I grant you that things -- I'm quite sure that there are unfortunate things that are going on and that are happening. The idea is, are they legitimately and in good faith making progress in trying to solve that -- resolve that. And that's what the testimony will be, that they are.

I, again, would like to call your attention to the great turnaround and the exposure of what has been disinformation and outright false propaganda for so long about El Salvador and the fight down there, that was exposed in the turnout of people who, in the face of guerrilla ambushes, guerrilla threats against their lives, went to the polls to vote for order in government.

I said there was a flurry about land reform. I understand that that has turned around, that there are thousands of people who have been given the deeds to their plots of land now and that there are several hundred pending.

Q. Sir, you have a report before you that was given to you from the Justice Department. It shows the discriminations that actually exist on the books in Federal agencies and departments against women. Now, you're committed to take care of legal equity for women, and this report has not been made public. Would you please let us see it, and will you do something about it?

The President.  --  -- in high positions, a great number of them requiring confirmation. And that is continuing along that line, and that has a task force now -- in the Justice Department there is a task force that is working on this very question.

The President. No, then what we're doing with the task force that I've spoke about is one that is aimed, just as I have asked 50 Governors, and they have all appointed a representative, to go into all the statutes they can find in their States, as we did in California when I was Governor.

Indian democracy, which provides a unique opportunity for us to broaden and deepen the dialog we began last autumn in Mexico. Through our talks, we can help to reach a renewed recognition of the mutual importance of strong, constructive ties between India and the United States.

In searching for words to describe the focus of your visit to Washington this week, I came upon a statement that you had made in Delhi when Roy Jenkins visited in 1980. And at that time, you said, ``The great need in the world today is to so define national interest that it makes for greater harmony, greater equality and justice, and greater stability in the world.'' Well, that is more than an eloquent description of enlightened national interest. It can also serve to describe the foundation of the relationship between the United States and India, a relationship we seek to reaffirm this week. A strengthening of that relationship, based on better understanding, is particularly important at this time.

The conflicts and the tensions of the 1980's pose new challenges to our countries and to all nations which seek, as India and the United States do, freedom in a more stable, secure, and prosperous world. As leaders of the world's two largest democracies, sharing common ideals and values, we can learn much from one another in discussing concerns and exploring national purposes. From this understanding can come greater confidence in one another's roles on the world's stage and a rediscovery of how important we are to one another.

Prime Minister Gandhi, we recognize that there have been differences between our two countries, but these should not obscure all that we have in common, for we are both strong, proud, and independent nations guided by our own perceptions of our national interests. We both desire the peace and stability of the Indian Ocean area and the early end of the occupation of Afghanistan.

It is difficult to imagine two nations more different than ours. As history goes, your country is a young one. Over the years, it has held unparalleled attraction for the adventurous and daring, for the talented as well as for the persecuted. It has stood for opportunity and freedom. The endeavors of the early pioneers, the struggle for human values, the coming together of different races have enabled it to retain its elan and dynamism of youth. With leadership and high ideals, it has grown into a great power. Today, its role in world affairs is unmatched. Every word and action of the President is watched and weighed and has global repercussions.

India is an ancient country, and history weighs heavily on us. The character of its people is formed by the palimpsest of its varied experiences.  The circumstances of its present development are shadowed by its years of colonialism and exploitation. Yet, our ancient philosophy has withstood all onslaughts, absorbing newcomers, adapting ideas and cultures. We have developed endurance and resilience.

In India, our preoccupation is with building and development. Our problem is not to influence others, but to consolidate our political and economic independence. We believe in freedom with a passion that only those who have been denied it can understand. We believe in equality, because many in our country were so long deprived of it. We believe in the worth of the human being, for that is the foundation of our democracy and our work for development. That is the framework of our national programs.

We have no global interests, but we are deeply interested in the world and its affairs. Yet, we cannot get involved in power groupings. That would be neither to our advantage, nor would it foster world peace. Our hand of friendship is stretched out to all. One friendship does not come in the way of another. This is not a new stand; that has been my policy since I became Prime Minister in 1966.

No two countries can have the same angle of vision, but each can try to appreciate the points of view of the others. Our effort should be to find a common area, howsoever small, on which to build and to enhance cooperation. I take this opportunity to say how much we in India value the help we have received from the United States in our stupendous tasks.

Reagan. I thank you, Mr. President, for your kind invitation, for your welcome, and your gracious words. I bring to you, to the First Lady, and to the great American people the sincere greetings and good wishes of the government and people of India.

The Prime Minister and I and Secretary Shultz and other members of our government have had a long and meaningful discussion on a wide range of subjects. Often we came at these subjects from different perspectives born of different national experiences and roles in the world. But throughout I have been struck by the strength, the intelligence, and the determination of the Prime Minister, not only in explaining her views but in seeking a clear understanding of ours. The dialog of discovery that we began at Cancun matured in our discussions today and will, I trust, bear important fruit in the days and years ahead.

And India stands in eloquent refutation of all those who argue that democratic institutions are not equal to the task of dealing with today's problems, or are irrelevant to the needs of today's developing nations. For these reasons, India serves as a beacon not only to developing nations which seek to emulate its experience but to all of us who seek renewal of our faith in democracy.

You can understand, Madam Prime Minister, why we are honored to have you here. It's not only because you're the leader of a great nation, one whose history, civilization, size, and influence on the world command our attention and respect, but also because you're the representative of a family which has been in so many ways the architect of that nation.

Adams family. They came from Massachusetts, not Kashmir. They came -- by coincidence they were often referred to as Boston Brahmins. [Laughter] And theirs, too, was a tradition of scholarship, sacrifice, and public service. Successive generations of Adamses contributed to our national development, first by struggling for independence and articulating our national ideals, then through years of selfless effort toward their attainment. So you, Madam Prime Minister, your father, and each of your sons have served India.

The recent summit at Versailles proved once again, as I told the British Parliament, that even in times of severe economic strain, free peoples can work together freely and voluntarily to address problems as serious as inflation, unemployment, trade, and economic development in a spirit of cooperation and solidarity. In our bilateral relationship as well, democratic principles are the foundation on which we can build the framework of a lasting and durable friendship. The day-to-day reality of our close ties, whether in the fields of education, the arts, science, or commerce, all flow from the same basic understanding that although our countries may travel separate paths from time to time, our destination remains the same.

For my part, Madam Prime Minister, our talks today were particularly useful in reaffirming the inherent strength of our relationship. Our frank discussions have contributed greatly to the stripping away of stereotypes which have sometimes surrounded our relations. We look forward now to a renewal of cooperation based on the shared understanding of our common values and our common aspirations.

Entering the White House, one cannot but think of the men of vision and energy and the women of character and grace who have lived here, who have influenced people's minds and the course of world events. Awesome indeed are the responsibilities of the United States and its President. In far-off India, at a time when communications were not as satisfactory, our own freedom struggle drew inspiration from the makers of your nation. How farseeing and wise they were, and how well they built.

America amongst the foremost nations in examples of justice and liberality.'' Since those words were uttered, the United States has become the world's foremost country in wealth, in technology, and in vigor of intellect. The combination of these qualities is indeed something of which you can be justifiably proud.

Our challenges in India have not been less. We have charted our own course, fortunate in leaders who took sustenance from our timeless philosophy, as well as modern concepts, putting them to work as instruments of action.

Our national movement reinforced the age-old unity which had held our country together through the ups and downs of history, across the shifting borders of hundreds of kingdoms, and bridging succeeding dynasties. After independence it was our task to usher in a more egalitarian society which would ensure social and economic justice to all regardless of religion, caste, language, or sex. For us economic progress means not only material well-being but moving nearly 500 million from one age to another, with the minimum dislocation or alienation from their roots.

Few things are good or bad in themselves. Their effect and importance lies in what one makes of them. Tradition, especially ours, which has been a factor for unity, for tolerance, and harmony, and for our people's cultural literacy, can be used as a tool, paradoxical though it may sound, for change and modernity. Life for a person or a country is a series of choices, not between the correct and the incorrect, which a computer can make, but in terms of opting for a course which will be consistent with our ethos and individuality, our past history and future aspirations.

Our struggle for independence was nonviolent. We chose democracy based on the British system but with some modifications, and the American Constitution influenced the shaping of our own Constitution. Our planning is not for regimentation, but to help us to take rational decisions and meet the competing demands of different sections of society and regions.

In India, as in the U.S.A., we have a private sector as well as a public sector. I see no conflict between the two. We have persevered in the face of criticism, of aggression, of different types of interferences. We are not satisfied with our success; we could have done better. Yet, notwithstanding the tremendous odds, we have moved forward.

There has been significant progress in agriculture and industry, in science and technology, and in the social services. The very fact that life expectancy has gone up by 20 years indicates improvement in living and working conditions. We aim at self-reliance. So, it is befitting that 90 percent of the resources needed for this gigantic endeavor of modernizing the country have come from our own people, impoverished though they are thought to be. But the remaining 10 percent or so is important, for that represents the inflow of modern technology.

In this we have been helped by the United States, by countries of Western and Eastern Europe, and several international institutions. We particularly appreciate American technical assistance. In consonance with our independent stand, we take cooperation in science, trade, or defense requirements from wherever it suits our national interest.

If India were considered in economic or military terms, it would not count. Yet our voice is heard, because in spite of our poverty and economic backwardness and often looking beyond our immediate interests, we have fearlessly spoken up for the rights of the underprivileged and the threatened and have championed the cause of peace and freedom. We have always viewed our problems in the much larger perspective of global problems.

It is good that meetings between heads of state and government, individually and at conferences, are taking place more often. They do take us away from urgent tasks at home, but national and international problems are increasingly interlinked. Cancun dealt with various global issues, Versailles with the economic and other problems of the North, touching also on North-South questions. At the New Delhi Meeting of Developing Countries, the focus was on cooperation between themselves.

On earlier occasions I have pointed out that the future of advanced and developing countries is so closely intertwined that cooperation would benefit both. This is not merely a question of social justice and equity. My own view is that developing countries can contribute significantly to the emerging world economic order. Theirs are the potentially large markets which would help developed countries like the United States to maintain higher profitability on their investment, higher rates of growth, and to generate more employment.

To our minds there are three main causes of the present disturbing situation: the growth of armaments; the increasing disparity between the rich and the poor, both between and within nations; and the thoughtless wounding of our Earth.

Mr. President, may I say how much I appreciate your invitation to me. In a world where crises so swiftly follow one another, it is important to keep in touch and exchange views even if one cannot agree on all points.

We have had, as you have just told us, discussions which have been important and useful to us and, I think, which have created better understanding. I thank you once again, and Mrs. Reagan, for your gracious hospitality, for this delightful evening in such elegant and impressive surroundings.

May I now ask you all, ladies and gentlemen, to join me in a toast to the health of the President and the gracious First Lady, to the well-being of the American people, and to friendship between our two countries.

The U.S.-U.S.S.R. grain agreement, which has governed our grain trade with the Soviet Union since 1976, is due to expire September 30. After discussion in the Cabinet, I have authorized U.S. officials to explore the possibility with the Soviet Union of a 1-year extension of the existing grain agreement. I have further authorized them to explore in the consultations with the Soviets, normally conducted under the agreement, the possibility of additional grain sales to the Soviet Union.

December 29th, I postponed such negotiations until the Soviet Union indicates that it is prepared to permit the process of reconciliation in Poland to go forward and demonstrates this desire with deeds and not just words. My decision reinforces this objective. The Soviets should not be afforded the additional security of a new long-term grain agreement as long as repression continues in Poland.

At the same time, American farmers will not be made to bear alone the burdens of this policy toward the Soviet Union. In the spring of 1981, I lifted the grain embargo imposed by the previous administration, because it was not having the desired effect of seriously penalizing the U.S.S.R. for its brutal invasion and occupation of Afghanistan. Instead, alternative suppliers of this widely available commodity stepped in to make up for the grain which would have been normally supplied by U.S. farmers. These developments substantially undercut the tremendous sacrifices of our farmers, and I vowed at that time not to impose a grain embargo unilaterally unless it was part of a general cutoff of trade between the United States and the Soviet Union.

I renew that pledge to American farmers today. American farmers can be assured that they will continue to have a fair opportunity to export grain to the U.S.S.R. on a cash basis. Other suppliers, who sometimes criticize our grain sales, also supply grain to the Soviet Union. Grain sales have little impact on Soviet military and industrial capabilities. They absorb hard currency earnings and feed the people of the Soviet Union, who are suffering most from the disastrous economic policies of the Soviet Government.

When General Washington directed the creation of the Badge of Military Merit specifically to honor our lower-ranking soldiers, he demonstrated a philosophy unheard of in contemporary Europe, which reserved military honors for officers and members of the nobility. Thus, our Nation's first military award recognized the spirit of voluntarism and selfless dedication of the average American which has been so fundamental to the American way of life ever since.

President Herbert Hoover as an award to be presented to Army personnel who were wounded or killed in combat against an enemy of the United States. It later was authorized for Navy, Marine, and Coast Guard personnel, and, now, all armed services personnel as well as certain civilian nationals are eligible to receive it.

Countless Americans have been wounded in combat while defending our great Nation against armed enemies. Because of the nature of their injuries, these Purple Heart recipients bear their battle wounds for life. Many more have made the supreme sacrifice, giving their lives for their country.

It is most fitting that this special group of veterans be recognized for their outstanding contributions to our Nation's security. It is also most fitting that we recognize the bicentennial anniversary of the creation of the Purple Heart and the fiftieth anniversary of its reestablishment as well as the fiftieth anniversary of the establishment of the Military Order of the Purple Heart.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 30th day of July in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

States, opening new frontiers and establishing missions and settlements that were the forerunners of some of our most important and thriving urban and cultural centers. Across the southern regions of our great country, from Florida to California, Hispanic explorers, pioneers, and settlers have helped to shape this vast land.

Since the time of our Revolution, when U.S. leaders shared with leaders in Latin America the common struggle of lifting the bonds of colonial rule, through the present, peoples of the Americas have shared great democratic ideals. In the words of Benito Juarez, a contemporary of Abraham Lincoln, ``Respect for the rights of others, between individuals, as between nations, is the basis of peace.'' These words convey the essence of our laws and values, preserving the dignity and equality of all our people.

In times of peace, the accomplishments of these Americans in science, technology, politics, the arts, and other important fields have greatly enhanced our way of life. In times of war, Hispanic Americans have defended our nation with pride and courage. Thirty-nine of them have received the Medal of Honor, America's highest military decoration. This is a higher proportion of such heroes than in any other group, and we salute their sacrifices and bravery.

As did earlier decades, the 1980s present Hispanic Americans with new opportunities to pursue their goals and advance our society. Like those before them today's Hispanic Americans meet their challenges and responsibilities with dignity and a creative spirit. Their energetic commitment to hard work and their determination to participate fully in the American Dream bring strength and inspiration to us all.

Nuclear-weapon states party to this treaty have agreed not to assist nonnuclear-weapon states to acquire nuclear explosives, and nonnuclear-weapon states have pledged not to acquire nuclear explosives. These mutual pledges recognize that the further spread of nuclear weapons threatens all nations.

The NPT also calls for parties to assist in the development of the peaceful uses of nuclear energy, especially in nonnuclear-weapon states which are parties to the treaty. The peaceful uses of nuclear energy are important to the well-being of many other peoples, and the United States takes its obligations for cooperation in this area seriously. We have long been in the forefront of those providing technical assistance and other cooperation in the nuclear field, and we are committed to continuing such cooperation under adequate safeguards.

The United States also recognizes its obligation under the NPT to pursue negotiations in good faith on effective measures relating to nuclear disarmament. This is an issue of major concern to all countries. I am personally committed to take whatever steps are necessary to increase the likelihood of real, substantive progress towards an agreement involving significant reductions in U.S. and Soviet strategic nuclear arsenals to equal more stable levels and that would be in the national security interests of both sides. The United States will also spare no effort to negotiate an equitable and verifiable agreement on intermediate-range nuclear forces that would reduce the risk of war in Europe and globally.

The United States played a major role in the negotiation of the NPT, and five U.S. Presidents over its lifetime have strongly supported the treaty as a cornerstone of the international effort to prevent the spread of nuclear explosives to additional countries. As we plan for the important NPT Review Conference in 1985, the United States will continue to strive to strengthen the viability of this treaty. I urge all countries that have not yet done so to join the growing consensus against the spread of nuclear explosives by adhering to the NPT.

In July 1981 I outlined a policy to prevent the proliferation of nuclear explosives, and declared that this issue was critical to future international peace and regional and global stability. But if we are to succeed in halting the spread of nuclear weapons, the nations of the world must work together. As I have announced on previous occasions, one key step would be for nuclear suppliers to agree on requiring comprehensive safeguards as a condition for any significant new nuclear supply commitment. This is not a policy that denies nuclear assistance, but rather one that conditions assistance on a reasonable demonstration that a nonnuclear-weapon state's entire program is dedicated to the peaceful use of nuclear energy. This demonstration has already been made by the 116 nonnuclear-weapon states that are parties to the NPT. It is my hope that agreement can be reached soon on this measure to strengthen the international nonproliferation regime.

On this the 15th anniversary of the opening of the NPT for signature, all states should rededicate themselves to achieving the purposes of this important treaty and to ensuring its continued vitality. That is both our shared responsibility and a contribution to peace for future generations.

On Monday, America will celebrate her 207th birthday. I love the Fourth of July. I enjoy picnics and fireworks and long summer days, and I get excited with the thought that millions of our people all across our great country will, on this Fourth of July weekend, join together in thinking about freedom and the men and women who sacrificed to make it our inheritance.

Now, you may not think of yourself or our democracy as an experiment, but look around. All over the world, millions and millions of people still live under tyranny. Their leaders claim that they're the wave of the future, that history is on their side. And yet, their people look to us for hope. Their people look to America as the cradle of freedom, the place where the great civilized ideas of individual liberty, representative government, and the rule of law under God are realities.

They were nurses who'd been captured in the Philippines during World War II and then spent nearly 3 years in prison camps. Lieutenant Colonel Madeline Ullom, who was captured at Corregidor, has described tending wounded soldiers during the long months of siege: ``Our atmosphere was one of dusty pall, ever present, in which we moved, worked, tried to eat, tried to breathe in an endless nightmare,'' she said.

In Santa Tomas Prison Camp, Colonel Ullom and her fellow nurses quickly organized into shifts and began to care for other prisoners. They fought against diseases and starvation. They lacked medicine and equipment and food. But miraculously, every one of the 81 American women POW's had survived.

These women would not describe themselves as extraordinary Americans; they simply volunteered to serve their country, and they chose to serve it with courage and hope. Their patriotism, as they gathered in Washington 40 years after their capture and imprisonment, remained strong and vibrant.

We've seen a great example of this kind of political courage just recently when a majority, made up of both Republicans and Democrats in the Congress, set aside narrow political considerations and embraced a bipartisan program for enhancing America's security and stability through meaningful arms reductions and modernization of our defenses.

It was not easy for many of these men and women to vote for the MX missile. Some have been harshly criticized by other Members in their own party. Indeed, they faced considerable pressure and corresponding political risks. While accepting such risks, the only benefit they've received is the knowledge that they placed foremost their hopes for successful arms reductions and greater security of their nation.

Our negotiators have been given instructions that provide greater flexibility in our negotiations with the Soviet Union. The proposals are fair, realistic, and would bring a much greater degree of stability for all the peoples of the world. There's absolutely no doubt that the prospects for success in our negotiations have been significantly improved because of the political courage shown by the Congress.

The task now is to be patient and to sustain our resolve. On this Fourth of July weekend, I salute those Members of the Congress who are putting the interests of America first. They're part of a long American tradition of proving democracy's critics wrong -- of showing that we have the courage to stand up for what is right and what is necessary.

It's always been my belief that by a Divine plan this nation was placed between the two oceans to be sought out and found by those with a special brand of courage and love of freedom. Can we imagine the courage it took back in 1620 to pick up family, bid goodby to friends, board those small ships, and set sail across a mighty ocean toward a new future in an unknown world?

But look closer. Look in our own neighborhoods and families, and you will see America is still a land of heroes with all the courage and love of freedom that ever was before. And that's our best hope for the future.

We're a melting pot. And our body and spirit have never been stronger or richer, thanks to hundreds of thousands of new heroes -- the brave men, women, and children who risked death to escape their communist prisons in Asia and Cuba. They arrived less than 10 years ago. Most were not able to speak a word of English. But with their courage and faith, they brought unbounded determination to work, produce, succeed, and excel. Now, more and more of them are becoming leaders in their communities -- small businessowners, hard-working taxpayers, even valedictorians in their high school graduating class. We can be proud and thankful that they're joining us today in parades and ballgames and backyard barbecues as young members of an old family.

And how can we ignore the countless other examples of courage and love of neighbor from everyday Americans -- people like that grandmother in New York who collared a robber and gave him the back of her hand until the police arrived; people all across the country who've been battling angry spring floods and rising rivers so they could save the property and maybe the lives of their families and friends.

Don't let anyone tell us that America's best days are behind her, that the American spirit has been lost. I've never felt stronger than I do now that our people are coming together and that America is moving forward again. I've never been more convinced that fundamental problems of the economy, education, and national defense -- neglected for too many years -- are now being addressed and can be solved.

They will be solved if we believe in each other and in those values that make us a great and loving people. Think about it. We work and educate for freedom, for service of the ideal of liberty, not for subservience to the state.

Our notion of education is the most revolutionary idea conceived by mankind. When our scholars and teachers learn something new, they can't wait to teach it to our children. But in a totalitarian country, you're not allowed to read books or discuss ideas that aren't approved by censors. You're not allowed to have a computer in your home, because you might obtain information or knowledge that would make you a threat to the state.

We, the people, have only begun to write a great story that will be passed down through time -- the story of America. I'm reminded of a verse I once read about Old Glory. The Red, White, and Blue is a testament to the unity and patriotism of our people and to the deep love and commitment we have for our country, our freedom, and our way of life. The verse was written as if the flag was speaking to us, now and for generations to come.

Yours is a sacred mission. In the words of Henry Adams, ``A teacher affects eternity.'' Each of you, as tiring and routine as your daily duties may sometimes seem, is a keeper of the American dream, the American future. By informing and exercising young minds, by transmitting learning and values, you are the vital link between all that is most precious in our national heritage and our children and grandchildren, who will some day take up the burdens of guiding the greatest, freest society on Earth.

Oh, I know there's a pretty big education organization out there, but it's been my experience that dedication, open-mindedness, and initiative count for just as much as size. It seems to me that in all three categories the AFT, like Avis, tries a lot harder. For this, you have my sincere admiration and my pledge to work with you in building a creative, lasting dialog on a subject close to all our hearts: the renewal of excellence in American education.

Of course, we have our differences, and both this administration and the AFT believe in the benefits of vigorous debate. And that's what living in an open, free society is all about. We've both made our positions well known. And I'm not here today as a salesman trying to peddle a prepackaged, all-purpose, off-the-rack education program. I am fully aware that there are some major areas where we disagree -- matters like tuition tax credits and vouchers. But it's the very genius of our democratic, pluralistic system, our society, the key to its unequaled success over more than two centuries, that individuals who sincerely disagree on some matters can still work together in mutual respect and understanding to serve a higher goal. And I defy anyone to name a higher common goal of domestic policy than working for a renaissance in American education.

Not that long ago, American public education was one of the marvels of the world. Wave after wave of immigrants from the far corners of the Earth came to our shores with little more than the clothes on their backs and hope in their hearts. Many were illiterate, victims of grinding poverty here as well as in the old country. But the public school system, often within a single generation, provided a magic ladder to full participation in American life. And it taught their children more than just the skills they needed for a more abundant life; it taught them the solid values of good citizenship.

And, you know, speaking of that, I don't know whether -- I just came across this little item the other day about a teacher at a very, very beginning level of elementary education, who was having a little trouble at that tender age -- his students, in telling them about how you, where you put your hand when you recited the Pledge and all. They didn't really know the location of the internal organs, and putting their hand on their heart didn't mean too much to them. And finally he showed the ingenuity that is typical of good teaching. He told them to put their hands on the alligators.

Our public schools have played a great historic role in shaping our democracy, and they have a crucial role to play today. You in the AFT can help lead the way, and that's why I'm less deterred by the differences between us than I am encouraged by the important areas of agreement that we share.

The AFT wants to upgrade standards -- including emphasis on testing both students and beginning teachers, changing curriculum to strengthen academic requirements, and increasing homework assignments. Well, so do I.

The AFT supports many aspects of this administration's bilingual education legislation, which favors local autonomy in deciding what method will be most effective to teach children who are limited in their ability to speak English. We both agree that children who are truly in need and cannot function in English in a regular classroom environment deserve help. But we also recognize that bilingual programs should serve as a bridge to full participation in the American mainstream. They should never permanently segregate non-English-speaking students in a way that will make it harder, not easier, for them to succeed in life.

There are so many other values and beliefs that we share. The AFT understands the importance of a strong national defense, not just for our own sake but for the sake of our friends and allies in the Americas, Europe, Asia, and the Middle East. Only a strong, credible America can preserve our freedom at home, deter aggression, pursue the cause of meaningful arms reductions, and stand by our friends in time of need.

I also want to commend the AFT for its recognition of the need to upgrade math and science education and for its ringing condemnation of those organizations, one of which I referred to earlier, who would exploit teaching positions and manipulate curriculum for propaganda purposes. On this last issue, you stand in bright contrast to those who have promoted curriculum guides that seem to be more aimed at frightening and brainwashing American schoolchildren, than at fostering learning and stimulating balanced, intelligent debate.

Working together, we can accomplish so much. And we know there is so much to do. When I ran for President in 1980, I said that this country must recognize the problems in our educational system and start doing something about them.

We can only admire the dedication with which the great majority of teachers has tried to meet these problems, because, let's face it, it wasn't you, the teachers, who created and condoned the drug culture, sexual license, and violence in our society. It wasn't you, the teachers, who encouraged the banality of TV over the beauty of the written word. And it wasn't teachers who asked for a Washington-knows-best attitude that too often showered you with rules, regulations, and uniformity, while discouraging the rich variety and excellence of our heritage. For too long you've been fighting a lonely war, and it's about time you got some reinforcement from the rest of us.

And that was one of the main reasons I moved early in this administration to do something never tried before. We wanted a thorough, no-holds-barred study that would stimulate debate and action. So, we set up a bipartisan group, the National Commission on Excellence in Education.

The Commission found that about 13 percent of our 17-year-olds are functional illiterates, and the rate was much higher than that for minority youth. About four-fifths of our highschoolers can't write a decent essay. And most of them do less than an hour of homework a night.

Well, predictably, some people are already wringing their hands at this bad news and casting about for scapegoats. But I deeply believe that this cloud has a silver lining. I believe it can mobilize, energize, and unify this country in a way that we haven't seen for years. Instead of worrying about whether we put together a Republican plan or a Democratic plan, can't we join together on a course of common sense for an American plan? Let us stand together -- parents, teachers, concerned citizens -- and let us say yes to the challenge of a national agenda for excellence that will uplift every child in our land.

America's not a defeatist nation. We came back from Pearl Harbor to win the greatest military victory in history. We came back from the shock of sputnik to send our astronauts to the Moon and bring them safely home. I believe the nation that met those great challenges can surely meet another. Let us resolve today: The United States will not only reverse its decline in college board scores, we will raise verbal and math scores at least 50 points and do it within the next decade.

At the heart of the Commission's report and our agenda are two themes I've long advocated. First, true excellence in education will require much greater emphasis on the basics -- basic skills of learning and teaching with discipline, basic standards and rewards for excellence, and basic values of parental involvement and community control. Second, to meet the demands of this fast-changing world, we need also to broaden our vision of education. Education must become more than just the province and responsibility of our schools. It's also an integral part of our homes, churches, synagogues, communities, and workplaces. And we must recognize that.

The board in Ypsilanti, Michigan, has voted to extend their elementary school day and raise high school graduation requirements. In Illinois, high school graduation requirements are also being increased. Ditto for Washington State and also Virginia where the school board of education plans to overhaul their public school curriculum this summer.

Endowment for the Humanities, is offering summer seminars so high school teachers can increase their teaching competence in history, literature, and the other humanities. We recognize, as most of you, as most teachers always have, that good teaching also means a life-long commitment to learning.

I also want to commend the AFT for its fair, openminded approach to other potential means of encouraging good teaching and good teachers. I'm thinking of things like new approaches to differential pay, such as the proposal of Governor Lamar Alexander of Tennessee, which would include peer review. By engaging in free and open discussion and by demonstrating a willingness to examine new ideas even when they may require thinking, or rethinking long-held views, the AFT is once again providing an example of positive leadership and winning respect for the teaching community. Working with you, with State and local leaders, and with parents and concerned citizens across the country, we can and we will climb the lofty peak to excellence in education.

I appreciate this opportunity to meet with you today. I hope it'll prove to be the first chapter in a long and productive relationship. We won't always agree. Life would be pretty dull if we did. But with a spirit of positive, candid cooperation, we can do much for the country we love and for the young people we serve.

I will, therefore, proclaim import relief but in a modified form and duration from that recommended by the USITC. I will impose relief for four years rather than three, as recommended by the USITC, to provide time for the industry to complete important investment projects, improve productivity, and regain profitability. I have decided to provide relief in a form consistent with my belief in minimal government interference in the marketplace, and which will facilitate the orderly adjustment of the industry while recognizing the substantial differences in the competitive conditions of the various segments of the industry.

For flat rolled products (55 percent of imports), I will proclaim four years of digressive tariffs. For stainless steel sheet and strip, (excluding razor blade strip and type 434 cladding grade stainless sheet), the tariffs will be increased by 10 percent ad valorem in the first year, declining to 8, 6 and 4 percent in subsequent years. For stainless steel plate, the tariff will be increased by 8 percent in the first year, declining to 6, 5 and 4 percent in subsequent years.

In recognition of the weaker competitive position of the stainless steel rod, bar and alloy tool steel sectors, I will proclaim 4 year global quotas that will expand at an annual rate of three percent.

I also direct you to undertake an annual review of the necessity for and effectiveness of import relief. Should conditions change or inadequate adjustment efforts be undertaken, you may, in consultation with the Trade Policy Committee, obtain USITC advice and propose changes in the terms of relief.

In accordance with Section 203(b)(1) of the Trade Act of 1974, I am writing to inform you of my decision today to grant import relief to the specialty steel industry. My serious concerns last November about the health of the industry led me to direct the United States Trade Representative to ask the United States International Trade Commission to initiate this investigation. The USITC found specialty steel imports to be a substantial cause of serious injury to the industry. Imports have depressed U.S. prices and captured market share from U.S. producers. This has had the effect of reducing domestic production and capacity utilization, resulting in major losses by most producers. Employment has also fallen significantly.

The relief program I am implementing is tailored to the needs of the industry as well as the objective of trade liberalization as expressed at the Williamsburg summit. It is part of a comprehensive and coordinated approach to this industry's trade problems. In addition to applying import relief under Section 201, I have directed USTR to continue its efforts to achieve the multilateral elimination of trade barriers.

My decision differs in some respects from the USITC proposal. I have recommended relief for four years instead of three to give the industry sufficient time to complete investment projects, improve productivity, and restore profitability. This relief package has been adopted in order to reflect the substantial differences in the competitive conditions of the various parts of the industry.

Tariffs applied to the flat-rolled products will be at levels less restrictive than the relief suggested by the USITC. Producers of flat-rolled stainless steel are on the whole more efficient, progressive, and competitive than their counterparts in the non-flat-rolled industry who have faced greater import competition. They have also recently succeeded in using our antidumping and countervailing duty statutes to obtain special duties on unfairly traded imports from three of their principal foreign competitors. These duties will be added to the normal tariff and the additional tariffs to be imposed under Section 203. Consequently, greater relief is needed for producers of non-flat-rolled products to enable them to make necessary investments.

America, and in order to eliminate an agency reporting requirement which has proved ineffective and which consumes resources that could be employed in a more effective manner to prevent antitrust violations, Executive Order No. 10936, of April 24, 1961, is hereby revoked.

Last January, in my State of the Union address, I declared this administration's commitment to achieve greater equity for women in the pension field. Today's court ruling has largely achieved this goal and marks a major step forward in making America an even more fair and just society.

Court in support of equal benefits for women and men under employer-sponsored pension benefit plans. In its decision today, the court decided that such equal benefits must be paid to women and men for pension credits they accrue from this day forward. This decision is a milestone for working women and represents the kind of real legal equity between men and women which I believe we can achieve through existing statutory and legal processes.

In the months ahead, in cooperation with the Congress, we will work for legislative changes consistent with the court's decision and will continue to seek other ways of guaranteeing fair treatment under the law for the women of America.

Day by day, month by month, America is gathering strength and moving forward. We still have a long way to go, but the recovery is spreading. Our most pressing task is to keep it rolling while holding down inflation, and that means holding down Federal spending. I urge the Members of the Congress -- both Republicans and Democrats -- to work with us and exercise the discipline we need to continue building a new era of lasting growth for the American people.

The President. I told my staff that I wanted everyone there to hear directly from me that they were to make themselves available; if they had any information whatsoever to take it and tell it to the FBI, to the Justice Department, in the investigation which I had ordered of this entire incident.

We're seeing strong economic growth, and we're seeing it while inflation is at its lowest level in a decade -- 3\1/2\ percent over the last year. This sharply lower inflation and the first decent tax cut since the 1960's are allowing families to keep more of their own earnings to spend or save.

Contrary to propaganda blasts you hear, America is heading in a better direction today than before. For example, thanks to the tax cuts and our progress against inflation, a medium-income family earning $25,000 has nearly $600 more in purchasing power today than in 1980.

Well, we haven't abolished inflation or high taxes, but we're gaining on them. Your after-tax purchasing power helps determine your economic well-being. But this fact is ignored by the big spenders who claim to carry the banner of fairness and compassion. According to them, the whole issue of fairness revolves around government spending programs. And even on government spending, some of them have been misleading you. You've been led to believe that any budget savings in these programs would hurt the needy, and that's not true.

The problem we set out to solve back when we inherited those record inflation and interest rates was not government doing too much for the needy, but government doing too much for the nonneedy. Before our budget reforms were passed, surveys indicated that 2 out of every 5 dollars in benefits went to those with total incomes and benefits well above the poverty line. Also, some of the programs to help the poor had the effect of keeping them poor and dependent, robbing them of their self-respect.

America is a wealthy nation, but our wealth is not unlimited. So, we've tried to face up to the reality too many have ignored. Unless we prune nonessential programs, unless we end benefits for those who should not be subsidized by their fellow taxpayers, we won't have enough resources to meet the requirements of those who must have our help. And helping those who truly need assistance is what fairness in government spending should be all about. We're trying to do this.

Our budget request for 1984 would have the Federal Government spend, after inflation, two-and-a-half times what it spent in 1970 on assistance to the poor. So while, yes, there have been some cuts, they've been nowhere near as draconian as critics charge. Why haven't you had this information? Well, maybe one reason is the drumbeat of gloom and doom from misery merchants in some of the media.

The truth is low-income Americans are receiving more food assistance in 1983 than ever before in history. During our administration, food assistance has grown by 34 percent. More people are being served and the grants for the neediest have been increased. We subsidize in whole or in part 95 million meals a day.

The average food stamp benefit, per person, has grown faster than the increase in food prices through inflation. The infant mortality rate has continued to decline. A greater percentage of school-lunch-program dollars are dedicated to providing meals for children of low-income families. Subsidies for meals served to children from low-income families have also increased in this administration.

Our administration is also distributing surplus cheese, butter, powdered milk, rice, flour, honey, and cornmeal to the needy and elderly. This is in addition to commodities regularly provided to schools and charitable institutions. The total comes to $1.7 billion so far.

Those budget reductions you've heard so much about have been achieved by improving efficiency, reducing dependency, cutting waste and abuse, and targeting on the neediest families. And that's as it should be. We're committed to fairness, and we'll continue to take actions needed to bring it about throughout our society.

Next week we'll be taking a new initiative to keep a pledge I made in my State of the Union address -- the pledge to strengthen enforcement of fair housing laws for all Americans. We believe in the bold promise that no person in the United States should be denied full freedom of choice in the selection of housing because of race, color, religion, sex, or national origin. We're proposing a series of amendments that will put real teeth into the Fair Housing Act.

For example, the Justice Department can now act on complaints only when there's reason to believe there exists a practice of discrimination. Under our proposal, if conciliation fails, Secretary Pierce at HUD could forward individual complaints to the Attorney General for litigation. We're also proposing to extend the current law to prohibit discrimination on the basis of handicap or size of family. And our proposal will create substantial civil penalties for landlords and others found violating the law. This will include stiff fines up to $50,000 for a first offense and $100,000 for a second offense.

We believe this is an important step for civil rights. For a family deprived of its freedom of choice in choosing a home, our proposal will mean swift action and strong civil penalties to prevent discrimination in the first place. As I said, we're committed to fairness and we're committed to use the full power of the Federal Government whenever and wherever even one person's constitutional rights are being unjustly denied.

Government's international activities in the field of science and technology. This report, as were its predecessors, has been prepared by the Department of State in collaboration with other concerned Federal agencies.

In the past year, there have been several important developments in our international science relationships, all of them reflecting one of our principal foreign policy goals -- to give science and technology a more prominent position in our relations with other countries. This is important not only to the conduct of our foreign relations, but to the successful fulfillment of many of our own science and technology objectives. As I have indicated in my Annual Science and Technology Report to the Congress, international collaboration can help advance many of our own national interests. Thus, I have asked my science advisor, Dr. George Keyworth, to pay special attention to international affairs and, throughout the Federal Government, concerted action has been taken to demonstrate our commitment to using the advances in science to overcome both national and international challenges.

There has been substantial progress. For the first time, international science cooperation was a subject for discussion among the leaders of the principal industrial democracies at the Versailles Summit. Those discussions led to a study by the Summit countries of the relationship between technology, employment, and growth, and to the establishment of eighteen new projects for cooperation among us. Although these projects will, in the first instance, be led by one or another of the Summit countries, they could eventually involve other countries and international organizations and lead, in time, to advances for countries of the Third World. These projects for enhanced cooperation were endorsed by the heads of state at the Williamsburg Summit and it was agreed that we would discuss them again at our next meeting.

Last July, Prime Minister Gandhi and I initiated a new program for enhanced scientific collaboration between the United States and India. A group of some of the most distinguished scientists from both our countries met in India in January and prepared a far-reaching program in medicine, agriculture, meteorology, and energy. Work began in April 1983, and we expect to see the first results within the next twenty-four months.

Similarly, when I visited Brazil late last year, President Figueiredo and I reaffirmed our desire to strengthen science and technology collaboration. We have developed a program for joint work in five significant areas and, as part of our projected joint efforts in space, I proposed that a Brazilian payload specialist train with American astronauts for participation in a future space shuttle mission. When President Zia of Pakistan came to Washington in December, we agreed to establish a new Joint Commission to coordinate several bilateral activities, including common undertakings in science and technology.

U.S.-PRC Joint Commission for Scientific and Technological Cooperation. At the conclusion of the meeting, three new protocols on cooperation in nuclear physics and magnetic fusion, aeronautical science and technology, and transportation science and technology were signed.

These supplement seventeen existing protocols that already include agriculture, students and scholars, space technology, high energy physics and hydropower. In addition to the new protocols a memorandum of understanding on cooperation in the basic biomedical sciences was also signed.

It is in our fundamental interest to advance our relations with China. Science and technology are an essential part of that relationship and I have taken steps recently to ensure that China has improved access to the U.S. technology it needs for its economic modernization goals. We will continue to assist China through mutually beneficial cooperative efforts in science and technology.

We are continuing our cooperation with the U.S.S.R. in science and technology. This is a complex matter made more difficult because of Soviet behavior regarding Afghanistan and Poland, as well as their efforts to acquire sensitive Western technology. Decisions to renew agreements are being made on a case-by-case basis taking these concerns into account along with the benefits to the U.S. through participation. For example, I have recently approved the renewal of an agreement for cooperation with the Soviets on atomic energy, with appropriate limitations to protect our interests while letting the work proceed.

These examples suggest the range of our international effort in science and technology, but they are hardly exclusive. We have programs with more than three dozen countries, in every part of the world, at every level of sophistication. Science, as we know, has always had a special international character, and the advancement of science can make profound contributions to freedom and prosperity around the world. These tasks are formidable, for our scale of measurement must be decades, even generations. For this reason alone, our government, in a cooperative spirit, will continue to work closely with others prepared to join with us.

The Protocols extend both Conventions through June 30, 1986. They maintain the framework for international cooperation in wheat trade matters, continue the existence of the International Wheat Council, and extend the parties' commitments to provide minimum annual quantities of cereals food aid to developing countries.

Under Mr. Chapman, the reconstituted Office of Planning and Evaluation will serve as a catalyst for increasing long-range research support from Federal offices outside the White House and for seeking similar assistance from persons and groups outside the Government. The Office also will help stimulate the climate for public discussion of long-range issues of importance to the President's goals. Within the White House, the Office will participate in strategic planning and program analysis. In addition, Mr. Chapman will report on demographic developments and will suggest improvements in the Government's statistical system.

The Federal Fair Housing Act was enacted by the Congress 15 years ago. It stands as a bold promise that no person in the United States should be denied full freedom of choice in the selection of housing because of race, color, religion, sex, or national origin. Since its passage, however, a consensus has developed that the Fair Housing Act has delivered short of its promise because of a gap in its enforcement mechanism.

Secretary of Housing and Urban Development through informal methods of conference, conciliation, or persuasion. This informal process is the best and most effective procedure that can be devised for speedy and non-burdensome relief for individual victims of discrimination. It has worked well when it has been approached in good faith by all parties to the dispute. The Secretary achieves conciliation in roughly three-fourths of the cases in which a determination to resolve through conciliation is made, and the success rate of conciliation by State and local agencies to which complaints are referred is comparable. But as few as the cases may be where conciliation is unsuccessful, they are too many.

Effective enforcement of our Nation's fair housing laws is . . . essential to ensuring equal opportunity. In the year ahead, we will work to strengthen enforcement of fair housing laws for all Americans.

The central objective of the proposed legislation which I am transmitting today is to supply the missing ingredient to effective enforcement. I propose that when conciliation fails, the Secretary may refer the complaint to the Attorney General with the recommendation that an action be commenced on behalf of the United States in Federal District Court. This expands the current jurisdiction of the Justice Department, now limited to cases of discriminatory patterns or practices, to include cases involving individual victims of discrimination. It thus places the leadership in enforcement where it belongs, with the Federal Government rather than with the individual victim. And in order to emphasize the clear public interest in the prevention of discriminatory housing practices as well as to add teeth to the enforcement arsenal, it authorizes the Attorney General to seek substantial civil penalties in addition to equitable relief. While the maximum penalties are severe -- as they ought to be in cases of violation of the basic right to be free from illegal discrimination -- the tribunal with power to impose these remedies is that one which has earned and enjoyed the confidence of the American people over our history for its impartiality, independence, and fairness.

The proposed legislation also will extend coverage of the Fair Housing Act to prohibit discrimination on the basis of handicap. The need to extend the protection of this statute to the handicapped is a subject on which a clear consensus of the Congress emerged during the unsuccessful attempt to adopt amendments in the 96th Congress.

And now, just, welcome to the White House. And I think that Ted Bell [Secretary of Education] will agree when I say there isn't a group who belongs here more than you, America's finest educators. I'm very proud and happy to have you here.

Behind each of your awards, of course, are countless individual children whose lives you've touched, whose minds you've broadened, and whose character you've helped shape. The knowledge, the judgment, and the love that you've shared will follow them through their lives, and that will enrich all of us. On behalf of a grateful nation, I thank you.

Companies, and Good Housekeeping magazine. Together they've sponsored the National Teacher of the Year competition for more than three decades, promoting and rewarding excellence in our classrooms. And that's just the kind of cooperation and initiative that we need more of if we're to get our education system and our country back on track.

Someone once said that a school is a building that has four walls and tomorrow inside. Our history has been a testament of the fact that our education system, the key that unlocked the golden door of opportunity for our people, has been in those buildings. When our forebears were throwing up makeshift towns across our wilderness continent, among the first structures that they built were the churches, and then came the schoolhouses.

And as a matter of fact, the tradition of the little church-related college -- where I went to college in Illinois, Eureka College, the tradition there has -- it was reversed when Ben Major, in command of the wagon train, and they stopped in a walnut grove of trees and decided that this was where they would settle, he sank an ax in a tree and said, ``Here we will build our school.'' And they built their school before they built anything, or their own homes.

There's nothing the matter with our children, and I'd like to make it plain once and for all: There's nothing the matter with America's teachers. You are people who savor the sound of a well-turned phrase and delight in introducing youth to Shakespeare, knowing that it was youth that Shakespeare loved. You best understand how a mastery of math can help master life, how science can open endless worlds of the imagination, and how history teaches judgment and perspective.

Many of you have been waving a red warning flag for years now, calling for more stress on basics and pointing out how society has discouraged some of our most capable people from choosing teaching careers. It's time America listened to you again, respected you again, and rewarded your effort and excellence with salaries that will encourage our best young people to follow in your footsteps.

That's why Secretary Bell and I have been pushing hard for a national agenda for excellence in education. And one of the first items on it is the concept of merit pay for teachers. If we want to achieve excellence, we must reward it. It's a simple American philosophy that dominates many other professions, so why not this one? There are plenty of outstanding teachers outside of this room. They're teaching in classrooms all across America. What we must do is find them, promote them, and hold them up as role models not just for other teachers but for our children.

There are many important jobs in American life, but I can't think of any that are more important than teaching. As I told a group of journalists recently, I remember the high school teacher who changed my life: B. J. Fraser -- Dixon, Illinois. He taught English and drama. But most important, he channeled my imagination in ways that set it free. I owe him a great deal.

William Ellery Channing, an early American clergyman, once said that ``it is a greater work to educate a child than to rule a state.'' What he said was right then, as America set her first minorities -- or priorities, I should say. And it is still true today as we return to them.

America's parents, administrators, and officeholders must join with you in a new campaign for educational excellence. With your continued help and dedication and our renewed commitment, we can and will restore America's ability to educate all our children to the highest standards we know.

So, thank you very much -- not only for coming here today but for dedicating your lives to our children and to our future. And just let me know how I can be of help to you. Good luck, and God bless you all.

Although you have already stayed the course with me far beyond your original intention (and, I'm afraid, at considerable sacrifice to your own private business career), I want you to know how grateful I am for all your help, advice and innovative assistance.

In 1980 I joined the majority of Americans feeling that this country was going in the wrong direction. You brought the nation hope that we did not have to be a victim of economic forces but that by trying some new ideas we could master the problems we faced.

Through your leadership our hopes have been realized. The turnaround has been tougher than we had originally hoped, but it has not been the calamity that was inevitable had you not taken the helm. You have made a real difference.

As you and I have discussed, it is now time for me to return to the private sector; therefore, with this letter I tender my resignation effective July 31, 1983. As I leave I am asking you for one more opportunity -- the opportunity to help you be re-elected for a second term. Lucy joins me in leaving you and Nancy with our every good wish.

I am today signing S. 273, a bill that would amend section 8(a) of the Small Business Act to extend two pilot programs designed to assist minority business development. My approval of this bill demonstrates this administration's continuing commitment to minority business.

Small Business Administration (SBA) that will direct procurement contracts to minority businesses and thus assist their development. Under the program, SBA will have final authority in selecting the procurements that would best assist the growth of particular minority enterprises.

The concept behind the 8(a) procurement pilot program is to test whether minority-owned businesses can be advanced through the use of more technically sophisticated, higher volume, and longer term contracts. I believe that this program can be an effective business development tool for small minority enterprises. I will direct SBA and the designated agency to work cooperatively so that this pilot program has a fair and adequate test.

This administration is dedicated to increasing the share of Federal procurement dollars which is placed with minority business. This program can assist us in meeting our minority business development goals as well as assist minority businesses in industries where minorities traditionally have not participated.

Born with God-given physical talent, Joe Delaney brought distinction to himself and pride to his family and friends by exemplifying the best in sportsmanship as an outstanding high school, college and professional football player. Even more important, he set an example of citizenship off the playing field, as a caring, involved member of his community of Haughton, Louisiana.

By this supreme example of courage and compassion, this brilliantly-gifted young man left a spiritual legacy for his fellow Americans, in recognition of which I, Ronald Reagan, President of the United States, do hereby award Joe Delaney the Presidential Citizens Medal.

The advance retail sales for June, announced today by the Department of Commerce, show continuing good news about the strength of the economic recovery. The President is encouraged by growing consumer confidence, which is reflected by this third consecutive monthly increase in consumer buying. The sales of big-ticket items such as automobiles are a key sign of consumers' expectations for the future. The President's policies have placed the recovery on firm footing and hold the promise of a robust economy in the years ahead.

One item of business we'll be taking care of before we get underway in the Cabinet meeting, and that is the signing of this Executive order today. It's a symbol of the commitment of this administration to do everything it can to keep alive the American dream for all of our citizens.

Now, while our program for minority business development is important, it's by no means the most important of our efforts to promote this American dream for all our citizens. But beginning in the late sixties, on the very heels of the breakdown of legal racial barriers, the economy entered a period of contraction. And what it amounted to was that just when they achieved the rights to buy a ticket on the train -- the economic train that they'd seen going by -- got on the train, it started going backward.

So, this has been a problem. The actions taken, the proposals that have been made by this administration are designed to get the train moving again. And the signs are clear now that our program is working. And in addition, because of the progress of the 1960's and this administration's firm commitment to protect the human rights and the economic freedom of all Americans, the passenger list is going to look a little different when the train starts rolling ahead this time.

Section 1. Minority Business Development Plans. (a) Minority business enterprise development plans shall be developed by each Federal agency having substantial procurement or grantmaking authority. Such agencies shall submit these plans to the Cabinet Council on Commerce and Trade on an annual basis.

Sec. 2. Minority Business Development Responsibilities of Federal Agencies. (a) To the extent permitted by law and consistent with its primary mission, each Federal agency which is required to develop a minority business development plan under Section 1 of this Order shall, to accomplish the objectives set forth in its plan, establish programs concerning provision of direct assistance, procurement assistance, and management and technical assistance to minority business enterprises.

In meetings here today, I have once again asked for congressional approval of the American share of an increase in lending resources for the International Monetary Fund (IMF). The Senate has already approved the request, and the House will take up the measure next week.

In the past decade the economy has witnessed soaring inflation and interest rates, plunging commodity prices, and worldwide recession. While the international economic outlook is now improving, the experience of past years has contributed to a major international debt problem that poses grave risks for the U.S. and world economies. We have formulated a strategy for dealing with this problem, and IMF plays a key role in it. IMF resources, however, are running low and unless action is taken to increase them, IMF may no longer be able to play that role.

Some argue that increasing IMF resources is simply a way to bail out big bankers who made imprudent loans. This is wrong. In fact, IMF involvement has brought more, not less, participation by private banks. It is important to remember that IMF makes no gifts, that it lends money to governments, and that it charges interest on its loan and assures that proper economic policies are in place to correct the problems and to assure that the loans are repaid.

All of this is very important to the American economy. In 1980 U.S. exports accounted for 19 percent of the total production of goods and, during the decade of the seventies, export-related jobs rose 75 percent to over 5 million. The ability of IMF to deal with the current strains in the international financial system will have a powerful impact on American exports and on American jobs. If IMF is not in a position to help countries help themselves, our economic recovery could be aborted and unemployment start rising again.

Therefore, I urge the House of Representatives to act favorably on this legislation. No legislation now before the Congress is more important to a healthy world economy and to a continuing economic recovery here in the United States.

I am delighted by today's action by the House of Representatives on the trade and tax provisions of the Caribbean Basin Initiative. Although it took longer than I had hoped to secure passage, the vote today is a giant step forward. I congratulate the chairman of the Ways and Means Committee, Dan Rostenkowski, and Members of the House for the bipartisan cooperation they demonstrated in working for the stability and progress of some of our closest neighbors.

United States. The region, in reality, represents the third border of our country, and for far too long it has not been given the attention it deserves. Today's vote by the House is a signal to all concerned that we recognize the vital importance of the Caribbean and are willing to meet our responsibilities.

There have been a number of changes in the legislation since its inception, but the heart of the proposal remains intact. Through tax and trade incentives the energy and creativity of the private sector will be put to work on the economic challenges that confront our friends and neighbors in the Caribbean. The Caribbean Basin Initiative will serve as a catalyst for progress and will offer broad new opportunities to the people of the region.

Throughout your career, and especially here at the White House, you have served with dedication and distinction and with a truly inspirational sense of public duty. I know well of the many long hours you have devoted and of your tireless efforts to serve many constituencies. And through it all, you have maintained the highest standards of personal integrity and loyalty and you have even maintained a sense of humor. I am proud to have had you as my Deputy Press Secretary and I am proud to have you as one of our nation's representatives abroad.

The report this morning of the 1.1-percent June rise in industrial production brings welcome news for the summer: America's recovery is strong and continues to build. This seventh straight month of improvement in the Nation's mines and factories saw widespread gains in the production of materials and products. It strongly suggests more Americans will find more jobs in the months ahead.

Our goal is an economic recovery that leads us to a new era -- strong and steady growth with greater opportunities for all Americans. The latest news on inflation indicates economic growth can continue without triggering an outburst of new inflation.

We must not permit the specter of towering inflation and interest rates to reappear in America and destroy the progress we've made. So, I appeal to the Members of the Congress -- both Republicans and Democrats -- to work with us to hold down Federal spending and resist raising taxes on the people.

Between 1945 and 1963 the United States conducted some 235 atmospheric nuclear weapons tests in the Pacific and the American Southwest. At least 220,000 American service men and women witnessed and participated in these tests, or served in forces occupying Hiroshima and Nagasaki immediately following World War II. It is only fitting that their dedication to duty be afforded proper recognition and brought to the attention of the American people.

Many of these American service men and women witnessed the awesome potential of nuclear weapons. In honoring these veterans, let us rededicate ourselves once more to our national goal of a world at peace in which nuclear war is unthinkable.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 15th day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America, the two hundred and eighth.

Allan Spitz will succeed Steven Weinberg. Dr. Spitz is vice president for academic affairs and professor of political science at the University of Wyoming. Previously he was dean of the College of Liberal Arts and professor of political science at the University of New Hampshire. He currently serves as a member of the executive council of the National Association of State Universities and Land Grant Colleges. He is married, has two children, and resides in Laramie, Wyo. He was born October 9, 1928.

Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe are approaching agreement on a concluding document -- one that will strengthen and extend the undertakings contained in the Helsinki Final Act. It is a call on all 35 CSCE states -- particularly those who have so tragically failed to live up to promises made in Helsinki -- to give life to these commitments and to rededicate themselves to advancing the freedom and justice on which security in Europe ultimately depends.

We have agreed to this concluding document, as we did in 1975 to the Helsinki Final Act itself, with no illusions about the nature of the Soviet Union or about the system which it seeks to impose over much of Europe. In an ideal world, agreements such as this would not be necessary.

CSCE states -- a set of standards to which we and the other Atlantic democracies will continue to hold all those who will have pledged their word at Madrid. We will sign it with the hope that it will serve as a step toward achieving our objective of a more stable and constructive relationship with the Soviet Union.

The Madrid accord will add important new commitments to the Helsinki process, including provisions dealing with human rights, the trade union freedoms so tragically violated in Poland, terrorism, religious liberties, reunification of families, free flow of information, and more. It will provide for two important meetings of experts in the humanitarian field and for a security conference which will attempt to negotiate measures reducing the danger of surprise attack in Europe. Another full, followup meeting will take place in Vienna in 1986, where we will review the conduct of the participating states and seek to build on the accomplishments at Madrid.

The unity and resolve of the Western democracies at Madrid have made this achievement possible. Ambassador Kampelman and his NATO colleagues deserve the highest praise for bringing this long and often difficult conference to a successful conclusion. We also owe a special vote of thanks to Prime Minister Gonzalez of Spain, whose thoughtful proposal set the stage for final agreement.

In concluding the Madrid meeting, we reaffirm our commitment to the Helsinki process. We will not flag in our continued determination to work with all governments and peoples whose goal is the strengthening of peace in freedom. As Madrid has shown, dialog, when based on realistic expectations and conducted with patience, can produce results. These results are often gradual and hard-won, but they are the necessary building blocks for a more secure and stable world. The challenge remains. We must all consolidate and build on these gains; we must ensure that good words are transformed into good deeds and that the ideals which they embody are given concrete expression. Giving substance to the promises of Madrid and Helsinki will remain one of our prime objectives.

Twenty years have passed since those words were spoken, and they've been a troubled era, overshadowed by the dangers of nuclear weapons. We've seen the world's inventory of nuclear weapons steadily expand. Despite many sincere attempts to control the growth of nuclear arsenals, those arsenals have continued to grow. That's the bad news.

Americans have joined together -- Republicans and Democrats, liberals and conservatives -- to face the greatest challenge of our time: the urgent task of pursuing a lasting peace in the nuclear era. Our political process has forged a consensus, a bipartisan consensus that has united us in our common search for ways to protect our country, reduce the risk of war and, ultimately, dramatically reduce the level of nuclear weapons -- the foundation we need for successful negotiations.

Remember, our MX Peacekeeper missile program calls for the deployment of 100 missiles. The level ultimately deployed, however, will clearly be influenced by the outcome in Geneva. If an agreement is reached which calls for deep reductions -- which is, of course, our goal -- the number of missiles could certainly be adjusted downward.

As the Scowcroft commission rightly pointed out, the MX Peacekeeper missile is an essential part of a comprehensive modernization and arms control program to ensure deterrence today and in the future. We're building the MX Peacekeeper to strengthen deterrence. But it also provides vital negotiating incentives and leverage in Geneva.

Andrei Sakharov, the distinguished Soviet physicist and Nobel Prize laureate, recently published an eloquent article which forcefully makes the same point. He notes that, given the Soviet advantage in land-based, strategic missiles, talks about limitation and reduction of these systems could become easier if the United States were to have MX missiles, albeit only potentially. Andrei Sakharov is a hard man for anyone to ignore.

When the Congress reaffirms its support for this program and authorizes the funds to modernize our strategic deterrent, our agenda for peace will be strengthened even further. In NATO, as in our other alliances, there's a renewed feeling of solidarity. Last May at Williamsburg, the leaders of the major industrialized nations demonstrated their commitment to vigorously pursue the twin objectives of arms reductions and deterrence in the Williamsburg communique. This solidarity is a source of much strength.

For the graduates of June 1983, this a time of opportunity and hope -- a hope that they and their children will enjoy a safer, more secure world. That's why we must sustain our consensus. And that's why I've spent hundreds of hours meeting with members of this administration, with the bipartisan commission on strategic forces, with our arms negotiators, with Members of the Congress, and with concerned citizens.

My message to them and to you is that I have no higher priority than reducing and ultimately removing the threat of nuclear war and seeking the stability necessary for true peace. To achieve that objective, we must reduce the nuclear arsenals of both the United States and the Soviet Union. We must achieve greater stability; that is, we must be sure that we obtain genuine arms reductions, not merely agreements that permit a growth in nuclear arsenals or agreements that proclaim good intentions without the teeth necessary to verify and enforce compliance.

Our current goal must be the reduction of nuclear arsenals. And I for one believe we must never depart from the ultimate goal of banning them from the face of the Earth. That's why we presented ambitious but realistic proposals, and that's why I have been and continue to be willing to consider any serious Soviet counteroffer. And that's why I've made our original proposal more flexible and why I continue to seek new ideas for achieving an arms reduction breakthrough.

But we cannot and we must not settle for less than genuine, mutual, and verifiable arms reductions. America's postwar generation has preserved world peace in its lifetime, but it's been an uneasy peace. Today's young Americans -- indeed, all members of the human family -- desire more and deserve more. And you deserve to know that your government is doing everything possible to meet your expectations.

Time and again our nation has proved that there are no limits to what we Americans can achieve when we work together. Well, today we are working together to do what is right. And as a result, we can look forward to a more secure tomorrow.

Teddy, he sticks by his union. He sticks by his friends, and he sticks by his country -- the kind of integrity and loyalty that is hard to come by today. And one reason that I wanted to come here was to thank Teddy and you members of the ILA for your generous support and encouragement.

I hope I've returned that support. One of the things that I'm trying to do for union members and for all Americans is to fix things so that you can keep more of your hard-earned money in your pocket where it belongs. Not long ago, inflation was public enemy number one. We were told it could be a decade or more before we could ever hope to conquer it. Well, we've brought inflation down from double digit to 3\1/2\ percent for the last year and less than 2 percent for the last 6 months. And that has helped the working men and women of this nation.

You hear a lot about compassion in Washington from those who want us to return to the policies of the past. But their compassion is not for people; it's for programs. Now, maybe there's a little compassion for people, for the people who make careers out of running those programs. What would have happened if we had permitted inflation caused by some of those programs to remain double digit? A family of four on a fixed income of $20,000 a year would be $1,700 poorer in purchasing power today. On top of that, they would have been made even poorer by much higher taxes.

High inflation, of course, drove up interest rates and virtually shut down the automobile industry and the housing industry. The prime rate was 21\1/2\ percent when we took office. It is less than half that now. Housing starts are up; auto sales are up; consumer spending is up; personal income is up; productivity is up. Our factories are beginning to hum, and people are being called back to work. Since last December, 1.1 million more people are working.

Let me just pause, if I could, for a second and interject something else about the unemployment picture. There's no question that in every recession unemployment is the last of the economic indicators to improve. And that's tragic. I wish it could be otherwise. I know a little bit about that subject. I was job hunting for my first job in the job market in 1932, in the depths of the Great Depression. But we have to understand that there's more than just people who have lost jobs, who are out of work. Thirty percent of today's unemployed are new entrants into the job market. It is not a static pool of people who, throughout the entire recession have been there unemployed.

Seventy percent of the unemployed today have been unemployed for 7 weeks or less. And of all the weeks of unemployment, 50 percent of them are accounted for by 3\1/2\ percent of the total unemployed. But that doesn't mean that we don't think there are things that can be done about it, and that's why we advanced spending for the next several years in public projects -- to advance it to the present so that we could stimulate more jobs in that way. And that's why we are dwelling on job training for the changes that have occurred in the job market.

The recession that we're emerging from has been very difficult for many union members, especially those in auto and steel, as I mentioned before. But what we're doing is something that Washington has never had the self-discipline to do in the past. We're building a recovery that won't lapse back into inflation as soon as we turn around. We're building a recovery that is based on economic growth, that is based on government -- not based on government temporarily pumping more money into the economy.

The recovery that we're experiencing is an honest one. And we're building it to last. Just look back at the recessions since World War II. I've heard a figure seven before this present one -- maybe give or take one or two, that's about right. Again and again the quick fix was applied and inflation rose higher than it had been, and they laid a foundation for the next recession which usually followed in just 2 or 3 years.

You know, one of the things that I'm proudest of from my days in Hollywood is that I served six terms as my union's president. Now, six terms -- I'll let you in on something. I don't think I could take six terms in Washington. [Laughter] But I'm very proud of my union service. And let me join your union leaders here today in saying, be proud of your service and of your union. Be proud of what unions symbolize. Free unions represent free people. And someday let us hope that the members of a union called Solidarity will be able to assemble like this and enjoy what ILA members enjoy every day -- the freedom to organize.

Our democracy encompasses many freedoms -- freedom of speech, of religion, of assembly, and so many other liberties that we often take for granted. These are rights that should be shared by all mankind. This union has always patriotically stood up for those freedoms. And that's why I want to talk to you today about freedom not in the United States, but in a part of the world that's very close and very important to us: Central America.

We all know that Central America suffers from decades of poverty, social deprivation, and political instability. And because these problems weren't dealt with positively, they're now being exploited by the enemies of freedom. We cannot afford the luxury of turning away from our neighbors' struggle as if they didn't matter. If we do turn away, we'll pay a terrible price for our neglect.

In April I reported to the Congress that the problems in Central America have the potential to affect our national security. This is still the case, and I want to reinforce it. Many of our citizens don't fully understand the seriousness of the situation, so let me put it bluntly: There is a war in Central America that is being fueled by the Soviets and the Cubans. They are arming, training, supplying, and encouraging a war to subjugate another nation to communism, and that nation is El Salvador. The Soviets and the Cubans are operating from a base called Nicaragua. And this is the first real Communist aggression on the American mainland. And we must never forget that here in the Western Hemisphere we are Americans in every country from pole to pole.

Caribbean. It's well to remember that in early 1942, a handful of Hitler's submarines sank more tonnage in that area than in all of the Atlantic Ocean, and they did this without a single naval base anywhere nearby. Today, Cuba is home to a Soviet combat brigade, a submarine base capable of servicing Soviet subs, and military air bases visited regularly by Soviet military aircraft that control our shores. If the Nazis during World War II and the Soviets today have recognized that the Caribbean and Central America is vital to our interests, don't you think it's about time that we recognize that, too?

Costa Rica is as strong a democracy as you will find anywhere with a long history of peace, free elections, and stability. They don't even have an army. If democracy can work in Costa Rica and Honduras, if it can work in El Salvador and Nicaragua and Guatemala, there is still time for the people of Latin America to build a prosperous, peaceful, and free future. And we have an obligation to help them for our own sake as well as theirs.

People throughout Latin America are waiting to see if Republicans and Democrats in this country can work together to make the United States what it should be: a loyal friend and reliable defender of democracy and human decency. I believe that we must exercise that leadership, and the time is now.

Tomorrow, July 19th, is the fourth anniversary of the Sandinista revolution. This was a revolution that promised to bring freedom to the Nicaraguan people. History will call it the revolution of broken promises. Tomorrow, the nine military commanders who rule Nicaragua with Cuban and Soviet power will indulge in boastful revolutionary rhetoric. But there are few left who will believe them. This consensus throughout the hemisphere is that while the Sandinistas promise their people freedom, all they've done is replace the former dictatorship with their own, a dictatorship of counterfeit revolutionaries who wear fatigues and drive around in Mercedes sedans and Soviet tanks and whose current promise is to spread their brand of revolution throughout Central America.

Nicaraguan port of Corinto. Last month, their union assembly was packed with Sandinistas, and six union leaders were arrested. Their presumed crime was trying to develop ties with independent trade unions, including some here affiliated with the AFL - CIO. I can tell you one thing, if all the longshoremen in Corinto are like Teddy Gleason, the Sandinistas have got a real fight on their hands.

What kind of democracy is it? Ask the Nicaraguan refugees who've risked starvation and attack to escape to Honduras. Let me read to you directly from a newspaper article: ``. . . one Nicaraguan man -- still filthy, ragged and, above all, hungry after an odyssey that began 5 weeks ago -- breathed a note of thanks: `God has smiled on us.''' Imagine, with barely clothes on his back and nothing in his stomach, he believed that God had smiled on him because he'd arrived in free, democratic Honduras.

This man fled Nicaragua in May with many others when they learned the Sandinistas planned to relocate their villages. Let me quote again what one of the many others -- what they had learned and what they had to say. They said, ``We left everything. We left the pigs, the corn, the animals. .

Well, when the Sandinistas first took power, all their neighbors hoped that they would embrace democracy as they promised. In the first year and a half after the revolution, the United States sent $118 million worth of emergency relief and recovery aid to Nicaragua, more than provided by any other country in the world. But the Sandinistas had lied. They rejected their pledges to their own people, to the Organization of American States, and to the world.

Organization of American States that they would hold elections and grant all human rights that go with a democracy. In short, they literally made a contract to establish a true democracy. The dictator Somoza was then persuaded by the OAS to resign and the government was turned over to the revolutionaries and recognized officially by the Organization of American States.

The guerrilla bands fighting in Nicaragua are trying to restore the true revolution and keep the promises made to the OAS. Isn't it time that all of us in the Americas worked together to hold Nicaragua accountable for the promises made and broken 4 years ago?

El Salvador is moving toward a more open society and government in the midst of a foreign-supported guerrilla war. National Presidential elections are planned. Through their Peace Commission, they've offered to talk even to the violent opposition about participating in these forthcoming elections They've implemented an effective land reform program which has provided land for over half a million Salvadorans, and they've given amnesty to former guerrillas.

This is El Salvador's revolution -- it is one that is building democracy. Contrast this with the corrupted revolution in Nicaragua, one which has repressed human liberties, denied free unions and free elections, censored the press, and threatened its neighbors and violated a public pledge.

It's time El Salvador's recognized for what they're trying to do. And it's true that their path has been a hard one. Peaceful change has not always been easy or quick. We realize the human rights are not all in El Salvador that we would like them to be. The killing must stop. But you have to realize much of the violence there -- whether from the extreme right or left -- is beyond the control of the government. El Salvador is moving in the right direction. Its elected government is committed to further improvement. They need and they deserve our help.

Just remember that scene last year after months of campaigning by a variety of candidates, the people of El Salvador were offered a chance to vote, to choose the kind of government they wanted. The guerrillas threatened death to anyone who voted. They destroyed hundreds of buses and trucks to keep the people from getting to the polling places. Their slogan was brutal: ``Vote today and die tonight.'' But on election day, an unprecedented 80 percent of the electorate braved ambush and gunfire, and many of them trudged for miles to vote for freedom.

Members of our Congress who went there as observers told me of a woman who was wounded by rifle fire on the way to the polls. She refused to leave the line to have her wound treated until after she'd voted. Another woman had been told by the guerrillas that she would be killed when she returned from the polls. She was a grandmother. And she told the guerrillas, ``You can kill me. You can kill my family. You can kill my neighbors. You can't kill us all.'' The real freedom fighters of El Salvador turned out to be the people of that country. The world should respect this courage and not allow it to be belittled or forgotten. And I say that we can never turn our backs on that.

Most of our aid is not military at all. Seventy-seven cents out of every dollar that we will spend this year will go for economic assistance -- food, fertilizers, and other essentials to help break the vicious cycle of poverty. And make no mistake about this, of all the words that I've spoken today, let me underline these especially: America's emphasis in Central America is on economic and social progress, not on a purely military solution. But to give democracy and development a chance to work in the face of increasing attacks, we're providing a shield of military training and assistance to help our neighbors protect themselves.

Meanwhile, the trade provisions of the Caribbean Basin Initiative will stimulate production and employment. Last week's congressional vote on the CBI is a step toward more work for their longshoremen and ours. Nor is that all. We are actively supporting the search for political solution and dialog among and within these nations.

We know that peace ultimately can come only if people talk to each other and learn to accommodate in an atmosphere of freedom. To this end, I dispatched my special emissary to the region. Despite the fact that the guerrillas rejected our offer, we remain ready to facilitate free and open elections. We also support the process started at Contadora for a multilateral approach to peace.

In my speech to the Joint Session, I asked the Congress to join me in a bold, generous, bipartisan approach to the problems of peace and poverty, democracy and dictatorship in this region. Many Members of the Congress have responded in a genuine spirit of cooperation, despite divergent views on specific strategy. Senators Jackson and Mathias, Congressmen Barnes and Kemp have suggested the formation of a national commission to build on our bipartisan concern for these key issues.

I agree with them that this is a good idea. So, today, I am announcing a bipartisan national commission on Central America. The commission will lay the foundation for a long-term, unified, national approach to the freedom and independence of the countries of Central America. The commission will be honored by a very distinguished American, outstanding in the field of diplomacy, virtually a legend in that field. It will be headed by Dr. Henry Kissinger, who will present recommendations to me later this year. Their focus will be on long term, looking to what it is that we want and what we must do in the years ahead to meet the underlying problems of the region.

In the meantime, we must not allow totalitarian communism to win by default. But we cannot succeed unless the Congress approves the necessary resources. All that our neighbors ask is for the tools to do the job themselves. And I ask you and every American, regardless of political party, to join in a common effort to promote freedom for all the people of this hemisphere.

Just as you work so your children will have a better future, the United States must work so that the fledgling democracies of this hemisphere will have a better future and so that our own future can be more secure. The legislative branch must bear its share of responsibility for ensuring this promise.

Central and South America. And I pointed something out to them that very often we tend to forget. This Western Hemisphere is unique. We are, as I said before, 30 countries down there, the three here in the northern continent -- but we are all Americans. We cross a line into another country; it is still North and South and Central America. And we haven't gotten together the way we should. We don't know enough about that area, and we need to do more.

Can you imagine what a power for good in the world these two continents, linked by the Isthmus of Central America -- we worship from South Pole to North Pole the same God. We have the same heritage of coming here as pioneers to these virtually undiscovered continents. And what a power for good we could be with all the resources available in these continents if we help them in achieving what we have achieved here in this land -- in freedom, in economic progress, in standard of living.

Human rights means working at problems, not walking away from them. Without the necessary funds, there's no way for us to prevent the light of freedom from being extinguished in Central America, and then it will move on from there. A truly bipartisan approach to these problems can produce the kind of progress that will help the people of the region help themselves.

ILA stands for I Love America. And that's true. I don't think America has a more patriotic union than this one. This union is great for the same reason America is great -- because so many different groups are working together, pulling together toward a common goal. The cultural diversity of this union and this country make us both strong and free.

Today I ask you to join me in an effort to keep the light of liberty alive in Central America. We must never let freedom fade where there's a chance to save it. We must never let the enemies of human dignity die out simply because it's -- the embers, I should say, not the enemies, the embers of human dignity die out because it's easier to turn the other way. With a timely investment now, we can save freedom in Central America. And I believe we must make that investment. I believe we have a moral responsibility to do so. And I believe with the help of organizations like the ILA, we will succeed in expanding freedom for the people of Central America.

Following his appearance at the convention, the President held separate meetings with the executive council of the International Longshoremen's Association and south Florida Jewish leaders at the resort. He then returned to Washington, D.C.

States as a guest of the American people. Your concern for your people is well known, particularly your commitment to the education and economic well-being of your citizens. Your personal involvement in the problems of even the humblest of your countrymen is legendary. For these reasons and others, I've looked forward to the day when we could meet.

Your Highness, you've guided Bahrain through a difficult first decade of independence with admirable skill, bringing economic progress with imaginative leadership. With far fewer oil resources than some of your neighbors, you've transformed Bahrain into a financial and industrial center with one of the most diversified economies in the region. Just as important, because of your progressive leadership, Bahrain also leads the area in health care and education. As it has been since ancient times, Bahrain continues to be a place where people of different cultures and religions live together in tolerance and peace. Your efforts to build a humane and diverse society provide an effective link in the exchange of technical skills and cultural values between East and West.

Under your leadership, Bahrain continues to be an inspiring example for all of the Middle East and the world. The American people are pleased to have been counted as supportive friends as you built this record of achievement. Our two peoples have been partners for progress and peace since the beginning of this century. We have found this relationship to be of great mutual benefit. Many of the 70 United States companies in Bahrain today continue to train Bahrainis in technology and other skills, whether they be modern banking techniques, setting up new industries, or preparing coaches and athletes for Bahrain's Olympic teams. Our long history of private sector cooperation is a shining example of what can be achieved in a partnership based on mutual trust and respect.

Gulf region depend on peace and security. It is no secret that the United States has a vital national interest in the Middle East. We and our allies depend on oil originating there, much of it produced in and nearby your country. Yet we also recognize the value of partnership and respect for the culture and aspirations of states like your own -- unlike another world power which seeks to impose its system by encouraging and exploiting conflict and unrest. But the United States seeks peace and stability.

Together with other peace-loving nations in the Gulf region, we've made rapid progress in recent years, not only by helping our friends meet their own defense requirements but also by developing our own ability to come to their assistance should the need ever arise.

Many Americans who work in the region have experienced hospitality of the Bahraini people, and for this I am most appreciative. During his recent visit, Crown Prince Hamad deepened his friendship between our two countries.

Your Highness, I want to assure you that I share your concern about the conflict between Iraq and Iran. The loss of tens of thousands of young men on both sides and the destruction borne by both countries is tragic. I look forward to consulting with you about what more our countries might do to encourage a negotiated end to this conflict, which threatens the security and even the marine ecology of the entire area.

We've appreciated your government's understanding as we pursue our goal of seeking the withdrawal of all foreign forces from Lebanon and securing a settlement for the Palestinian people that is firmly rooted in the principles of security and justice embodied in the United Nations Security Council Resolutions 242 and 338.

As you know, Secretary Shultz returned recently from the Middle East. We remain undaunted in our effort to prevent the forces of violence from exercising a veto over the rights of the Lebanese people. The people of Lebanon must have restored their basic human right to pursue their own destiny in an atmosphere of peace, security, and mutual trust.

I look forward to discussing our many common concerns with you today. I know our shared goals of peace and prosperity for the region can be met in the same spirit of good will and partnership that has characterized our friendship thus far.

The Amir. Mr. President, I would like to offer my appreciation and thanks for the kind thoughts expressed in your address towards the State of Bahrain and for the welcome and hospitalities extended to us from the very beginning of our official visit to your friendly country. This indicates the strength of the friendly ties existing between our two countries. I offer my genuine good wishes to the friendly people of the United States of America for their well-being and prosperity.

I believe that this visit will succeed in developing the relations between our two countries, open up a new chapter in our fruitful cooperation, and support our efforts to help maintain peace, security, and justice for the world community. As you have referred, Mr. President, in your address, to some of the most important economic and political issues in the world, I should commend in this respect the positive role you play for the prosperity and security of the world.

We, no doubt, support and uphold the great effort you make in this field; as we firmly believe that such issues are very important for the progress of the individual in the modern world and that without them clashes and war will break out. Clashes and war will break out and destroy all of the progress made over the years.

Middle East problem comes in the forefront of political issues in the world. It is one of the burning and explosive problems in the world, which passes now through a very dangerous stage that poses a serious threat to the world peace and security. This imposes upon us the duty to make every effort to save the region from this disastrous situation.

We hope that the sincere and good effort you make to find a suitable solution to this problem will result in establishing just and durable peace in the region, which has been exposed to five major wars within 35 years with disastrous effects to its people. The tragic events in Lebanon and the damage it has suffered are but some of many inevitable results of the explosive situation in the region. Lebanon deserves all the help and backing so that its government will exercise full control over its unified territories.

We believe that there will be no hope of stability in the Middle East without the application of the same universal principles upon the people of the region; and concluding, the Palestinian people, when they are dealing with their legitimate right to live in peace within secure national boundaries.

We are prepared to do our best and participate in every sincere, international effort to establish security in the Middle East region, within this framework, in order to put an end to this terrible conflict and enable the people of the region to live in peace.

Finally, it is my pleasure to conclude by wishing you, Mr. President, all the success in your efforts for the progress and advance of the friendly people of the United States of America, and to bring peace, justice, and prosperity to the people of the world.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Angela M. Buchanan to be a member of the President's Advisory Committee on Women's Business Ownership. This is a new position. The President also intends to designate her Chairperson.

Meanwhile, we anticipate discussions on the Middle East peace process with Israel and other nations in the region will continue. We see this as in no way an impediment to the progress of our peace initiative in Lebanon or in the region as a whole. Secretary Shultz has just completed an extensive round of talks with the leaders of Israel, Syria, Egypt, Lebanon, Saudi Arabia, and Jordan regarding the current situation. In Israel, he had detailed discussions with the Prime Minister, the Foreign Minister, and the Defense Minister. We anticipate our diplomatic discussions will continue at all levels during this critical period.

As far as the President is concerned, we will continue our pursuit of the full withdrawal of all foreign forces from Lebanon, the reestablishment of Lebanon's sovereignty over all its territory, and the security of its borders. We will continue to have discussions with all parties leading toward this objective.

Earlier in the day, Mr. Speakes announced that Prime Minister Menachem Begin of Israel telephoned the President that morning to say that he would have to postpone his visit to the United States for personal reasons.

Americans and, may I add, fellow citizens of the world who yearn to breathe free, we're honored to welcome all of you. I'd like to thank Congressman Jerry Solomon for his strong support of this event.

And today we come to show solidarity with our brothers and sisters who are captives, not because of crimes that they have committed but because of crimes committed against them by dictators and tyrants.

We met here last month with a group of Baltic Americans honoring Baltic Freedom Day. And I said that we gathered to draw attention to the plight of the Baltic people and to affirm to the world that we do not recognize their subjugation as a permanent condition.

Today, we speak to all in Eastern Europe who are separated from neighbors and loved ones by an ugly iron curtain. And to every person trapped in tyranny, whether in the Ukraine, Hungary, Czechoslovakia, Cuba, or Vietnam, we send our love and support and tell them they are not alone. Our message must be: Your struggle is our struggle, your dream is our dream, and someday, you, too, will be free. As Pope John Paul told his beloved Poles, we are blessed by divine heritage. We are children of God and we cannot be slaves.

We Americans understand the truth of these words. We were born a nation under God, sought out by people who trusted in Him to work His will in their daily lives, so America would be a land of fairness, morality, justice, and compassion.

But only one so-called revolution puts itself above God, insists on total control over the peoples' lives, and is driven by the desire to seize more and more lands. As we mark this 25th observance of Captive Nations Week, I have one question for those rulers: If communism is the wave of the future, why do you still need walls to keep people in and armies of secret police to keep them quiet?

Now, some believe we must muffle our voices for the cause of peace. I disagree. Peace is made or broken with deeds, not words. No country has done more or will strive harder for peace than the United States. I will personally embrace any meaningful action by the Soviet Union to help us create a more peaceful, safe, and secure world. I welcome the Soviet pledge of cooperation at the Madrid review Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe. With every ounce of my being I pray the day will come when nuclear weapons no longer exist anywhere on Earth. And as long as I'm President, we'll work day in and day out to achieve mutual and verifiable reductions in strategic weapons.

When Congress approved the MX Peacekeeper program last May, America demonstrated its bipartisan consensus to implement the recommendations of the Scowcroft commission. This bipartisan step marked progress toward genuine arms reductions. In the next few days, the Congress will vote on the question of supreme importance: Do we continue forward, or do we turn back from the Scowcroft commission's recommendations?

In terms of speaking to the world with one bipartisan voice, of standing up for U.S. vital interests, and of strengthening America's agenda for peace, no question matters more for this country in 1983.

Ask yourselves: Was it our words that destroyed peace in Afghanistan, or was it Soviet aggression? Is peace served by sealing our lips while millions are tortured or killed in Vietnam and Cambodia? Or should we not speak out to demand those crimes be stopped? It's not provocative to warn that once a Communist revolution occurs, citizens are not permitted free elections, a free press, free trade, free unions, free speech, freedom to worship, or property, or freedom to travel as we please. Many military regimes have evolved into democracies. But no Communist regime has ever become a democracy, provided freedom or given its people economic prosperity.

Now, many of you here have known the suffering that I've described. You are the conscience of the free world, and I appeal to you to make your voices heard. Tell them: ``You may jail your people. You may seize their goods. You may ban their unions. You may bully their rabbis and dissidents. You may forbid the name of Jesus to pass their lips. But you will never destroy the love of God and freedom that burns in their hearts. They will triumph over you.

Help us warn the American people that for the first time in memory we face real dangers on our own borders, that we must protect the safety and security of our people. We must not permit outsiders to threaten the United States. We must not permit dictators to ram communism down the throats of one Central American country after another.

And we see the Soviets and Cuba building a war machine in Nicaragua that dwarfs the forces of all their neighbors combined. Let's not fool ourselves: This war machine isn't being built to make Central America safe for democracy. It isn't being built to pursue peace, economic or social reform. It's being built, by their own boast, to impose a revolution without frontiers.

Now, this is not my problem; it's our problem. But if we pull together, we can solve it. As I announced yesterday, I'm appointing a bipartisan commission on Central America. And let us resolve today: There must be no more captive nations in this hemisphere.

With faith as our guide, we can muster the wisdom and will to protect the deepest treasures of the human spirit -- the freedom to build a better life in our time and the promise of life everlasting in His kingdom.

America. The Commission shall be composed of not more than 12 members appointed or designated by the President. These members shall be drawn from among distinguished leaders of the government, business, labor, education, Hispanic and religious communities. No more than seven members shall be of the same political party.

Commission shall provide advice to the President, the Secretary of State and the Congress on elements of a long-term United States policy that will best respond to the challenges of social, economic, and democratic development in the region, and to internal and external threats to its security and stability. The Commission also shall provide advice on means of building a national consensus on a comprehensive United States policy for the region.

The Commission is bipartisan, with no more than 7 of its 12 members from the same political party. In addition to the above, there will be Senior Counselors designated by the President. They will include two Democrats recommended by the Speaker and two Republicans recommended by the minority leader from the House of Representatives, and two Republicans recommended by the majority leader and two Democrats recommended by the minority leader from the United States Senate.

July 24, 1983, marks the bicentennial of the birth of Simon Bolivar, the great Liberator who laid the foundation for the Inter-American System. The Government and people of the United States take pride in joining with the other countries of the Americas in celebrating this historic event. A great soldier and patriot, Simon Bolivar serves as an inspiration to all the peoples of the western hemisphere. Through turbulent and frustrating times, he had the vision to see that the unity of the Americas could be achieved.

Bolivia, and Panama in a struggle similar to that which had brought the United States its liberty forty years earlier. Although shaken by personal tragedy and disappointed by two unsuccessful attempts to establish an independent republic in his homeland, Bolivar persevered. His burning desire for freedom could not be extinguished, and his subsequent brilliant military victories inspired an entire continent. Likewise, his vision of a united Americas continues to inspire new generations of citizens in every country of this hemisphere.

Bolivar's ideals of Pan Americanism, based on independence, solidarity, sovereignty, as well as the right of all nations to live in peace, find clear expression in the Charter of the Organization of American States.

The debt owed by all Americans to Simon Bolivar is incalculable. Thus, it is fitting that we should pause and reflect upon his great achievements in this bicentennial year of his birth. On this occasion, we in the United States join with our hemispheric friends to remember the great hero whose ideals bind us closer together. Bolivar, more than any other figure in the history of the western hemisphere, understood that, while we are citizens of separate countries, we are members of one family in the new world -- we are Americans.

Section 1. General Responsibility. The Secretary of Transportation is authorized to operate and administer the Alaska Railroad, except that the authority of the Secretary to fix, change, or modify rates for the transportation of passengers and property shall be subject to the authority of the Interstate Commerce Commission, pursuant to Section 3 of this Order.

Sec. 2. Rates -- Secretary of Transportation. (a) In exercising the authority granted by this Order to fix, change, or modify rates of the Alaska Railroad, the Secretary of Transportation is authorized to establish rates and enter into rate arrangements, including contracts, with other parties to the same extent as comparable rail carriers subject to the jurisdiction of the Interstate Commerce Commission under subchapter I of chapter 105 of title 49 of the United States Code.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 19th. day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

This week the House will consider Title III of the Fiscal Year 1984 Defense Authorization Bill which implements the bipartisan recommendations of the Scowcroft Commission. Endorsing these recommendations will give this Nation a very solid chance to secure a balanced, verifiable arms reduction that, through greater stability, can make our Nation, our world, our people safer. In terms of speaking with one bipartisan voice, of standing up for U.S. vital interests, and of strengthening America's agenda for peace, this vote is of special significance.

These words, which guided the Commission, were instrumental in forging that bipartisanship which aims for deep reductions in both the U.S. and Soviet strategic arsenals, coupled with necessary modernization of our strategic forces in a way which will enhance stability.

The MX Peacekeeper is being built, as an integral part of the bipartisan Scowcroft Commission's package, to strengthen deterrence. It also provides vital negotiating leverage in Geneva. That lever is working.

Although the Commission called for the deployment of 100 missiles, the level ultimately deployed will be influenced by the outcome in Geneva. If an agreement is reached which calls for deep reductions -- which is our goal -- the number of missiles could certainly be adjusted downward.

We need the MX, not only for force modernization, but to keep the Soviets moving at the negotiation tables. That is why congressional endorsement of the Scowcroft Commission recommendations, as embodied in Title III of the Defense Authorization Bill, is so important.

The American people believe that this should not be a partisan issue. I hope that I can count on your help to implement all elements of the Scowcroft Commission recommendations. Together we can ensure a continuing national consensus that can lead to the eventual elimination of all nuclear weapons.

All 29 NSTAC members are senior executives of major U.S. corporations in the telecommunications industry. During its business session, NSTAC finalized and voted to send recommendations to the President addressing enhancements in telecommunications capabilities to support national security requirements. Those recommendations will now be reviewed by the Secretary of Defense. That review is expected to be completed this summer with the President reviewing and acting upon NSTAC recommendations thereafter.

During the meeting, President Reagan, who addressed the members via videotape, expressed his appreciation for the efforts of NSTAC members and the substantial commitment of corporate resources each had made to the NSTAC process.

Your Highness, in view of the long history of technical cooperation our two countries have enjoyed, I can think of no more appropriate guests tonight than our five astronauts from the space shuttle Challenger. The members of that crew typify the highest American accomplishments, both in technical skill and teamwork, which benefit all of mankind. And the teamwork between our two countries, Your Highness, has led to growth, prosperity, and development of human and natural resources. We must draw on our foundation of partnership as we search for stability and peace with justice in the Middle East.

I'd like to restate the commitment of the American people to fulfilling our role as a loyal friend and cooperative partner to Bahrain. As an island country, Bahrain has prospered by reaching outward. You have been especially sensitive to the ebb and flow of international events while others were content to look inward. Your recent economic accomplishments have been the result of hard work and effective government, but they also reflect your personal imagination and leadership. That same vision has made you, Your Highness, a leader in the cooperative effort with your friends to strengthen the security of your region.

We in America understand the importance of maintaining steady economic growth in an uncertain world so that the lives of the Bahraini people can continue to improve. The United States stands ready to consult with you on whatever we can do to participate more fully in your remarkable economic and social progress. I'm particularly pleased that you'll be meeting with Secretary of Treasury Regan to discuss the world economic outlook.

As a banking and financial center, an important ship-repair port and site of international petrochemical and metallurgic cooperative ventures, your country is an open and inviting land of growth and opportunity where Arabs and Westerners can freely share their lives and views. As such, Bahrain contributes immeasurably to peace and mutual understanding.

Americans deeply respect your personal courage and vision, Your Highness. We've seen you guide your people with confidence through a turbulent period in the history of the Gulf, never sacrificing your personal commitment to a humane and just society.

Your Highness, I salute you. The American people are fortunate to have you as a friend and proud to stand side by side with the people of Bahrain in seeking stability, prosperity, and peace for us all. Thank you very much, and on behalf of the American people, it's been my pleasure to welcome you to Washington and to the White House.

Our initial delight in visiting this friendly country has been greatly increased during our useful meeting with you, Mr. President, this morning. Our discussions with Senator Charles Percy and his colleagues today were informative and positive. We are sure that two more happy days are awaiting us.

Thank you, Mr. President, for your invitation to us tonight and for the kind words you have spoken about Bahrain and its people. Needless to say, that we have always admired the enterprising spirit of the American people. Today, we in the Gulf are enjoying many of the fruits of their achievement in all field -- notably in science and technology.

Gulf present. Firstly, two centuries ago, 13 British colonies succeeded in building a free and strong nucleus of future America. Two years ago, 6 Arab States of the Gulf decided to follow a similar path of cooperation and ultimate unity. If your 13 managed to survive and later increase, surely our 6 must have an equal chance.

Secondly, like your country -- that's so an awaking of the American mind during and immediately following the Jacksonian era -- the Arab States of the GCC [Gulf Cooperation Council] are the scene of growing activities in the field of economy, industry, social services, education, communication, and culture. We are confident that the help and understanding of our friends will make the aspiration of our people and the process of achieving those aspiration peaceful for all mankind.

They surely deserve a decent, earthly meal. [Laughter] We hope that, while cruising in outer space, they noted an island that swam in a sea of spilled oil. For their information, that was Bahrain. [Laughter] We take this opportunity to salute their daring skill and achievement.

Frank Reynolds was one of America's foremost broadcast journalists, trusted and respected by millions of his fellow citizens, Nancy and I among them. To us he was also a warm, considerate friend who will be missed for his outstanding human qualities as well as for his many contributions as a newsman. Our prayers and sympathy are with Frank's family in their bereavement.

Directorate, issued a statement. Our response to that is we welcome any sincere and verifiable proposal to lessen tensions in Central America. Taking Mr. Ortega at his word, we believe the Nicaraguan proposal is a positive step in that it acknowledges the regional nature of the problem and the need to address external support for insurgencies and terrorist groups.

The proposal still contains a number of serious shortcomings. For example, the proposal seeks to put the insurgents in El Salvador on the same level as the democratically elected government. It fails to take into account the need for true democracy as a means to resolve internal problems of the countries of the region. It does not deal with Nicaragua's military buildup, and there are no clearly articulated provisions for effective verification.

Nonetheless, we would hope that the Nicaraguan proposal, along with those put forth by other countries of the region, would be considered, refined, and expanded as necessary at the next meeting of the Contadora nine, scheduled for later this month.

When Secretary Ray Donovan learned that my adopted hometown here was running out of money for its summer jobs program, he called Mayor Barry and offered to help. The result is today's check drawn from available funds at the Department of Labor. These funds will be added to the $8.2 million already transferred to the city and should provide 2,200 more summer jobs for unemployed young people in our Nation's Capital, a city that is very special to all of us as Americans.

This money is part of over $800 million that is being distributed nationally to enable State and local governments, and this will provide an estimated 800,000 summer jobs for young people throughout the United States. Our goal is to offer disadvantaged young people valuable work experience and at the same time provide the community with their services, which, I might add, will be more than welcome by cities and nonprofit agencies which will be receiving their help.

I have to add to what the Secretary said about that first summer job. Mine was when I was 14 years old. And I regret that a lot of rules and regulations have changed some things since then, because at that time I wound up with a construction company that was remodeling houses, and I ended the summer up, at my age even, at laying hardwood floors, shingling roof, painting houses.

This summer youth program is funded by the Department of Labor and operated by State and local governments throughout the country. It'll continue to be an important part of the Job Training Partnership Act, which will replace the old CETA program this October. But this program is only part of an overall effort we've made to help deserving young people get a start.

We've put in place a tax-credit program that gives employers who hire eligible teenagers a tax credit for up to 85 percent of the wages of these new, summertime employees. In some cases, the credit will enable an employer to hire a disadvantaged youth for the entire summer at a cost of only $260. The young person gets not only a paying job but also the valuable experience participating in the private sector. The employer gets a young employee the company may not have been able to afford without the tax break. And everyone's better off because of it.

The White House Office of Private Sector Initiatives and the National Alliance of Business have been in the forefront of this drive to give those young people who want to work this summer the chance they deserve.

My White House Office on Private Sector Initiatives has been doing a tremendous job. I know that because they've enlisted me on a number of occasions on this particular issue. As part of a well-coordinated program, I've written 5,300 chief executive officers of companies across the country asking for their support. I've been making videotapes and phone calls to job-a-thons in order to kick off summer job efforts in cities across the country.

All of these efforts, coupled with the tax credit program and, yes, the economic recovery, have had an effect. We're just now emerging from one of the most frustrating times in our country's history. After years of economic uncertainty, of devastating inflation, business stagnation, ever-increasing taxation and a resulting drop in investment, of high interest rates, and declining stock prices, we've begun to turn things around. It wasn't easy, but together, all of us together, we've got the American economy on the move again.

While we've been trying to straighten out the situation, we know it's been a particularly hard time for the unemployed, especially the young. Economists tell us the unemployed are the last ones to feel an economic upsurge. But we all can be happy that last month total employment rose 1.2 million nationwide.

Clearly, the Federal funds that are being allocated to States and local governments are important to the young people they help. But we also want to take this opportunity to highlight the private initiatives that have been taken throughout the country as well.

The President. Good morning. I have a brief statement, two very welcome pieces of news. This morning's report of a surge to 8.7 percent in second-quarter real economic growth and last night's bipartisan victory for the MX Peacekeeper program send an important signal to the world. I think that confidence in America's economic recovery and leadership for peace continue to build.

Vigorous growth is the surest road to more jobs, declining deficits, and a future filled with opportunity for all our people. We must encourage the roots of confidence to grow strong and deep by protecting the recovery from a new burst of runaway inflation and interest rates. We support the commitment of the Federal Reserve Board to a monetary policy that ensures stable prices, and we urge the Congress to help us make the Fed's job easier, not by taking more money out of the people's pockets, but by exercising discipline to hold down Federal spending.

I want also to thank courageous Republicans and Democrats in the House for giving America the bipartisan unity needed to pursue two vital national goals -- strategic modernization and arms control. It's now time for the Senate to act. If the Senate joins the House in approval of funds for production of the Peacekeeper, the United States representatives in Geneva will have increased leverage to negotiate significant mutual and verifiable strategic arms reductions. End of statement.

Nicaragua, by supporting the rebels against that Government, has helped to bring the Government to a position where they are expressing some willingness to negotiate? Would you attribute that to the pressure that the U.S. has been able to bring to bear? And would you accept a negotiated solution in El Salvador contingent on a solution in Nicaragua?

The President. Well, you're getting very complicated there and getting me deep into the field of things that I don't think are at hand yet. I'd have no way of reading their minds as to why. I think it could be assumed that maybe what is happening there with the contras, who are opposing the Sandinista regime, have something to do with this decision. Undoubtedly Contadora did also have something to do with it.

I welcome this first step. I don't think it's far enough. But what really is needed is what the contras are asking for, and that is that the Sandinista government is in violation, literally, of a contract that they made with the Organization of American States. That's not just the United States; that's 30 other American States. They made a contract during the revolution that, if they had the help of the OAS in persuading the Somoza regime to step down and let their revolution take over, they made specific promises as to what they would do with regard to freedom of press and freedom of -- well, all the freedoms that we enjoy here in this country. They have violated all of those provisions. And the OAS considers that the violation of a contract. And what the contras are really seeking, having been members of the Sandinista revolution for the most part in its effort to bring democracy to Nicaragua, they are trying to restore the original purpose of the revolution.

Government has proposed that if the guerrillas will lay down their arms and come in and participate in the democratic process of election, they will be granted amnesty. They have a peace commission that is organized to negotiate such a thing with them. And, so far, the guerrillas in El Salvador have refused any such meeting on that.

Q. Mr. President, Henry Kissinger was someone that you said should resign back in 1976. He's controversial because of his role in overthrowing the Allende regime in Chile, because of his support for covert action. Why did you choose him to head this Commission, considering your past doubts about him? And aren't you, in effect, shortcircuiting the work of the Commission, since the administration is already planning an increase of some $400 million in its aid request for next year for that region?

Kissinger came up in response to questions from the audiences as to whether I would choose him as my Secretary of State. And I said that I had other things in mind and I would make my own choice of a Secretary of State.

I've chosen him for this committee because I believe here is a man with a distinguished record in diplomacy. I believe he is exceptionally well qualified to bring back the information that, I think, we all need and that would help the Congress make the decisions it needs to make about Central America.

Q. Well, to follow up -- to ask you whether you think that there is no need, then, for this massive increase, because there are administration officials who have said that there are planning papers already at the budget office for this big increase in economic and military aid. Do you think it will not be necessary?

But I do think that this commission -- what I want is to bring back and with the Congress sit down with the idea of an overall program for all of our neighbors here in the hemisphere. It is what I talked to leaders about when I made my one trip to South and Central America -- talked to them about all of us becoming equal allies here in the Western Hemisphere, all dedicated to the same thing, to progress, economic reform, what social reforms are needed in some areas and so forth. And this is my goal for Central America.

To achieve it, however, you've got to stop the shooting. You have got to let them proceed with these reforms without getting murdered by terrorists who want a continuation of what we've seen too much of in the past, and that is revolutions that only overthrow one set of rulers in order to establish another set of rulers.

Q. Mr. President, in view of your frequent criticism of the Sandinista regime, which you repeated here this morning, do you think it's possible to get any kind of regional settlement and regional stability if that regime remains in office? Or do you think that regime would have to go before there would be any settlement?

The President. Well, if the Sandinista regime remained, but remained true to the original purpose of the revolution -- this is a government by one faction of the original revolution. It exiled, it jailed, it threw out of office the other leaders of the revolution because they wanted democracy and the present group wanted Communist totalitarianism. And this is what they presently have there. So, what is being struggled for there is a restoration of the original revolution.

Q. Sir, the Polish Government says it's going to lift martial law, as of tomorrow, and free some, but not all, of the political prisoners. Is this action enough to cause you to lift the remaining sanctions or not?

What we want to be on guard for is -- having a cosmetic change, in which they lift technically martial law, but replace it with equally onerous regulations. If that's true, then the situation has not changed. And so, I can't answer until we know whether there actually has been any improvement.

Then we've always said, if there is, we're going to go by deeds, not words. If there is something that indicates that a reciprocal action by us is desired -- us and our allies -- then we'll consult on that.

We do know this: I think sometimes we look at the pool of unemployed -- and, remember, the rate is down to 9.8 percent; we're out of that 10-percent bracket now. We look at the unemployed, and we incline to believe that this is the same group of people that have been sitting there helpless and hopeless throughout the entire recession. Seventy percent of the unemployed today have been unemployed 7 weeks or less. Thirty percent of the unemployed today are newcomers to the job market, seeking their first employment. And if you want another rather hard-to-imagine figure, if you take the total weeks of unemployment, more than half of them were accounted for by only 3\1/2\ percent of the unemployed.

Now, it's a more complicated picture than just simply transferring one thing to the other -- the number of young people that are being put to work this summer in summer jobs, more than in several years and in part due to -- as yesterday out in the Rose Garden, our ceremony where we contributed some money here, but that was only part of another $800 million nationwide. We've been working with the private sector on this. The job-a-thons held by television and radio stations throughout the country, particularly television -- they've had a remarkable success. And it happens within the time of the program literally that these people get them back.

So, there is reason for encouragement. There's only a very limited number of people who have been unemployed 6 months or longer. And they are the hard core, and they are the real basic problem we want to get to. But we have to deal with it as it is. And I think there is certainly very definite reason for hope of employment.

Once again, with today's release of the Consumer Price Index for June, we see evidence that a healthy economic recovery is underway, one that is better than anything most of the experts were predicting just a few months ago. The new CPI figure is especially good news for Americans living on fixed or modest incomes -- the people who suffer the most from the ravages of inflation.

By keeping inflation down, our economic policy protects those Americans who are most vulnerable -- and that, not the inflationary policies of the big spenders, is an important part of fairness and compassion.

Between May and June, consumer prices rose by only .2 percent. Food prices actually declined, and the increase in gasoline prices tapered off considerably from recent months. Most important, the level of the CPI this June was only 2.6 percent higher than a year ago. That represents the lowest 12-month rate of increase in consumer prices in more than 15 years.

Taken together with yesterday's good news of 8.7-percent real economic growth in the second quarter of the year, it is clear that our program, and the American economy, are on the right track -- the track to a strong, sustained, noninflationary recovery.

During his first visit here 9 months ago, President Gemayel and I discussed the principles upon which United States policy toward Lebanon is based: the full withdrawal of all foreign forces from Lebanon; support for a strong central government capable of asserting its authority over all of Lebanon; and security for Israel's northern border.

Today, I've reaffirmed these principles to President Gemayel. A united, sovereign, and independent Lebanon, free of all foreign forces, is the legitimate aspiration of the Government and the people of Lebanon and a goal shared by the people of the United States. Our talks today focused on the next steps in securing Lebanon's independence. We admire the courage and wisdom demonstrated by the Lebanese Government during its negotiations that resulted in an agreement for the departure of Israeli forces.

Philip Habib, who must return to his business and academia duties. Phil has set a high standard in bringing us through 8 months of difficult negotiations to the situation we face today, and he will be sorely missed.

I'm happy to have had this opportunity to confer with President Gemayel once again. I'm impressed with the progress that he and the Government and people of Lebanon have made in rebuilding their country. It's my belief that energy and perseverance will triumph in the end. And as I told President Gemayel, we do not lack for either. Lebanon can count on our support.

President Gemayel. My second visit to the White House in the course of the year is a further confirmation of our appreciation for the consistent support President Reagan has given Lebanon and the Lebanese objective, which is the withdrawal of all foreign forces and the reconstruction of a sovereign, democratic, and united Lebanon.

I'm very happy to have with me this time the Prime Minister, Mr. Shafiq Wazzan. This should emphasize the importance we attach to the visit. Indeed, conditions in Lebanon have changed immensely since my visit last October. And you are going through dramatic developments, highlighted in particular by today's events in Lebanon. During our meeting this morning and the talks held by my delegation with the State Department and the Pentagon, we have amply covered the various practical ways and means available to the Government of Lebanon and the United States in order to fulfill our common goals.

American friends. President Reagan has reassured us of his continuing concern and determination to pursue his initiative in Lebanon with the same strength and commitment. Our two governments will intensify their consultations until the expected results are achieved.

Before I get to the heart of my remarks today, I want to mention some important legislation currently before the Congress. I'm sure you're all aware of the difficulties some countries are having in meeting payments on their debts. Their problem touches all of us in a very real way and, indeed, poses a threat to the stability of the world financial order. For that reason, something called the International Monetary Fund was created some years ago. It's better known as the IMF, and that's how I'll refer to it.

Nations, including our own, contribute to IMF, and countries with temporary balance-of-payment problems borrow from it on a short-term basis. In order to get a loan, they have to agree to terms the Fund managers lay down with regard to correcting the practices and policies that contribute to their financial difficulties.

IMF is not foreign aid, and the $8\1/2\ billion is not being given away. We will have additional drawing rights in that amount from the IMF. In fact, in its entire history, the two countries that have borrowed the greatest amounts from the Fund have been the United Kingdom and the United States. The sum we're asking Congress to approve does not increase our budget and is returned with interest as loans are repaid.

In addition, it creates jobs, because it keeps the wheels of world commerce turning. Exports account for one out of five manufacturing jobs in the United States. The IMF and its programs help keep Americans at work. This is important legislation for international economic stability, and I hope you'll support it.

I'm taking to the airwaves in hopes we can save one little 11-month-old girl from Texas and many others like her. The young girl from Texas is Ashley Bailey, and all 11 pounds of her are in critical condition at the University of Minnesota Hospital in Minneapolis. She is now fed intravenously and has but 2 or 3 weeks to live unless she receives a liver transplant.

Back in May, Congressman Charlie Stenholm of Texas wrote me of the plight of this baby girl who must receive a transplant to survive. The surgery was estimated to cost $140,000. The Congressman said there'd been a tremendous outpouring of community and business support in the Abilene, Texas, area and about $75,000 already had been raised. A week or so after I received the letter, the Texas and Federal Medicaid programs contributed $82,000 toward the operation and medical expenses were no longer a problem for little Ashley. What she needed then, and needs now, is a donor. Time is running out. I'm issuing a plea to the Nation to find Ashley a donor.

There are many other children like Ashley. We're looking for donors for them, as well. Right here in the White House we have an electrician, Stuart Thomas, whose daughter Candi -- another 11-month-old girl -- is waiting for a transplant. The helicopter squadron at Andrews Air Force Base is alerted to transport Candi and her mother to Pittsburgh as soon as a suitable liver is found.

Surgeon General to conduct a conference on organ transplants. The major recommendation was to develop a public awareness program on organ donorship. This is underway, and I hope my broadcast today adds to the momentum. The project will stress education for doctors, State highway police, hospital officials, and others on the need to consider organ donorship when accidental death occurs.

America has faced shortage in the past of everything from nylons during World War II to oil in the 1970's. But modern medical science has provided us with a new shortage -- a shortage of living organs: livers, hearts, lungs, eyes, kidneys. I urge all Americans to fill out donor cards, little cards you carry in your wallet or purse that, in the event of your death, offer the hope of life to others. You can obtain these cards by simply calling your local kidney, heart, or lung associations.

Americans are giving people. In many of the cases where these very expensive operations are essential, local citizens have raised money to help the families in need. I've already mentioned the community support given to Ashley. Well, not far from Washington, Morningside, Maryland, raised over $100,000 for the Goode family, whose little Nicky needs a transplant.

Russell Train of the Wildlife Fund. Russell's more at home here than I am. [Laughter] He served in two administrations, and this is my first. [Laughter] I'm pleased that we have representatives of other conservation groups here today, as well.

But let me say how proud I am to present the J. Paul Getty Wildlife Conservation Prize. This is the largest award given specifically for outstanding service to wildlife conservation. This honor is so distinguished it's often been likened to a Nobel Prize for conservation. And our award winners today deserve that distinction: Alvaro Ugalde, Director of the National Park Service of Costa Rica, and Mario Boza, who is Costa Rica's first Park Service Director. They have contributed greatly to building their country's park system. And you gentlemen have my warmest congratulations.

Well, I'm always using Costa Rica as a positive example for Central America. It's more than that, however. Costa Rica is a positive example for the entire world -- a model of democracy and political stability that all nations could do well to emulate.

Costa Rica's strength flows from the fact that the people choose their own leadership through the ballot box. And this is what we wish for Costa Rica's neighbors and for all nations. This is why we're helping countries in Central America defend themselves against those who would see them under the authoritarian rule of communism.

Costa Rica exemplifies what democracy is all about. It's no surprise that Costa Rica, throughout several political administrations, has demonstrated great leadership in the conservation and wise management of natural resources.

I'm especially pleased that the strong conservation leadership demonstrated by Costa Rica has earned the continuing support of private, voluntary organizations in the United States, such as the World Wildlife Fund, the Nature Conservancy, and the New York Zoological Society. I could talk to you all morning about the role that private initiative can play in solving so many of the problems that face us. And I think the World Wildlife Fund -- U.S. embodies to the fullest what the private sector can accomplish. I want to recognize its sponsorship of the prize that we're handing out here today.

The President. I appreciate this very much, and I'm very honored and pleased to have it. On our own ranch out in California, we have an awful lot of wildlife. And it's still there. And, as a matter of fact, if the Treasury agents won't object to my telling this experience, one day, one of them hung duty up on a hill up above the ranch house, came down, and he looked a little wild-eyed -- or wide-eyed, I should say. And finally he spoke, because he wasn't quite sure that what had just happened to him was something that you just normally expect around the ranch or whether it was a little unusual.

There has been planning for a combined U.S.-Honduran military exercise to take place this year, but since planning is still underway, we cannot provide specifics at this time. The U.S. has conducted combined military exercises with Honduras and other nations in the world before and will do so again. This series of combined exercises involving U.S. and Latin American forces began in 1965. Such exercises pose no threat to any nation. They play a crucial role in training of troops and support personnel of our own forces and those of the host country.

The recent deployment of the U.S.S. Ranger carrier group in the Pacific is for training purposes and to demonstrate our interest in the Central American region. As plans for the joint exercise are developed, we will consult with Members of Congress.

America, not a military one. We fully support the proposals for a lessening of tensions in the region expressed in the Final Act of the San Jose Conference of last October. We support the Contadora process and other regional initiatives to ease tensions in the area. Ambassador [Richard B.] Stone, the President's special envoy, is currently on his third trip to the area and is conveying to the Governments of the Contadora Four countries of Colombia, Mexico, Venezuela, and Panama a Presidential message which conveys our continuing support to the Contadora process. The recent Presidential appointment of a National Bipartisan Commission on Central America is an additional indication of this government's long-term interest in that part of the world.

Our commitment to a political solution and to the strengthening of democracy and economic development in Central America is clear. Democracy and economic development, however, must have a basis in security, and our military aid to our allies, as well as our efforts to help them strengthen their own defensive capabilities, are designed to increase their security and thus shield the growth of democratic processes, economic development, dialog, and negotiations.

April 27 speech to the joint session of Congress: support for democracy, development, dialog, and the necessary military assistance to provide a shield for the first three. As a practical manner, all four aspects are interdependent, and we are continuing to evolve practical steps to implement all the facets of that policy.

When the Final Act of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe, widely referred to as ``Helsinki accords,'' was concluded in Helsinki on August 1, 1975, thirty-three governments of Eastern and Western Europe, as well as the United States and Canada, committed themselves to ``respect human rights and fundamental freedoms, including the freedom of thought, conscience, religion or belief, for all without distinction as to race, sex, language, or religion.'' The participating governments further committed themselves to foster ``freer movement and contacts,'' improved access to information, and cultural and educational exchanges.

The Helsinki accords are a major achievement in the development of universal standards of international conduct and fundamental human rights. These standards go back to the earliest days of the American Republic. In a letter from Paris written to James Madison in 1787, Thomas Jefferson said that ``a bill of rights is what the people are entitled to against every government on earth.'' The Helsinki accords are, in effect, a bill of rights for all the people of Europe.

The Government of the United States is firmly committed to the full implementation of the human rights and humanitarian provisions of the Helsinki accords. The American people are unalterably dedicated to the preservation and promotion of fundamental human rights throughout the world.

At the Helsinki follow-up meeting in Madrid, the United States along with other Western countries has pointed out the failures of the Soviet Union and East European states to comply with their obligations under the humanitarian and human rights provisions of the Helsinki accords.

The suppression of the trade union Solidarity in Poland, the continuing acts of repression directed against the Helsinki monitors, the drastic decrease in the level of emigration from the Soviet Union, and the harassment and persecution throughout the Soviet Union and Eastern Europe of citizens attempting to express their religious and political freedoms flagrantly denies the principles of Helsinki agreed to by the respective governments. These repressive actions not only threaten the achievement of genuine security and cooperation in Europe, but have a chilling effect on the human spirit of the brave peoples enduring this tyranny.

Rights Day'' and has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of that day. On this occasion, Americans are afforded the opportunity to reaffirm their commitment to the human rights principles embodied in the Final Act of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe and to demonstrate their solidarity with the peoples of the Soviet Union and Eastern Europe, whose basic human rights are being violated by their governments on a continuing and regular basis.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 25th day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Bureau of Investigation. Believe me, it makes for impressive reading. But I couldn't help thinking this morning that no document or official history of the exploits of the men and women of the FBI could ever really capture what the Bureau, what the letters ``FBI'' themselves mean to the people whose way of life you are sworn to serve and protect.

To the American people you're a legend, and that is rightfully so. FBI agents have always been thought of as a cut above the ordinary, as law enforcement agents whose dedication and professionalism make them a first line of defense against mobsters, spies, corrupt officials, and other professional wrongdoers who prey on the innocent and undermine the moral foundations of our society. The personal qualities of the special agents of the FBI have made the Bureau the most corruption-free institution in the history of law enforcement and one of the most modern and advanced agencies of its kind in the world.

Recently, we've passed through a painful era in American history when it seemed that many of our proudest values and most important institutions were called into question. It's my personal belief that as mindless and destructive as some of the criticism was, its final result has been not only a reaffirmation of those institutions and those values but a new and greater understanding and appreciation for their usefulness and their meaning. The FBI will continue to look to the future, to use the latest and most sophisticated techniques to fight organized crime, white-collar crime, terrorism -- in short, to do what needs to be done to protect the law-abiding people of the United States.

Today, under Judge Webster's leadership, the FBI takes on great new challenges. For the first time you are involved in the investigation of narcotics and dangerous drugs trade, and already you have brought to this endeavor the kind of expertise and skill that we've come to expect of you.

The challenge of crime today in America is a grave one. As you know, upon entering office this administration addressed itself immediately to the economic crisis that we were facing at that time as well as to the dangerous decline that had taken place in our Nation's national security and military strength. Yet even while we worked on these difficult problems we still kept work on the Nation's crime problem foremost in our minds.

Last year, when I announced at the Justice Department our eight-point program for attacking this problem, I was pleased to be able to announce a very sizable expansion of Justice Department personnel, including for the first time in many years additional agents for the FBI. We're now moving forward with other elements of the crime program, and we're doing so methodically and carefully but with one goal in mind. The recent increase in the drug trade, which has led to your new role in this battle, is really a reflection of an even deeper problem: the criminal networks and syndicates that have been tolerated in America for too long. I can only repeat to you that we're going after organized crime, root and branch. Our goal is to break the power of the mob in America and nothing short of it. We mean to end their profits, imprison their members, and cripple their organization.

The FBI has been, and is today, in the forefront of this battle. In recent years you scored admirable successes against professional criminals and their organizations. What is called for now is a renewed national strategy and a unified effort to achieve this objective.

You stand at the forefront of our efforts to detect and counter the increasing hostile intelligence threat to our country. Espionage, theft, and diversion of our technology, and Soviet ``active measures'' threaten us as never before. This part of your duty, about which I can say little in detail here, is vital to our national security, and I ask that you continue to devote the special attention which this difficult task requires.

On this, your 75th anniversary, I ask you to redouble your efforts to break apart and ultimately cripple the criminal syndicates in America. I also ask that you continue to give the highest priority to deterring and countering hostile intelligence activities within the United States. The FBI's record of fidelity, bravery, and integrity is a long and distinguished one. At each turn in your history, when criminals have engaged in new or advanced forms of criminal activity, you have led the law enforcement community in responding to these threats.

Once again, you're being asked by the American people for that kind of leadership, that kind of selfless dedication. I want to say to you that I know that you will respond as you always have -- with excellence and with fervor.

Let me say to all the agents and staff of the Federal Bureau of Investigation the American people are proud of your past and your present, and we're grateful that you will be there for all of the challenges that lie in our future.

Axis-inspired espionage and sabotage, dealt serious blows to organized crime, worked to stem racial violence, and undertook the responsibility of safeguarding America against threats of hostile intelligence agents and efforts to subvert our form of government. Beyond this, today's FBI is not only preeminent in scientific investigative support, but has demonstrated great vision and distinction in the performance of its duties and the training of its Special Agents.

By designating July 26, 1983, as FBI Day, we mark the seventy-fifth anniversary of the creation of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. In celebrating this event, law enforcement agencies throughout the Nation join the American people in expressing their debt of gratitude to the men and women who have made the FBI the world's foremost criminal investigative organization. This major milestone provides an opportunity for all our citizens to join in honoring those whose dedicated efforts have made the FBI a formidable foe of criminals and a stalwart defender of America's freedom and security.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 26th day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Thank you for the letter which you and the presidents of Colombia, Mexico, and Venezuela have sent to me concerning the meeting held in Cancun on July 17, to review the current situation in Central America.

I would like to congratulate you on the efforts which the Contadora Four are making to promote dialog among the countries of Central America. My government has consistently expressed strong support for the Contadora process. The Cancun Declaration, by articulating the crucial issues which must be treated to reach an effective and enduring resolution of the Central American conflict, is an important contribution to advancing that process.

First, it is essential that democratic institutions be established and strengthened as a means to resolve political differences within the Central American states. Only by ensuring free and open participation in the democratic process can the peoples of Central America achieve reconciliation within their societies.

Third, the conflict in Central America must be removed from the context of an East-West confrontation, through such measures as the verifiable withdrawal of all foreign military and security advisers and a certifiable freeze on the acquisition of offensive armaments.

And finally, the countries of Central America must work among themselves and with their neighbors to achieve and sustain a level of economic growth that will guarantee the basic needs of their people.

I am pleased that the Cancun Declaration recognizes the importance of these fundamental principles. These issues are inextricably inter-related, and must be addressed on a comprehensive, regional basis which treats simultaneously the concerns of all the states affected by the Central American conflict. An attempt to resolve these issues sequentially, or on a piecemeal basis, will not achieve the goal we all share of a lasting peace for all of Central America.

Equally important is the need to ensure that all undertakings assumed by the Central American states be fully reciprocal and subject to comprehensive, fully adequate verification. Clearly, no initiative can bring true peace to Central America if one state is permitted to take unjust advantage of its neighbors through failure to abide by peace conditions which bind the others. The Charter of the Organization of American States makes clear that it should be the purpose of the OAS to either prevent unjust acts committed by one state against another, or to provide for common action on the part of the members in the event of difficulties. I believe the OAS, as this Hemisphere's regional forum, is the appropriate mechanism to ensure that those who make commitments, comply with them.

The problems of Central America are complex, and their solution demands untiring efforts. The activities which you and your colleagues in the Contadora group have undertaken are proof of your sincere dedication to the goal of a genuine and lasting peace throughout the region. My own efforts in this regard have been to dispatch my Special Emissary to the region and establish a bipartisan commission to examine the problems of Central America and to propose solutions. You have my prayers and those of my countrymen as you continue your work.

On April 27th I went to Capitol Hill, addressed a Joint Session of the Congress on a subject of vital importance to all Americans. I talked about our goals in Central America, and I asked for congressional understanding and support.

In Central America, as elsewhere, we support democracy, reform, and human freedom. We support economic development. We support dialog and negotiations among and within the countries of the region. And, yes, we support a security shield for the region's threatened nations in order to protect these other goals.

In my view, there's been entirely too much attention to the efforts that we're making to provide that security shield and not nearly enough to the other elements of our policy. Yet in each of the four elements of the policy, we find they reinforce each other and that they are being pursued simultaneously in a carefully balanced manner.

I dispatched Ambassador Dick Stone to the region to facilitate the process of dialog and negotiations. He's there now with a personal message from me to leaders of countries in the region, the text of which I'm making public tonight. I'm heartened by the efforts of the Contadora countries -- led by Colombia, Mexico, Panama, and Venezuela -- to reach a peaceful regional solution. I'm encouraged by some recent statements from Nicaragua and Cuba that seem to indicate that they, too, now recognize the merit to regional negotiations. I trust their words will be followed by positive actions to ease tension and to stop the fighting in the region.

Here at home I've appointed a bipartisan commission to make recommendations on the long-term measures, including economic assistance, that we should undertake to help these struggling nations. And I hope soon to be signing the legislation on the Caribbean Basin Initiative, passed by an overwhelming bipartisan majority of both Houses. The program will bolster the economic independence of the region.

We continue to promote elections as the best way to guarantee peace, human freedom, and responsive government. The greatest portion of our aid goes toward humanitarian and economic assistance. For every $1 we provide for security assistance to that region, we provide $3 for economic and human development.

But we recognize that democracy and development can hardly flourish when threatened by violence. Dialog and negotiations can best succeed when the parties are convinced that their goals cannot be achieved through the barrel of a gun. It's especially important in our own hemisphere that the United States continue to be the foremost protector of peace. As part of this mission, as a way to provide a shield for democracy and development, we, together with our friends, are now planning joint training exercises in the Caribbean and Central America. And let me set the record straight on what these exercises are and what they are not.

Essentially, there will be two sets of practice training in coming months -- one, a series of ground exercises in Honduras with the combined forces of Honduras and the United States; second, a series of ocean exercises with our own fleet. We have conducted joint exercises with Latin American countries on a regular basis since 1965. The latest exercises with Honduras took place earlier this year. Much larger scale exercises have taken place in Europe, Asia, and Latin America.

Yes, we want to underscore once and for all that the United States, along with our friends, seriously opposes the use of force by one neighbor against another in Central America, but we're not seeking a larger presence in that region, and U.S. forces have not been requested there. The United States stands firmly on the side of peace. As a nation, we remain steadfast in policy and purpose. We want to see an end to violence and bloodshed, to the export of revolution. We want to help our neighbors lift themselves up to prosperity. We want to usher in a new era of peace and social justice. Now, these are great goals, worthy of a great and generous people. And we shall continue to keep faith with ourselves in the days ahead.

Q. Mr. President, you complain of too much attention. How can the people ignore two battleship groups, thousands of combat troops going to Honduras, it is said the covert funding of 10,000 rebels, Nicaraguan rebels? My question -- and all these things have happened since April 27th -- my question, sir, is, in seeking solutions, how far will you go militarily, and I'd like to follow up.

The President. Well, I have told you, we have no military plans for intervention of that kind. We have 55, mainly noncommissioned officers helping to train the Salvadoran Army. We know that Cuba has somewhere in the neighborhood -- well, it has thousands of military personnel in Nicaragua. It does seem a little overbalanced with regard to the attention that's being paid to 55 as against attention that's being paid to the thousands. I suppose what my question is, Helen, to answer with a question, is why are maneuvers that we have performed before, and regularly, suddenly treated with such suspicion when only -- well, within this year, last spring, we had military maneuvers in Honduras, and last year we had naval maneuvers in the Caribbean, and no one seemed to be excited about them at all. So, is it just that there's no confidence in the fact that when I say these are maneuvers of the kind we've been holding regularly and for years?

Q. But they're unprecedented -- to last 6 months. The polls show the American people are not for them, and they fear it may lead to war. And my question is, remembering the lessons in Vietnam, does this bother you? And do they have any say?

The President. First of all, there is no comparison with Vietnam, and there's not going to be anything of that kind in this. And maybe the people are disturbed because of the confused pattern that has been presented to them and the constant drumbeat with regard to the fact of suspicion that somehow there is an ulterior purpose in this.

It hardly seems to me that those ships are going there -- and I don't know that they're going to be there 6 months. I don't know what the length of time for the training is. I don't know the number of ships involved. But I didn't know the number that were involved in the Caribbean exercises.

Soviet freighter, the Ul'Yanov, is approaching the Port of Corinto in the vicinity of Nicaragua -- that port is in Nicaragua -- and it is carrying a load of military equipment, helicopters, transport helicopters for military purposes, and so forth. And no one shot at them.

Look back at some of our aircraft that were shot down on the charge that they had ventured out over international waters -- or out of international waters, into the airspace of a Communist bloc country and shot down, and we protested diplomatically.

It seems to me that young men and women who are going to defend this country of ours and who join the military should know that they have the right to defend themselves if we have placed them in a position where they could come under fire. And this is just a standard order. We don't want war. But I don't think that you prevent war by letting your personnel out there become the victims.

The President. No, I don't think so. All of the ships that are down in that area and that are going there are outside the 12-mile limit. They're out in international waters where they have a right to be.

Now, wait a minute before all of your hands go up here. You change personnel every once in a while, and new people come into the White House press corps. And it's only been recently that an effort has been made to see that I have an opportunity to meet them and get acquainted. And so recently, I met five newcomers to the press corps, but only three of them are here tonight. And when I met them I told them that in this, the first press conference that I knew they were here, that I was going to call on them if they had a question.

Q.   --  -- in the region. Is sending down our military might to the region a way to show that we oppose force? Isn't there some sort of contradiction there? Wouldn't it be better to say -- if we do these things regularly -- isn't this the time now not to do it, not to heighten the tensions, and to say we oppose the use of force? How can you oppose it by sending down all these ships and men?

The President. Well, since the trouble that is going on down there comes from outside the area, is revolution exported from the Soviet Union and from Cuba and from others of their allies, then wouldn't there perhaps be a risk if we changed our pattern and withdrew? Wouldn't we be sending some kind of a signal that might be the wrong kind of signal to send if we want peace in that area?

The simple truth is no one has asked for American forces to come to their aid; in fact, they've gone quite the contrary and said the reverse -- that they don't. And yet, they do acknowledge that they need the material assistance that we're giving them, both economic and to provide a shield, or help them provide their own shield against the attacks that are preventing them from making the economic progress that they want to make, now that they have installed a democratic type of government there.

Q. You know, you've said in your letter to the four Contadora nations that you want to take this out of the realm of an East-West confrontation. But doesn't somebody have to begin to take it out of that realm? And couldn't the U.S. be the leader in that way and not make it that kind of an atmosphere of confrontation?

Salvadoran Government to discuss participating in the democratic process, in the elections that are coming up before the year is out. In the entire area, I have just sent letters -- which have been made public now -- but letters to the Contadora Four of our approval of what they're doing and our recognition of what they are, and that we stand ready to support them in what they're trying to accomplish. We want a political and peaceful solution.

Q. Thank you. Mr. President, military leaders in the Pentagon have stated recently that they never want to be involved in another war without the support of the American people. Do you have any sense or feeling now for whether the American people are ready to support a war to defend our interests in Central America?

No, I don't think the American people -- and I don't think that they, frankly, I don't think that they're as aware as perhaps they should be. We've tried to make them aware that this does constitute something of a threat in this hemisphere, to peace in the entire hemisphere, if those who are exporting the revolution here are successful.

But no, we're not planning a war, and we don't think that that's going to happen at all. I've seen four wars in my lifetime. I have sons, and I have a grandson. And I agree with General Eisenhower that war is man's greatest stupidity. I don't want to see such a thing. We want peace.

But we also must recognize that you've got to do more than just want peace. You have got to prevent what is happening down there to people who want peace, also, but are not allowed to have it because of outside forces that are seizing upon their situation and hoping to further their own ideological aims.

The President. Those that have been informed and understand it do. I just met with some today who made it evident that they did. Now, if we all get together and explain what's happening down there, perhaps that'll resolve the situation in that regard.

Q. Mr. President, if there is an incident where the American forces down there engaging in the military exercises are fired upon and they are forced to fire back, do you see any contingency where such an incident might lead to deeper American involvement in Central America?

The President. No, I don't really, because I don't foresee -- first of all, those maneuvers that are going to be held in Honduras are not going to put Americans in any reasonable proximity to the border. It would have to be something in the nature of a terrorist attack, something of that kind, and I think that any of us -- that could happen in a base here in America. And again, I believe that those people who have taken it upon themselves to be our defenders and protectors have a right to defend and protect their own lives.

Q. Thank you, Mr. President. I'd like to give you a chance to silence this drumbeat of confusion that you were talking about. Why not say categorically that Central America will not be another Vietnam, that under no circumstances will you impose U.S. troops in a combat situation in Central America?

The President. No one has presented a proposal to me about increasing the number. There's no question that 55 of them -- if there was an increase, probably we could train the Salvadoran Army and its new recruits -- that are coming in actually requiring basic training -- a little faster than we're doing it. But there's been no proposal for such an increase.

Commission, is for the purpose of coming up and recommending a long-range plan that would particularly deal with the things that you mention. There's no question that our neighbors to the south have, for too many years, suffered revolutions in which one set of rulers simply were exchanged for another set of rulers. And there's no question but their economic and social policies have left much to be desired as far as the opportunity for the great mass of their people.

South America and discussed with them -- of how we can have the kind of development that will make these countries economically self-sufficient, that will give them a standard of living in which there isn't the fertile soil that is presently there for subversion, for people offering promises of pie in the sky and then arousing to revolution, and to, in other words, have a program that makes all of the nations here in the Americas equal partners in the development of this Western Hemisphere.

The President. It does not follow that it has to undoubtedly entail that. For example, many of those countries are considered too high a risk for private investment. If, together, we could agree upon guarantees that investment would not be confiscated, taken over by governments and in changes of government, and so forth, there is far more in the private investment pool, far more there than any government could possibly do.

And it is to find out what is practical and what can be done. And we're not completely alone in this, because our allies, the other industrial nations in the world, have made it plain to us -- and again, at Williamsburg -- that not only here in our hemisphere but in their own, we want to come up and find ways that we can help the developing part of the world and help them to faster development and a better way of life.

The President. No, I am very hopeful that if this partial withdrawal takes place that it will be recognized and admitted to be, by the Israelis, as one phase of their agreement to withdraw. If they withdraw in a phased withdrawal, it certainly will give us a better case for breaking the roadblock that has been established by Syria and persuading them to keep their original promise that when others withdrew they would withdraw.

But if this is a phased withdrawal, I think there is fear if there's simply a withdrawal to another line and then a digging in and fortifying along that line, that this would be what it looks like Syria is doing, and that is simply trying to partition Lebanon, reduce Lebanon, and grab off some territory for themselves. But with the agreement that's been signed between Lebanon and Israel, I don't think Israel has that in mind.

The President. Well, I just believe that the people of a country have a right to determine their own destiny, choose their own government, and if it was partitioned, it would be occupation by other countries and, yes, I think that is awful. We set out to help Lebanon, after all these years of strife, regain sovereignty of its own land, protection of its own borders. And we're helping in every way we can to bring that about.

America, Dr. Henry Kissinger. There have been, as you know, a number of charges over the years that Mr. Kissinger during the Nixon years tried to destabilize the duly elected Government of Chile and that he also once told a Chilean official that whatever happens in the south is of no importance. Did you check into Mr. Kissinger's record on Latin America before you appointed him?

The President. I know what his position was prior to my taking over this Office and how seriously he considered the problems that are going on. Remember, Salvador didn't start with us. It was already in turmoil before we got here. And I know how he feels about that. And I know, also, that there is no hard and fast -- well, let me put it this way: I think there are some stereotypes about Mr. Kissinger that a little actual reading and re-reading of the history would indicate that those stereotypes are not necessarily valid.

Q. Mr. President, if I may follow up with another question about the Commission, you talk a lot here, and your aides do, about the gender gap. And yet that Commission was appointed -- 12 men, no women. Doesn't that add to the perception that you're insensitive to women?

The President. It might add to the perception, and that's all it is is a perception, because if anyone wants to really dig into the facts, I will match our record against any other administration that has ever been here with regard to what we have accomplished for women -- in the field of economics, our tax policies that reduced and hopefully will in the near future eliminate the marriage penalty tax; the measures that we passed in the IRA's that not only working women but housewives can have these tax-free savings accounts. We have almost doubled the tax credit for child care.

But in addition to that, I noticed the other night that someone on the air was comparing our record to that of the previous administration. And we came out a little behind with regard to the appointment of women to positions in government, except that it turned out that without their acknowledging it, they were comparing the 4-year record of the previous administration with our first 2 years. And when you compare our first 2 years with their first 2 years, well, we're quite a ways out ahead.

The President. On this particular Commission, maybe it's because we're doing so much and appointing so many that we're no longer seeking a token or something. It just came out that these were the 12 we selected. We wanted six opponents; we wanted six on our side.

Q. Mr. President, since Cuba has repeatedly been labeled as the fountainhead of most of the violence in Central America, why has your administration elected to go to the recipients of the arms and the equipment that comes in instead of going to the source?

The President. Well, we have interdicted some of the supplies that are going from Nicaragua over to El Salvador. If you go to the source, I think you're talking about the Soviet Union. They know, and we have communicated to them, how we feel about this, and we have also to our friends in Cuba -- told them how we feel about it.

We're trying to bring about the very thing that all of you seem to think that we're shying away from, and that is not broadening a war but trying to limit it and trying to bring about a peaceful and political settlement in Central America.

Q. Mr. President, in reply to Helen's question you spoke of confusion. But isn't this administration to blame for much of that confusion? Some of our own ambassadors in Central America were taken by surprise by the maneuvers. Some of the friendly governments, expecially in the Contadora group, were puzzled by your latest actions. My question is, why was there not more prior consultation, and what can you do now to reassure any of those friendly governments that we're not today closer to war down there than we were last week?

Sometimes there's a slip up, and an ambassador doesn't find out something they should find out soon enough in advance. As a matter of fact, I received a cable from one about that -- my most recent appointee as the Ambassador of Austria. And Helene [von Damm] let me know that something had taken place, and she hadn't been told about it in advance. And when Helene speaks, I listen.

The training feature with Honduras -- this has been well advertised and known for a long, long time that it's going to take place. And as I say, we regularly conduct, and conduct joint maneuvers with, very often not only on land but with the navies of our friends and allies in Central and South America. And so I just don't think that there's great confusion about this.

So, I can only tell you that we're continuing on a policy that we believe is aimed at, first of all, bringing about peace in El Salvador, hopefully through negotiations with those who are presently radicals and fighting as guerrillas, and in Nicaragua, hoping that we can persuade the Nicaraguan, the Sandinista government to return to the principles of the revolution and which they, in writing, guaranteed to the Organization of American States was going to be the policy of their government.

Q. Let me follow up on covert aid, Mr. President. Given the fact that this covert operation is not so covert any more, haven't we reached a point where it really might make more sense to do things on an overt basis? In other words, hasn't the thing really become counterproductive?

The President. No. No, I don't think so. And I think what we're doing is well within the limits of common sense. And those who are attempting to make it impossible for us to bring aid down in that area, I think are the ones who are building up -- if they have their way -- to a giant headache down the road a ways. And we're trying to prevent such a headache from coming about.

This is why, when this charge was made -- the allegation was made -- this is why I said there's only one answer to this. Certainly, the best investigative force in the United States is the Federal Bureau of Investigation. And I have told them to go completely to the bottom of this to see if there was any wrongdoing, to see if there was anything unethical in what had taken place. And I have told all of our people to make themselves available, anyone who knows anything about this, and that includes me -- and I didn't know anything about it until I read it in the paper -- to get to the bottom of this, so that everyone in this country can be reassured that we know the truth.

The President. Well, that's what was alleged. That was what some of them said that they suspected. I would have to tell you, having lived here for awhile, that I don't think it's possible, either. But, also, there could be the element of were these things actually stolen by someone in the White House? Was there involvement of White House staff in campaign activities who were supposed to be performing other government positions? There are any number of things that should be looked at.

It is good news for all Americans that the House and Senate have again demonstrated bipartisan unity in pursuit of two vital national goals -- strategic modernization and arms control. Their authorization of production of the Peacekeeper missile reaffirms the fact that, as a nation, we are united in our approach to arms reductions and protecting peace.

In May the Congress established a new bipartisan unity endorsing the Scowcroft commission recommendations. In the past 2 weeks, that unity was tested and sustained. Thanks to this bipartisan support, we are now in a stronger position to continue making progress at the START negotiations. If we can maintain our stable, bipartisan, consistent approach here at home, we have a great opportunity to achieve what we all want -- lasting stability in the nuclear balance and significant reductions of nuclear arsenals on both sides.

Foods from animal origin supply 70 percent of the protein, 35 percent of the energy, 80 percent of the calcium, 60 percent of the phosphorous, and important quantities of the ``B'' vitamins and trace minerals in the average American's diet. The application of scientific methods has markedly improved the efficiency of meat production in recent years and enhanced the desirability of these foods to consumers.

During July 1983, the American Society of Animal Science is celebrating its seventy-fifth anniversary. Its 7,500 members provide research, extension and educational services to all segments of animal agriculture in both the United States and other countries.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 27th day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

The power of these syndicates infects every part of our society. The cost in human and fiscal terms is incalculable. The climate of lawlessness that their very existence fosters makes this confederation of career criminals a costly and tragic part of our history.

The reasons for the mob's success are clear. Its tactics and techniques are well known: organizational cohesion and discipline, vows of secrecy and loyalty, insulation for its leaders from direct criminal involvement, bribery and corruption of law enforcement and public officials, violence and threats against those who would testify or resist this criminal conspiracy -- all of these have contributed to the curtain of silence that surrounds the mob.

Through the years, a few dedicated Americans have broken this curtain of silence and fought this menace. Their names are familiar -- prosecutor Thomas Dewey and Judge Samuel Seabury, Federal agent Eliot Ness, Senators Kefauver and McClellan, Attorney General Kennedy, investigative reporter Don Bolles. But for too long this fight has been left to a few dedicated policemen, prosecutors, journalists, or public officials, and too often their efforts have resulted in only temporary gains against this menace. The time has come to make these gains more permanent, to fully redeem the contributions of those who have waged a lonely battle against difficult odds. And the time has come for all of us to assist in the fight to break the power of the mob in America.

It's often been said that no government can eliminate or end the illegal activities that provide much of the revenue and support for organized crime. Well, that is only true as far as it goes. I agree that government cannot stop or abolish the human impulses that make racketeering profitable. But I also believe we'd have the capacity to break apart and ultimately destroy the tightly knit regional and national networks of career criminals who live off these activities.

Late last year, I announced a national strategy to expose, prosecute, and ultimately cripple organized crime in America. We're proceeding carefully with the elements of that strategy. Its final goal is the removal of a blot on American history that has lasted nearly a hundred years.

As I've said before, few weapons against organized crime have proven more effective or more important to law enforcement than the investigations of the Kefauver committee in the early fifties, the labor racketeering hearings of the McClellan committee in the midfifties, and the testimony of Federal informant Joseph Valachi before a Senate committee in the 1960's. While some other commissions on crime have been appointed since then, each has been of short duration and had neither the time nor the resources to fully investigate the syndicate and lay out a national program for its elimination.

The purpose of this Commission, which will last for nearly 3 years, will be to undertake through public hearings a region-by-region exposure and analysis of organized crime, to measure its influence and impact on American society, and make judicial and legislative recommendations.

Judge Kaufman has won widespread praise for his leadership of a number of important commissions on judicial and law enforcement problems. After I expressed my gratitude to him today in the Oval Office for taking this assignment, we were joined by the rest of the Commission members, including Senator Thurmond and Congressman Rodino, the chairmen of the Senate and House Judiciary Committees, whom, I am especially pleased to announce, have agreed to serve on this Commission. And I want, also, to acknowledge the generous assistance of Justice Potter Stewart, who, in addition to his other responsibilities, has agreed to play a vital role in this endeavor.

The membership of this Commission shows strong geographical balance, and it includes representatives of the judiciary, the Congress, the academic community, the private sector, and most important, law enforcement at all levels. We've been especially careful to include -- and I believe this will be one of the Commission's greatest strengths -- a number of individuals who, though not widely known, have had extensive, frontline experience with organized crime and are among the acknowledged experts in this field.

But prosecutions by themselves can never dig out the roots of a problem that reaches so deeply into our society. Nor is the Congress, which has many other matters on its agenda, in a position to take responsibility for the business of exposing organized crime, its latest techniques and inroads.

I believe this Commission can expose to the American people the small group of career criminals who run the rackets, push drugs, corrupt policemen and public officials, and, ultimately, undermine the very basis of our democratic society itself. I believe this Commission can mobilize the American people against organized crime by triggering the kind of public support that is vital for its final isolation and elimination.

Only when we work in our States and communities to put out of business the racketeering that fills the coffers of organized crime, only when we fully expose and isolate those groups or individuals who work or do business with organized crime can we expect a final victory.

Conference in upstate New York, a Federal judge noted that the defendants before him had not stumbled into criminal activity thoughtlessly or because of underprivileged backgrounds. He referred to them as hardened, sophisticated criminals who thought of themselves as a group above the law, men who placed loyalty to each other above loyalty to their country and its law-abiding citizens. He noted that these men ``wear two faces,'' that they cloaked themselves in the respectability of charitable or civic organizations, even as they work to prey on innocent people and undermine the very moral foundations of our society.

Judge Kaufman, your words were true then, and unfortunately, they are true today. I want you and the members of the Commission here to know, as you seek subpena power from the Congress and go about the difficult tasks ahead of you, that you have my full support, the support of the Attorney General, who was instrumental in the formation of this Commission, and the support of this entire administration.

Sec. 2. (a) The Commission shall make a full and complete national and region-by-region analysis of organized crime; define the nature of traditional organized crime as well as emerging organized crime groups, the sources and amounts of organized crime's income, and the uses to which organized crime puts its income; develop in-depth information on the participants in organized crime networks; and evaluate Federal laws pertinent to the effort to combat organized crime. The Commission shall advise the President and the Attorney General with respect to its findings and actions which can be undertaken to improve law enforcement efforts directed against organized crime, and make recommendations concerning appropriate administrative and legislative improvements and improvements in the administration of justice.

Carol Corrigan, of Oakland, Calif., is a deputy district attorney assigned to the senior felony staff for Alameda County and an assistant professor of law at the University of California Hastings College of Law. She served as special consultant and staff editor to the Presidential Task Force on Victims of Violent Crime in 1982 and has authored a number of publications relating to criminal law issues. She was born August 16, 1948.

Manuel J. Reyes, of Miami, Fla., is an attorney and executive vice president of the board of directors of Miami International Hospital. He also served as chairman of the Hispanic branch of the Miami Organized Crime Commission, and as a leader of the Hispanic community, he mobilized citizen groups to press for crackdowns on the influx of illegal drugs into the Miami area. He was born July 29, 1924.

Yesterday's attack in Lisbon on the residence of the Turkish Ambassador to Portugal was only the latest in a series of brutal and increasingly indiscriminate terrorist attacks against Turkish diplomats and other innocent civilians. In yesterday's attack, for which the Revolutionary Armenian Army claims responsibility, the wife of a senior Turkish diplomat was killed and a young child was seriously wounded. Only 2 weeks earlier, a Turkish diplomat was murdered outside his home in Brussels, and 1 day later 7 other individuals were killed as they waited to board a Turkish airliner in Paris. No real or imagined grievance could possibly justify these modern-day horrors.

On behalf of the people and Government of the United States, I extend the deepest sympathy to the Turkish Government and to the families of the victims of this attack. But more than sympathy is required. This senseless violence must cease. To that end, I will be speaking to other heads of state in the days ahead regarding urgent and more effective cooperative measures to eliminate from the civilized community such barbaric and inhuman acts.

Under its terms, the U.S.S.R. will purchase from the United States 9 million metric tons of grain annually in approximately equal quantities of wheat and corn. Up to 1 million metric tons of the minimum could be satisfied by Soviet purchases of 500,000 metric tons of soybean and/or soybean meal. If this soybean/soybean meal option is exercised in any year, the minimum of wheat and corn for that year will be 8 million metric tons. During any year of the agreement, the Soviet Union may purchase 3 million metric tons of wheat and corn in addition to the minimum of 9 million metric tons without prior consultation.

The current agreement that expires on September 30, 1983, called for a minimum annual purchase of 6 million metric tons of wheat and corn by the U.S.S.R., and provided an option for the Soviet Union to purchase an additional 2 million metric tons per year. The original agreement covered a 5-year period beginning in 1975. It was extended for a 1-year period on two occasions.

Nancy and I are delighted to welcome Dorothy Height and the National Council of Negro Women to the White House. I can think of no group that better represents what is good and right and hopeful about America. You have been an important force for progress and opportunity, not just in America but around the world. On behalf of the thousands you've helped and a nation that you've made proud, I thank you. And I especially would like to recognize the superb leadership of your president, Dorothy Height.

Dorothy, you've been quoted as saying, ``We have common problems, common desires and common goals, it's time for us to begin to work on the problems of the world, together.'' Your words have never been more true than they are today. Our country and our people face serious challenges, and our values and families are bearing considerable strain. We need unity, not divisiveness to see us through. If we're to remain strong and free and good, we must not waste the talents of one mind, the muscle of one body, or the potential of a single soul. We need all our people -- men and women, young and old, individuals of every race -- to be healthy, happy, and whole. Our young people must grow up free of drugs; our families must stay together; our people must have jobs; and our elderly must live out their days secure from want and from fear. I know these are your goals, and I share them.

Collaboration for Children and Youth, to name just a few of your efforts, testify to your commitment. Your willingness to give of yourselves should lift the hearts of all who are tired and discouraged. Dorothy's words, which I know have been an inspiration to you, must become a rallying cry for all Americans who love freedom. We are one family of humankind, and together we can make our dreams real. Obstacles of inequality and discrimination are still great, but our combined determination to overcome them is greater. If we persevere together, we can and we will succeed together.

As women and as blacks, you know better than almost anyone else the difficult problems of discrimination. And through your volunteer work, you are keenly sensitive to the needs of our underpriviledged and disadvantaged. I want to help in your cause. The door to the Oval Office will always be open to Dorothy Height and the members of the National Council of Negro Women.

I have to tell you, though, I'm more than a little self-conscious facing you here and saying these things. There's been such a case made that I am prejudiced, if not an outright bigot, that I find myself wondering if maybe you're thinking that I don't mean what I'm saying, and this is just another dose of political hot air. Well, believe me, it is not. Nothing has frustrated me more than the totally false image that has been created of me.

I've lived a long time, but I can't remember a time in my life when I didn't believe that prejudice and bigotry were the worse of sins. My mother was the kindest person I've ever known and truly believed that we are all brothers and sisters -- children of God. My father was a rough, tough Irishman. He might not have expressed himself the way my mother did -- [laughter] -- but when that great motion picture classic ``The Birth of a Nation'' came to our small town, the two kids in town who didn't get to see it were me and my brother.

That picture, as you know was a classic -- not so much for the subject matter -- it had charted a whole new course in the method of making pictures, and therefore, is still considered today a kind of historic monument. But our father said it was about the Klu Klux Klan, and no one in his family was going to see that picture. And to this day, after more than 25 years in the motion picture industry, I haven't seen it, and I don't intend to.

From boyhood on, the way we were raised, my brother and I challenged every time we ran across it -- the, sometime, the customs of the times, customs that we're doing away with -- may not have succeeded entirely; but, oh, what changes we've made since those days when I was a boy.

As a radio sports announcer almost 50 years ago, I used to speak out on the air against the then ban on blacks in organized baseball. And before that, playing college football, a little school in the Midwest, my closest teammate and buddy down there in the center of the line -- he was center and I was right guard -- was a man named Franklin Burghardt. Burky was black. He went on to become the athletic director of Morgan State University in Baltimore. And I have thanked the Lord many times that we were reunited after many years of being apart -- although we kept in correspondence -- but back here, shortly before he was to end his life, and that Nancy and I could have he and his wife as guests here in this house that belongs to all the people.

I have to tell you just one little thing about how much Burky meant to us. In those days, not very many got to college, and if you did it was because you could play football or something, which is how I got there. [Laughter] But we were playing a game one day and -- with the score 14 to nothing against us and only 2 minutes left in the first half. The other team, who wasn't blessed with having someone like Burky on their team, began to pick on him for the reasons that were more obvious then than they are today. And to give you an indication of what we all thought of Burky, we ended the half 14 to 14 and ended the game 43 to 14. [Laughter] He was quite a man.

As Governor in California, I broke a subtle barrier that had made it virtually impossible for blacks to rise above the very lowest civil service positions in State government. We increased by 60 percent the number who held supervisory positions and appointed to executive and policymaking positions more minority members than all the previous Governors of California put together.

I intended and am going to tell just some of the things that -- well, forgive me for taking the time to say this; but, as I said, I've been frustrated by all the demagogic image-making of the last couple of years. Now, let me tell you just some of the things we're doing in this administration and some of the things that we hope to do.

It's no secret that we're trying to reduce the cost of government, but not, as some have charged, at the expense of government's real responsibilities. Our budget calls for spending $632.2 million for Federal civil rights activities in 1984. And that is more than a 24-percent increase over the last year of the previous administration.

As evidence of our commitment to equal employment opportunity, we are fighting well over a hundred ongoing cases throughout the country against public employers charged with discriminating against minorities. In fiscal year 1982 alone, the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission obtained more than $134 million in back pay for victims of employee discrimination, a 74-percent increase over the last year of the previous administration.

But there are two sides to government's responsibility to provide opportunity. One is a fairminded and vigorous enforcement of antidiscrimination laws, and that's what we're doing. But enforcement alone will not create the jobs our people need so badly. What will create jobs is a healthy and growing economy. We can all find hope in the strength of the economic recovery that has begun, and I assure you this: We intend to see that every American, regardless of race, religion, or gender, benefits from that recovery.

Our minority youth, as you're only too painfully aware, are suffering nearly a 40-percent unemployment rate. To combat that, the Department of Housing and Urban Development last month launched the Minority Youth Training Initiative, a nationwide demonstration involving partnerships between city government, local private industry councils, and public housing authorities. This project will train minority youths in 20 cities for entry-level jobs in the public and private housing field. As many as 14,000 disadvantaged young people will be taught housing management and maintenance skills.

Also, our summer youth employment program has a budget of more than $800 million -- an increase of a hundred million dollars over last year -- to provide more than 800,000 summer jobs for young people throughout the United States. In fact, just last week here in the Rose Garden we found another $800,000 -- well, we didn't find it in the Rose Garden. [Laughter] We're not that careless! We found it over at the Labor Department -- [laughter] -- and in the Rose Garden we gave it to Mayor Barry for more youth jobs here in the District of Columbia. We've put in place a tax credit program that gives employers who hire eligible teenagers a credit for up to 85 percent of their wages. And we've made a special effort this summer to focus the attention of business and industry on the difficulties of minority youth. The White House Office of Private Sector Initiatives and the National Alliance of Business have worked hard to give these young people the chance they deserve. And I have been told that so far this summer nationwide summertime employment for young people is up 20 percent.

With Nancy's prodding and assistance, we've run up a battleflag on drug abuse. Drugs are a scourge of inner-city life, as you know so well. They can snuff out the bright prospects of a young person before he or she gets a chance to become an adult. We're implementing a tough, new enforcement strategy for the first time, coordinating the efforts of nine departments and 33 government agencies. There'll be no excuses. Drugs are bad, and we're going after them, and we're going to win.

To fight housing discrimination, we've put real teeth into the fair housing law by introducing legislation to give the Federal Government, for the first time, legal authority to protect people from housing discrimination. We believe that all Americans should be free to choose where to make their homes. If our proposed amendments are passed by the Congress, heavy financial penalties will be levied for the first time against those who practice bigotry and discrimination in housing.

We also believe that a good, solid education is the right of every child in our land. It is a vital, first step to opportunity, the means by which Amercian families traditionally have made life better for themselves and for generations who followed. And that's why we've launched a national campaign to improve the quality of America's classrooms and have begun to outline an agenda for excellence in education that will leave no child behind. We are also aggressively combating segregation in schools. The Justice Department, for example, has recently taken legal action against one State, charging discrimination in its higher education system.

And, again, speaking of my frustration, I've seen the news stories that, well, this is all a grandstand stunt by us, because next year is an election year. Well, we have authorized for filing three school desegregation cases, more than was authorized by the previous administration during its first 30 months in office.

Medical College in Nashville, Tennessee, an institution that has trained more than 40 percent of all the black physicians in America. Earlier this year we authorized the expenditure of more than $30 million so that Meharry Medical College can continue its historic service to the Nation. This commitment of resources by government will help to ensure that Meharry Medical College can continue as a major educational resource for primary-care physicians. It was in deep trouble, and we were very proud and happy to be able to set it on its course.

I could go on and on, but I don't think you want me to -- or need me to read a long laundry list of accomplishments. If you like, I can provide more details for you later. [Laughter] But let me assure you, I hear your call. With your help, this administration will continue to respond not just with words but with action.

Your founder, Mary McLeod Bethune, once said that black people in America only want what other Americans want -- an opportunity to make real what the Declaration of Independence and the Constitution and the Bill of Rights say, what the Four Freedoms establish. She said black people only want an equal chance to realize those ideals. And that's why we're eager to work with you, the organization that she founded on the premise that while government can assure equal treatment, government alone cannot provide that equal chance. That's the important work of families and communities and of organizations such as your own.

Let me say again, my door is open, and so is Faith Whittlesey's. Let's make this meeting the beginning of a lasting, positive relationship. We may not always agree on every detail, but together we can make this land we all love a better, freer place for our children and our children's children.

I regret the circumstances that have led to your decision, but I want to add that during this affair, you have acted in a manner consistent with the reputation for honor that you have always possessed. I know that reputation among your friends and associates will continue to be strong.

I appeared on Tuesday before the Senate Foreign Relations Committee for consideration of my appointment to the Board for International Broadcasting. It became obvious to me from the outset of the questioning by Senators Tsongas and Biden that they would use that occasion to attempt to divert the hearing away from broadcasting the U.S. views of freedom behind the Iron Curtain into a personal attack on me by my political enemies.

As a matter of fact, Senator Tsongas had issued a press release prior to the hearing criticizing you and prejudging my qualifications. It was an obvious partisan political effort to drive a wedge between you and the black community using me as the instrumentality. I have attached a copy of my letter to Senators Tsongas and Biden.

Frankly, I do not mind taking whatever heat these two ultra-liberal senators want to generate in my direction. However, I believe it is vital to America that they and their ilk be denied the opportunity to use me to hinder your struggle to return economic stability and provide an adequate national defense to our nation. Therefore, I am respectfully requesting that you withdraw my name from consideration for appointment to the Board for International Broadcasting.

Let me say in closing that I appreciate your appointing me to the Board. I did not seek the appointment but was most anxious to serve as I believe our only hope to survive the spread of Soviet slavery across the free world and to free the hostage people of the USSR is to broadcast the tenets of Christian belief through mass communication. I trust that the Board of International Broadcasting will carry out this task without fear of interference from some of those in public office who do not recognize the threat of Communist world domination.

But what was then true then is still true today. And that was the Future Farmers of America does more than give a good start to some fine young people. By cultivating leadership skills and patriotism, it ensures the strength and vitality of our country.

This generation of American farmers has astounded the world with its productivity. Farm output since 1950 has jumped 89 percent, with agricultural productivity rising more than four times faster than industrial productivity per hour worked. Last year, with less than three-tenths of 1 percent of the world's farmworkers, our country produced 65 percent of the world's soybeans, 48 percent of the corn, 33 percent of the sorghum, 25 percent of the oranges, 32 percent of the poultry, 26 percent of the beef. And the list goes on and on.

Today, one of our farmworkers produces enough food to feed himself plus 50 other Americans and 20 people in other countries in the world. So, it doesn't take a Harvard-trained economist to see what this means to our economy and the well-being of our people.

American agriculture has been so efficient that we often tend to take the abundance of food for granted. We can be very proud that we live in one of the few countries of the world that will not tolerate hunger and that your profession could take a lion's share of the credit for our ability to live up to that goal.

Agricultural productivity has permitted us to develop human values and to put those values into practice. And this just didn't happen by accident. Our abundance is a product of the hard work of our farmers, the skill and technological know-how that we put into agriculture and, most important, the freedom of which we're so proud here in America.

By the way, you might be interested to know that in some of the efforts to help the Third World, the developing countries -- and when we met in Cancun, Mexico, the industrial nations on this subject, I spoke to them of some of the things that we could do other than just handing out grants-in-aid and told them what it could be like if we could send teams of agriculturalists, of farmers from our country to some of those countries to help them become more selfsustaining in their food. And you might be happy to know that we have called a number of times already, and every time American farmers have volunteered and sent task forces to these undeveloped countries to tell them how they can better feed themselves.

Well, I know that the Future Farmers of America is doing its part to build character and to keep our country in the forefront of the production of food and fiber. I'd like to congratulate you for FFA's theme this year, which I understand is ``Keeping America on the Grow.'' You're now just emerging from some hard times that have been a long time in the making. I know things have been rough and still are for many farmers. But I hope when you go back to your homes, you'll tell your families and your friends of our confidence that things are getting better. And while you're at it, tell them that a White House source -- [laughter] -- told you personally that America's farmers are not going to be left out of the good times that lie ahead.

Capital. And I think that one general -- we owe General Motors a thank-you for sponsoring this leadership conference and making it possible. This kind of enlightened support from the private sector speaks well of American business.

And let me leave you with this thought: When you go home and remember all the sights you've seen in Washington, the shrines of American liberty, remember that back at the time the ideals of our nation emerged, it was composed overwhelmingly of men and women who made their living from the land. Today, we rely on you to maintain our ties to the land and to live up to our ideals.

You know, I've been out of school for a little over 50 years now, but I still get nervous around so many principals. [Laughter] And I don't know why I should think of this story except that it has to do with school, and I know that -- and teachers, and I know also that it's very dangerous to ever try to tell stories to people of one profession about their profession. But I'll take a chance anyway.

Well, that isn't the attitude that I wanted our Committee on Excellence in Education to take, but I did want them to approach their task with some hard-eyed realism. And you're, by now, well acquainted with the Commission's findings.

So many things have changed in our society from the structure of family life to drug abuse among our young that, over time, it's begun affecting education. The principals and the teachers alone cannot correct these social ills any more than any single level of government can, by itself, improve the schools. But we can and we must build a new consensus among parents, teachers, and students, principals, and elected officials to bring about a renaissance in American education.

Most of the attention is focused on the need to reward excellence. Now, I can't imagine anything more discouraging for young teachers than to see a rigid salary scale laid out for the rest of their lives that ignores their efforts no matter how good they might be.

Soviet leadership is considering ways to get the Soviet economy moving again. Well, one proposal is to depart from the practice of paying Soviet citizens relatively equal wages irrespective of job performance. Now, if even Yuriy Andropov and the Soviet bureaucracy are beginning to realize the need for merit pay, why can't certain segments of our own educational establishment?

And there are many other things that we can do to improve our educational system that don't cost money. Secretary Bell tells me that research on what makes one school more effective than another has shown that challenging students through high standards and high expectations results in increased achievement. In other words, if we don't expect anything from our kids, why should they expect anything of themselves? And here, of course, I'm talking about adopting more rigorous academic standards. I'm talking about strengthening graduation requirements in terms of curriculum and reducing discipline problems by enforcing codes of student conduct.

Before I go on, I just have to tell -- I made a phone call just a couple of weeks ago to a young man out in the Midwest -- a great basketball star. He had suffered a knee injury, and that knee injury led to a lot of reassessment for him. And he'd gone to Marva Collins in Chicago. And he'd gone there to learn to read and write.

He had been a basketball star for a couple of years in one of our fine universities. He was six feet five when he was in junior high, and the coach suggested he start shooting some baskets. But he got all the way through high school, and there he was then in the university, and he couldn't read or write.

But I'm also reading some interesting things about new textbooks that can do wonders with increasing math skills. I'm sure you've probably heard about that new math textbook. It's by a fellow named John Saxon, that has average I.Q. students scoring above high I.Q. students and has Algebra I students who use this textbook doing better on tests than Algebra II students who use the traditional text. I believe some principals in Oklahoma and some other States have been involved in this experiment. So, here's another area we could look into. All we'd have to do is simply replace the old books as they wear out with new books of this kind.

But we simply can't tell the taxpayer that more funds are needed to improve quality when, during the 20-year period between 1960 and 1980, spending on education was shooting up while the college board scores were going down. If a 600-percent increase, which is what we had in spending in those 20 years, couldn't make America smarter, how much more do we need? What we do need is a commitment to education and not just more money. Now that I have the Commission's findings in hand, I've been going around the country trying to keep the dialog alive, and I think we're making progress.

In its report, the Commission calls upon you, the principals, to play a crucial leadership role in developing school and community support for its reforms. You're deeply dedicated to our children's education, or you wouldn't be in the field that you are. And I have confidence that working together, we can make the U.S. educational system what you want it to be. I believe we can make it meet your standards. And I wanted to meet with you today to tell you personally how much I respect what you're doing for the Nation and to ask you to help me further in the debate.

Future Farmers of America from all over the United States are in Washington right now. And I was talking to them about their particular trade -- farming. But it also has to do with that previous story I told about the Soviet Union. And I think I'm going to repeat it here. Maybe there's a little meat in it.

Veterans' Affairs such information and such technical assistance as the Administrator may reasonably require to discharge his responsibilities under Section 156. The Administrator of Veterans' Affairs shall reimburse the Department of Health and Human Services for all expenses it incurs in providing such information and technical assistance to the Veterans' Administration.

Sec. 3. During fiscal year 1983 and each succeeding fiscal year, the Secretary of Defense shall transfer, from time to time, from the ``Retired Pay, Defense'' account of the Department of Defense to an account established in the Veterans' Administration, such amounts as the Administrator of Veterans' Affairs determines to be necessary to pay the benefits authorized by Section 156 during fiscal year 1983 and each succeeding fiscal year, and the expenses incurred by the Veterans' Administration in paying such benefits during fiscal year 1983 and each succeeding fiscal year. Such transfers shall, to the extent feasible, be made in advance of the payment of benefits and expenses by the Veterans' Administration.

The people of this great Nation owe a tremendous debt of gratitude to the brave men and women of our Armed Forces who have fought to preserve America's freedom and independence. National Paralyzed Veterans Recognition Day offers us an opportunity to express our appreciation to a very special group of our veterans -- those who suffer the disability of paralysis.

On this day of tribute to these dedicated citizens, we honor them for the great sacrifice they made for their country, and praise them for the courage, determination, and perseverance they demonstrate daily in facing the difficult challenges of their disabilities. The strong will and spirit which they exhibit in overcoming the limitations of their paralysis serve as an inspiring display of the American drive to achieve, build, and advance which has kept this country strong for the past two centuries. Each of us is heartened by the knowledge that this Nation's paralyzed veterans lead active, productive lives which enrich us all. It is indeed appropriate that we set aside a special day upon which to thank them for their past and continuing contributions to this country.

In recognition of the sacrifices and contributions that these veterans have made and the service rendered by the many veterans who later suffered paralysis from nonservice related causes, the Congress of the United States, by House Joint Resolution 258, has designated August 3, 1983, as ``National Paralyzed Veterans Recognition Day,'' and has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of that day.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 29th day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Last Saturday, I told you about little Ashley Bailey and her desperate need for a liver transplant. I expressed the hope that someone listening might know of a possible donor who could assure 11-month-old Ashley of a chance to live. I listed several others who, like Ashley, are waiting for transplants if donors can only be found. I gave a phone number where possible donors could respond. Well, God bless you all, the response was overwhelming. Over 5,000 calls were received from people in 47 States. Many callers asked for donor cards so they could help others even after they're gone. Six liver transplants have already taken place. Six children, including Candi Thomas, one of the little girls I mentioned last week, have been given a new lease on life. And two people have received cornea transplants. They were given the gift of sight by one of our neighbors who heard about a chance to help.

She still needs a transplant soon, in order to live. Time is short. But your response has been so generous, I have to believe there will be a donor found. I'm going to keep on praying. One thing I know: We live in a country where people truly care for one another.

Today,I'd like to take you behind the headlines and talk about an issue that affects every U.S. taxpayer -- efficient management of the Federal Government. Government has grown like a patchwork quilt. Whenever a new need was identified, a new program was patched on regardless of what it cost. The door was wide open for fraud, waste, and abuse. Is it any wonder that we hear so many infuriating stories about government throwing money away, about food stamp rings that illegally obtain aid meant for the poor and needy, or about illegal aliens receiving government loans?

Already, we've cut the volume of new Federal regulations by one-quarter, reducing paperwork on the American people by 300 million hours a year. We've reduced the rapid rate of growth in government spending. And the Inspector General program has helped save or put to better use over $22 billion that was being improperly spent.

In the Defense Department alone, our efforts have saved or put to better use $16.1 billion. And the Department's 18,000 auditors and investigators have my full backing in their continuing fight against the fraud and waste typified by the recent $916 plastic cap purchase. Would you pay that much for a plastic cap? Well, the Government shouldn't either. And Secretary Weinberger is cracking down, seeing to it that negligent employees will be fired and irresponsible government contractors taken to court. Those horror stories you've been seeing and hearing about scandalous prices that we're paying for spare parts are the result of our own investigations and represent the findings of more than a score of Defense Department Inspector Generals.

This coming week I'll bring my senior appointees together at the White House to continue an ambitious program to upgrade management of the Federal Government. Our long-range goal is to overhaul the entire administrative system. I call this effort Reform 88. It's a big job. Our government has over 2.8 million civilian and 2 million active military personnel in over 22,000 buildings, using 19,000 computers, 330 differing financial systems, and 200 payroll systems, and there's never been an effective effort to manage this growing administrative monster.

Each year we've fallen behind the private sector in management techniques. Well, we're bringing this to an end now. Reform 88 is geared to get results. Over a 6-year period, it'll save the taxpayers or result in a better use of tens of billions of dollars that could mean as much as the equivalent of nearly $2,000 for the average American family. And these savings won't be obtained by cutting help to the deserving but by eliminating waste and inefficiency.

For example, in debt collection, where the Government is owed over $280 billion, we'll be using modern methods to ensure that Federal loans are paid back. You may have heard about the individual who obtained 10 Housing and Urban Development loans and defaulted on all 10. Well, in the future, deadbeats like that will be headed off at the pass. We'll do it by using credit bureaus and prescreening to determine the credit worthiness of applicants for loans and grants. And to help reduce the $40 billion in delinquent debt, we'll be automating our collection techniques just like private industry.

One of our highest priorities is to restore to the American people a government well managed and responsive to your needs and respectful of your tax dollars. The greatest nation in the world deserves the best government, and with your support, we'll have it.

The President. Yes. As a matter of fact, I was broadcasting the Chicago Cubs, his team, in those days when the only mathematical chance they had to win the pennant was to win the last 21 games of the season. And they did it, and it's still a record in the record books that's never been equaled. They won that last 21. And the last series, the last four games was with the Cardinals, the team that they had to beat.

Mr. Peelin. Well, from what we understand, sir, according to Transportation Secretary Dole, you changed your mind on raising the Federal drinking age. You originally had stood by the premise that it was a State decision. Isn't this just another example of the Federal Government getting involved in something that you had always said in the past was States rights?

The President. No, I don't think so. It's true that I am a strong advocate of States rights, and I don't like seeing the Federal Government cross the line and intervene, although it has done so once in this particular area with the 55-mile speed limit. That was born of an emergency situation.

But when I saw the figures -- there are 23 States that have now adopted the 21 age limit. The others are a little behind or, in some instances, have refused to go along with this. But when I saw the figures, I realized that the cause was worth this risk of the Federal Government intervening. In Michigan, 43 percent was the drop in nighttime fatalities after this was passed; in Illinois it was 23 percent. In the first year after New Jersey adopted this, the fatalities among young people dropped by 39 percent in the first year. So, I think it is worth it.

But also there is some element here that could open the door to the Federal Government being involved, and that is the fact of the interstate situation, that States with the advanced drinking age now find that in adjoining States where they still have the age much younger, they cross the line and -- into the -- or the other States, and then are faced with driving back with the result that we have seen.

Andrei Sakharov freed as similar as to what he did recently in Cuba. You apparently don't think he should be traveling around the world exercising foreign policy. At least that's the impression the media is getting, because you have refused to meet with Mr. Jackson, and Mr. Shultz has refused to meet with Mr. Jackson. Do you think that Reverend Jackson should stop making these trips around the world, exercising U.S. policy?

The President. Well I have to say this: I'm delighted that the humanitarian gesture, for whatever reason -- and I suspect very much the political reasons not on his side, but on the part of Castro in this most recent episode, had something other than humanitarianism behind it. But it isn't a case of what I think. It is a case that there is a law, the Logan Act, with regard to unauthorized personnel, civilians, simply going to -- or citizens -- to other countries and, in effect, negotiating with foreign governments. Now, that is the law of the land.

The President. No, we're not going to take legal action. But I do feel that, while in this instance he was successful, there were things that make you pause and think. He went to Cuba with a list of some 25 Cuban political prisoners that he had been given of people that he felt warranted being freed. Only one of the prisoners that Castro released was on his original list. Now, I don't know why Castro chose to make others available and not this one, but I do believe that to intervene, for example, on this very delicate matter -- on Sakharov -- ignores things that might be going on in the quiet diplomatic channels that we have going forward.

Mr. McDonough. My first question, Mr. President: You're expected to sign the bill that would order all States, including Florida, to raise their legal drinking ages to 21 within the next 2 years or lose their Federal highway funds. Our Governor Graham is in favor of the 21-year-old age limit, but he doesn't like the way the Federal Government went about imposing the limit on the States, calling it a violation of States rights. How do you respond to that, sir?

The President. Well, I can understand that, having been a Governor myself, and being a strong advocate of States rights and wanting to get more authority in the hands of the States. On the other hand, when the figures began to come in with regard to the 23 States that have already adopted the 21 age limit, those figures made it evident that so many lives were being saved because of this age limit. And with 27 of the States either refusing or just dragging their feet on doing something about it, I felt that we were justified in this.

We're talking about human lives, young lives. In Michigan, after adopting their 21 age drinking limit, the nighttime fatalities, particularly those related with alcohol, dropped by 43 percent. And in Illinois it was 23 percent; in New Jersey in the first year after they adopted such a law, the drop in alcohol-related accidents was 39 percent. Now, I think this many human lives indicate that the Federal Government was justified in taking this action.

In addition, there is some leeway here for believing that the Federal Government could get involved, in there is an interstate problem. A State can have a drinking age of 21; nearby State can have the younger age, and the youngsters that aren't 21, in that State, then are tempted to cross the State line to do what they want to do with regard to the drinking. And then they come back, driving again, and are now driving, having spent the day or the evening drinking. So, this does bring up a kind of an interstate -- I'd almost say commerce -- factor.

Kennedy Space Center here in Florida, has remained more or less the same over the past few years. Do you support an increase in that budget in the future, including a portion of the budget which would affect the space station project?

But I believe in the space program, and now, as you know, we're looking forward to, and have asked for, research and study into a space station. And, naturally, the budget will reflect whatever the increased needs are for these worthwhile undertakings.

Mr. McDonough. Mr. President, a final question. Some Florida farmers feel the new immigration law passed by Congress puts too much responsibility on them for enforcement of the law and not enough on the Federal Government. In the words of one Florida farmer, ``The Government hasn't been able to control the borders for the last 50 years; now it expects us to do it.'' How do you respond to that?

The President. Well, I know it's difficult, and I know that people are very concerned about this bill. On the other hand, our nation has lost control of its borders. Now, we're going to do everything else -- we've asked for a thousand more on the Southwest border, a thousand more INS people -- we want to resolve the problem of the illegal entrance.

At the same time we want some compassion for those people who have been living for a period of time in this country and have established families and roots here and have employment and all. But we have the problem of the undocumented worker coming into this country and then being victimized by some employers who know that he can't complain if he's paid less than the going wage or the minimum wage. We want to stop that.

So, the only way we can see is sanctions; but, at the same time, we want to make sure that there is a method whereby the individual can identify themselves as being a legitimate resident of this country. And all we ask is that the employer be subject to sanctions if they are trying to go around this bill and hire, knowingly, undocumented workers.

The President. Well, the trouble is, some of them are dying, but not for their country. They're dying simply because of drinking and driving. And we have the evidence now -- with 23 States that have adopted the 21 law, we have the evidence in the figures that show that that law saves lives.

The other thing is, that we haven't thought about, that at the younger drinking age -- it is easier for people who have not yet reached that age to pass themselves off as being old enough to be sold liquor. When you raise the age somewhat it's a little more difficult for the 16- to the 17-year-old to pass themselves off as 21.

The President. Well, we are concerned about the environment. As a matter of fact, our regulations now to protect the environment are much greater than they have ever been before. The incident of oil spills is almost nonexistent; and we've had, for a whole generation, we've had offshore drilling.

It is within the 3-mile limit, and these are State leases. We're talking about beyond the 3-mile limit, where there is probably the greatest available pool of oil, all around our shores, much more than what we have on land. And we think that necessity alone dictates that we explore this.

In many instances the Federal offshore wells will be far enough out that they won't even be visible from land. And, as I say, I think our regulations now are such that there is a safety factor that is actually greater than the safety factor of tankers that are bringing imported oil to us from across the oceans.

Mr. Rinker. Mr. President, with interest rates going up -- and growth here in central Florida has been phenomenal -- there's a lot of concern now by people who are being squeezed out by the variable rate home mortgages. What's your personal opinion about those mortgages, and should they have tighter controls than they do now?

The President. No, I would not like to see the Government moving into that field. But I have to tell you, we're distressed by the interest rates. Frankly, I see no justification for those rates remaining where they are.

Interest rates are determined by inflation. If you're going to lend money, you not only want a return in interest rate on your money, but you want to be sure that when the principal is paid back, it has the same purchasing power as it did before. And the only way to achieve that is by charging enough interest to offset inflation.

Now, we've reduced inflation so much that, as I say, there is no excuse for the interest rates staying where they are, and I believe the only reason for them staying there is pessimism. It's psychological. The people there in the money markets are not convinced yet that we have inflation under control.

Now, for the past month, or for this present -- well, no, it's now the past month, June -- the estimate a week or so ago was that inflation for that month was down to 2.6 percent. Now, that leaves a pretty high interest rate over and above that level. And we're just hoping that as we attack the deficit, as we continue to reduce the growth in government spending, that they will realize we do intend to keep inflation down.

The President. Well, it isn't the Federal Reserve at this time. As a matter of fact, Paul Volcker uttered this same thing about this being psychology -- that I have just uttered. The Federal Reserve has been increasing the money supply at the upper limits of its growth rate, commensurate with the growth rate in productivity and in the economy. Now, that's all we ask for -- is that the money supply be increased so as to keep pace with the growth in the economy and not at a rate that would bring back inflation.

Mr. Marrou. Of course, there's a lot of interest here in south Texas in the Simpson-Mazzoli bill, and it has now gone through the House, surprised a number of people here. What are your personal feelings about that version of the bill?

The President. Well, I'm a little constrained as yet, because it's still in conference and there are two versions now. And the conference committee, when they come back from recess, will then take up the matter of resolving their differences. Actually, the differences are not very great. And it is reasonably close to what we asked the Congress for. So, I'm hopeful that they'll come together on something that I can sign.

I don't think are there right now. But I never really discuss veto or no veto until I see what's on my desk. But I believe that it is a legitimate effort to regain control of our borders. We know that in that about 120 miles of the 2,000-mile border -- that 120 miles in the Southwest -- is our greatest problem. And we have approved a thousand more INS personnel.

Mr. Marrou. There's a lot of fear among Hispanics in this area that perhaps they'd have to carry some sort of ID card or something like that to prove they're citizens even though their families have been for decades. What would you say to them?

And we want to be very careful that while we have safeguards to prevent employers from hiring the undocumented workers, that at the same time there is no discrimination against those who will be legalized under this bill, those who may still be undocumented but who've lived for a long period of time, put down roots in our society. We want to give them the right to legally live here and those who, as you say, are citizens.

The President. I think simply the pessimism on the part of so many out in the money market, their unwillingness or inability to believe that we do have inflation under control. Now, inflation has been at 3.6 percent for the first quarter of this year. The month of June it was estimated that it would probably come in at 2.6 percent, so we're still going in the right direction. It is their fear of lending money and then having inflation go up as it has seven times before this in recessions since World War II. But this is a different kind of recovery. It isn't based on artificial stimulants of the economy, the quick fix, so-called, that we've had before. This is a legitimate recovery and expansion with the creation of some 6 million new jobs in the last 18 months alone, things of that kind.

The President. Will you believe I never had such a thought? I always believed that you pay your way. So, when I was in show business and, therefore, had some ability to attract an audience, I used to campaign for people I believed in and causes I believed in. As a matter of fact, for much of my life I was a member of the other party -- the Democrat Party -- and campaigned for them.

But when they first appealed to me -- a group -- to run for Governor of California on the basis that I had the best chance of defeating the incumbent after all the work I'd done in politics, I fought as hard as I could against it and said, no, for them to find a candidate, and I would campaign for the candidate.

Mr. Scott. The Simpson-Mazzoli immigration bill -- a lot of folks down here in Texas don't like it for a lot of different reasons. Some people say it handles illegals in an arbitrary fashion, that it will produce discrimination against legal Hispanics here, that it's going to hurt businessmen, that it's going to be costly, that it won't be effective. Do you think it's fair? Do you think it's balanced? Do you think it's cost-effective?

The President. Yes, I think the bill as introduced is cost-effective and is fair. And it's also necessary, because the simple truth is we've lost control of our borders. And no country can afford that.

Now, all of the things that people are fearing -- these are very solid and real considerations of ours. And I'm convinced that we can protect our Hispanic American citizens from discrimination just on the basis that an employer might be afraid to hire them. We're going to protect their rights.

At the same time, we're also going to have compassion and legalize those who came here some time ago and have legitimately put roots down and are living as legal residents of our country, even though illegal. We're going to make them legal.

We also, I think, in this bill, are taking action against those employers who literally entice illegal entry into the country with the promise of jobs, but then take advantage of those individuals, knowing they can't complain, and pay them less than scale, deny them things that they should have in their employment simply because they're in a sense being blackmailed by the employer because of their illegal status. And we want to put an end to that.

Mr. Scott. Let's talk about Social Security a moment. A lot of people in this country -- Democrat and Republican, economists -- tend to feel that we can't get a handle on the Government deficits and we can't get a handle on straightening out Social Security unless some fundamental change is made in it next year. Now, why aren't any of the Presidential candidates talking about this, or can you guarantee us that come 1985 you won't have to go at Social Security with an ax?

The President. Well, there's one thing we will not do: We will not pull the rug out from under those people who are presently getting Social Security and are dependent on it. Nor has that ever been our intention, in spite of a lot of political demagoguery that flowed out of Washington and was multiplied as it went out through the country and -- that somehow we were out to destroy this program. Since we've been here, we have increased the Social Security payments for the average married couple by $170 a month. More people are getting it and getting more than ever have before.

If there is anything needed to be done to that program -- and these are things that we'll be looking at in the coming years -- it will have to do with -- people are presently paying in and whether they're being fairly treated because, if you will remember, the biggest single tax increase in our nation's history was passed in 1977 before we got here. And it is in the Social Security payroll tax.

And there is a possibility -- well, probability, that many people, young people now paying in will never be able to receive as much as they're paying. But no plan will be allowed to reduce the payments to the present recipients of Social Security. This has been my pledge from the very beginning.

Mr. Scott. As a lameduck next year, should you be elected, sir, you'd be in a unique position to be able to do some courageous political things without having to worry about reelection. If there is a major tax reform bill, for example, do you anticipate that you might support, for example, removing tax deductions on home mortgages?

The President. No. This came out of a discussion I had with a panel recently on a trip out in the country, and I was talking generally about all the areas that are being explored, whether flat tax or whatever it might be, in reforming the income tax. The income tax -- the base must be broadened, because there are a hundred billion dollars in tax not being paid by people who legitimately owe it today.

Ms. Daniels. I'd like to ask you about the Simpson-Mazzoli bill. It's created a lot of controversy here in south Texas -- we're so close to Mexico. A lot of people don't like it. How do you feel about it, and do you think it's going to solve our immigration problem?

The President. Yes, I think it is, as well as they can be solved. We've lost control of our borders, there's no question about that. And it is necessary and would be necessary for any country in that situation to do something about it.

Now, we recognize the great problem is in the 120 miles of our border, about that much, down in the Southwest. But we think that the program is going to provide for documented workers crossing the border to fill needs, particularly in agriculture. We think that we, with compassion, are going to recognize the problem of those undocumented immigrants to our country who have been here for a number of years, who've established a base and a home and put down roots, and we're going to legalize them.

And I think we're also, in this bill, going to stop the exploiting of the undocumented worker by some employers who hire them much more cheaply than the law should allow and do so because it's a form of blackmail. They know that the individual can't complain because of their undocumented status.

So, all of these things we're trying to solve in this problem. Now, there may be some glitches here or there, but, believe me, we don't want any penalty imposed on people simply because someone is reluctant to take a chance on hiring them because of their Hispanic heritage. And we're going to do everything we can to protect against that.

Ms. Daniels. Mr. President, the Hispanics are a growing political force. I'd like to know how important you feel the Hispanic vote will be in the upcoming election, and what are the Republicans and your administration offering Hispanics?

I think, at the same time, that we have more to offer them than they've been offered over the last few decades by the philosophy of the other party. The other party has believed in handouts, grants, welfare -- the making of people dependent. And in my view, the Americans of Hispanic origin, their values are based on family and religion, on all the basic good values of ethics and work ethic, and they want to be independent. And that's what we offer -- is opportunity.

Our program is one aimed at offering them not the dependency of having to hold out their hand for government to give them a handout, forever in bondage to the Government. Our offer: jobs, opportunities, a chance to be self-sustaining, to provide for themselves and their families. And I think this is what the average Hispanic American wants more than anything else. And we're offering it.

The President. I am glad you asked me that. I don't believe that any administration in this country has ever done as much as this administration is doing with regard to discrimination against women in the marketplace or wherever it might be -- employment in government and all.

First of all, we have, out of the 4,000 appointments that I can make in government, almost half of those are women. There has never been anything like that. Secondly, there's never been three women on the Cabinet before, as there are now. And I have appointed the first woman to be a Justice of the Supreme Court.

But that is only scratching the surface. No other administration has gone through, as we're going through, all the statutes, all the Federal laws and regulations, to find and eliminate those that contain language that is discriminatory against women. We have already implemented this in hundreds of those regulations. We have people in 50 States that are working toward doing the same thing, because I had done that as Governor in California, in the State statutes and laws.

Our tax policies that we put into effect has reduced the marriage penalty tax. We have almost doubled the tax credit for working mothers for child-care credit that they must have. We have removed the so-called widow's tax from inheritances -- no tax due on the inheritance.

All of these things have added up to more advantages for women than, as I say, have ever been provided by any administration. And maybe it's beginning to get around, because just last week, some national polls revealed that the gender gap has turned the other way by a slight margin -- a majority of women have announced themselves as supportive of our administration.

Important changes in United States and Italian tax laws and the development of a model tax treaty by the United States made it necessary to replace the existing income tax convention with Italy, which has been in force since 1956.

Among the principal features of the new Convention are the inclusion of the Italian local income tax among the taxes covered by the Convention and a reduction in the tax at source on most dividends. The Convention also introduces a limitation on the taxation at source of interest paid to residents of the other country. It provides a maximum rate of tax at source of 10 percent on royalties.

The protocol provides that the benefits of the Convention are limited to residents of the two countries, and otherwise clarifies and supplements the Convention. The exchange of notes sets out certain understandings between the two governments.

The Duck Stamp was the brainchild of a famous Iowan and a great American, the award-winning editorial cartoonist and conservationist, J.N. Darling, known to all as ``Ding.'' Ding was one of the foremost conservation figures of his day. And throughout his career as a cartoonist, that commitment to conservation came through loud and clear.

Sometimes Ding drew a bleak picture; but he did so for a purpose, to shake his fellow citizens out of their complacency about our resources. Too many still considered our resources inexhaustible, and Ding knew different. For millions of Americans, he made the concept of conservation come alive.

Ding saw the greed and the foibles that threatened to wreck our resources. But he also saw the abiding goodness of one very important species, his fellow man. Ding was convinced that Americans would respond to the call for help for our wildlife and that efforts could reverse the serious decline that was affecting our wildlife and waterfowl. And he was right on both counts.

More than anything else, it was Ding's idea for a Duck Stamp that enabled the change to take place. The Duck Stamp quickly caught on with duck hunters, corporations, and conservation groups of all kinds. To date, nearly 89 million stamps have been sold for revenues totaling nearly $300 million. And those revenues have been used to purchase thousands of acres of wetlands.

These refuges serve as a haven for waterfowl, protect fish and other wildlife, reduce flooding, and serve as natural water purifiers. For five decades, you, the sportsmen and conservationists, have been buying Duck Stamps and have been giving our nation a gift of beautiful wetlands and flourishing wildlife.

Secretary Clark. Mr. President, I believe everyone here today shares your great appreciation for the Duck Stamp program, really America's finest and most successful conservation program, again bridging -- as I know you've always desired to do -- the private and public sectors.

And we're fortunate today to have the grandson of Mr. Darling, and Kip Koss, who is with us today to make a presentation. And Kip has followed the inspiration of his grandfather, dedicating his life to conservation. And at this time, Kip would like to make a little presentation.

Among our most cherished wildlife resources are migratory waterfowl. The ducks, geese, and swans of North America not only fascinate us with their beauty and spectacle, they remind us of the continuing values of a clean, safe, wholesome environment. The health of our waterfowl resources depends on the well-being of their environment. If the Nation's wetlands are lost, these birds and the many other fish and wildlife resources they support cannot thrive. In recognition of the vital link between wildlife and wetlands, the United States has created an extensive system of National Wildlife Refuges. This great array of wild lands and waters provides countless opportunities for our waterfowl to nest and feed. We have so many of these refuges to enjoy today because of the farsighted practices of successive generations of Americans.

To implement this law, the first Duck Stamp was issued later that year. The Duck Stamp was the creation of Jay N. ``Ding'' Darling, an award-winning editorial cartoonist and pioneer conservationist. It was his idea that every waterfowl hunter in this country had a vital stake in wetland and waterfowl conservation and that each should share in the responsibility to maintain that wildlife tradition they held so dear.

In the 50 years that have passed since the introduction of the Duck Stamp, it has become one of the Nation's most successful conservation programs. Almost 90 million of the stamps have been sold, generating more than $285 million for waterfowl conservation. All or part of 186 National Wildlife Refuges -- a total of 3.5 million acres -- have been acquired through Duck Stamp revenues.

In the last 50 years, Americans have become increasingly aware that wetlands provide essential habitat for ducks and geese and contribute significantly to other wildlife resources including endangered species, open space recreation, commercial and sport fisheries, flood control, groundwater recharge and water purification. A recent study by the Department of the Interior concluded that the United States is losing wetlands at the pace of nearly one-half million acres every year, an area the size of the State of Rhode Island. Clearly, the Duck Stamp program is as important today as it was in 1934.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this third day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Arthur Fiedler and the Boston Pops had all of that city standing and cheering. In Baltimore, they had great parades, and in Philadelphia, they brought out the Liberty Bell and had a group of schoolchildren pat it with their hands so that it would make a sound without upsetting the crack in the bell.

A person who was there tells me that thousands of people surrounded the Liberty Bell, quietly and with respect. And then, a young fellow started to sing ``God Bless America.'' And it spread through the crowd. And people were left quite hushed with happiness when it was over.

It was a wonderful day, and ever since, the Fourth of July has been as special as it was back in older times when it ranked with Christmas as an important day, a time for families to come together and for neighborhoods to explode with bright lights.

Key saw through the glare of the rockets that our flag was still there. Somewhere a chorus will sing the old songs of love and affection for our country. Somewhere a family will gather and salute the flag. Somewhere a veteran will be told, ``Thanks for what you did.'' And in a courthouse somewhere, some of the newest Americans, the most recent immigrants to our country, will take the oath of citizenship.

Perhaps there's someone who's lonely in your neighborhood, someone whose friends all left for the holidays, or a girl or boy who are pretty much on their own. Maybe today someone will invite one of them over to the barbecue.

The spirit of our nation is strong. The freedoms our forefathers won for us endure. We still stand for freedom throughout the world, which is why immigrants still come to us. No one emigrates to Cuba or jumps over the wall into East Berlin or seeks refuge in the Soviet Union. Those who look for freedom seek sanctuary here.

The United States is a leader in a world turning, day by day, toward freedom. In Central America and Africa and elsewhere, the tide of the future is a freedom tide. The impulse to create democratic government not only endures; it grows, and that, in spite of real resistance from those who believe in freedom not a bit.

Other countries see our entrepreneurial spirit and seek to emulate it. They see how a vigorous, free society allows man to move on and grow. They see how we're trying to make life better for man through scientific inquiry. They see us pushing into space. Other systems are locked on to the land, prisoners of a gravity of their own devising. America is a rocket, pushing upward and outward into space, into human history.

Mr. Jarrett. It's now a great pleasure and an honor to welcome President Ronald Reagan, who, as you know, was an athlete himself in college and has a keen interest in sports. So, on behalf of the people on Motor Racing Network, Daytona International Speedway, President Reagan, we welcome you.

The President. Well, Ned, I'm pleased to be here. This is a real kick for me. At the same time, however, having been a sports announcer myself, I'm kind of glad that I didn't have to broadcast this, because I'm having so much trouble trying to sort out who's on first.

Mr. Jarrett. Well, they do run very closely, of course. Drafting -- you perhaps have heard that term -- and that is very normal and wins many races here on this racetrack. One car running, bursting the wind to open the other car, can run faster than he could normally run by himself by running directly behind the other car. That's why we see them running so close together.

Another thing that we have been pleased with, President Reagan, in this sport -- back when I was driving a racecar, it made me feel good to know that I was providing the American public with something besides what I felt was top-notch entertainment, because it serves as a good proving ground for the automotive and after-market manufacturers to prove their products out here, which makes better and safer cars for our highway driving pleasure.

The President. Well, I know that that's always been one of the factors behind these great classic races, is what we learn about further improvements in automobiles. But you've just proven something else about the sport here. This is the first time you've mentioned that about racing yourself, but here you are, hale and hearty and healthy.

Mr. Jarrett. Well, thank God for that. Well, I'll tell you, NASCAR has done a good job over the years, and the rules that go into the building of these racecars -- sometimes they get in some pretty serious crashes, but because of the rules and the safety equipment that's built into the cars, the drivers most of the time are able to walk away. And thank God for that.

The President. Now, I just noticed one car that came into the pits, and I know that everyone was supposed to have had their regular pitstop. He looks as though he's got some problem. There isn't any rushing around, as there normally is.

Mr. Jarrett. That is true, and that is Kyle Petty. He's the son of Richard Petty, who is currently leading the race. Of course, Kyle has been racing on this circuit for about 4 years, and you are right that something is wrong with the car, because it's a longer than normal pitstop. Now they're pushing him down pit road, so maybe he'll get back out in the running, but certainly it's cost him any chance about ever winning this race.

Mr. Jarrett. And it's a shame to run this near the end of the race with about 25 laps to go, and he was running very well in the event here today. So, he'll go back and see if he can see his dad win his 200th race here today.

Let's pick up the winner. You were an old sportscaster and see if we can -- Richard Petty, of course, driving car number 43. Here he comes now off of turn four, the blue and red car. Why don't you pick him up and call him down through the front straightaway?

The President. Oh, wait a minute here. Well -- [laughter] -- somebody just went past somebody right out here in front of us. I don't think that's informed anyone who's listening on the radio very much about the race, but I thought they changed positions just as they went by here.

Mr. Jarrett. They certainly did, and Cale Yarborough, who is running the car number 28, is gaining on Richard Petty right now, who is running out front. And you notice how high Petty runs through the wall -- or through the turn up next to the wall and turns one and two, but that's his style of driving. You do see a lot of passing in this area right directly in front of us.

Mr. Jarrett. Well, this is one of the fastest points on the racetrack, and the drafting takes such an effect right in this area of the racetrack. And that's one reason that they're able to make the moves and move around the cars in front of here. One car is sticking to the pavement a little bit better than another one. That helps him in this area where the -- [inaudible] -- is as we see.

Going into turn one, Cale Yarborough continues to gain on Richard Petty, so it looks like we'll have a shootout down near the end of this race between those two drivers. They pulled away from the balance of the field. Currently running in third place is Terry Labonte. Harry Gant is in fourth place and Bobby Allison in fifth place. And a fellow who has put on more good races with Richard Petty, David Pearson, is pulling into the pits now -- the hood goes up on that car, and there's trouble on the racetrack, Mr. President. We need to give it to our turn announcer.

Mr. Jarrett. That's right. I have an advantage on you. I've been around this business for about 30 years and know the fellows and know the colors. And, really, when they get on the backstretch, the color is about the only way that you can pick out the car.

We'll watch Richard Petty now as he comes off of turn four, and you can see Cale Yarborough in the orange car is gradually picking up on him. They have some cars that they're coming up to put a lap on. Of course, they're running faster than those cars. That will help both of them as they pick up the draft of each of those cars as they come in front of them.

And it'll be interesting to see, as they come up on this two cars that they're lapping now on the backstretch, Petty is able to move right up on the outside of them very carefully and get ahead of Yarborough going into that turn.

The President. You know, if I were faced with the responsibility of broadcasting this, Ned, and with Petty out in front, I would just keep watching Mike Curb down here to find out whether he was in front yet or fallen behind.

Mr. Jarrett. It certainly does. Well, he's -- everyone here -- I think Petty has such a tremendous following, and they've been waiting for him to win 200. The closest driver to him is David Pearson, who was in the pits there a moment ago. Pearson has 105 victories. But Petty has had such an illustrious career and has been so good for the sport. But he has his hands full now as Yarborough continues to, what we call in the sport, reel him in, because he's gaining on him.

Mr. Jarrett. Yes. Yarborough made a little longer pitstop than Petty, and that gave him an advantage. But his car seems to be running a little bit faster run now, and he's close enough now that he can pick up the draft. And we'll keep you here for just a moment, and we'll let you call that pass, if he indeed does pass him.

The next time around, he should be right on his bumper as they go into turn one. He moves right in on the back bumper of Richard Petty. He's definitely in the draft as they go into that turn. So, we'll see if Yarborough can make the move.

Mr. Jarrett. Yarborough couldn't make the pass there. Let's see as he comes off of turn two what he can do with it there. He dips down to the low side. Petty will go high in the turn. Now Yarborough drifts up right behind him. And he is definitely in the full force of the draft now. With Petty opening up quite a space of wind in front of him, that lets Yarborough's car run a little bit freer. But he still can't make the pass as they go into turn three.

I've been here. And with the skill and the daring that we witnessed out there, and the pursuit of excellence that those drivers -- and I mean all of them that are here -- made stock car racing a major American sport. And I know that each of them probably is proud and has every right to be, and we're proud of them.

I think I can understand why stock car racing is so popular. Americans have always cherished mobility, and we greatly admire innovation. And by combining man and machine, stock car racing brings out the best of both of these American impulses.

I appreciate all the work that goes into those precision machines also, because it makes you realize that the race is won in the garage as well as on the track. So, congratulations to all of those workers out there that were keeping those competing cars out on the track.

You need intense concentration and stamina, and it's amazing to see them out there, bumper to bumper at 200 miles an hour. We've all done a little bumper-to-bumper driving. I know -- you have to, if you live in Los Angeles with the freeways, but you're not going quite that fast.

Founding Fathers gave us a wonderful gift 208 years ago -- a free country, a country where no one need live in fear and where everyone can speak and pray and live as he or she sees fit. As we commemorate our country's birth and its freedom, I hope we can take a little while today to breathe a little prayer of thanks for the great blessings that we enjoy in America.

I'm certain that if Jefferson and Adams and Washington were here with us today, they'd be sharing in the festivities. And if Patrick Henry were here, from what I've read about him, he'd have been out on the track with one of the cars. [Laughter] Our Founding Fathers were kind of gutsy, and we'd better not forget that. These patriots and all the others, rich and poor, of every race and religion, who worked and struggled and sometimes fought and died for our freedom, are with us in spirit today.

Assembly elections. The bipartisan U.S. observer team and our Embassy in Guatemala report from visits throughout the country that the process was fair and open, well organized, and orderly. We applaud the Government of Guatemala for taking this important step in carrying out its commitment for a return to constitutional practices and the unprecedented response of the citizenry to the opportunity to participate in their political process. We wish the Guatemalans well as they prepare a constitution and proceed with elections for a new government next year.

Thank you, ladies and gentlemen. And thank all those wonderful young people that we've seen here in this parade. I don't know whether any of my remarks or what I'm going to say on this day can be as eloquent as seeing what really the future is all about in this great, free land of ours, and it is embodied in those young people that came by here.

What a wonderful festival this is. And one of the most impressive things about it is that you began this annual Fourth of July celebration 18 years ago when some people said that patriotism was out of style back in that period. Well, I guess here in Decatur it never was out of style.

It's good to be here with Senator Denton, Congressmen Edwards and Flippo, and I was hoping and thought for a time, until some things intervened in the schedule -- foul-ups here -- that I was going to be able to greet my friend and your Governor, George Wallace.

In World War II, a unit of ours that was routed by a superior enemy force -- and Audie Murphy climbed into a World War II disabled tank, up on the turret, and turned the machine gun of that turret on the enemy, and all alone was trying to hold off the hundreds of advancing men of the enemy. At the same time, walkie-talkie radio -- he tried to call for artillery support. And when the artillery commander, wanting to know what his safe range was, asked how close the enemy was to him, Audie said, ``Well, if you'll wait just a minute, I'll let you talk to them.'' [Laughter] Well, he was actually asking them to direct the artillery fire at his own position, because that offered the best opportunity of stopping the enemy.

But I'm so happy to be here tonight. I don't get to the South often enough to suit me. Come to think of it, I don't get to California as much as I'd like either. [Laughter] But I always feel a special affinity for this part of the country and the people in it.

And even now in these modern times when people who aren't from the South talk about it, they tend to dwell on the physical beauty of the Old South and wax poetic about moonlight on the magnolias. Well, of course the South is lovely, and that is true; but there are those -- and I'm one -- who feel a special affection for its people. I respect the values that took root here and the pride that's part of the southern character. I'm drawn to your good sense and decent traditions, your fidelity to God, and your faithfulness to your region. And I know that you love our country and are very protective toward it.

I mean no slight to the other parts of the country -- to my heritage, which was up in the heartland there in the Middle West, or now my home in the West. But I have been struck when, now and then, on news for some reason or other -- on the TV news -- there will be an occasion where the commentator is talking to one of our men in uniform, and I've often been struck by how often the young man in uniform, when he replies, you hear the lilting cadence of Charleston or Memphis or Winston-Salem or Decatur. The South was the home of patriots in 1776, when a southerner drew up our Declaration of Independence. And it's the home of patriots today, 208 years later.

We're here tonight at a great celebration, a birthday party for the Nation. And we come together to honor those who invented this country and who saw to it that it would always be a place of high ideals. And we celebrate those who, in each generation, have protected those ideals and advanced the cause of democracy.

But the cause of democracy, that's a subject of high seriousness when, on a night like this, it's hard to be somber and full of deep thoughts, it's hard not to be happy. We have so much to be thankful for.

University in Shanghai. And I talked to them about our country. I'd had an opportunity to be questioned by a number of them, and I felt that they had a great interest in us and particularly in our young people, their peers here in this land. So, in talking to them, I wanted them to understand who we are as a people, and I told them that in many ways we're a nation that loves to contend with itself. We love to argue. And we're free to argue, and that's as it should be.

But I told them that we always managed to stay united around certain things: our central belief that all men are created equal and our belief that democracy is the fairest and most honorable political system yet devised by man. And they seemed to understand. I sensed a very favorable reaction from them and was very pleased by that. And, of course, what I said was true. We are great arguers. But in spite of all our differences, we're still a united country, and we celebrate that unity today. We celebrate, too, the miracle of 208 years of freedom.

You know, when you work in the Oval Office, a lot of problems cross your desk. We're repeatedly reminded that there's a lot to do, so many causes to carry about -- or care about, and carry forward in our country and in the world. But I think what's impressed me most and what's given me a very deep feeling over the last 3\1/2\ years is how very lucky we are. We are truly blessed to live in this time and this place.

Now, I say that because there are so many people that get more attention than they deserve. They run around and survey the modern landscape and see the problems of mankind, and they say, ``Oh, it's such a troubled world.'' We hear people say that this is a terrible century and that we live in an increasingly totalitarian age, that freedom is dead or an illusion to begin with, and man is just a powerless victim of historical forces and that history is something beyond our control, something we can't affect. Well, the counsel of these sour souls would seem to be that mankind has had it and we might as well just give up. Well, let me tell you, they aren't talking about the American people I know.

We have the challenge to make America even more free than she is; to ensure greater freedom in the marketplace, where our boldness and our power and our genius can bloom. We must work for greater freedom for you so that you can benefit from your labors and so that your earnings will remain where they belong -- in your pockets and purses for your families and in your neighborhoods.

We have the power and the challenge to expand freedom in all areas of life; freedom of inquiry and thought, freedom for the practice of religion, freedom in commerce. Ours is the challenge to advance the interests of the family, the challenge to protect the interests of the smallest unit of government, the hometowns of America, where the expression of the public will is most directly felt.

You know, I've often had a feeling sometimes there in the National Government -- I even had it sometimes at the State level -- never in my hometown -- the feeling that sometimes if we just slipped out, we in government, and closed the doors, turned the key, and disappeared for a while, it'd take you a long time to miss us.

We stand for freedom in the world. We see the gulags and the prisons, those places where man is not free to do work of his choosing and profit from his labor, places where the freedom to worship God has been extinguished and where souls have withered. But we're blessed by God with the right to say of our country: This is where freedom is. This is the land of limitless possibilities.

Berliner jumping over the wall to get into East Berlin? Can you think of a time when someone took a homemade balloon -- hot-air balloon and tried to float from free Western Europe into Czechoslovakia? Or when someone took a leaky fishing trawler on a death-defying journey so they could enjoy the freedom of Havana, Cuba? Can you think of a time when any family, thirsting for opportunity, left a democracy to live in a country that was not free?

The truth is that the totalitarian world is a tired place held down by the gravity of its own devising. And America is a rocket pushing upward to the stars. Other countries see our entrepreneurial spirit and seek to emulate it. More and more, the world is reawakening to the fact that freedom is better than tyranny, that democracy is better than the iron fist of dictators, that freedom is the one condition in which man can flourish. And man was meant to flourish, was meant to be free. And that is why we were created. That's why it's been said that democracy is just a political reading of the Bible.

The world has flirted with systems other than democracy, and for a while, some of them were in vogue. There were those who said our problems are intractable, and we need huge government to tell us what to do. For a while, the doctrine of Marx and Lenin seemed something new and revolutionary. And some among us said, ``Well, that's an idea. We should look at it.'' Well, all for a while. Times have changed. Man has moved on, and more and more we can see that the tide of the future is a freedom tide.

Man still thirsts for freedom. And wherever the persecuted fight for freedom, our souls and our spirits are with them. We're with the trade unionist in Krakow, Poland, marching behind a crucifix. We're with the Afghan rebel fighting the tanks with an undying ancestral will. We're with the people of Central America, who struggle each day for liberty.

And in spite of decades of troubles and sometimes self-doubt, look across the world for the persecuted and punished, for those who yearn to be free, for those who fight for the right to worship, to speak freely, to write what they want, to enjoy the freedom God meant us to have.

You know, throughout the world the persecuted hear the word ``America,'' and in that sound they can hear the sunrise, hear the rivers push, hear the cold, swift air at the top of the peak. Yes, you can hear freedom. It was so 208 years ago, and it's so today.

My friends, we're so lucky. We've been granted the right to stand for something. So much of our greatness is behind us, but so much of our greatness is still before us, out there waiting for us to take advantage of it. It is, in truth, a wonderful time to be alive. And those young people that I mentioned first, with those present in our country who have been trying to frighten them into believing that maybe there isn't a future for them, don't any of us who are grown up let them believe that for one moment. They're going to see things we've never seen, they're going to have advantages we've never had.

Following his remarks, the President went to the Huntsville Hilton Hotel in Huntsville, AL, where he remained overnight. The following morning, he attended a reception for Reagan-Bush workers at the hotel.

Veterans' Preference Act. This statute brought together, for the first time, laws, Executive orders, and regulations extending back to the Civil War which granted preference in Federal employment to veterans.

The primary purpose and philosophy of the Veterans' Preference Acts are to assist veterans in obtaining and retaining Federal jobs for which they qualify. They constitute not only a means of rewarding veterans for their service in the Armed Forces, but also a means of preventing them from being penalized, in the search for employment, by the fact that the months or years they spent in the service of their country isolated them from the civilian world. In recognition of the economic disadvantage suffered by this service, these Acts seek to give these veterans a favorable position in competing for Federal employment. At the same time, the veterans' preference laws have been drafted so that they are compatible with the merit principle of public employment.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fifth day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

I had a few notes here for some remarks based on very little information, but some in anticipation of what I was going to see. I thank you and Roger and Howard and all of you who have been giving this demonstration and this look into the future. All I can say is, I like what I see.

You know, Mark Twain, we all know, was one time reported dead. And he replied with a statement that his death had been exaggerated. [Laughter] And I couldn't help but recall that with regard to some of the people who have been counting this industry out and announcing its demise.

You represent an enormous productive power, and your industry is vital to the health, the vitality of our country. And it isn't taken for granted by anyone in this administration. Unlike some socialist countries, the future is not in the hands of government; it's in your hands.

And I was going to come here and suggest or urge you to be bold. You have been bolder than I was even going to suggest. Your vision and confidence are crucial if America is to meet the great challenges that face us in the -- and remain prosperous -- in the eighties. And many of us here remember, I'm sure, when American business was untouched by war and was the undisputed leader of the world. But that era is over. Government, industry, and labor are operating under different rules in a much more competitive world. And all of us will have to do better if we're to remain an industrial and economic force such as we have been.

Something we've tried to end, which I never could understand when it was prevalent, was the adversarial relationship between government and business in our country. And those in government should want business to succeed, should want new workers to be hired and want you to make a profit. We're trying to create an economic climate of success by bringing inflation under control at our end and holding down taxes and unnecessary regulation. But, as I say, it isn't just up to government. Ingenuity, courage, and hard work were the essential ingredients of the American success story, and I think what is happening here is in keeping with that great entrepreneurial spirit.

With the Saturn concept, as I've seen, General Motors is heading into the future not just with an idea of survival, but with an idea of triumph, and that's the attitude that all American business should have. And I think we're seeing more than that -- more of that spirit that's cropping up all over our country.

Note: The President spoke at 1:35 p.m. in Design Studio 3 at the center, after several briefings on the company's Saturn project. Following his remarks, he was given the opportunity to test drive a prototype of the experimental automobile on the grounds of the center.

But, also, I had the privilege of driving a prototype car just a little while ago. And Roger was brave enough to get in the other seat. And I reminded him that for 3\1/2\ years I've been sitting in the back seat. [Laughter] But fortunately, I have to tell you, it literally drove itself.

Well, yesterday we celebrated Independence Day, when all Americans come together and with good cheer and revelry commemorate our freedom. Today, we herald another step forward that will ensure that America remains the free and prosperous land that God intended it to be. I've always believed that with freedom, hard work, and the profit motive, there's nothing that Americans can't do. Well, this plant represents the ``can do'' spirit for which your industry and America have always been known.

It took great courage for all of you to make this kind of an investment. In a time of great uncertainty, General Motors proved that they had faith in our country and faith in our country's economy. Since 1979 more than $50 billion has been spent by your industry -- scrapping old plants, building new ones, developing technology, and retraining employees -- and over $23 billion of that $50 was spent by General Motors right here in America.

President Dwight Eisenhower, who dedicated the GM High Tech Center, which I just visited, once said, ``The future will belong, not to the faint-hearted, but to those who believe in it and prepare for it.'' Well, you're preparing for our future, for a better future. So, let our competitors take note today: The American automobile industry is back -- back with pride, back with teamwork, and back with performance that can and will make us number one.

This plant is a result of the bold leadership of your industry and an admirable commitment to the future of America. And I think your plant symbolizes a new spirit of cooperation between management and labor. That cooperation reflects the determination of this industry not just to survive but to triumph. And we know that the UAW put its full support behind this endeavor.

Keeping faith with that good will, I understand that General Motors chose this site over three less costly locations, permitting them to put laid-off General Motors employees back to work. You're showing just how much can be accomplished when management and labor speak with each other, instead of at each other; when management and labor work together, instead of against each other.

I'd like to take this opportunity to congratulate the UAW and the entire American labor movement. During these last few years of severe economic stress, organized labor has played a responsible and constructive role in rebuilding American industry.

You've demonstrated, when the chips are down, what people can do working together freely, rather than at the dictates of some central planner or bureaucratic mandate of government. I happen to believe the last thing your industry needs is the Federal Government bringing in outsiders to tell you how to run your business and how much to pay your workers.

And let me just share with you a conviction that I feel deep in my bones. If we Americans keep working together to improve quality, keep investing in America's technology to become more productive and hold down costs, then, yes, we can outcompete, outperform, and outsell the pants off anybody, anywhere in the world.

Earlier today, I was at the Tech Center taking a look at your Saturn project. The energy and creativity out there confirmed my belief that mankind is on the edge of a new era of opportunity and progress. Putting technology to work for us, which is what your Saturn project is all about, will ensure that when the future gets here, Americans will be leading the way. Space-age technology is being put to use to make certain America remains on the cutting edge of progress, new products, and new jobs. The confidence and positive outlook experienced here today -- or evidenced here today is the kind of optimism and pride in our way of life cropping up in cities and towns in every part of our country.

It's a far cry from the gloom and doom of just 4 years ago. Sometimes it's hard to remember that only a short time ago people were counting America out. They were claiming that we were a nation in decline, that our best days were behind us. Inflation was running in double digits, robbing working people and the elderly of the value of their savings. Economic stagnation was throwing more and more people out of work and destroying any chance for the poor to better their lot.

Well, we've been determined to chart a new beginning for America. And I know that it hasn't been easy. That recession was deeper and longer than predicted. But these problems had been building up for 20 years.

We were determined to find a real economic cure, not just resort, as they had so often in the past, to another political quick fix. There've been eight recessions since World War II, and seven of those were treated with quick fixes. There's no compassion in snake oil cures. We weathered that storm together, and now the Sun is shining on a strong economy and on an American automobile industry that is moving forward again.

Taxes had more than doubled just between 1975 and 1981, leaving working people paying taxes at a rate that only a short time before had been reserved for the extremely well-to-do. This ever-increasing tax load was driving money away from the private sector that could have been spent buying new cars or investing in new plants and equipment. With a 25-percent across-the-board tax cut, we've prevented the people from being mauled by tax increases, and we've indexed the rates so that ordinary people won't be pushed by inflation into higher and higher tax brackets.

We immediately moved to reduce the regulatory burden which bound the hands of our most productive citizens with Federal redtape. And I'm proud to say, we made a special effort on behalf of the auto industry, saving you hundreds of millions of dollars at a time when every dollar counted.

It took time to put our program in place and time to take effect. And the same was true for all the auto industry. And I salute all of you who kept your faith when things were especially tough. And I know they were tough. But by working together, by believing in each other, we've turned the situation around.

In the last 19 months, we've enjoyed economic expansion even beyond our own expectations. In the first quarter of this year, the economy grew at the astonishing rate of 9.7 percent. Second quarter growth appears to have been solid -- not quite 9.7, but still higher than anyone had expected. And inflation ran at only 3.6 percent in the first 3 months of the year. For the first time in over a decade, we're enjoying a strong economy, falling unemployment, and low inflation all at the same time. And we're determined to keep it that way.

You know, those selling the old no-win notion that you can't have growth without high inflation have been proven wrong. Having a degree in economics myself, I feel free to talk about too many economists have a watchchain with a Phi Beta Kappa key at one end of the chain and no watch on the other end. [Laughter] They were wrong when they said that inflation and interest rates couldn't come down. They were wrong when they said recovery wouldn't come, wrong when they said expansion couldn't last. And I think if they keep running down America, they're going to be wrong again.

What we're seeing is that things are getting better. Across America, businesses are showing a profit, laid-off workers are being rehired, and new employees are being brought on board. Over 6 million new jobs have been created in the last 18 months. Now, Europe calls this -- in fact, to my face at the last summit meeting -- the American miracle.

Well, last year the auto industry had a good year. General Motors has been reopening plants and putting on second shifts all over the country. And I'm told that in the last 18 months you've brought 90,000 men and women back onto the payroll.

Well, we have every reason to be confident. Our country has recaptured the pride and community spirit that was for so long an essential part of our national character. You folks here at GM have much of which to be proud in this account. You not only build cars; you're making this country the decent place that we want it to be.

She works tirelessly for the United Way and also recruits volunteers from your ranks for worthy community projects. Mr. Roberts' -- or Miss Roberts', I should say, citizenship is an example to all of us. And Herman LaFayette -- he's helped over a thousand young adults in the Junior Achievement program. He's also worked as a counselor at a local halfway house for former prisoners.

Your company deserves some recognition on this count. General Motors' annual award for excellence in community activities is the kind of program of which any corporation should be proud. It highlights the public service of employees like Kenneth Mehl, who's a city councilman of Westland, and Wallace Holland, a former GM employee who is now the mayor of Pontiac.

I think Americans -- all of us -- have come to a better appreciation of the values that bind us together. We're seeing a new respect for family and neighborhood. Remember when it was fashionable to claim that God is dead? Well, today I think we're seeing that He's alive and well in the hearts of our people. And we're grateful to Him for the many blessings that He's showered upon us.

We're rededicating ourselves to the values that define our character, that make us a good and worthy people, and that can and will keep America strong and secure and free. Our forefathers left us a wondrous land of liberty. And now it's up to us. This dedication today, the cooperation and the hard work behind it, the community spirit and the heartfelt patriotism of everyone who works here, are part of a rebirth of freedom. This generation of Americans is meeting the test. We intend to pass on a country as prosperous and free as the one that was given to us.

I'm going to, before I start, just take a second to return to my past and give you kind of a news commentary. Just in case that you haven't caught the news early this morning, the Labor Department has announced the unemployment figures for June. And from 7.4, if you counted the people in uniform -- and they certainly are employed -- 7.5, if you just count the civilians, and as of the end of June that had gone down to flat 7 for the total unemployment and 7.1 for the Nation as a whole. And 6,700,000 people have gone into new jobs in the last 19 months in our country.

Texas. You know, all Americans like to think that they're a little bit of Texas, because Texas is such a big and great part of America. You're so much a part of our national past, and because you stand for growth and energy, you stand for the best in our future as well.

And I know everybody expects me to be political this morning, but this is an official stop, so I'll resist the temptation to comment on all the odd causes and special interest groups the other party seems to be embracing these days. [Laughter] And I don't know what the secretary of state meant when he said that I might come back before November. [Laughter] I don't know why that was.

So, Texas continues to be very much a part of the American story. And what a story! During the past few years, Americans and Texans have been riding together. It wasn't long ago, after all, when our national economy was in its worst mess in years, when our national security was badly endangered, endangered not only by Soviet expansionism and a massive Soviet arms buildup but even by threats and aggressions from tiny nations run by bullying despots and dictators.

From Washington we heard only an elaborate and disheartening series of excuses about our national and international problems. We were told these problems were basically insoluble and that we had to accommodate ourselves to stagflation, to limitations on growth, to living with less.

And some said our political institutions and constitutional system weren't up to functioning in the modern world. And, worse, some said all of this was the fault of the American people, who, we were told, suffered from a crisis of confidence.

Well, there was a breakdown in America, but it had precious little to do with our political system or the American people. It had everything to do with 63 square miles of riverfront real estate called the District of Columbia and some of the politicians and bureaucrats who've been bivouacked there too long.

Now, ladies and gentlemen, this administration wasn't in office but a few minutes before we went to work on some of those same national problems that some said had no solution. And we aimed our fire at the high spending and taxes and unnecessary Federal regulations that were thwarting the spirit of enterprise and faith in hard work in America. And today, as we look at an expanding economy and a low inflation rate, we can see how far we've come from the days when inflation was running at 12.4 percent, the prime interest rate was 21\1/2\, unemployment was climbing, and we were entering our fourth straight year of stagnant or declining productivity.

On the international front, too, there have been dramatic changes. This administration spoke candidly about the wrongs and dangers of totalitarianism; we checked its advance; we rebuilt our defenses; we revitalized our alliances. And yet, at the same time, we launched the most comprehensive series of arms reduction proposals in our nation's history.

Now, I know it's a political year. Some may expect me to stand here and claim this was a victory for one administration or one political persuasion. But as I've said many times before, this victory went far beyond any one person or any party. It was a victory that belonged to the people, because they were the ones who, time after time, forced the grasping politicians and indifferent bureaucrats in Washington to do what all the smart sayers and seers said was impossible: cut Federal spending, cut individual tax rates, end the unfairness of bracket creep by indexing tax rates to inflation, thin out the thicket of Federal regulations, fight waste and fraud, rebuild our defenses, and resist totalitarian expansionism in Central America. And I think if this administration deserves credit, it's only for having the kind of trust in the people that made us willing to take our case to them and seek their support.

We dared to do it then, and we dare to do it now for one simple reason: We believe we were speaking for a new political consensus in America, a consensus that objected to government intrusions into areas where government was neither competent nor needed, but a consensus that was also critical of government's failure to perform its legitimate and constitutional duties like providing for the common defense and preserving domestic tranquillity; a consensus, in short, that wanted to get government off our backs, out of our pockets, and back to the standards of restraint and excellence our forefathers envisioned.

Now, it's true that the focus of much of our effort in Washington during the past few years has been on those twin crises we inherited on entering office -- the crisis of our economy and our national security. But now that our economic expansion is well underway, and now that America's international prestige and security are being enhanced and restored, I've had the chance to report on another crisis that we've been working on quietly but, I think, effectively, and one that I know concerns all of you -- the crisis of crime in America.

Two weeks ago in Hartford, I reported to the National Sheriff's Association on the steps we've been taking since our first few days in office to fight the menace of crime in America. You know how dangerous that menace had grown. Violent crime had risen 50 percent in a decade. It was costing more than $10 billion in financial losses, touching 30 percent of America's homes, and taking the lives of more than 23,000 Americans a year.

I noted then something basic and something obvious: The American people are fed up with leniency toward career criminals, and they're fed up with those wrongdoers who are openly contemptuous of our way of justice and who do not believe they can be caught and, if they are caught, are confident that once the cases against them enter our legal system, the charges will be dropped, postponed, plea-bargained, or lost in a maze of legal technicalities that make a mockery of our society's longstanding and commendable respect for civil liberties.

I also noted the American people have lost patience with liberal leniency and pseudointellectual apologies for crime. They're demanding that our criminal justice system return to realism; that our courts affirm values that teach us right and wrong matters, and that individuals are responsible for their actions, and retribution should be swift and sure for those who prey on the innocent.

And the will of the people is at last being felt again. Reported crime dropped 4.3 percent in 1982, and that was the first decline since 1977. And reported crimes for last year showed an even more remarkable 7-percent decrease. This is the sharpest decrease in the history of the crime statistics and the first time the serious crime index has shown a decline for 2 years in a row.

Now, a few people want to attribute the encouraging downward trend in crime to the fact that there are fewer members of the population now in the crime-prone age group. Well, I challenge this view. Coincidence isn't necessarily cause. The truth is that crime has sometimes risen with population growth and sometimes not. There's nothing historically inevitable about it. Between 1970 and 1982, for example, the numbers in the crime-prone age group did drop slightly by about 1 percent, but serious crime went up 40 percent.

No, the real explanation for the drop in crime lies in the nationwide crackdown on career criminals in America. The growth of Neighborhood Watch associations, the new statutes in many States toughening criminal penalties, and the sweeping steps we've taken at the Federal level are all indications of this new consensus, of a return to traditional values and an insistence that criminal predators who make a mockery of those values be brought to justice.

And that's why, from our first few days in office, the Attorney General and I gave the closest attention to the kind of candidates picked for Federal judgeships. Yes, we wanted candidates who were sensitive to the rights of the accused, but we also wanted candidates who understood that society and the innocent victims of crime had rights that needed protection, too.

We moved to crack down on the growing menace of illegal drug trafficking. We increased our law enforcement budget by more than 50 percent and added over 1,900 new investigators and prosecutors. Most of them went to work in the 12 new regional drug task forces that we established around the country. And these task forces are already cracking major drug rings.

We've also declared war on organized crime in America. I'm proud to tell you that organized crime convictions are up from 515 in fiscal 1981 to 1,331 in 1983. And we're getting longer prison sentences and, for the first time, making a serious effort to confiscate the financial assets of the mobsters. And our new organized crime commission has begun hearings on the structure of the mob today in America and its money-laundering techniques, and its work will now be greatly broadened, because just last week it received subpoena powers from the Congress.

Believe me, we have it within our power to shatter the regional and national syndicates that make up organized crime in America. And this administration seeks no negotiated settlement, no detente with the mob. Our goal is to cripple their organization, dry up their profits, and put their members behind bars, where they belong.

Now, the list goes on about the offensive that we've been carrying on against crime during the past 3\1/2\ years. Our local law enforcement councils under our U.S. attorneys have helped improve cooperation with State and local law enforcement agencies. We've implemented most of the recommendations of our task force on violent crime. We appointed a task force on the victims of crime that has come up with legislation that will compensate crime victims, and not from tax dollars, but from the penalties paid by criminal wrongdoers. We've won some important legislative victories, making it easier for the IRS to work on organized crime investigations and revising the posse comitatus law to permit the use of military resources against the international drug traffickers.

But I have to tell you today that the major part of our legislative initiative against crime remains right where it has remained for the last 3 years -- dead in the water in the House of Representatives.

Now, this isn't at all surprising. This is the same liberal leadership that has done nothing but stand in the way of initiatives the American people want and need -- initiatives like tuition tax credit to help hard-working families; enterprise zones to provide jobs to those who yearn for progress; a constitutional amendment mandating a balanced Federal budget; and, yes, an initiative to return the freedom of voluntary prayer to children in every school across our land.

So, I do have some advice this morning for the House leadership: Stop kowtowing to the pundits and the special interests, and start listening to the American people. The American people want this anticrime legislation; they want it now; and with your help, they can get it. Please tell your elected representatives you expect full and fair representation, and that means getting this bill out on the floor of the House for a vote.

It understands that law is not just a way of preventing one citizen from taking advantage of another. It's also the collective moral voice of society. And so, it understands that laws and government, the power of the state and politics itself, can never really account for the moral or material progress of a society. At root, these things are reflections of much deeper currents, the wisdom, the energy, and the decency of the people themselves.

Well, other writers and thinkers in our time have made similar observations. Dr. Charles Malik, the former President of the U.N. General Assembly, wondered how it was that in so many universities what he called the wonderful living values of the great tradition were all but forgotten in the curriculum.

And a few years ago, social critic and theologian Michael Novak wrote about the weakening of family values. ``The family nourishes `basic trust.' And from this springs creativity, psychic energy, social dynamism. . . . Familial arts that took generations to acquire can be lost in a single generation, can disappear for centuries. If the quality of family life deteriorates,'' and then he said, ``there is no `quality of life''' if it does.

And that's why it's so important to make our government leaders respond to the demands of the people, to make them reduce the role of government and restore government's legitimate functions. It is also why restoring common sense and decency to our criminal justice system is equally vital.

Well, our goal then is not to pass laws that will make the people good. Our goal is to have our laws and legal institutions reflect the goodness of our people and to reflect the things they most deeply believe in. We need to make our criminal justice system reflect once again the innate decency and sound values of the American people.

I began by speaking today about the Texas legend. Its hold even today on the American people is easy to understand. Not far from here, 187 men gave a display of personal valor and commitment to ideals the world will never forget. And sometimes it's forgotten that only a few miles from here, a young colonel named Robert E. Lee held his first real command.

Well, if we look to history, if we examine closely the last few years and see how far we've come, we can say that these have been hopeful years and be grateful for them. And let us move forward now together to bring about a new age of reform, to complete our national renewal, and to bring about a new birth of freedom.

I'm going to say something right now that -- I know I run a risk because there are so many people that want to portray me as trigger happy. I want to tell you something -- I never see these young men and women in our Armed Forces in uniform without having a swell of pride that puts a lump in my throat. And how anyone could think that any man would want to send them out to lose their lives -- it's just impossible.

When we came to office, crime was taking the lives of over 23,000 Americans a year. It touched a third of American homes and resulted in about $10 billion a year in financial losses. Yet, just as America has regained her economic strength and international prestige in the last few years, so, too, the crime problem in America has shown improvement for the first time in many years.

First, from our first day in office, the Attorney General and I have emphasized the importance of appointing to the Federal bench, including the Supreme Court, judges determined to uphold the rights of society and the innocent victims as well as the rights of the accused.

Second, we've launched an all-out assault on the illicit drug trade -- that fever swamp of career criminals in America. Taking our cue from the success of our South Florida Task Force, we've brought aboard more than 1,200 new investigators and prosecutors and established 12 regional task forces throughout the United States to crack down on the big money drug traffickers.

The results of that effort have been encouraging. The drug task forces have initiated 620 cases; they've indicted more than 2,600 individuals; and 143 of these indictments have been under the ``Drug Kingpin'' law, which carries a maximum penalty of life imprisonment without the possibility of parole.

Third, we've launched a full-scale offensive on the home ground of career criminals -- organized crime itself. Organized crime arrests have nearly tripled, and confiscation of their assets is also sharply up. Our new commission on organized crime has brought much needed public attention to this problem, and as soon as it receives subpoena power, it will do even more.

Americans who are fed up with crime, fed up with fear in our streets and neighborhoods, fed up with lenient judges, fed up with a criminal justice system that too often treats criminals better than it does their victims.

Too many Americans have had to suffer the effects of crime while too many of our leaders have stuck to the old, discredited, liberal illusions about crime -- illusions that refuse to hold criminals responsible for their actions.

For example, I wonder how many of you know that the major part of our legislative initiative against crime remains right where it's remained for the last 3 years, dead in the water in the House of Representatives. Now, our crime package includes bills calling for bail reform, tougher sentencing, justice assistance to States and localities, improvement in the exclusionary rule and the insanity defense, and major reforms affecting drug trafficking, prison crowding, capital punishment, and forfeiture. All of these reforms are badly needed and constitutionally sound. In fact, our core crime package has already passed the Senate once by a vote of 91 to 1. But in the House of Representatives, the liberal leadership keeps it bottled up in committee.

I told a group of Texas lawyers yesterday, we're not about to quit on our crime bill. We're going to do what we've done in the past. We're going out to the heartland, and we're taking our case to you, the people. And so, I'm asking for your help today. Please send a message to the House leadership. Tell them to stop kowtowing to the special interests and start listening to you, the American people.

Americans want this anticrime legislation, and they want it now. And if those of you listening will lend a hand, we can get it now. Please tell your elected representatives you expect full and fair representation, and that means getting this bill out of committee and onto the floor of the House for a vote.

The President. Good afternoon, and welcome to the White House. It's a pleasure to have you all here. And I know you want to get to the question-and-answer period, so I'll keep these opening remarks brief.

Washington gave an inaugural address of less than 150 words, and he was a great leader, as we all know. William Henry Harrison gave an inaugural address that lasted nearly 2 hours on a cold, wintry day, and a month later he died of pneumonia. [Laughter] So, with your permission I'd like to touch just briefly on two of our administration's main efforts, and with my luck probably they were covered in some of your briefings already.

But, anyway, first, the economy. When we took office, I think we inherited a mess: raging inflation, declining real wages, soaring interest rates. Indeed, the month of the inauguration the prime interest rates soared to over 21 percent, the highest level since the Civil War. Our administration moved quickly to turn that around.

The best news of all since the expansion began is that some 6.7 million Americans have found jobs. The unemployment rate has taken the steepest nosedive in more than 30 years. And our country has produced new jobs faster than any other industrialized nation on Earth.

But these are all statistics. I think there's a better way that you can tell our program is working -- and I understand that a reference was made to it already this morning, and, Don, you stole my thunder -- it's true the critics don't call it Reaganomics anymore.

But, second, foreign affairs. We're working hard to give American policy new strength, new firmness, and new purpose. In Europe, we're helping to hold the Atlantic alliance together under intense pressure from the Soviet Union. In Central America, we're strengthening the forces of democracy and economic progress. And in Grenada, we joined the Caribbean democracies in setting a nation free.

In our dealings with the Soviets, we've shown again and again that we remain unshakably determined to support freedom and the struggle for freedom in the world. But we're also eager and willing to negotiate genuine and verifiable arms reductions. And we continue to hope that the Soviets will sit down with us this fall, as they themselves first suggested, to discuss the control of weapons in space and, we hope, on Earth as well.

Recently, Morton Kondracke, the executive editor of the New Republic, summed up our foreign policy very well. He wrote that our administration ``has altered the correlation of forces in the world in America's direction.'' Well, I believe America is stronger, prouder, and more joyful than she was just a few years ago. We still have a long way to go, but we've made a good beginning.

The President. Well, that's going to be up, pretty much, to those that are framing the platform, because I'm not going to give any orders to them. I think that from what I have heard, from some people that are involved, that they're -- it's probably going to be pretty much of a broad statement of principles, of what it is we try to do without trying to get down too much into specifically how it must be done.

Q. Mr. President, I'm Jane Saxton, Indianapolis Visions magazine. I wonder what you and your administration and your party would like to do this fall to attract black voters -- if anything -- or if the Republican Party is merely going to write black voters off?

The President. Certainly we are not counting them out or simply ignoring them. Not at all. As a matter of fact, I think one of the great frustrations I have is that this -- what we have done with regard to minorities, with regard to people who still have a way to go to have some of the advantages that they've been denied in the past -- that that is one of the better kept secrets of our success and what we've done.

We've had a program to aid the black colleges and universities; because when I came here, I said I think they're such a part of history -- they fulfilled a need for so long when there was discrimination that made the advantage of education hard to get for many of our minorities -- that they must, that institution must be preserved. And we've been working on that.

I think the very recovery program -- the fact that the greatest decrease in unemployment was in the minority community, and particularly among blacks. We have two programs before the Congress that are buried now, or stopped in the House of Representatives without coming to the floor for a vote, that both would be of, especially, advantage to -- and particularly young blacks -- would be the two-step minimum wage to allow employers to hire young people who have no job experience, who are starting out to get their first job at a lower rate than the present minimum because that minimum today has priced a great many jobs young people used to have, priced the jobs out of existence. People are just not having things done that they would have done.

The other one is the enterprise zones. We started that almost 3 years ago. It is still buried and has never come to the floor for a vote. Some States have already moved out on their own and they can't as effectively, because the tax incentives aren't as great just at the State level. But in that regard, in those States where they've done it, some of the stories are just miraculous of what the advantages have been.

And so, I think that we've -- it has to do with our own administration here. And this isn't a new thing with me or born of politics. When I was Governor of California, I appointed more members of the black community to executive and policymaking positions than all the previous Governors of California put together. And, as I say, this is a rather well-kept secret.

And if we can find a way for those people to know what we've done, I think that they would choose our policies rather than the policies of the past, and that would be of the future if the Democrats were in control, because those policies sentence too many people to the bondage of welfare-ism rather than opening up jobs and opportunity for them.

Q. Mr. President, Jerry Fogel, KCMO-Radio at Kansas City. Do you feel that the recent travels and negotiations by Reverend Jackson might send a signal to future Presidential candidates and these candidates for nomination that such activities are okay and will not be prosecuted under the Logan Act or any other legislation?

The President. Well, the prosecution under the Logan Act -- and I think in an answer I gave to a question recently on that sort of led me -- or suggested I was astray on that. The Logan Act is very specific, and I was only calling attention to the fact that there is such a thing and that private citizens cannot go and literally try to negotiate terms and arrangements with foreign governments.

I don't think there's been any evidence of that being broken by Reverend Jackson. I think that it would be very dangerous if this became a political ploy for candidates in the future. Anyone that wants to go simply as a citizen, a private citizen, and try to do a humanitarian thing as he successfully did in Syria -- and I'm grateful to him for it because I know it's something I couldn't have done officially. I'm grateful that those people were released that were in the Cuban prisons. I could have done without some of the criticisms of American policy that were made while he was in those foreign countries.

Q. Chester Grabowski from New Jersey's Post-Eagle, editor. Speaking of foreign policy, I'm wondering when our President will lift the restrictions and sanctions against the Polish people, specifically to lift Polish airlines, which does not allow the people to go back and forth to Poland.

The President. I can tell you that this is very much on our minds. And we are seeking to find a way to remove the restrictions that are penalizing the people of Poland more than they are the so-called Government of Poland. And we would like to do that. At the same time, we don't want to send a signal that might be interpreted as that we no longer feel as we do about the Polish Government. So, we're trying to find a way.

No, this -- you couldn't be here in this proximity to that -- and it is the largest such body of water on our -- the entire thousands of miles of coast of the United States. And its decline in quality -- what has been done to it -- just is unconscionable. And we are pledged to reverse that, just as we're pledged to -- and have added millions of acres to the wilderness territory, have made the most extensive cleanup of the national parks that's ever been made, to restore their safety and health features, and now are going to add additional parkland to those parks.

We hear of human rights, of citizens' rights, minority rights, and women's rights. And I'm wondering, Mr. President, when and how are the rights of the unborn human children going to again be protected in this nation?

The President. Well, we're striving very hard to do that. I know what you're talking about. First of all, with regard to those who some would deny life to after they're born because they are born less than perfect, I wish everyone could have been where I was a few Sundays ago, at the opening of the disabled games -- international games that take place every 4 years, this year for the first time in the United States up in New York, and seen those people and their happiness and their enthusiasm, and to think that someone might have decided at their birth that they should not be allowed to live.

No, but I'll tell you, the job that our people did down there was magnificent. And anyone who thinks that that was a mistake should simply talk to some of the people from Grenada, not just our medical students, our American students there. The people of Grenada believe they were rescued from a Communist domination that had already affected their lives. So, I'm very proud of our military. They only had 48 hours to plan that, too. And they did it.

Incidentally -- could I just take a second -- I left off a part of the answer to your question, too. I know the other part must have had to do with abortion. And I still have to feel that the Constitution already protects the unborn, unless and until someone can prove that the unborn child is not a living human being. And after months of hearings before committees in the Congress, no one could prove that.

Now, if any one of us came upon a body and we couldn't determine whether it was living or dead, we certainly wouldn't bury it until someone proved to us that it should have been buried. And I feel that one of the great moral sins that is violating our very constitutional guarantee of right to life is now prevalent in abortion on demand.

Q. All morning long, your advisers have been telling us -- and you mentioned it at the beginning of your remarks -- about the economy improving. But as the economy is improving, as inflation is maintaining at a much lower level and, in fact, going down, the prime interest rate in this country is going up. Who's to blame for the prime interest rate going up, and at what point do you think it will continue -- will it turn around and go back down?

The President. Well, I had made a prediction in the fall, and I know there are a lot in the press corps that -- here in Washington -- that are just wringing their hands waiting to see whether I'll have to say I was wrong or not. Maybe I was -- guessed too soon. I'll still stick with it, because I'm an optimist and I think that most economic prognosticators are pessimists.

I think the interest rates are where they are -- and it is psychological. It is because after seven previous recessions since World War II, the money market out there is just not convinced that we have inflation under control or that, politically, we will not yield to the previous practice of artificially stimulating the economy to get an artificial fix, a quick fix, to bring us faster out of the recession.

Well, we had about 50 years or so back there and -- a little -- around and before the turn of the centuries in which this country had an economy that was at a boom rate, and it didn't bring on inflation, and it didn't bring on any of the evil things that they say.

There's nothing wrong with economic growth. And so, I hope we'll continue it. But I think it is just the psychology that they are fearful. It's been done to them before. It's an election year. They believe that if anything should start to happen, there will be an attempt at a quick fix. Well, there won't be; we don't believe in it. There's going to be sound recovery.

Q. If I could follow up, sir. You are known for some fairly persuasive power when it comes to dealing with individuals. And I'm thinking, in particular, of the banks that are responsible, in your opinion at least, for the prime rate being up. Why can't you persuade them to -- why can't you persuade them to your way of thinking?

The President. Well, we think that maybe the persuasion should be based on a few deeds. For example, I think as it moves through the Congress -- and it looks favorable -- our downpayment on the deficit is going to have, I think, a salubrious effect out there when that's passed, when they find out that the deficits are very probably not going to be as great as they've been projected, and when they find out, also, after the election, that is -- if we're still here -- that we're not through fighting the deficits, because I've been out on the mashed-potato circuit for 30 years preaching against deficit spending, and I'm determined that we're going to eliminate it.

The President.  --  -- in getting passed the balanced budget amendment. And then, please give me a line-item veto. Don't let me face those porkbarrel bills in which I've got to sign the good and take the bad with it. As a Governor, I line-item vetoed in 8 years, 943 budget items, without ever having the veto overthrown.

Since my last report to you there have been several developments in the Cyprus question worthy of note. On April 17 the self-declared Turkish Cypriot ``state'' announced the formal exchange of ambassadors with the Government of Turkey. We strongly opposed this development and declared publicly our concern that it could set back the U.N. Secretary General's efforts in the search for progress. We also repeated our opposition to any diplomatic recognition of the self-declared entity.

We reiterated to the Council our continuing opposition to the Turkish Cypriot community's declaration of statehood and our determination to see progress made under the aegis of the Secretary General. Following passage of that resolution Secretary Shultz's Special Cyprus Coordinator, Richard Haass, and other Administration officials undertook intensive consultations with both Cypriot parties, with U.N. officials and others on the potential for progress on the question.

On June 15 the Security Council met again on Cyprus, this time to renew, unanimously, its mandate for U.N. peacekeeping forces in Cyprus (UNFICYP). The resolution approved on that date is identical in text to the previous renewal in December, 1983. Following the vote the Turkish Cypriot representative told the Council his community could not accept the resolution but would continue its cooperation with the U.N. forces on the same basis as that announced by the Turkish Cypriots in December, 1983. We view this continuation of the vital U.N. peacekeeping mandate as a positive sign that the parties to the Cyprus question do intend to continue the search for a solution. I am enclosing a copy of the Secretary General's report to the Council on UNFICYP activities.

At the time of the June Security Council vote the Turkish Cypriot side pledged to maintain the unoccupied status of the city of Varosha and presented to the Secretary General its latest ideas on possible next steps toward a solution. We welcomed the Varosha announcement and hope the ideas presented, as well as the comprehensive framework presented previously by the Government of Cyprus, can assist the Secretary General as he resumes efforts under his good offices mandate.

The United States and the American people have a long and proud tradition of helping those who are in need. In Africa, the needs of refugees cry out for continued attention. So, too, do the needs of the host countries who, despite their own limited resources, have accepted the refugees in the best tradition of humanitarian concern. Their generosity has led them to make great sacrifices.

We in the United States are mindful of the burdens that are borne by the refugees and their host countries. We are dedicated to the cause of meeting their needs now and in the future. We fervently hope that the Second International Conference on Assistance to Refugees in Africa, which begins July 9, 1984, will lead to a sustained effort by the international community to help African countries effectively cope with the refugee burden. Our own efforts have been and will continue to be in support of the African refugees and their host countries.

As we reflect on the situation of refugees and their host countries, I hope Americans will be generous in their support of voluntary agencies that provide relief and development assistance to Africa. Further, I wish special consideration be given to the extraordinary hardships borne by women refugees, their children, and other vulnerable groups. The innocent victims of civil strife and war deserve our special concern.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 9th day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

The ice cream industry generates approximately $3.5 billion in annual sales and provides jobs for thousands of citizens. Indeed, nearly ten percent of all the milk produced by the United States dairy farmers is used to produce ice cream, thereby contributing substantially to the economic well-being of the Nation's dairy industry.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this ninth day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

The President. Thank you all very much, and it really is a pleasure to be here. And I think all of us owe a special thanks to the ladies of the auxiliary for the fine meal that they've prepared for us today.

And I've enjoyed very much breaking bread with you in this particular building. My father was a member of a volunteer fire department in my hometown when I was a lad. And the thousands of volunteer fire departments across America symbolize, I think, the strong sense of community, which is such an admirable part of our American character. By getting involved and working together, we Americans have always been confident that we can do whatever has to be done. And that confidence is kind of an American trait.

I also want to extend a hearty word of congratulations and thanks to Governors Hughes, Robb, and Thornburgh for their magnificent cooperation. Having been a Governor myself, I know how difficult it is to do this sort of thing without getting bogged down in bureaucratic back and forth.

And this same good will can be found among all concerned, whether in Federal, State, or local government, or in the private sector. Saving the bay has united a coalition of diverse interests and activated a broad range of individuals. I know, for example, the Chesapeake Bay Foundation has over 1,300 volunteer bay watchers in the region. And there's also been much more done by groups like Ducks Unlimited and the National Wildlife Federation. All of us working together not only can save the bay; we're going to save the bay and restore it.

Now, H.L. Mencken, that spirited newspaperman from Baltimore, once labeled the bay ``a great big protein factory.'' Well, Mencken is known to have enjoyed oysters on the halfshell and steamed crabs. There are tales about the invigorating powers of the oyster known even back as far as the days of Thomas Jefferson -- not that he told me personally. [Laughter] But many of you may be related to the people who provided Mencken with those shellfish. This is more than an income for you, it's a way of life. And believe me, we aren't going to let anything destroy it.

Clearly the time for action is now. The oyster crop and the crab harvest are down. Other statistics like those concerning the decline of the striped bass are also cause for concern. This is not a question of environmental concerns versus economic development. We can and will preserve the bay without hurting the economy or stopping growth. In fact, much of the economic vitality of this region depends on conserving the bay and its many resources.

Of course, we're talking about more than a bay. We're talking about a body of water that nurtured those hardy souls in the first permanent English settlement in Jamestown. We're speaking of a body of water that served as a vehicle for commerce for the middle colonies, enabling our young country to grow and prosper. This body of water means a livelihood to many of you and is a source of recreation and enjoyment for millions of Americans. It's our responsibility to pass on to our children in America, as free and strong as what was passed to us, and also to pass on to the next generation in America as beautiful and productive an America as the one that we were handed. We mean to do just that. And with your strong support, I know we will.

Blackwater National Wildlife Refuge. While there he received briefings from Under Secretary of the Interior Anne D. McLaughlin and refuge manager Don Perkuchin on endangered species and new acquisitions. He then viewed the refuge from an observation tower.

D. Eisenhower signed into law Public Law 480, the Food for Peace Program. And 10 years before the signing ceremony which took place here at the White House, President Eisenhower launched the Normandy invasion. And only the year before the signing ceremony he was first sworn in as President. It's possible that on July 10th, 1954, Ike thought most of his great moments were behind him. But that was not so, as this program proves, for in time it grew to become one of the greatest humanitarian acts ever performed by one nation for the needy of other nations.

Food for Peace is still the largest food aid program in the world. Over the last 30 years, it's delivered almost 653 billion pounds of food to people in over 100 countries. It's helped bring hope and new economic opportunity to more than 1.8 billion people. Statistics are, by their nature, dry, but bear with me for a moment as I give you just a few more -- with the hope that they haven't been given to you already.

Food for Peace has delivered 27,000 tons of food a day to recipient countries for three decades now. And the value of those U.S. farm products exceeds $33 billion -- more than $3 million a day over the history of the program.

All of those numbers give us a sense of the scope and the magnitude of this program. But its great contribution is that it's an instrument of American compassion. And it also reflects America's practicality. We recognized 30 years ago that people who are hungry are weak allies for freedom.

The businesslike approach is one of the strengths of this program. We've never attempted to make countries who receive our food become dependent on our aid. In fact, we've used our aid to foster economic development around the world. And that is an important reason why, over the years, many of the nations that have received our aid have eventually become major commercial partners.

In the early days of Food for Peace, the major recipient nations were the war-devastated economies of Europe: Italy and Spain, West Germany and Japan. And with time and with the help of Food for Peace, those economies regained their strength. They began to pay cash for American farm commodities. Many of these countries have become our top commercial partners. Eight of our top 10 agricultural markets are former recipients of Food for Peace aid. And Japan is now our number one agricultural market on a cash basis. And that has not only been good for the American farmer and the American economy; it's been good for our international relations.

Food for Peace has been very important in spreading good will and generosity throughout the world. When droughts and flooding from the El Nino weather disturbances destroyed food crops in Peru, Bolivia, and other Latin American countries last year, Food for Peace took the lead in providing emergency relief. During the 1966 famine in India, roughly 60 million people are estimated to have been sustained for 2 years by Food for Peace shipments.

Today we face a severe and widespread famine in Africa, which is threatening the lives of millions. And, once again, Food for Peace is saving lives. We've already agreed to provide over $400 million for food assistance to Africa in this year alone. And I want to announce today a major initiative to help the starving people of America -- or of Africa, I should say, and the world.

I will shortly propose legislation to create a $50 million Presidential fund allowing us to set aside existing foreign aid resources to meet emergency food aid needs. By prepositioning food stocks overseas where the requirements are the greatest, we can respond to emergency situations more rapidly and effectively. I will also propose authority to allow the Food for Peace Program to reduce the burden of transportation costs on the most needy countries. And all this is aimed at reducing the loss of life to acute hunger in the Third World.

Food for Peace has come to embody the spirit of American voluntarism. The Federal Government has developed a strong partnership with the private sector to help feed malnourished infants and children, to help mothers and the aged and the disabled. This cooperative effort with private and voluntary organizations includes such agencies as CARE and Catholic Relief Services, and many other groups are helping, also.

In short, the Food for Peace Program has become a wonderful means by which a nation of abundance has helped those in need. It's helped us expand agricultural markets, get needy allies back on their feet, and help potential allies become strong allies for freedom. Food for Peace has helped to coordinate the charitable impulses of the private sector. It's helped feed the weakest people in the world.

Eisenhower picked up a pen and signed a piece of paper that quietly -- and, with no great attention from the wise, he changed the world. I think Dwight D. Eisenhower would be very proud of what the Food for Peace Program has accomplished. I certainly am, and I'm proud to be able to mark with you its anniversary today.

The productivity and abundance of U.S. agriculture have made this generosity possible. During the thirty years of this program, more than 300 million tons of agricultural commodities and products valued at approximately $34 billion have been distributed to over 150 countries. This food has helped reduce world hunger and improve nutritional standards.

The Food for Peace program has accomplished multiple objectives: to combat hunger and malnutrition abroad, to expand export markets for U.S. agriculture, to encourage economic advancement in developing countries, and to promote in other ways the foreign policy of the United States.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 10th day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

Supreme Court regarding the authority of bankruptcy court judges under the 1978 act. It also remedies abuses by both debtors and creditors in consumer bankruptcy proceedings and protects farmers and commercial fisheries from unfair losses that are sometimes incurred when grain elevator operators and fish processors go bankrupt.

I note with special pleasure a provision of H.R. 5174 that would prohibit a debt incurred as a result of drunk driving -- where a drunk driver is successfully sued for causing an automobile accident, for example -- from being discharged in bankruptcy. This proposal is one of many made last year by the Presidential Commission on Drunk Driving and complements a number of other initiatives that my administration has undertaken in this important area. I am hopeful that it will act as an additional incentive in keeping drunk drivers off our nation's roads.

H.R. 5174 also resolves a troublesome problem concerning the status of labor contracts in bankruptcy proceedings. In my view, an unfettered collective bargaining system is essential to cooperative and effective relations between labor and management. The way in which collective bargaining agreements are treated in bankruptcy is critical. This legislation meets the interests of labor by prohibiting unilateral rejection of labor agreements without court review of whether rejection is necessary. The bill also meets the interests of both labor and business by providing debtors with the flexibility they need to reorganize successfully and preserve jobs for workers. In these cases, bankruptcy courts are required to recognize the great importance that matters of this nature hold for workers and management alike by resolving questions related to collective bargaining agreements in a timely manner.

First, the provisions of the bill that authorize the creation of 85 new Federal judgeships present a potential constitutional problem. Section 201 of the bill creates 24 new court of appeals judgeships but states that I may not appoint more than 11 judges before January 21, 1985.

Similarly, section 202 creates 61 new district court judgeships, but prohibits me from appointing more than 29 judges before January 21, 1985. I believe that these provisions clearly violate my constitutional authority under the appointments clause of the Constitution to submit nominations to the Senate and to make appointments after receiving the Senate's advice and consent. As a practical matter, I do not consider it likely that I will appoint more than 40 new judges before the date set forth in H.R. 5174. Consequently, although my actions will be consistent with these provisions, the purported restrictions of my appointments authority will have no actual effect. My acquiescence in these provisions should in no way be considered as a precedent for future congressional limitations on the constitutional appointments authority of the President.

Second, section 382 of the bill places limitations on the fees that a handful of bankrupt estates currently owe the referees salary and expense fund. As I emphasized in 1981 when I withheld my approval of H.R. 4353, a similar proposal that was presented to me as a separate bill, I strongly object to attempts of this nature to confer private relief on a few to the direct detriment of others who are similarly situated and who have met their legal obligations. This is especially true in this case, which I understand involves a giveaway in excess of $20 million. I would have vetoed this section of H.R. 5174 had it passed the Congress as ``stand alone'' legislation.

I sign this bill with the following additional reservations. I have been informed by the Department of Justice that the provisions in the bill seeking to continue in office all existing bankruptcy judges are inconsistent with the appointments clause of the Constitution. I am also advised that the Administrative Office of the U.S. Courts has reached the same conclusion. Therefore, I sign this bill after having received assurances from the Administrative Office that bankruptcy cases may be handled in the courts without reliance on those invalid provisions. At the same time, however, I urge Congress immediately to repeal the unconstitutional provisions in order to eliminate any confusion that might remain with respect to the operation of the new bankruptcy system.

This 88-acre preserve is a living memorial to a unique leader of this nation, a man with great personal strengths of vision and energy and conviction, who rallied the American people to the protection and preservation of its natural resources.

When Teddy Roosevelt became President, our land, forests, and wildlife had been exploited for more than a hundred years. Some four-fifths of our prime forests had been leveled. Untold acres of rich farmland had been washed away and lost in river mudflats. Wilderness areas were unprotected; wildlife had been destroyed in appalling numbers; and some native wildlife species had been totally destroyed. But the consequences of these lost resources had not yet dawned on the public conscience. Well, President Teddy Roosevelt fired the imagination of the American people, shook our nation from its lethargy, and began to rescue the public domain.

As you know, during the sixties and seventies many beneficial advances in science, technology, and economic development produced new and unwelcome threats to our environment and the quality of life. And once again, America's conscience was deeply touched. A new and vigorous environmental movement burst forth across our country. The American people joined together in a great national effort to protect the promise of our future by conserving the rich beauty and bounty of our heritage. As a result, our air and water quality is far better today than it's been in many years. We've reclaimed rivers and wilderness areas that were gravely threatened.

We can all be proud of the advances that have been made during this rebirth of the environmental movement. As the 14th annual report on the Council on Environmental Quality makes clear, we're making solid progress protecting and improving the quality of America's air, land, and water resources.

Now, some are ignoring the progress that we've made in just the last few years in this. But it has continued, and it has been made. By almost any measure, the air is cleaner now than it was when the Clean Air Act was passed 14 years ago. And we achieved this success despite a 60-percent increase in coal-fired electric generating capacity and a 40-percent increase in the number of miles traveled by cars and trucks.

We've also seen improvement in the quality of surface water all across the country. And sometimes it still gets noisy out here -- [referring to the noise from another airplane taking off from the airport].

The number of people that are served by wastewater treatment systems has nearly doubled just since 1970. And salmon, trout, and other species of fish are returning to rivers where they hadn't been seen for generations. Just down the river from here, around Haines Point, there used to be signs that warned potential swimmers and boaters of the dangers of the polluted waters of the Potomac. Well, today pollution warning signs are gone, and the fish have returned. And this grand old river is making a long overdue comeback.

But we have much work yet to do. Even as many environmental problems have been brought under control, new ones have been detected. And all the while the growth and shifts of population, economic expansion, and the development of new industries will intensify the competing demands on our national resources.

If we've learned any lessons during the past few decades, perhaps the most important is that preservation of our environment is not a partisan challenge; it's common sense. Our physical health, our social happiness, and our economic well-being will be sustained only by all of us working in partnership as thoughtful, effective stewards of our natural resources.

We must and will be sensitive to the delicate balance of our ecosystems, the preservation of endangered species, and the protection of our wilderness lands. We must and will be aware of the need for conservation, conscious of the irreversible harm we can do to our natural heritage, and determined to avoid the waste of our resources and the destruction of the ecological systems on which these precious resources are based.

We must and will be responsible to future generations, but at the same time let us remember that quality of life means more than protection and preservation. As Teddy Roosevelt put it, ``Conservation means development as much as it does protection.'' Quality of life also means a good job, a decent place to live, accommodation for a growing population, and the continued economic and technological development essential to our standard of living, which is the envy of the whole world.

We can best serve the interests of the American people and generations yet to come by seeking to harmonize competing interests and to reconcile legitimate social goals. And in doing these things, we'll be a trusted friend to both the environment and to the people.

And now I'm going to move over to that table and sign the 14th annual environmental report. But before I do, I want to thank Alan Hill, the Chairman of the Council on Environmental Quality, and all the other people who took part in preparing this environmental report. Your good efforts, together with a national spirit of cooperation, will help us move forward toward the goals that we all want -- the preservation of America's natural beauty, the protection and conservation of her natural resources, and a future that is economically prosperous, environmentally safe, and scenically beautiful.

I have long believed that our Nation has a God-given responsibility to preserve and protect our natural resource heritage. Our physical health, our social happiness, and our economic well-being will be sustained only to the extent that we act as thoughtful stewards of our abundant natural resources.

As this report describes in detail, we are continuing to make demonstrable progress protecting and improving the quality of the Nation's air, land, and water resources. By almost any measure the air is cleaner now than it was when the Clean Air Act was passed in 1970. Since the passage of the Clean Water Act in 1972, the volume of industrial pollutants released into lakes, rivers, and estuaries has declined sharply. In spite of economic and population growth over the past decade, water quality has remained the same or improved in virtually all United States rivers.

Our Nation is justifiably proud of this record. Since 1970, we have passed comprehensive environmental legislation that is a model for the rest of the world. We have shown people everywhere that we have the environmental awareness, the political will, and the technical understanding necessary to resolve the resource use conflicts that arise inevitably in a populous, highly industrialized nation.

But our past success should not blind us to the fact that in the future we will face even more complex questions regarding the use of our natural resources. Chemicals, both old and new, will continue to be invaluable aids in our economic development, but the benefits they bestow on all of us will have to be balanced against any possible adverse health effects caused by exposure to such chemicals. Population growth, economic expansion, and the development of new kinds of industries will intensify the competing demands on our natural resources.

In the future, we will improve our stewardship of the Nation's wealth of natural resources if we apply well the lessons of the past. We have learned that scientific understanding is essential to any successful regulatory program, but that when scientists are unsure, politicians should act with caution. We have learned that regulatory actions can be effective when they are clearly defined and strongly enforced, but that without careful attention to relative benefits and costs, they can waste one resource while preserving another. Most important of all, we have learned that the Federal government has played an important role in protecting and preserving natural resources, but that it has not acted and should not act alone. In the past, State and local governments, businesses, and private citizens all have made important contributions to environmental research, land preservation, habitat protection, and enhancement of environmental quality. If we are to continue the progress we have seen in the past, the partnership between government, businesses, and private citizens must be expanded in the future.

Since the French explorers of the Sixteenth Century, people have searched for a reliable way to sail into the heart of our continent. The opening of the St. Lawrence Seaway in 1959 made this dream a reality and opened North America's agricultural and industrial heartland to deep draft ocean vessels. The Seaway forged the final link in a waterway extending over 2,000 miles from Duluth, Minnesota to the Atlantic Ocean.

The building and operation of the St. Lawrence Seaway, considered one of man's most outstanding engineering feats, was a joint project of the United States and Canada and stands as a symbol of the valued and constructive cooperation which long has existed between the two countries. On the 25th Anniversary of the completion of the Seaway, it is appropriate that we recognize its role in promoting our economic prosperity.

In the quarter century since Queen Elizabeth and President Eisenhower joined in its dedication, more than one billion metric tons of cargo, valued at more than $200 billion, have moved along this trade and transportation route. As grain has moved from the farmlands of the United States and Canada to help feed the hungry around the world, Great Lakes cities have grown into international seaports. The second largest cargo shipped on the Seaway is iron ore, important to the industries of both countries.

I urge all Americans to join with our good neighbors in Canada in observing this Anniversary. Let us celebrate together a quarter century of partnership in the spirit of friendship and cooperation that has long marked United States-Canadian relations, and pledge our continued support of the international Seaway which links our two countries.

Now, I'm told that there are more than 20,000 of you here today, from retired couples to young families with infant children -- an all-American gathering of people from every walk of life firmly united in enjoyment of the great outdoors. For more than 20 years, your National Campers and Hikers Association has been helping to enjoy the land, but in addition, in many cases, helping to preserve the beauty of the land itself.

Ever since taking office, we've urged Americans to become active in voluntarism programs, and your conservation work provides an inspiring example. You maintain wildlife refuges; you plant trees, clean up streams, parks, and highways. You've raised funds to protect endangered species like our nation's symbol, the bald eagle, and you've worked with the Department of Agriculture to control the spread of the gypsy moth, which is a blight on our woodlands.

American family is the foundation of our country's goodness and strength. Take away the sense of purpose that raising a family gives to men and women, take away the love, support, and training that children get from their parents, and all that we hold dear in this land will be in jeopardy. But by promoting activities that everyone from grandparents to toddlers can enjoy, you're keeping families together, and you're keeping them strong.

Today I want to speak about a matter that concerns us all: our efforts to protect our country's national heritage. It was near the turn of the century that concerned citizens, naturalists, and explorers first brought to the Nation's attention a series of grave threats to our environment. They pointed at dwindling resources, unprotected wilderness areas, imperiled wildlife, and a public that was uninformed.

But he said, ``of all the questions which can come before this nation, short of the actual preservation of its existence . . . there is none which compares in importance with the great central task of leaving this land even a better land for our descendants than it is for us. . . .'' Well, I know that all of us take pride in the measures that were set in motion by President Theodore Roosevelt and the environmental movement of his day.

In the years since the founding of our National Park Service, other landmark environmental legislation has been passed. 1964 Wilderness Act called for areas to be set aside in wholly natural environments, lacking even roads. In 1973 the Congress passed the Endangered Species Act, one of the most far-reaching laws anywhere -- anywhere in the world -- to prevent the extinction of plants and animals.

During the sixties and seventies, we became aware of the growing threat of pollution, and in 1970 we created the Environmental Protection Agency. At the time some claimed that, despite the EPA, economic progress would bring in its wake more and more pollution. But advances in science and technology, born out of our system of free enterprise, combined with the work of the EPA to prove just the opposite.

There has been a 60-percent increase in coal-fired electric generation capacity during the last 14 years. Yet powerplant sulfur emissions today are lower than they were in 1970. During the decade of '70 to 1980, the number of miles traveled by cars and trucks on our highways increased by nearly 40 percent. Yet, at the same time, total pollution from those cars and trucks actually dropped by almost 20 percent. Over the same period, we've seen dramatic improvement in the quality of surface water throughout the country. Today salmon and trout are returning to rivers and streams where they haven't been seen for generations.

America has built a proud record of achievement in protecting her natural heritage over the past three-quarters of a century. At the same time that our population was growing by leaps and bounds and we were building the most productive economy on Earth, we were protecting our lands and wildlife and working successfully to keep our air and water clean.

Sadly, though, in recent years our environmental efforts began to lose some of their energy and direction. Indeed, by the time our administration came into office, the Federal Government had become somewhat negligent in its care of our natural heritage. Our parks have suffered funding declines for maintenance and were in disrepair. At Yellowstone National Park alone there were health and safety hazards that would require millions of dollars to correct.

America's wetlands were in grave danger of disappearing. State plans to combat pollution had been allowed to pile up in an enormous backlog. And the vital task of preserving endangered species had been neglected, because the Government had failed to complete the necessary recovery plans -- even though those plans had long ago been mandated by the Congress.

Well, a few years ago we were faced with the worst economic crisis since the Great Depression and a weak and vacillating foreign policy that had lost the respect of friend and foe alike. Yet, even while we moved to address these twin crises, we were determined to move quickly and effectively to deal with the Federal Government's lagging efforts to protect our environment.

One of our most important efforts has involved hazardous wastes. Where wastes were mismanaged in the past, we've moved aggressively under the Superfund program. By the end of this year, the Environmental Protection Agency expects to have undertaken more than 400 actions to address contamination threats. At hundreds of other national priority sites, long-term work is underway to remove wastes and eliminate contamination of valuable land and groundwater. And as I told the Congress in that State of the Union Address, I'm committed to seeking an extension of that Superfund law. Negligent handling of toxic wastes threatens the health of thousands of Americans. And I pledge to you that your government will take all the necessary steps to protect the American people against the menace of hazardous wastes.

To combat water pollution, our administration has established more stringent standards for 19 critical industries. To deal with the threat of lead poisoning, we've issued regulations that sharply reduce the amount of lead in gasoline. In controlling pesticides, we're handling more reviews of new chemicals, and we've moved against the dangerous pesticide EDB, ethylene dibromide.

And as a first practical step to deal with acid rain, our administration is conducting extensive research. Now, some have suggested that, oh, this is just government studying something to death. No, it isn't. The more we've learned, the more we've realized how little we know about the problem that is causing some of our lakes to die and some of our forests to be affected. And so, during the coming year, we plan to spend $127 million on further research, so that before we turn loose recommendations as to what must be done about it, we'll know really what we're talking about; and we won't be wasting your tax money or that of business and industry which would increase the prices for things that you buy. As this research produces answers, we're going to put that information to work. And we'll keep working until we provide reliable protection for all our natural resources.

Each of us knows the thrill we get when we see an eagle in the mountains or a deer in the forest, and I'd like to tell you how we're trying to preserve the rich beauty and bounty of our lands and wildlife. We've added many miles to our National Trails System. And we've put scores of historic sites on the National Registries of Historical and Natural Landmarks. And to expand our National Wild and Scenic River System, we proposed adding 245 river miles along 8 different rivers.

We have a proposal that, if enacted by the Congress, will be the first comprehensive effort in our history to protect our nation's wetlands. And our Coastal Barriers Resources Act is already protecting large sections of our Gulf and Atlantic coasts, including more than 700 miles of dunes, beaches, and marshland.

To preserve our wildlife, we're working with the State of California to create a wildlife sanctuary that will protect thousands of seals and sea birds. In Texas, we're helping the State government at Aransas National Wildlife Refuge to protect the whooping crane. And we've completed recovery plans for more than 80 endangered species. Today the California condor, the Atlantic salmon, the peregrine falcon, and many other magnificent creatures have a new chance to multiply and flourish and to be here to greet our great-grandchildren.

And this brings me to a measure that I know is close to your hearts particularly: our work to refurbish and beautify our national parks. Like everyone who's ever seen them, we view our national parks as the crown jewels of the American land. And when we took office, we reversed a decline in funding that had been going on for their upkeep and inaugurated a 5-year, billion-dollar effort to give our parks the improvements they so badly needed. And I'm delighted to announce that this vital program has proceeded so well that it will be finished in 1985, a full year ahead of schedule.

From Independence Hall in Philadelphia to the Redwood Forest in California, our great national parks are getting the treatment they deserve. At Mammoth Cave National Park, our park restoration and improvement program has funded a universe of repairs and improvements. And I was just shown some of them a little while ago. Throughout the park, for example, cave trails and footpaths have been reworked to keep the caves accessible to their millions of visitors.

No treasure, I don't believe, means more to the American people than the Statue of Liberty. And right now, that grand lady in New York Harbor is getting special attention. With help from Lee Iacocca, the chairman of Chrysler, and his advisory commission, we've begun an effort to raise $230 million to give the statue and Ellis Island some sorely needed repairs. Already the American people have contributed a sizable amount.

And schoolchildren across this country have sent dimes and nickels that total more than a million dollars for this refurbishing job. The repairs will be completed in time for Miss Liberty's 100th birthday celebration on the Fourth of July, 1986. It's going to be quite a party, and you're all invited. Maybe we can announce that it's the greatest facelift that's ever been given.

But just as we believe in preserving our natural heritage, we're committed to putting it to the best possible use for the American people. Today some 175 million Americans over the age of 12 regularly participate in outdoor recreation. That's a substantial increase over past decades. And as members of the NCHA, you won't be surprised to hear that some 46 million Americans are campers. But perhaps you didn't know that more than 50 million are boaters, and some 64 million are fishermen, and about a hundred million are swimmers.

Now, make no mistake, the American land belongs to the American people, and we intend to keep it open for the American people. You may remember that under past -- well, over the years past, there's been -- well, there were some efforts to deal with energy shortages by attempting to ration gas and trying to keep you from using your recreational vehicles, your RV's. At one point, the Department of Energy even proposed a Sunday ban on motorboating. Now, officials admitted that the ban would have very little effect on gas supplies. But they claimed that it would have symbolic value. Well, they were right about that. The proposal did symbolize a government that had grown a little arrogant and intrusive, a government that seemed to believe that the American people should be kept away from their own lakes, rivers, and parks.

Well, forgive me, but we take a different view. We believe the environment includes people and that they, now and always, have a right to enjoy the American land. But I'm happy also to say that under our energy policy, I don't think we should ever again face a severe shortage of gasoline.

Indeed, when we decontrolled, oil prices -- or oil supplies increased, and today the price of gas at the pump is actually lower than it was in 1981. But if we do face a gas shortage, this administration will never respond by trying to keep the American people from enjoying the great outdoors.

In short, we believe that you can be a friend to the people at the same time that you're a friend to the land. And we're convinced that working through the wonders of science and technology, the human mind can enable our economy to grow, providing new jobs for millions, while at the same time enhancing our precious natural resources. And on these principles we have proceeded and we shall continue to act as long as we hold office.

Three thousand years ago the psalmist wrote, ``I will lift up mine eyes unto the hills, from whence cometh my help.'' The American writer and naturalist Henry David Thoreau, whose 167th birthday we celebrate today, expressed a similar belief. ``In wildness,'' he wrote, ``is the preservation of the world.'' Well, today in this great open field, we know that those two writers, though separated by the centuries -- what they both thought and felt.

Here in the open, close to the land, we feel refreshed and free. Here we see clearly what is important in life -- the liberty our country offers, the love of our families and friends. And here it is that we're given a strong sense of the majesty of our Creator. I just have to believe that with love for our natural heritage and a firm resolve to preserve it with wisdom and care, we can and will give the American land to our children, not impaired, but enhanced. And in doing this, we'll honor the great and loving God who gave us this land in the first place.

I want you to know also I'm not a stranger to what it is that you love so much out there. As a matter of fact, I haven't had as many chances to do that now as I would like. But the last time I remember taking a pack trip into the High Sierras. And we had our small son along with us at the time, Nancy and I, and when we picked a place to stretch out our sleeping bags on the ground, he decided he was going over there between a couple of pine trees. And he went over there, and then we settled in.

You probably got this news in the briefings that have taken place already. But just in case you didn't -- and if you did, it's worth repeating -- our goal for the American people is a strong, growth economy with stable prices. And this morning it looks like we hit the jackpot, made a triple play. Industrial production in June was up. Retail sales in June were up. And producer prices were unchanged for the third month in a row, 0.0.

So, now I can go on that it's good to see so many old friends and also to meet some new ones, and to be joined by two of the favorite women in my life, Nancy and Maureen. I want to begin by giving each of you my heartfelt thanks for all that you've done for the Republican cause.

Politics is often fun and sometimes glamorous, but in the end it's the hard work of people like you that makes it possible for us to put our beliefs into practice. Your role is especially important because you demonstrate a Republican commitment to American women. And that's a commitment that runs deep.

It is kind of appropriate today I should be saying this -- [laughter] -- because, you know, some people have tried to keep this very fact I've just mentioned a secret. Well, first it was the Grand Old Party that gave its backing to women's suffrage. And then it became the first to elect a woman to the United States Congress and the first to elect women to the United States Senate who are not just filling out unexpired terms.

Republicans, the only two women in the Senate. And we have nine outstanding Republican women in the House of Representatives. And I really bring this up because I think it's time that they have more company there.

Now, all of us are aware of the events that transpired yesterday among the Democrats. They have their ticket, and I'm looking forward to campaigning against it on the issues. As I said yesterday, their choice of a Vice-Presidential nominee [Geraldine A. Ferraro] is historic. And so was appointing Sandra Day O'Connor to the United States Supreme Court. And I have to tell you that the day I appointed her was one of the happier days of my life.

But what about that foolishness that it's the other major party that represents the interests of women? The truth is the Republican Party represents those interests best and in a serious and a long-term manner. We Republicans think women should change America. And that's why we have Ambassador Jeane Kirkpatrick as an eloquent and courageous voice at the United Nations. And she is changing America, as are Elizabeth Dole at Transportation and Margaret Heckler at the Department of Health and Human Services, and as are Katherine Ortega, the Treasurer of the United States, and Martha Seger at the Federal Reserve Board.

United States one of these days soon, and she's going to be a Republican. Why? Because we have the great talent. The women who have advanced in our party and who are coming up through the ranks today are doing it by merit. And the American people, recognizing this, will support such a woman when she runs.

The Conservative Party of Great Britain chose Margaret Thatcher as their leader not because she was a woman, but because she was the best person for the job. There was no tokenism or cynical symbolism in what they did. She became leader of her party and Prime Minister of Great Britain because she was judged by her peers to be a superior leader. And that's how the first Republican woman President will do it.

But look around you at the great talent that is in this room. The advancement of women in this party is more evidence of the growing fact that increasingly the Republican Party is the party of ideas. We're the new thing in politics these days. We are taking creative steps to free up the economy. We have the new and vital economic ideas. We're taking a new look at the family and its pivotal place in society. And we're the ones with fresh new insights on tax structure. And we're the one with the courage, conviction, and the compassion to increase personal incentives for every working American. Our party fairly crackles with ideas and dynamism, with the bustle of pioneers looking into the future and trying to make it better than the present or the past.

The past 3\1/2\ years -- if you noticed -- we have, all of us together, changed our country. We've led the way in helping the public understand that the great contention between the free world and the totalitarians is the preeminent struggle of our times. We've led the way in helping our country appreciate anew the fact that economic justice comes from economic freedom and that big government does not liberate men and women; it holds them down. What we've accomplished is the most exciting domestic political development since the New Deal.

And all of you in this room are an integral part of that new revolution. You're the incredible talent that's lighting our party with tremendous energy. The Republican Party is the party of the future, and it is up to all of us to reach out to all of the people in this country, to go to the union halls and the fire stations and the street corners and get the word out and let people know that the party with a vision wants their support, needs their support, and deserves their support.

It all comes down to you. Scores of gifted Republican women like you are serving in public office outside Washington. In the 23 State primaries that have been held this year to select candidates for State and Federal offices, in addition to incumbents, our party fielded over 200 women, and more than 150 of you came out of your primaries victorious.

Now, I know you're having briefings all day, but if you'd allow me, I'd like to take a moment to give you an overview of some of the other things we've been trying to do -- and I'll be brief, because maybe you've already heard them. I may be plowing some ground that's already been plowed, but there are some specific proposals that we're making, working on, that directly affect women in America.

On the legislative front, we've made proposals to really toughen child support enforcement: to improve State collection of child support payments and require the adoption of proven and effective enforcement techniques. Bills containing these measures have passed both the House and the Senate, and we hope they'll emerge from a conference committee ironing out the differences between them within the next few weeks.

In pension reform, we have proposed legislation to increase protection for widowed and divorced spouses and to help women earn their own pension credits. That bill is also well on its way to enactment.

The economic crisis struck women especially hard. Most elderly Americans living on fixed incomes are women, and their purchasing power was eaten up by inflation. Women saw jobs become more and more scarce, and a 12.4-percent inflation rate made buying groceries and paying bills a nightmare. The thousands of women who wanted to start their own businesses saw a 21\1/2\-percent prime interest rate slam the doors of opportunity.

We eliminated needless regulation, reduced personal income tax rates. And we passed an historic reform called tax indexing, that means the Government can never again use inflation as a tax increase to profit at the people's expense. We reduced the marriage tax penalty, almost doubled the maximum child-care credit, increased the limits for IRA and Keogh contributions, and eliminated estate taxes on family farms and businesses for surviving spouses.

And our greatest triumph is in the area of employment. Right now more people are employed in the United States than at any other time in our history. And we've beaten back unemployment to 7 percent. But if you just take women's unemployment, it's less than 7 percent.

Today, from Maine to California, there's a powerful economic expansion that is taking place. As a matter of fact, I had an angry, scholarly economist write me to tell me to stop calling it economic recovery. He said, ``We're past that -- it is now economic expansion.'' [Laughter] And I believed him. But inflation has plummeted by more than two-thirds since we took office. It's been running at 3.6 percent for the last 3-month period.

Retail sales, as I said, are up. The American worker's real wage is rising. Investment by U.S. business and new plants and equipment has risen at its fastest rate for any recovery in the last 30 years.

We Republicans have more than a good record. Together we've changed and will continue to change our country. For the last 30-odd years or more, the political debate in Washington was all having to do with how much they were going to spend and the new spending proposals. And nobody's stopped to notice that for the last few years, the debate in Washington has been all entirely on how much are we going to cut. And we've never cut as much as I think we should, but we're going to keep on doing that, too.

We know that our nation's best days are still ahead of us. We can build a country where all women and men have the chance to go forward just as far as their dreams and talents will take them -- an open society led by new ideas. It's all very exciting, and we're doing it, all of us together. And if we succeed in getting the word about -- out about who we are and what we're accomplishing -- then I feel sure the Nation will follow us.

The United States has long depended upon the ocean for food, transportation, national security, and recreation. Today, the ocean has become even more important to the people of our Nation -- as a source of petroleum and minerals and an avenue for foreign trade. In addition, the ocean is a constant source of employment for hundreds of thousands of Americans each year.

This Nation is the steward of the resources of the ocean. Americans have long cherished the freedom of the coastal regions which border our shores. The ocean is the link between the many countries with which we have shared the discoveries of modern technology in the development of oceanography.

Our increased use of the ocean requires that we work to protect this resource effectively and efficiently. In order to do so, we must educate Americans concerning the role of the ocean in our lives and our responsibility to match increased uses of marine resources with vigilant efforts to preserve the ocean environment for the benefit of future generations.

I'd like to talk to you today about our environment. But as I mentioned earlier this week, in doing so I might be letting you in on a little secret -- as a matter of fact, one of the best-kept secrets in Washington.

More than 15 years ago, the State of California decided that we needed to take action to combat the smog that was choking the beautiful cities of my home State. Out of that concern was born the first serious program to require manufacturers to build cleaner cars and help control air pollution. The auto industry had to build two kinds of cars -- one that would be for sale in the other 49 States and one that would meet the stiff antipollution standards required in California.

And we took the lead in that area as well. It took the rest of the Nation a few years to catch on, but in 1970 the Congress followed California's lead and enacted the Clean Air Act. Other laws to protect and clean up the Nation's lakes and rivers were passed, and America got on with the job of protecting the environment.

Part of the secret I mentioned is that I happened to have been Governor of California back when much of this was being done. Now, obviously, neither the problems in California nor those nationally have been solved, but I'm proud of having been one of the first to recognize that States and the Federal Government have a duty to protect our natural resources from the damaging effects of pollution that can accompany industrial development.

According to studies by the Environmental Protection Agency, the quality of our air and water has continued to improve during our administration. In many big cities, the number of days on which pollution alerts are declared has gone down. And if you live near a river, you may have noticed that the signs have been coming down that used to warn people not to fish or swim.

We came to Washington committed to respect the great bounty and beauty of God's creation. We believe very strongly in the concept of stewardship, caring for the resources we have so they can be shared and used productively for generations to come. And we've put that philosophy to work, correcting deficiencies of past policies and advancing long-overdue initiatives.

We also took the lead in developing a new approach to protecting some 700 miles of undeveloped coastal areas -- the dunes, beaches, and barrier islands that are some of our most beautiful and productive natural resources.

Now, there are some who want you to believe that commitment to protecting the environment can be measured by comparing the budgets of EPA under the previous administration with those proposed and approved by the Congress under my administration. But they deliberately ignore that the major Federal environmental laws are designed to be carried out by the States in partnership with EPA.

By the time the clean air, clean water, and other big programs put in place in the early 1970's moved into their second decade, the States had largely taken over the job formerly performed by the Federal Government. With the successful delegation to the States, EPA, under the leadership of Bill Ruckelshaus, has been freed to move on to the challenges of the 1980's -- such as cleaning up abandoned toxic waste dumps.

Under our administration, funding for the Superfund cleanup program will have increased from just over a hundred million dollars in 1981 to $620 million in 1985. By the end of this year, EPA expects to have undertaken more than 400 emergency actions to remove and contain public health hazards. And because we recognize that we need to do more cleanup work than the current law provides, I'm committed to seeking an extension of the Superfund program.

I know I speak for Vice President Bush when I say that we're delighted to have you all here and delighted to welcome you. But I'm very much aware that in your case that word ``delight'' does not nearly suffice.

I look at you, and I know I'm looking at people who have seen and suffered the full gamut of totalitarian terror. Some of you lost friends and loved ones in your struggles. And some of you risked your lives and all your earthly belongings, and you'll bear scars for the rest of your life.

You're men and women of courage, heroes who have devoted a lifetime to struggle for God's greatest gift -- for freedom. And for that, I can only say I'm honored to be here with you today, and I'll be proud to stand by you always.

You understand that the struggle for freedom is the preeminent struggle of our time. One of the great tragedies of our age is that ugly, sinister walls continue to deny for the millions trapped behind them the most basic yearnings of the human spirit. And let us make it plain that we must and will condemn all tyrants who deny their citizens human rights, whether they be dictators of the left or the right.

I've often thought to myself -- in fact, I've mentioned a few times -- I don't think there is a left or right, because if you follow that far enough either way, you suddenly find they've come together, and they all have the same characteristics. I think we ought to start talking about an up or down -- up to the ultimate in individual freedom, consistent with an orderly society, or down through statism until you arrive at totalitarianism.

But for the sake of our security and for the sake of our freedom, let us understand the nature of the single greatest challenge to human rights in the world today: It's the challenge of one system that puts itself above God, that demands control over people's lives, and that defines its very existence by the relentless drive to conquer more and more lands. And that system is, today, Communist totalitarianism.

Look at the lesson of history. Many nations today have been conquered by force -- not by moral force, not by persuasion, and certainly not by the tides of history. No, they were seized by forces of violence -- by tanks and guns in Poland, Hungary, and Czechoslovakia; by bombs, chemical poisons, and forced starvation in Afghanistan, Vietnam, and Kampuchea; and everywhere by the forces of persecution against innocent people -- people whose only crime might have been a simple faith, a love of their God, a longing to worship as Moslems, Buddhists, Jews, or followers of Jesus Christ. They were taken captives by force, and they remain captives by force.

The citizens of Nicaragua are the latest to join this unhappy lot, victims of the campaign of persecution against liberty and faith that follows every Communist takeover. The Archbishop of Managua, Miguel Obando y Bravo, and the members of his flock have recently been singled out as enemies by the Sandinista regime. Last week the Archbishop said, ``We're in the presence of a Marxist-Leninist government that cannot accept an independent Church. The government's goal,'' he said, ``is to eliminate the Church, to eliminate priests who are loyal to the Pope and to the Church hierarchy.'' And Pope John Paul II said, ``I express my firm disapproval in my intimate participation in the suffering of the Church in Nicaragua.'' And I know I speak for millions of Americans who join the Pope in saying we, too, disapprove, and yes, people of Nicaragua, we, too, suffer with you.

Democracy is far from perfect. But democracy does not wage war on its neighbors; it doesn't build walls to keep its people in; and it doesn't organize armies of secret police to spy on them and keep them quiet. Democracy reflects all the mistakes, all the frailties, but also all the deepest hopes and dreams of the human spirit. And democracy rests upon a noble principle that has and always will make tyrants tremble: Government derives its legitimacy from the consent of the governed.

And that is why people with their innate good sense have never chosen of their own free will to live as slaves. But millions have risked their lives to escape the darkness of oppression and to live in the sunlight of freedom. And that's why we can say here today with certain knowledge that our path is the right and good path and that, yes, democracy is the way of the future.

Republicans or Democrats, but as Americans -- saying you are not alone; your dreams are not in vain. Hold onto your dreams, because the tide of the future is a freedom tide, and totalitarianism cannot hold it back.

I've said repeatedly, there's nothing we want more, nothing we're trying harder to achieve than to bring about a more peaceful world. Peace is our highest aspiration. We're prepared for peace and prepared to persist for peace.

We will always summon our freedom to work another day to make this world a safer place. But as we go forward in this worthy endeavor, let us also remember who we are and what we stand for. We're a nation under God, and His divine spirit of truth and love must guide and always remain central to our existence. Yes, we stand for peace, but we stand for peace with freedom and for peace with dignity.

And when we speak of the dignity of the individual, nothing could be more tragic than the fate of the Nobel Prize winner, Doctor Andrei Sakharov, and his wife, Yelena Bonner, who are currently suffering severe persecution and are cut off from the rest of humanity. The world demands to know the fate of these two good and courageous people. So, to those who believe our policy must always be willful ignorance of ugly truths, must be silence in the face of persecution, and appeasement or surrender to aggression, I say, no, that price is far too steep, and we dare not and will never pay it.

If our observance of Captive Nations Week is to have meaning, then it must be observed in word and in deed. Today I'm calling on people everywhere who enjoy the blessings of liberty to join with us in helping the freedom fighters in Afghanistan, because they need our support, they want our support, and they deserve our support. The cause of peace is not served by a conquering force of more than a hundred thousand Soviet troops. The cause of peace will only be served when those troops are out and Afghanistan belongs again to the Afghan people.

And today I'm appealing to those who refuse to help the freedom fighters in Nicaragua, refuse to assist their courageous struggle for democracy, for freedom of the press, and for freedom of assembly and worship in their homeland. I urge you to ponder long and hard, to reflect on the fatal consequences of complacency and isolationism, and, above all, to understand that freedom is never more than one generation away from extinction.

It's vital for the sake of our own future that the Congress and the American people respond to the democratic aspirations of the Nicaraguan people. Freedom's greatest shield is a shield of truth, and our shield is stonger today than ever before.

I'm proud to tell you that we've begun an initiative that will bring words of truth and a message of hope to millions of imprisoned people throughout the world. The construction budget of the Voice of America was only $2.6 million in 1981. So, our administration has developed a 6-year, $1 billion program to modernize the Voice of America. And I'm pleased to report that the Congress has voted to provide nearly a hundred million dollars for 1985.

Liberty to communicate with the peoples of Eastern Europe and the Soviet Union. And we're pleased that the Congress has authorized the establishment of Radio Marti, which will broadcast the truth to the people of Cuba.

There is cause for hope and promise. And so, I thank you for your faith, for your courage. And I thank you for standing together, because, with you by our side, we'll keep our sights on the farthest stars; we'll climb higher; we will be a shining city on a hill. Our time is now.

Once each year, all Americans are asked to pause and to remember that their liberties and freedoms, often taken for granted, are forbidden to many nations around the world. America continues to be dedicated to the proposition that all men are created equal. If we are to sustain our commitment to this principle, we must recognize that the peoples of the Captive Nations are endowed by the Creator with the same rights to give their consent as to who shall govern them as those of us who are privileged to live in freedom. For those captive and oppressed peoples, the United States of America stands as a symbol of hope and inspiration. This leadership requires faithfulness towards our own democratic principles as well as a commitment to speak out in defense of mankind's natural rights.

Though twenty-five years have passed since the original designation of Captive Nations Week, its significance has not diminished. Rather, it has undeniably increased -- especially as other nations have fallen under Communist domination. During Captive Nations Week we must take time to remember both the countless victims and the lonely heroes; both the targets of carpet bombing in Afghanistan, and individuals such as imprisoned Ukrainian patriot Yuriy Shukhevych. We must draw strength from the actions of the millions of freedom fighters in Communist-occupied countries, such as the signers of petitions for religious rights in Lithuania, or the members of Solidarity, whose public protests require personal risk and sacrifice that is almost incomprehensible to the average citizen in the Free World. It is in their struggle for freedom that we can find the true path to genuine and lasting peace.

For those denied the benefits of liberty we shall continue to speak out for their freedom. On behalf of the unjustly persecuted and falsely imprisoned, we shall continue to call for their speedy release and offer our prayers during their suffering. On behalf of the brave men and women who suffer persecution because of national origin, religious beliefs, and their desire for liberty, it is the duty and the privilege of the United States of America to demand that the signatories of the United Nations Charter and the Helsinki Accords live up to their pledges and obligations and respect the principles and spirit of those international agreements and understandings.

During Captive Nations Week, we renew our efforts to encourage freedom, independence, and national self-determination for those countries struggling to free themselves from Communist ideology and totalitarian oppression, and to support those countries which today are standing face-to-face against Soviet expansionism. One cannot call for freedom and human rights for the people of Asia and Eastern Europe while ignoring the struggles of our own neighbors in this hemisphere. There is no difference between the weapons used to oppress the people of Laos and Czechoslovakia, and those sent to Nicaragua to terrorize its own people and threaten the peace and prosperity of its neighbors.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 16th day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

Ambassador Goodby briefed me on the second round of the Conference, which has just concluded, and on the prospects for progress when the talks resume in September. He noted the continuing efforts of the U.S. and our NATO allies to achieve an outcome which will genuinely increase mutual confidence and reduce the risk of war in Europe. Earlier, in the first round of the Conference, the West put forward a package of concrete proposals designed to achieve these goals.

Parliament that the United States is prepared to consider the Soviet proposal for a declaration on the non-use of force if the Soviet Union is willing to discuss concrete measures to put that principle into action. We are disappointed, however, that the Soviet Union has so far failed to join the great majority of the 35 participating nations at Stockholm, who have demonstrated a desire to begin such concrete negotiations.

I assured Ambassador Goodby that he has my continuing strong support in our efforts to get on with the practical negotiations for which this Conference was intended. We will continue to do our best to achieve progress at Stockholm, just as we and our allies are working hard together in other multilateral areas of arms control -- such as the East-West conventional force talks in Vienna and the 40-nation Conference on Disarmament in Geneva.

This agreement is a modest but positive step toward enhancing international stability and reducing the risk that accident, miscalculation, or misinterpretation could lead to confrontation or conflict between the U.S. and the Soviet Union.

With the addition of a facsimile capability, we will not only be able to exchange messages faster; but for the first time we will be able to send graphic material such as maps or pictures which would play a crucial role in helping to resolve certain types of crises or misunderstandings.

In developing this and other initiatives designed to reduce the risk of war due to accident, misunderstanding, or miscalculation, we had the benefit of excellent advice from a number of key congressional leaders, including Senators Warner and Nunn and the late Senator Jackson.

I see this agreement as both an appropriate technical improvement to the hotline, which has served both our governments well for over 20 years, and as a good example of how we can, working together, find approaches which can move us towards a reduction in the risks of war.

When I accepted my party's nomination for the Presidency -- that was 4 years ago today -- I shared a vision of the future. I said that we needed a rebirth of an American tradition of leadership at every level of government and private life as well.

United States of America is unique in world history. It has a genius for leaders at many -- of many leaders on many levels. And since then we've seen the rise of a great national movement, a movement that's led by men and women in all walks of life. It began in the community; it spread to State governments; and now it's won wide support here in our Nation's Capital -- the movement against drunk driving.

The bill we're gathered to sign today reflects the will of the American people. It takes the battle to stop drunk driving one crucial step further. And permit me to tell you why I believe that this bill is so important.

We know that drinking plus driving spell death and disaster. We know that people in the 18-to-20 age group are more likely to be in alcohol-related accidents than those in any other age group. We know that America has a clear stake in making certain that her sons and daughters, so full of vitality and promise, will not be crippled or killed. And I know there's one -- we all know that there is one simple measure that will save thousands of young lives that are in the drinking age -- if we, or if we raise the drinking age, I should say, to 21.

State that has raised the drinking age to 21 has produced a significant drop in the teenage driving fatalities. In the State of New Jersey, whose Governor made it a very personal crusade for himself, the rate dropped by 26 percent; Illinois, it has fallen 23 percent; in Michigan, 31 percent.

And yet, today, less than half that number have the age-21 law. And that leaves us with a crazy quilt of different States' drinking laws and far too many blood borders, borders where teens drive across to reach States with lower drinking ages. And these teenagers drink and then careen home and all too often cause crippling or fatal accidents.

This problem is bigger than the individual States. It's a grave national problem, and it touches all our lives. With the problem so clear-cut and the proven solution at hand, we have no misgiving about this judicious use of Federal power. I'm convinced that it will help persuade State legislators to act in the national interest to save our children's lives, by raising the drinking age to 21 across the country.

Now, many have toiled hard to make this bill possible -- Members of Congress, Secretary Dole, thousands of concerned Americans like Mothers Against Drunk Driving, the Students Against Drunk Driving -- by supporting legislation, they've done this nation a service. And each of them certainly have my heartfelt thanks and, I think, the thanks of all the people in our country.

Government's civilian land remote-sensing satellite system, known as Landsat. This legislation, which recognizes that competitive private sector involvement in land remote sensing is in the national interest, is a good example of cooperation between the administration and Congress.

One of the administration's primary goals in implementing this legislation will be to develop a program that requires minimum government involvement. The administration's policies of limiting burdensome governmental regulation and encouraging competition in the marketplace will guide the Secretary of Commerce's implementation of this legislation, and we will make every effort to minimize the duration and amount of any Federal subsidy.

Two provisions of the bill deserve special comment since the Attorney General has advised that they establish a procedure which is unconstitutional. Sections 202(c) and 303(c) require the Secretary of Commerce to transmit to the appropriate congressional committees any decision to enter into a contract under titles II and III of the bill and to wait for 30 days before implementing that decision. These sections also provide that the committees may, in effect, waive the prescribed waiting periods. Under the Supreme Court's decision in Immigration and Naturalization Service v.

Chadha, 103 S. Ct. 2761 (1983), Congress, including committees of Congress, may not be given power which has ``the purpose and effect of altering the legal rights, duties and relations of persons, including . . . Executive Branch officials . . .,'' through procedures which bypass the constitutional requirements for valid legislative action. Thus, the provisions in this bill purporting to empower the relevant committees to ``waive'' the 30-day waiting period are, under that Supreme Court decision, unconstitutional.

I extend my appreciation to the Congress for the careful and timely consideration given this legislation, and I look forward to the successful commercialization of the Landsat system. This commercialization represents one of the administration's major efforts to return to the private sector those activities which it can best perform.

I am today signing H.R. 4170. In signing this important legislation, I must vigorously object to certain provisions that would unconstitutionally attempt to delegate to the Comptroller General of the United States, an officer of Congress, the power to perform duties and responsibilities that in our constitutional system may be performed only by officials of the executive branch. This administration's position on the unconstitutionality of these provisions was clearly articulated to Congress by the Department of Justice on April 20, 1984. I am instructing the Attorney General to inform all executive branch agencies as soon as possible with respect to how they may comply with the provisions of this bill in a manner consistent with the Constitution.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Larry C. Williamson, of California, a career member of the Senior Foreign Service, class of Counselor, as Ambassador to the Gabonese Republic and to serve concurrently and without additional compensation as Ambassador to the Democratic Republic of Sao Tome and Principe. He would succeed Francis Terry McNamara.

The President. I just want to say that this is a great honor for me -- all of you by your examples have set a pattern of dedication to country and duty -- and to address you now on this your 37th annual convention.

Those service men and women who were placed in circumstances, including all of you -- they called for special sacrifice and extraordinary bravery. Only those who have been POW's can realize the trauma of being captured and the indignities and hardships that you had to endure. And your families suffered with them. I know that's one of the reasons why you're out in front of all of us in continuing to show compassion for the over 2,000 Americans that are unaccounted for in Southeast Asia and their families and what they're going through. So, I just welcome this opportunity to thank all of you.

No, seriously, I think we all do know and just -- I welcome this opportunity to wish you well in this 37th annual convention and at the same time then to thank you on behalf of all Americans for the sacrifice that you made.

Mr. Darrington. Mr. President, as you can see and -- hear, rather, this is a very appreciative group for you and for our love of our country. And we want you to know again that we appreciate you calling, speaking to the American Ex-prisoners of War in our 37th annual convention.

Over the last year, these Central American outreach group meetings have been held. You've heard from dozens of witnesses telling you what has happened to them, to their country, and to their hopes for freedom, democracy, and peace.

They'll recall the joy that they felt 5 years ago. A dictatorship was defeated, and a democracy was promised for their future by the Sandinistas, who had led the revolution. But the Sandinista revolution is a revolution betrayed, a revolution that has left in its wake a trail of broken promises, broken hearts, and broken dreams.

Tragically, there is far less personal freedom, far more repression in Nicaragua today than there was 5 years ago. And I'm told there are several among you here who have seen firsthand the truth of these words.

The Nicaraguan people are trapped in a totalitarian dungeon, trapped by a military dictatorship that impoverishes them while its rulers live in privileged and protected luxury and openly boast their revolution will spread to Nicaragua's neighbors as well. It's a dictatorship made all the more insulting, all the more dangerous by the unwanted presence of thousands of Cuban, Soviet-bloc, and radical Arab helpers.

September 14 to 16 in Cleveland, Ohio, there will be a meeting brought about by several organizations in our country, and it will be -- or is billed as a nationwide conference against U.S. military intervention in Central America. Well, if 55 trainers in a country like El Salvador is military intervention, I think they're exaggerating a little bit.

The Pope, who was so outrageously insulted during his mass in Managua in March of 1983, asked for prayers for the church in Nicaragua. He expressed his disapproval and his intimate suffering with those who live under the boot of Sandinista oppression. And as I said on Monday at the marking of Captive Nations Week, I know I speak for millions of Americans who join the Pope in saying: We, too, disapprove. And, yes, people of Nicaragua, we, too, suffer with you.

If the Sandinistas want cooperation and friendship from the civilized world, then they can start by treating their own citizens in a civilized manner. They can start honoring their promises of freedom -- freedom of speech, freedom of assembly, freedom of worship. And they can agree to abide by the most basic and honorable principle of a democracy: that government must derive its legitimacy from the consent of the governed.

All of us who cherish democratic values should insist the Sandinistas permit genuinely open and fair and free democratic elections. We must insist that the Sandinistas, like their Guatemalan, Honduran, and El Salvadoran neighbors, open their doors to representatives from democratic organizations to observe their upcoming elections, especially the Organization of American States, OAS, because it was to the OAS that they promised democracy. And the OAS recognized the Sandinista regime based on these promises.

Tomorrow, I will be meeting in South Carolina with Caribbean leaders who know from firsthand experience how a hostile country in their midst can threaten their stability and security. As our Congress returns next week, I urge them once again to understand our responsibility as a trustee of freedom and to vote for the resources that I have requested to support democracy in Central America. And I hope all of you will continue attending these Central American outreach meetings.

Well, I do believe that it's possible to warn of danger, to learn from the millions of witnesses who have come to the West fleeing totalitarianism. But we must not turn a blind eye and a deaf ear to the truth. We must have the wisdom to understand, and we must have the courage to act.

In signing H.R. 5713 into law, I note that seven of its provisions purport to limit my authority, and the authority of the affected department or agency heads, to use funds otherwise appropriated by this bill, unless the Committees on Appropriations of both the House of Representatives and the Senate approve of those expenditures. Three of these provisions would purport to permit those committees to authorize the Administrator of NASA or the Administrator of the VA to exceed certain secondary limits on the amounts that may be spent on several specified activities, by using otherwise appropriated funds; a fourth would purport to allow those committees to authorize the Administrator of NASA to enter into certain leases or construction contracts that otherwise must be specified in an appropriations act. The appropriations made for the Environmental Protection Agency and the Federal Emergency Management Agency, and section 409 of the general provisions applicable to all appropriations made by this bill, contain similar provisions.

I fully recognize the interest of Congress and its committees in preserving oversight and accountability over the discretion Congress grants to the executive in such important areas as the obligation of appropriations. I do believe, however, that the time has come, with more than a year having passed since the Supreme Court's decision in Chadha, to make clear that legislation containing legislative veto devices that comes to me for my approval or disapproval will be implemented in a manner consistent with the Chadha decision. I strongly urge Congress to discontinue the inclusion of such devices in legislation, because doing so serves no constructive purpose after Chadha beyond introducing confusion and ambiguity into the process by which the executive's obligations are discharged.

As I said recently in Texas, the changes that have been brought to government signify far more than a victory for any one person or any administration or political philosophy. When these changes were first proposed, the seers of Potomac land said it couldn't be done, that our problems were too vast and complicated, that our political institutions couldn't function anymore. They said that we couldn't simultaneously cut the growth of government, reduce tax rates, spark an economic expansion, launch a war on crime, rebuild our defenses, stop the expansion of totalitarianism, and put forward the most extensive series of arms reduction proposals in our nation's history.

Well, they were wrong. All those things are being accomplished, and they're too vast and sweeping to be the work of any one person or one administration. The impetus for those changes has come from what has always been the real source of America's success and greatness, the American people, themselves.

Now, I'm talking about all the average citizens who time and again have made their voices heard here in Washington, who said they'd had enough excuses from politicians and indifferent bureaucrats, the heartland people who took back their government from a Washington-oriented leadership that stood for pessimism, defeatism, and ineptitude.

And one example of the people's newfound influence here in Washington has been a cost-cutting revolution that this administration began the day it took office. Unheralded, almost unreported, it's a quiet revolution that's reaching into every part of the Government, pruning, shearing, cutting, cutting back bureaucracy, making it more efficient and less wasteful, and making it more responsive to the people.

Three years ago I called waste, fraud, and mismanagement in the Federal Government an unrelenting national scandal. Well, today, although we're still a long way from home, that scandal is starting to relent. And let me tell you why: From discovering benefit checks still being sent to the deceased to finding a hammer the Pentagon was paying $400 for, our Inspectors General, auditors, and administrators are putting the squeeze on billions in waste and mismanagement.

Accomplishments so far include the collection of billions of dollars in delinquent debt, reduction of paperwork by 32 percent, and suspending publication of an estimated 155 million copies of marginally useful Federal publications.

To ensure that reforms occur and that savings are made, we examined progress made during formal management reviews with each Federal agency as part of the budget process. But ultimately, I believe history will record the American people's biggest victory over bureaucracy and big government began with the work of you who are here today.

I think all of you remember the skepticism, the cynicism, and even the scorn with which the permanent Washington establishment greeted the announcement of the Grace commission. You know, I remember during the last campaign, anytime you brought up the problem of waste, fraud, and mismanagement in government, many people who'd gotten used to the ways of Washington said it was just campaign rhetoric. They said such problems were so engrained, and, as they like to say in this city, ``structural,'' that nothing could be done about them.

Well, something was done about them, and in large part, we have all of you to thank for that. The end product of your 18 months of hard work was 2,478 recommendations on how to cut the deficit, conveyed in 36 task force reports, 11 special reports, and a two-volume final report to the President. Your 21,000 pages of the 48 reports are supported by 1\1/2\ million pages of documentation, and your survey was conducted at no cost to the Government, with $75 million donated by the private sector in personnel, materials, supplies, equipment, and travel costs.

Now, I think you all know that I pledged to you last January not just talk but aggressive action on your recommendations. Well, I received a very thick memorandum the other day. It noted that our special task forces set up to review and implement your proposals have currently completed their reviews of 44 percent of the issues, and more than 80 percent of those issues have been forwarded for implementation.

You know, the review process involves very complex and detailed computerized data, all of which was summarized recently in that very thick memorandum that was sent my way. Kind of reminds me of the time that a government official said he was so disturbed by duplication in government that he was appointing not one, but two commissions, to study the problem.

I've just signed a major part of our deficit downpayment package which is intended to reduce the deficit by $62 billion. Now, we're determined to get the full downpayment of nearly 140 billion over these next 3 years, so I'll be ready with a veto pen to make sure the spending restraint that we need is fully reflected in the remaining appropriation bills to complete that downpayment.

But for the future, what we need most are long-term reforms to ensure sustained reductions in spending growth. And that's why we'll press on for constitutional amendments to mandate a balanced Federal budget and to permit a line-item veto. And we'll continue to press for reduced spending growth by adopting the kind of commonsense, long-overdue measures that you have proposed.

So, I wanted to take this opportunity to give you a progress report on our waste and fraud campaign and to thank each of you for all that you did during the course of your work on the Grace commission. I know it meant many hours away from your jobs and families. Each of you here today, whether you personally worked on the Grace commission or stood by and supported your friend or spouse, symbolize the best in America -- a willingness to set aside individual preferences for the common good of the country.

You've given something back to America. You should be very proud of that. Your work was courageous and daring; you didn't seek the approval of the Washington establishment, but produced a report that shook the foundations of the establishment.

Napoleon once said to one of his commanders, ``If you start to take Vienna, take Vienna.'' Well, there's a lot of work left to be done on your recommendations, but believe me, this administration has learned from your example. And I can promise you, again, not just talk but aggressive action.

As we face the future together, I think we have good reason to be confident. For, years ago -- 4 years ago, I should say, economic prospects were bleak, and the forces of tyranny were on the move, emboldened by what seemed to be a paralysis among the democratic peoples of the hemisphere. But by joining together with courage and determination, we've turned that situation around.

Now, the tide of the future is a freedom tide. The free people of this hemisphere are united and share a common sense of purpose. Nowhere is that more apparent than with the United States and the Caribbean democracies as has been so evident in our meeting today.

Your own democracies are an example to developing countries everywhere. That's not to say that you don't face great challenges. The worldwide recession has profoundly affected the Caribbean with market prices for key commodities you produce dropping even as the costs of your imports were rising. The United States has been hard pressed economically. But we've done our best to help and provide hope, and we'll continue to do so. The United States has a deep and abiding interest in the well-being of its neighbors.

In the last 3 years, we've begun to put our own economic house in order by cutting down the growth of government spending and regulations. We're enjoying high growth, declining unemployment, and low inflation. And we've become, once again, an engine for worldwide economic progress. We believe the secret of that success is lower tax rates. And that's a secret everyone can share and benefit from.

Monetary Fund's ability to assist countries with debt problems. But let's be realistic; stopgap measures with the IMF are merely that -- temporary solutions. The ultimate solution is strong and steady growth in every Caribbean country.

We can and must work together to improve the well-being of our people and to ensure our safety, as well. I'd like to take this opportunity to congratulate many of you for your courage and leadership in turning back the Communist power grab in Grenada last fall. We can be proud that thanks to the unity and determination of our democracies, we saved the people of that troubled island; we restored their freedom; we revived their hope in the future; and we prevented danger and turmoil from spreading beyond Grenada's shores. Let us always remember the crucial distinction between the legitimate use of force for liberation versus totalitarian aggression for conquest.

But what was happening in Grenada was not an isolated incident. The Soviet bloc and Cuba have been committing enormous resources to undermining our liberty and independence. Nowhere is this threat more pressing than in Nicaragua, a country which today marks the fifth year of Sandinista dictatorship.

The Sandinista revolution, like Castro's revolution, is a revolution betrayed. And now faced with mounting internal pressures and disillusionment abroad, the Sandinistas have announced an election for November of this year. We would wholeheartedly welcome a genuine democratic election in Nicaragua. But no person committed to democracy will be taken in by a Soviet-style sham election.

The situation in Nicaragua is not promising; but if the Sandinistas would keep their original commitment, permit free elections, respect human rights and establish an independent nation, conflict in the region would subside.

In the meantime, we have a moral responsibility to support anyone who aspires to live in a true democracy, free from Communist interference. If the democratic peoples do not stand together, we certainly will be unable to stand alone.

Just a few years ago, totalitarianism was on the rise. But there's a new spirit among democratic peoples. Prime Minister Adams described it when he said, ``There is a community of interest among democratic countries which can transcend ethnici -- ethnicis -- city'' -- I'm sorry -- twisting that word up -- ``and differences in economic development.'' This spirit is a powerful new force for freedom in the world today.

What we do together, as a family of free men and women, will determine what the future will be like for our children. If we`re strong enough to live up to our shared values, the promise of freedom and opportunity for the New World will at long last be realized. By working together, the free people of this hemisphere can make certain that the next century will indeed be our century, a democratic century.

I've thoroughly enjoyed being with you here today. And I hope that after my attempt to pronounce a word that I stumbled over, that you won't take that honorary degree away from me, Mr. President. But, again, it's been a great pleasure. I know that I must return to Washington now. I think meetings of this kind should be a regular feature in the years ahead, and we shall look forward to that.

In his opening remarks, the President referred to James B. Holderman, president of the University of South Carolina, who had awarded the President the honorary degree of doctor of laws during his visit to the university on September 20, 1983, to address a convocation.

Ladies and gentlemen, distinguished guests, welcome. We are here today to recognize and honor a small, but very special group of Americans: our former prisoners of war and those who are still missing.

Their incarceration often included beatings and torture, starvation, and all forms of emotional and psychological abuse. It also entailed the terrible loneliness of living through lost years, of seeing the days tick away without friends, without loved ones, without family and community.

What has sustained such men and women in their isolation is a question I think all of us have asked ourselves many times. What kept them going when faith waned, as it must have, and questions began to haunt and doubts began to accumulate. We hear the stories of the returned prisoners of World War II and Korea and Vietnam, and we marvel at how they kept going.

I recall that when many of our prisoners returned from Vietnam 11 years ago, a number of them said there were three things that helped them survive captivity and return with honor: faith in God, faith in their fellow prisoners, and faith in their country. By faith; they didn't mean only love -- though they demonstrated that in abundance. They meant a heartfelt belief that they would not be abandoned, that we at home would move mountains to return them safely to us after the war.

Our prisoners of war have been and are the bravest of the brave. They kept a trusting heart, they retained their spirit and their will, and they kept the faith. They trusted us, and that trust did us great honor.

Among us here today are some American prisoners of war. May I say that you are, as the great always are, more than the sum total of yourselves. You're a testament to the strength and the character of the American people. You are a symbol of our spirit. You're an expression of American trust. Your heroism is as old as war itself, as old as names like Andersonville and Los Banos and Camp 5 and the Hanoi Hilton.

Most of those places are gone now or empty, but the silence left in their place surely echoes with the quiet, unheard valor of those who suffered there and clung to the belief that their government and their loved ones would be semper fi -- ``always faithful.'' We honor you, and that honor is unending.

Vietnam. They, too, have shown more than their share of heroism, holding the standard for those who went away and are not yet returned to us, insisting that the world remember and respond, asking all of us to help them in their great effort, never giving up or abandoning hope.

Our administration inherited the challenge of accounting for the missing in January of 1981, two decades after the first man was placed on the missing list in Vietnam and almost three decades after the armistice in Korea. There'd been many obstacles and excuses in that time as to why progress could not be made. We found 3 years ago that the greatest obstacle that we could face and would continue to face was the passage of time.

Government of North Korea for an accounting. We will continue to do so. But I want you to know that we've received some valuable information from some dedicated veterans of that war on possible grave locations of some of their fellow soldiers, and we're acting on this information. If it is confirmed, we will return their remains to their homes and to their loved ones.

The Vietnamese also offered to resume technical-level meetings in August, and we appreciate these actions. We look forward to an acceleration of the process, an acceleration that was pledged to our delegation that traveled to Hanoi in February.

Ann Griffiths [Executive director of the National League of Families of American Prisoners and Missing in Southeast Asia] helped to arrange those negotiations. And, Ann, we appreciate your help and all that you've given to this process.

It was hoped that the truce agreement would bring peace to the Vietnamese people. Instead, they have been at war ever since. And those wars have caused untold human suffering. Today, Vietnam continues to fight in Kampuchea and on its northern border. Nearly 10 years after the end of hostilities, the United States and the Government of Vietnam still have major differences.

But we're encouraged that Vietnam has agreed in principle that our two countries should cooperate on the POW - MIA issue as a separate humanitarian effort. Peaceful cooperation, negotiations with its neighbors in Kampuchea, and resolution of the POW - MIA issue provide the key for ending Vietnam's isolation. Normal relations with the international community can bring an end to the long suffering of the people of Vietnam. And I believe it to be in Vietnam's own interest to choose this path. It's a decision that we would truly welcome.

I'm mindful that I stand here before the families of many of the missing. I'm mindful that you gave your sons and husbands and fathers into the care of our government when they left to fight for our nation. You knew they might die in battle. But you had, and will always have, every right to expect that your government will not abandon those who failed to return.

In this, you, too, showed trust, and I tell you again, your trust will not be in vain. For many years, you stood alone in your quest for answers. Well, today you're not alone. And I tell you from my heart, you will never be alone again.

Across the Nation this week, hundreds of ceremonies are taking place in an outpouring of concern and understanding and solidarity. Balloons are being released across the country; a prayer ministry is ongoing; and the small black and white flag you see over this house flies proudly. All of this is good and fitting.

In January of last year, I said to you that we must fulfill our obligations as a matter of highest national priority. Much has happened since then to give us some hope of progress. It's agonizingly slow for you and for us. But we must not lose faith in each other because of lack of action from the other side.

Two months ago I received the remains of the unknown serviceman of Vietnam. And I said to all the Nation -- and most especially to all of you -- that we write no last chapters; we close no books; we put away no final memories until your questions are answered. Your husbands, fathers, and sons and brothers did their duty by this Nation, and this Nation will do its duty by them.

Buffalo, N.Y. He is also director of the Department of Experimental Therapeutics and institute coordinator for therapeutics. He has been with the institute since 1957 and his duties also include serving as head of the drug development and formulation unit. He is on the staff of the State University of New York as adjunct professor of biochemical pharmacology, School of Pharmacy, and research professor of pharmacology, Department of Pharmacology, School of Medicine.

Today's celebration also brings back a very fond memory. In August 1969, after a long quarantine, the White House honored the Apollo 11 crew with a dinner in California. As Governor, I had the opportunity to introduce the President, and I remember looking out at our dinner guests -- Ambassadors and other representatives from 83 countries, 44 State Governors, 50 Members of the Congress, 14 members of the Cabinet, and the leadership of NASA -- and thinking that the men and women of NASA changed forever our concept of the universe and our relation to it. No longer could there be any mistake about the common heritage and common destiny of all people.

The Apollo program was a noble achievement of the mind, the heart, and spirit -- and the most ambitious and complex program ever undertaken in peacetime. The lunar landings were a dazzling triumph of exploration. The Mayflower did sail on. Gus Grissom, Ed White, Roger Chaffee opened the trail, and we'll always remember their tragic sacrifice. But the program went on, and 12 Americans landed on the Moon.

By the end of the Apollo program, the Columbia, the Endeavor, the America, and the other command modules had returned 27 Apollo astronauts safely from the Moon and its vicinity. And, oh, how our astronauts, with their quiet confidence, superb professionalism, and inner strength, lifted our feelings, our spirits, and our feeling of good will.

Apollo enriched our intellectual and economic life and awakened us to mankind's boundless horizon. We carried a new sense of pride and became more confident that we've only seen the beginning of what a free and a courageous people can do. And, of course, the Apollo program was a supreme test of technology, always at and often beyond the cutting edge.

It opened the door to exciting scientific and commercial opportunities, opportunities like the programmable heart pacemaker which uses technology first developed to send coded instructions to orbiting satellites. Cordless home appliances and surgical instruments grew out of requirements of Apollo's lunar experiments. Even the fabric roof of Pontiac, Michigan's Silver Dome, home of the Detroit Lions, was made from the product developed for NASA's spacesuit.

The era of Apollo helped us build a technological base that was second to none, but we've only touched the edge of possibilities in space. The Apollo experience was only a beginning for America. From Apollo came the shuttle, the world's first true space transportation system, and another victory for the American spirit. The space shuttle opened a new era to pursue the many scientific, educational, industrial, and commercial opportunities of space, and as long as we challenge our imagination and aim high, there's no end to the potential of space.

There's never a time when we can stop moving forward, when we can stop dreaming. And so, this past January, in my State of the Union Address, I challenged our nation to develop a permanently manned space station and to do so within a decade. And I'm very pleased that the Congress has authorized funds enabling NASA to take the first steps in the design of America's space station.

The footprints on the Moon showed us that America's future can be determined by our dreams and our visions. The shuttle and our space station will help make those dreams come true. Our freedom and well-being are tied to new achievements and pushing back new frontiers. We'll push back those frontiers and open new doors to discovery, opportunity, and progress.

I also said in that State of the Union Address that we would soon develop initiatives to help promote private sector investment in space, and we're now embarking on that course. We'll do all we can to ensure that industry has a routine access to space and a suitable, reliable place to work there. And we'll do this without needless regulatory constraints. Eleven successful shuttle flights mean that we're on the verge of a space transportation system that can dependably support space industries.

And the benefits our people can receive from the commercial use of space literally dazzle the imagination. Together we can produce rare medicines with the potential of saving thousands of lives and hundreds of millions of dollars. We can manufacture superchips that improve our competitive position in the world computer market. We can build space observatories enabling scientists to see out to the edge of the universe. And we can produce special alloys and biological materials that benefit greatly from a zero-gravity environment. By accepting the challenge of space we'll carry forward the same courage and indomitable spirit that made us a great nation and that carried our Apollo astronauts to the Moon.

As you know, Dr. George Low, the guiding light behind the Apollo program, passed away earlier this week. Dr. Low began his career as a research scientist and progressed to key leadership positions in the manned space flight program, including manager of the Apollo spacecraft program. He played a leading role in all the Apollo missions and directed the Apollo 11 flight.

Dr. Low also served as Deputy Administrator and Acting Administrator of NASA and was instrumental in the planning of the shuttle program. For the past 8 years, he continued his lifelong efforts to build a better tomorrow while serving as president of Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute.

But I'm sure George Low would be pleased that we're honoring our achievements and the promise of space with a proclamation designating today as ``Space Exploration Day.'' Let us use this occasion as a commitment to our future, to the best of America. And let it be a reminder of America's spirit of exploration, our desire to cross new horizons and to learn more about ourselves and the world around us.

And now I will sign the proclamation. I thank you, and God bless you all. And I can't help but think -- all the things I've been saying here about the progress that's been made -- I, a one-time second lieutenant of horse cavalry, will now sign the space proclamation.

Mr. Armstrong. Mr. President, what a wonderful occasion this is. We have here today a very large fraction of the people who, over the first quarter-century of the space age, conceived, executed, managed, and flew those flights that made their mark on the last quarter of this century.

May I also speak on behalf of these people and say how much we share your belief that the progress made during that first faltering two decades plus of the space age has been important to our country and citizens around the world and how much we appreciate your commitment to continued progress in these areas, as expressed in your State of the Union Address and confirmed here today.

And on behalf of all of us at NASA, my crew here on the stage, may we leave you with a small memento representing the 15th anniversary of this flight, where we carried this American flag to the Moon and returned it.

Space exploration is a quest for knowledge -- knowledge about what lies outside the confines of the Earth's atmosphere and knowledge about the Earth itself. The information obtained adds greatly to the accumulated wisdom of mankind necessary for an understanding of the fundamental processes and origins of life, providing insight into perplexing mysteries of the universe. Because space has no boundaries, the information and benefits from space exploration accrue to mankind's advantage in many different spheres.

States has expanded the frontier of space research; and the fruits of this research have been shared with scientists of other countries, reflecting the peaceful nature of our exploration. For example, the National Aeronautics and Space Administration has sent remotely controlled satellites on missions to measure the winds of Mars, count the rings of Saturn, and record volcanic activity on a moon of Jupiter; weather satellites have intensely studied the Earth's weather patterns; and communications satellites have profoundly changed modern life as events and impacts are known instantly and felt worldwide. Near-Earth satellites inventory our agricultural resources, search for mineral deposits, and measure the ecological impact of forest fires and volcanic eruptions. New products for industry, home, and medical use also have moved into the private sector.

The success of America's Space Shuttle, the most sophisticated space research vehicle yet developed, reaffirms the spirit of confidence, courage, pride, ingenuity, and determination which has characterized the history of America's space program. As the Shuttle continues to demonstrate and expand its capabilities, and as we progress towards a permanently manned space station, the spirit of July 20, 1969, burns brilliantly, leading our journey into the future.

Space exploration is part of the human adventure. Through it, we challenge ourselves to strive and to achieve. By exploring, we are not just finding out more about our physical environment, we are finding out more about the human condition.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 20th day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

Today's request for six debates cannot be taken seriously, however. It is obviously a partisan tactic intended to focus attention on words not actions -- on promises uttered in debates, rather than on proven records.

Both President Reagan and former Vice President Mondale have well-established records. The former Vice President served with President Carter for 4 years. President Reagan has served the Nation for the succeeding 3\1/2\ years. These records provide a telling comparison, a uniquely valuable basis on which the American people can render judgment.

Yesterday we marked the 15th anniversary of the first manned landing on the Moon. We all remember that great moment when Neil Armstrong said, ``Tranquility Base here. The Eagle has landed.'' But that wasn't our last great moment in space. In fact, it's become increasingly clear that most of our great moments are ahead of us.

For 25 years, we approached space with a certain amount of derring-do. It was the last frontier, and we would be its first pioneers. Space seemed like a vast, black desert, but now we're ready to make the desert bloom.

We've learned in the past few years that in the zero gravity of space it's possible to manufacture drugs and pharmaceuticals of a purity much greater than is possible on Earth -- and in much greater quantities.

The zero gravity of space is allowing us in the space shuttle and soon in a manned space station to experiment with new drugs and new cures for diseases. Do you have a friend or relative with diabetes? Some scientists believe that in space it's possible they may be able to produce a cure for diabetes within the next decade.

In space we also find new opportunities for important breakthroughs in cancer research. Now, cancer research is one of those phrases that to some people means we're still thinking and getting nowhere. But a number of scientists now believe that a cure for some types of cancer might be produced in space sometime in the not-too-distant future.

That's not all. In space we can manufacture crystals that have many times the yield and purity of those made on Earth. These will help maintain America's leadership in the computer industry. We can also develop new metals that are lighter and stronger than any we've ever known.

So, the promise and the potential are there. And private industry, private research groups, medical groups, and all sorts of businesses want to get up into space and invest. But it's very costly. It'll involve long-term investment, commitment, and imagination.

For the past year now, our administration has been studying ways to encourage private investment and development. And we've come up with a number of new initiatives to achieve that goal. These initiatives don't involve a special interest treatment of any sort. What they come down to is a policy designed to do away with laws that inadvertantly discriminate against companies that do business in space rather than on the ground.

We also want to make sure these companies are not stymied by needless regulation. For example, the way the law is written now, products made in space might be subject to import tariffs because they weren't made in America. Well, we're going to change that. Another example: Businesses which operate at home receive various kinds of tax incentives. But, again, as the laws are written now, space products companies would not receive those incentives. We'll be looking at that, too.

Also, to encourage research and development, we've been working in partnership with industry and academia to expand basic research opportunities, achieve new breakthroughs, and give U.S. companies making space-age products a boost on the way to the marketplace.

As our country moves into high-tech industries, space will be a big part of the future. As space-related businesses take off, the economy will benefit. Ultimately, it could well mean tens of thousands of jobs, billions of dollars in new foreign trade, and tens of billions of dollars added to the gross national product.

I'm proud of our work in this area, of our ability to recognize what private companies have recognized: that we have cultivated space for the past 25 years, and now is the harvest time. Now is the time to reap the practical fruits of all that daring.

You know, we've been hearing a lot lately from politicians who keep talking about how dark the future is. Well, I think the narrowness of their vision stems from a kind of blindness to the adventure that technology continues to offer us. Those folks have such a strangled sense of possibilities. But in space, the possibilities are endless. It's good news for all mankind and for our country.

As you know, some $61.7 million in urgently needed military assistance for El Salvador was passed by the Congress. The remaining $117 million in military assistance and $134 million in economic assistance have not been acted upon and, at this point, are both urgently needed by the Government of El Salvador, as are the $266 million in economic assistance and $142 million in military assistance requested in February for other countries in Central America.

I know that you'll be meeting with our Secretary of Agriculture, Jack Block -- or have you done that already and am I way behind? He'll probably spin a few of his stories. And Jack was a Greenhand of the Knoxville, Illinois, chapter of FFA. But we both like to put on a blue denim jacket whenever we get the chance, and I remember some -- once, years ago, having an experience.

Now, I'm a rancher -- I've got a ranch. But I had an experience that taught me how little a great many people know about farming. You know, most people just think that you put something in the ground, stand back, and wait for it to grow up -- it's that easy. And I guess maybe I was guilty of some of that, even with a ranch, because with all that space and everything, I got the idea that why shouldn't we have our own eggs for breakfast. So, I put in a battery of chickens and everything, and it was just great. We did have our own eggs. And they only cost me $1.65 apiece.

But all of us, I think, know that God has blessed America with a vast and a fertile land. But it's ingenuity and muscle and sweat that have made our farms the envy of the world. And the last thing our farmers need is government getting in the way and making the job even tougher.

Our record of agricultural productivity is unmatched anywhere in the world. And it didn't come about thanks to double-digit inflation. In the 3 years before 1981, farm costs jumped an outrageous 45 percent, and that was nearly $40 billion, the largest 3-year increase in our history.

Our farmers and our ranchers don't produce the most wholesome and varied foodstuffs known anywhere as a result of 21\1/2\-percent interest rates. When we took office, that's where the prime rate stood. I know that some of our critics have very short memories, but you and I know that a 21\1/2\-percent interest rate is a devastating blow to an industry that spends a fifth of its cash outlays on interest expenses. Well, we've cut them by 40 percent. But don't get me wrong, they're still too high, and we're not going to stop until we get them lower. And one of these days -- and I hope it's very soon -- some people will wake up and realize that not only is inflation firmly under control, but we intend to keep it that way.

And with signs of future price trends pointing to low rates of inflation as far as we can see, I can't help believing that there's no excuse for interest rates being where they are. We can all understand why, if there is inflation, you have to get back in interest if you've loaned money, you have to get back the loss of the value of that money over the period of the loan due to inflation, plus your earnings on it. But the interest rates today are outrageously high, and they cannot have any excuse in inflation for their being at that level.

That didn't happen -- thanks to grain embargoes and protectionism. The grain embargo was a cruel, painful blow, and it was terribly unfair. And that's why one of my first actions on this job was to lift that embargo. And as long as I'm here, our farmers will never again be made the scapegoats for a foreign policy of weakness and indecision.

What we're doing and will continue to do is move in a positive direction, pursuing new export markets and working to remove export barriers. Our trade teams have been continuously on the go in search of new markets. Jack Block has been knocking on doors all over the world, and he's going to keep on knocking.

On another front, we've demonstrated our determination to aggressively maintain exports, including a strong American challenge to the European Community's subsidy program. As a result, the European Community has joined us in serious discussions in an effort to solve some of the problems caused by their subsidized exports.

Now that we've regained our reputation as a reliable supplier, we mean to maintain that reliability and that image. And today, at home, we're hard at work on the 1985 farm bill. The Department of Agriculture will continue to solicit farmers' views on this important bill. So far, they've accepted hundreds of pages of written recommendations and held listening sessions around the country.

Now, you know, I don't get a chance to talk enough to the farm community to suit me. You represent the best in America. Our farmers and ranchers have always honored and lived by the values and traditions that make America great: faith, family, neighbors helping neighbors, hard work, free enterprise, and independence. We can touch the spirit of America in our farm communities. And, again, much is owed to the Future Farmers of America.

FFA is giving more than a fine start to young people like yourselves. By cultivating traditional values, leadership skills, and patriotism, the Future Farmers of America ensure the strength and vitality of our country.

Before I close, I want to say a few words about the thousands of volunteers and private industry sponsors who are reaching out to America's future. FFA has some 14,000 adult teachers and State advisers -- good, caring Americans who are offering a gift that'll last a lifetime: the gift of opportunity. That's all made possible because of the generosity of the private sector. This year business and industry are expected to give over $2 million to provide incentive awards to FFA members. In fact, your State Presidents Conference in Washington wouldn't have been possible without the support of the Chevrolet Motor Division of General Motors. And I'm sure that Bob Burger, general manager of Chevrolet, who is with us today, is very proud of what his organization is doing.

You all deserve to be very proud. With your help, our young people will be ready to meet the challenges before them and turn them into opportunities for their families, their community, and for America.

I have to tell you just one more farm story before I quit. [Laughter] Maybe you know this one about the old boy that had taken over some creek bottom land. And it was rocky and covered with brush. Cleaned the brush; he got rid of all the rocks and hauled them away, and then he planted. And he really had a beautiful garden there. And one day at church he asked the minister to come back with him after the sermon and take a look at what he'd accomplished.

Among the many important issues now facing the Congress is legislation that will help reduce deficits, reward work and thrift, make our cities and neighborhoods safer, and increase personal liberties throughout our land. Legislation that could do these things is already before the Congress. It's been bottled up in the House for months, and in some instances, even years. But something can be done.

First, a constitutional amendment requiring a balanced budget. And we must balance it, not by raising the tax rates of hardworking Americans, but by insisting that government spend no more than it takes in.

IRA's, as spouses working outside the home. Each spouse could save and deduct from taxation up to $2,000 a year. The House had a chance to enact this initiative in a bill I signed just days ago, but they dropped it.

Fourth, a bill allowing tuition tax credits for low- and middle-income parents who pay to send their children to parochial or independent schools while also paying their full share of taxes to support public schools.

Q. Mr. President, your advisers have publicly disagreed with Walter Mondale's assertion that a tax increase will be necessary next year in order to help cut the enormous Federal deficit. While your advisers say you don't want a tax increase next year, they have refused to flatly rule out the possibility. Will you now flatly rule out the possibility of seeking a tax increase next year if you're reelected?

The President. Yes. I have no plans for a tax increase. I believe it would be counterproductive with regard to the present recovery, or expansion. Indeed, I believe that the tax cut that we had is largely responsible for the recovery that we're having.

Maybe they left that for me to say. I know that for Mr. Mondale, he has repeatedly and over the years supported tax increases on any number of occasions. He was opposed to our indexing, which is a provision that would benefit the lower- and middle-income people almost exclusively, because they would be the ones that could -- without indexing -- could be moved up into higher tax brackets by inflation. Those who are already in the high tax brackets can't be moved up.

But I have one thing to say about a tax increase with regard to our problems. The only way that I could see is that -- government is taking a percentage of the gross national product that is higher than the revenues -- the percentage that is being taken in revenues now from that same gross national product. Now, if, after all of our best efforts, if we have gotten government costs down to the point at which we say they cannot go any lower and government still meet its responsibilities and provide the services that are required of it, and that is still then above the percentage taken by taxes, then you would have to look at the tax structure in order to bring that up, to meet that minimum level of government expenditures.

But I think we're a long way from that point with regard to bringing government down to where it could be brought down. We're looking right now -- and we have a task force working on 2,478 recommendations made by the Grace commission of ways in which government can be made more economical and more efficient by simply turning to modern business practices in all of these different ways instead of sticking with some oldtime government practices that are way behind the times.

And I believe that to raise taxes without waiting for what I had just said, I think that to do that would simply open the door to more spending. That's been the pattern of the past, and it is a pattern that -- as a matter of fact, Vice President Mondale has stated that his own belief in it. In '76 he publicly stated on a television show that he had voted time after time to raise taxes on his own constituents. So, he believes in tax increases, and I believe that our goal must be to, wherever possible, reduce the tax burden for our people.

We are -- let me just say, we are -- I've ordered, or asked the Treasury Department to come in before the end of the year with options on tax simplification and ways in which we can broaden the base and thus lead to the ability to further reduce the individuals' rates by broadening the base.

And the fairness of all of this goes without saying. But, also, the simplification -- I think it's practically immoral, the complexity of the tax laws and what we impose on the people with regard to their tax obligation, and I think it can be simplified. And I believe that there will be some options brought to me in December, as I had requested.

Q. Sir, if I may follow up. Do you think that there's room in the Federal budget to cut spending so deeply that you can balance the budget that way? And, if you believe that, is it possible, do you think, to do that without going into entitlements and Social Security, and are you willing to go that deep?

The President. No, what we're looking forward to is the fact that as the recovery takes place, you are going to see some contributing factors to further reducing the deficit. A large part of the deficit, when it went up so far, was because of the depth of the recession. But today there are 7 million more people working than were working in 1980. Now, that's 7 million people that are not a burden on the Government or being taken care of; that's 7 million more people paying taxes.

And so far, we have found repeatedly, and still are finding, that we have overestimated the deficits, and much of the overestimation is our underestimating the revenues that we're going to get. So, I think that there is still a large area in which we can go.

Now, you mentioned Social Security, and that brings to mind something I want to get off my chest right now about Social Security. As you know, in the regulations of Social Security, if the inflation rate falls below 3 percent, there are no more COLA's -- cost-of-living adjustments, or additions -- for people getting Social Security. We, now, in the last 3 months, have been down around 3.2 or .3 with regard to inflation -- the inflation rate. If, when we come to the period, which is the third quarter of the year, and inflation is below 3 percent, we have asked the Social Security recipients to take a 6-month delay in getting their cost-of-living adjustment. And if it is below 3 percent, I am going to ask the Congress to permit the payment of a cost-of-living adjustment to the Social Security recipients.

As for her qualifiers, that our budget practices had victimized the poor and the needy, there is not one single fact or figure to substantiate that charge. I know that's been the talk. I know there's been a lot of demagoguery about that. But all of the programs for the needy that are means-tested programs, they were $47 billion in cost when we came here. They're now around $64 billion.

Everyone that, for food stamps, for example, that has an income or earnings of up to 150 percent of the poverty level is eligible for food stamps. Out at the State -- where the States administer them, programs like AFDC, there the requirement is based on what is the needs level in that particular State. And, therefore, they set the basic benefit according to 130 percent of that.

But we are aiding more people and spending more money on those programs than has ever been spent in history. So, there's no basis for this demagoguery that somehow we have punished and are picking on or trying to get our recovery on the backs of the needy.

Q. I know that Congress doesn't agree with you -- the Congressional Budget Office. But I'd like to ask you -- Ed Rollins said today that the Ferraro nomination to the number two spot could be one of the biggest busts in history. And do you think so, and do you think you'll be hurt?

Mrs. Ferraro's suggestion about whether or not you're a good Christian. Some of your own strategists have said that there's a double standard in the way that she is being covered because she is a woman -- that a male candidate could not get away with that particular suggestion about the President. Do you think that that's fair, that she should be able to suggest that you're not a good Christian and not be criticized for it?

The President. Well, I think that's a decision that all of those who -- of you who do the criticizing has to make. I have never been one to campaign against opponents. I prefer to campaign on our record, what we've done and what we intend to do. And that's the way I'm going to conduct myself in this campaign.

The President. Well, I think this is a decision for those who are working on the strategy of the campaign to deal with, and I'm going to let them do that. And, again, I know that George feels the same way that -- as George, himself, has said, that his campaigning is going to be to try and get the top of the ticket elected, which seems to make some sense.

But let me -- I'd better switch over here for some more. And may I -- of course, and I don't mean to offend with regard to the followups -- and I understand why you had them -- but we've been reduced in the number of questions we get to ask when everybody has a followup. So, ask them both at once.

Q. Sir, Mr. Mondale said in his acceptance speech that 100 days into his Presidency he would stop the secret war against Nicaragua. I assume that you're going to continue your policy down there in that respect. And he also implied, of course, once again, that you, as President, will be trigger-happy and will get us into war. How will you answer both of those?

The President. Well, I'm not trigger-happy, and having known four wars in my lifetime, I'm going to do everything I can. I think the greatest requirement is to strive for peace, and I'm going to do that.

And, again, I think there was some demagoguery in this. But it's my understanding that all of you have been given a report -- has a kind of a green cover -- on the Nicaraguan situation, and it has also been delivered to every Member of the Congress. And I think if -- believe me, I wouldn't ``round file'' those. I'd look at them, because the information is in there that reveals that everything we've said about the Sandinista government is a proven fact. They are trying to destroy El Salvador by providing the rebels there with the wherewithal to do it. They are a totalitarian government.

But you'll also find in there a statement by Ogarkov of the Soviet military. This was prior to our rescue mission in Grenada. But he openly stated that after all the years of only having a base in the Western Hemisphere in Cuba, that now they had bases here in Nicaragua and in Grenada. Well, they don't have one in Grenada anymore. And I think that it is the responsibility of this government to assist the people of Nicaragua in seeing that they don't have one in Nicaragua.

The President. Well, they seem to be opposing everything that we've tried to do, including the aid to El Salvador. As a matter of fact, I've been very worried that their niggardly treatment of El Salvador is such that we might see -- it's comparable to letting El Salvador slowly bleed to death.

Q. Mr. President, you say that you won't raise taxes. Yet people in your administration have said, including Mr. Stockman, [David A. Stockman, Director of the Office of Management and Budget] that if the huge budget deficit is to be reduced at all, that there will probably have to be cuts in some of the major entitlement programs, such as medicare, veterans benefits, farm price supports. Now, you said in an interview earlier this year that you weren't going to discuss things like that in an election year. And I'd like to ask if you don't think that you owe an explanation of what you might cut to the people in an election year?

The President. Well, I've told you about those 2,478 recommendations that have been made. We are going to look at every area where we can cut, but at the same time we're going to do what I said from the very beginning: We are not going to destroy the safety net for those people who, through no fault of their own, must depend on government.

Q. Mr. President, the Polish Government is releasing hundreds of political prisoners in a move that appears to meet one of your conditions for normalizing relations. You have removed some of the sanctions you imposed a couple of years ago. Will you remove others, and if so, when do you think you'll be acting?

The President. Ralph [Ralph Harris, Reuters], we're studying what they've done in their legislation on amnesty very carefully right now. Our purpose from the beginning has been, with regard to the sanctions, that we know that in some instances those sanctions are penalizing not only the Government of Poland, with which we're not in very much sympathy, but the people themselves.

The President. Well, I don't think that in a campaign you can ignore the things that other people or opponents have said and pretend that they'd never said them. I have responded here myself to some charges that -- already this evening -- I have said had no basis in fact or figure, whatsoever.

Now, that I think that we can do. But to ask questions that I thought indicated that how are you going to plan to campaign against someone -- basically the campaign is going to be on behalf of what our own programs are and what we intend for the people.

Q. Mr. President, a few hours ago in the Rose Garden you said that with inflation so low, it's outrageous that interest rates should be so high. Who's doing this? Is it the moneylenders, and is it the bankers? Do you think that they're gouging the American public, and, if so, what are you going to do about it?

The President. No, I've said many times that I think there's a psychology at work. We've had so many recessions since World War II -- seven or eight. I've been saying seven, but someone has indicated that I was wrong by one, that it might be eight, so seven or eight before this one. All of those were cured by the quick fix; all of them used the artificial stimulant of money that raised inflation. And all of them only lasted for a couple of years, maybe three or four, at the most, and then there was another recession following. And this one is different. I believe the basis for this recovery is sound and solid.

And so, I just think that what we're seeing is an unwillingness out there, an inability to believe that we have control of inflation, that it's not going to go back up. And anyone who's in the business of lending money must know, particularly if it's going to be long-term money, that he must get an interest rate -- he or she -- that is going to return the original purchasing power that was loaned, making up for that loss of inflation, then plus the earning power or the earning capacity, the interest that they want as profit on that loan.

Well, right now, if there's still that unwillingness to accept that we have a recovery and that it is one with a declining inflation rate, then the financial market is very jittery. And frankly, I do not see any real reason other than just this kind of lack of trust or confidence that is responsible for the present interest rates.

Q. Mr. President, how do you feel about the fact that throughout the South your political workers are striving to register as new voters affluent people and white people while shunning poor people and black people?

The President. They're not doing that. I want everybody registered that can. I think that democracy, if it's to work, then everybody that's eligible to be a voter should be registered, and they should vote. And I think sometimes the declining number of people voting is because we have satiated them with campaigning over such long periods of time that they finally come to a ho-hum attitude and go their way. But, no, this whole idea that we don't want the votes of certain people in this country is absolutely ridiculous. We do want them.

And if it comes to the affluent, I did think that it was kind of interesting to see some of the people that were onstage at the convention in San Francisco that were talking about their love for the poor and our affinity for the rich, when they themselves were not only rich, but they were selling seats on the floor for $5,000. And you could meet and eat with the candidate or have your picture taken with him for a hundred thousand dollars. And they had some other alternatives in there at ten, twenty, and fifty thousand dollars.

The simple truth of the fact is that for more than a quarter of a century, the Democratic Party has raised the bulk of its contributions from contributions of a hundred dollars and up. And the Republican Party, the so-called country club party, has raised the bulk of its donations from a hundred dollar contributions and down.

The President. We've got a voter registration drive. I think it goes with every campaign. But we're doing it. Now, we're not drawing the line, and we don't have any -- we're not going to shove aside anyone else. We're going to ask everybody that will to register.

Democratic convention, because he might hurt Mr. Mondale politically. But he was there. I'm wondering, it's been 10 years since Mr. Nixon was in the Presidency, and you've sought his advice and appear to think highly of him. I wonder whether you think it might hurt you politically if he were to be at your convention and if he were to campaign with you.

The President. Well, it's a question that I don't have to answer, because he himself has ruled out coming to the convention and has, I believe, publicly stated that he has no intention of participating in a campaign.

The President. I don't think that it would affect trade. But I do know -- and I would rather not get in too deeply to anything, because that is something that will be worked out and negotiated with the new Government of New Zealand. And I have every reason to be optimistic that there won't be any denial to our ships.

The President. Well, as I say, I don't want to get into things or anything that might sound as if I'm pressuring or threatening or anything of the kind. So, let me just say that we're going to do our best to persuade them that it is in their best interests as well as ours for us to continue with our alliance with ANZUS, those countries as we have been.

Q. Mr. President, I'd like to ask you about the leadership situation at the Justice Department, both in terms of reality and symbolism. You have an Attorney General in Mr. Smith who wants to get out; and you have a nominee, Mr. Meese, who wants to get in, but the Republican Senate won't let him in. Is that the most effective and efficient way to run the Department of Justice? Does there come a time when you want Mr. Meese to withdraw his nomination?

The President. Right now there is an investigation going on at Mr. Meese's request, and until we know the results of that investigation, I don't think that there's any answer I could give to that. He asked for that in response to the furor that was raised about him.

I have every confidence in him, and I'm appreciative of the fact that Attorney General Smith wanted very much to return to private life but has agreed that he will stay as long as this situation prevails and until it is resolved. And I'm confident that, myself, that we're going to find out that Mr. Meese is guilty of no wrongdoing.

Q. In regard to another one of your nominations, the Senate late this afternoon voted 73 to 19 to request that you withdraw the nomination of Anne Burford to serve on an environmental advisory committee. That includes more than 30 Republicans. Will you take that direction?

The President. No, I won't. Ms. Burford was called before a House committee when she was head of the EPA, and she obeyed the instructions that we gave her. The House committee was trying to obtain documents, and we exercised executive privilege on the ruling of the Justice Department that those documents were part of investigation reports and that if there was any evidence brought up that would lead to legal action against anyone they could be compromised by opening them up to the Congress.

So, she obeyed her instructions, and there was not one single allegation that was proved in any way that stood up under all the shouting and the furor that went on. And therefore, I am standing by the appointment that I have made. And I am pleased that the resolution that was passed was nonbinding.

Q. In regard to that, your critics have come out very strongly recently in criticism of your environmental policies. Do you see the Anne Burford appointment as a liability to you during this election year?

The President. And in that regard, once again, I ask all of you of an investigative nature to take a look at what our record is with regard to environmentalism. There is not one fact substantiating many of the charges that had been made.

We have continued doing what we came here to do -- clean air and clean water, and both are cleaner than they've been for a long, long time. We have refurbished and reestablished the health and safety factors of the parks and are now going to return to adding territory or land to the park areas. We have vastly increased the wilderness lands.

Italian dinner at a Catholic church named for the patron saint of women in a New York City suburb on Thursday would indicate that you're at least a bit concerned about the impact of Geraldine Ferraro on the election. Could you assess for us your views on what the impact of a woman on the Democratic ticket will be?

The President. Well, no, I think this is just another step forward in the recognition of the new place of women that has been long overdue. I think it is significant. I think it was significant when a woman took her place -- Sandra Day O'Connor -- on the Supreme Court; when we had three women on our Cabinet; and when we have some 1,600 in very responsible positions, Presidential appointees, in our administration.

The President. Glad you asked that. [Laughter] I was speaking to a room full -- the dining room, as a matter of fact -- of Republican women, all of whom were -- some were candidates, but the bulk of them were elected government officials at various levels of government -- Republican women elected officials from all over the United States. And in talking about a subject that I thought would be of interest to them, I was delivering a talk that had been put down on paper many days before Ms. Ferraro was spoken of as a nominee or chosen.

And I was talking about my own personal experience with meeting Margaret Thatcher when I was a Governor and she was the newly chosen head of the Conservative Party in England, which is when we first met there. And I was talking about how she had been chosen by the Conservative Party to be their leader; obviously on the basis that she was the best qualified person in the party to have that job. And I used the phrase, I said there was no tokenism or symbolism connected with it. I was talking about Margaret Thatcher and the Conservative Party of England; I didn't have Ms. Ferraro in mind and certainly not when I put that down on paper.

I'll take up where the Vice President left off on one point: At their convention, the leadership of the Democratic Party gave Texas the back of their hand. Well, we've come to give you a message from our heart: We care about Texas. We care about your citizens and the values that you all live for. But rather than saying ``your,'' maybe I should be saying ``our,'' for you've made me feel at least like an adopted son.

And you've also given me and the country one of your finest. Believe me, Texas has no more loyal son than my partner, George Bush. And I use that term, ``partner,'' advisedly. With all due respect to those who have served in that office before, I don't believe there has ever been a Vice President that has been so involved at the very top level in all that is going on in our country and in the decisions that are being made. He is untiring, totally faithful, and I am so grateful for what he brings on the basis of his experience as a Congressman, his experience as the Director of the CIA, as our Ambassador to the United Nations, and as our representative to the Republic of China. I just happen to think he's the best Vice President we've ever had.

He joined ours. But then, where he didn't need to do this, having just been returned to office, he went back to the voters of his district to give them a chance to register approval or disapproval on the action he'd taken. And thank heaven -- they registered approval.

Democrat. And I cast it for Franklin Delano Roosevelt in 1932. He ran on a platform to reduce the Federal budget by 25 percent, to eliminate useless boards, commissions, agencies, and bureaus, and restore the autonomy of State and local governments that he said had been unjustly seized by the Federal Government. Ask yourselves which party could run on that platform today?

The President. Certainly not those we heard and saw in San Francisco. But then, with all respect to millions of fine, patriotic citizens who are Democrats in this country today, let us ask, were those people in San Francisco truly representative of those millions of rank-and-file Democrats across this land?

The President. To those of you who are still Democrats -- and I know there must be many here -- and who might share my belief that government should not plunder more of our earnings, should not seize greater power over our lives, but should work to ensure the ultimate in individual freedom consistent with an orderly society, then I extend an invitation to you, and to millions of others: Come where you will be welcome and appreciated. Join George Bush and Phil Gramm and me, and together we'll make history on November 6th, 1984.

You know, when I heard some of the things that were being said last week in San Francisco -- and I didn't watch all the convention -- [laughter] -- there's some punishment you just don't deserve. [Laughter] But from what I did hear, and then maybe the next day read about, I couldn't help but think that maybe the fog is so thick out there that it was getting inside their heads.

I'm sorry they seem to see only misery and feel only fear and never stop pining for the days of tax and tax and spend and spend. They offer a three-point program: Fear the future, ignore the present, and forget the past.

But they offer a three-point program -- as I said -- forget the future, ignore the present, and forget the past. I've found a way to put their pessimism to constructive use. It's a sure-fire diet that you can use to lose weight. And there's only one rule: You only eat on the days the pessimists say something good about America.

Point one: Those responsible for punishing America with record inflation, record interest rates, record tax increases, credit controls, farm embargoes, gas lines, no growth at home, weakness abroad, and phony excuses about malaise are the last people who should give sermonettes about misery, unfairness, and compassion.

Point two: Today they offer new realism. Well, forgive me, but their new realism seems to begin right where their old ideas left off: billions in new spending; higher taxes on small business, family farms, and every other working family. And we must answer with a firm unequivocal no.

We'll campaign on our record -- and, yes, on theirs as well -- and for ideas we believe will bring new hope to all Americans. We intend to represent only one special interest group -- you, the people.

Let me pose the question they never got around to in San Francisco. Which major industrial nation today has the strongest currency; the strongest economic growth -- 7\1/2\ percent for the last quarter -- inflation of only 3 -- well, it's only been 3.3 percent for the last 3 months; labor force participation at an all-time high; fastest rate of job creation, as you've just been told. There are 7 million more people employed in the United States today than were working in 1980.

Last year there were a record 600,000 business incorporations, its fastest growth in business investment in 30 years; the largest increase in real after-tax personal income since 1973; and leadership in developing jobs and markets for the future in science and high technology, both on Earth and in outer space.

I'm sorry the other side still doesn't know any of this, but then they never have understood the economy. They still think that GNP stands for gross national promises. [Laughter] They've never understood that incentives are the driving force of growth and human progress, that if we work or save more than before, our reward will be greater than it was, and we'll be challenged to lead more productive, worthy lives. They don't understand, but America does; and I believe that challenge will be the choice of a new generation.

Austin with your great commitment to technological leadership. But we mustn't stop until we simplify the entire tax system, until we make taxes more fair, easier to understand, and most important, until we bring your personal tax rates further down; because if we bring them down enough, the underground economy will shrink, the world will beat a path to our door, and no one will be able to hold America back. So, please, don't let them bury the American dream in their graveyard of gloom and envy.

The President. I've always been told that if you want to make a Texan's neck swell, you tell him where to line up and what to think. Well, this election offers the sharpest, most important choice in modern times -- greater freedom or coercion.

Last night I asked the leadership of the Democratic Party to support six key measures for our future -- legislation that will benefit all Americans, legislation that's been bottled up by a do-nothing House leadership. For example, they seek to reduce deficits, but the futile way -- by raising taxes on America's families.

Fairness for families means a spouse working in the home would enjoy the same individual retirement rights, IRA's, as a spouse working outside the home. Each should be able to save and exclude from taxation up to $2,000 a year. We'd like that bill passed now.

You know, it's fine to get way out there in the nether regions -- out in the abstract someplace -- and talk about our great national family. But how about a little help for the real families who sustain our neighborhoods, our churches, and our schools? The forgotten Americans in all those years of their domination have been those parents who sit around a table at night deciding how to pay their bills and put their kids through school. How about a little compassion for them, too?

Then there's our bill offering incentives for investment in 75 enterprise zones that would bring jobs and growth and hope for people in inner cities and in other distressed regions. But here's the rub again. Enterprise zones have been blocked for 2 years by the same people who gave those fine speeches about opportunity and fairness. Well, do they want to end the welfare bondage or they just want to filibuster forever about the nice things they'll do someday, somewhere, somehow, for somebody?

We think it's not asking too much that Americans be able to take a walk after dark without having to cringe in fear. We have a strong anticrime proposal that would provide new restrictions on bail, tougher sentencing, and stricter enforcement of drug trafficking laws. Lives are at stake. So, if we still can't get a vote on that, maybe it's time to move some politicians out of office to get the criminals off the streets.

And finally, last night I asked the House to pass the equal-access bill. It would permit religious student groups the same freedom that other student groups now have to meet in public high schools in their vacant rooms during off-hours. This is -- let me repeat -- this is in nonschool hours. I believe the God who blessed this land of ours never deserved to be expelled from our schools in the first place.

Well, I'm pleased to give you some good news, and just received -- take out your pens, members of the press -- [laughter] -- today I have just been informed the House of Representatives finally passed, despite stubborn resistance by its liberal leaders, the equal-access bill, 337 to 77. But let's make one thing plain: While this long-overdue action is welcome, it's certainly not sufficient. They should put their new realism to work and take action on each of those other five requests that they've bottled up for so long; and together we will make America great.

And let me just suggest to you the steps that we've taken, the steps we've taken to reverse years of neglecting our military security -- shameful neglect -- have not made America less secure; the steps we've taken have made us more secure. If the sons and daughters of this nation can risk their lives to protect our freedom in a dangerous world, then we have a moral obligation to give them, in the way of protection, the finest we can in weaponry, in machinery.

I want to tell you something. When you see one of those young men or women out on the street in uniform, if you haven't done it already, give them a smile and maybe ask them where they're from and tell them, maybe, you're a little grateful for what they're doing. I have to tell you that nothing in this job has made me more proud than the young men and women who are representing our country in uniform. They have the highest level of intelligence and education of any who have ever represented our country in the past in uniform. They are the best trained. They have an esprit de corps that just won't stop.

And I know -- I was an officer once, and I know that in civilian clothes you're not supposed to salute. But I also know that if I'm Commander in Chief and when they started throwing those highballs at me, I'm going to salute 'em back.

Now, this is an interesting time in our national life. Last week the Democrats picked their nominees. The election year has begun now that both sides have their tickets. I've been in Georgia and in the South a number of times since I was elected President; I'll be back a number of times.

But I want you to know something. The other party apparently thinks the South just isn't important this year; it just doesn't deserve much attention. Well, I'll tell you how George Bush and I feel about the South. We won't write it off; we won't kiss it off, or try to buy it off. The South is worth fighting for; the South is worth listening to.

The South is America at its best. You know those folks who are writing off the South out there in the fog in San Francisco, they were busy talking and filling the air with eloquent-sounding words; as a matter of fact, big clouds of words. But a lot of those words contained what Winston Churchill called ``terminological inexactitude.'' [Laughter] That's a nice way of saying they said a few things that weren't true.

According to the other party, there's nothing to hope for but despair, and we have nothing in store but fear itself. In fact, I thought it sounded a little bit like one of those disaster or horror movies in which they picked me to play the monster. [Laughter] Do you get the feeling -- I don't know whether you did or not, but do you get the feeling that they don't like me very much?

Well, it was great dramatic rhetoric, but the fog has cleared, and this is a good time to look at the record, to look at the facts. Now, the plain truth is that 4 years ago our economy was in a shambles. Inflation, their disease, has come like a thief in the night to rob our savings, rob our earnings, and take the bread off our tables.

Four years ago a tyrant held our diplomats hostage. Four years ago our defense had deteriorated to the point where many of our ships couldn't leave port. Many of our aircraft were so old that they'd been flown by the fathers of the pilots who are now flying them. And 4 years ago the Soviets took the free nation of Afghanistan for their own.

American prestige seemed like a memory. Our standing in the world had fallen. Our government was talking about a malaise. You remember that talk, and you were the ones that were supposed to be having the malaise.

So, if you'll join me, I'll take the blame for inflation falling by almost two-thirds, as you've been told. And I guess that makes us responsible for the economy expanding and the country growing and building again. And it's our fault that the prime interest rate fell from that 21\1/2\ percent, our defenses are stronger, that we cut taxes for every American so that everyone can keep more of the money they earn and spend it on their children and their families and their neighborhoods.

The plain truth, the economy -- or the recovery is real. It's based on commonsense fact: that if you allow the people to keep the fruits of their labor, then they'll work hard and make money and save money and invest money. They have an incentive. But kill that incentive, and you kill economic expansion. And that's precisely what the opponents would do.

They talk about the budget deficits. But they don't tell you that the budget problem is a spending problem. They don't tell you that all spending originates in the Congress, which has been controlled by the Democratic Party for 46 of the past 50 years.

They don't want to control their spending. They want to keep spending and raise your taxes so they can keep on spending. And that's what they say they'll do. And believe me, of all the promises they made, that's the one they'll deliver on if you give them a chance.

I want to interject something here. The other night in the press conference, I made a statement with regard to the pledge at the convention about their candidate would promise he would raise taxes. And he means it. He's never missed a vote on raising taxes. But then I gave my own position, which is that, no, we have no plans and will not raise taxes. But I added one qualifier, and it seems to be presently being distorted. And let me make it plain what I said.

They have suggested that I put an ``if'' in there and said, ``Well, if, you know, we get all the spending cuts that we can and still we haven't gotten the balance between taxes and spending together, why then we'll have to look at the tax.'' That isn't what I said. What I said was, if and when we bring government spending down to where we have a government that can fulfill its responsibilities and do those things the people require of government, and then, at that bottom level, that still is above what our tax system is bringing in in revenues, yes, then we would have to look and make those two balance so that we would be spending within our means. But we're a long way from getting down to that bottom line of what is absolutely necessary for government's expenses.

It's kind of interesting to note that in a half dozen years before this administration came here, taxes in the United States were tripled and the deficits totaled $650 billion. Raising taxes just gives them a license to keep on with their deficit spending.

The plain truth is, our administration is on the right track. We've turned away from failed ideas about a huge government taking your money and redistributing it. We've moved on to ideas that work. The plain truth is that we're finally making our defense system stronger, and for only one reason, because weakness invites trouble and strength deters it. And yet, in spite of all of their rhetoric about our gigantic deficit-causing defense spending, our defense budget is lower than the one that their President in 1980 had projected for this particular time -- because Presidents must project about 5 years ahead under the law as to what they think's going to happen. We're spending less than they said they were going to spend on defense and doing a better job of it.

There's a mood, a general feeling that patriotism isn't something to be embarrassed about, but something to be proud of. There's a mood in the country, a general feeling that once again, there's a lot to be hopeful about. Our optimism has once again been turned loose. And all of us recognize that these people who keep talking about the age of limits, are really talking about their own limitations, not America's.

I couldn't be addressing a crowd in this place, and of this number, without realizing that I must be speaking to a great many Democrats who are here. But your Democrat Party has been a great party. I was a Democrat, too. And I supported and campaigned for Franklin Roosevelt and Harry Truman, because I felt they were for a strong America, a fair and decent America that wouldn't shrink from its responsibilities in the world and wouldn't retreat or run from the challenges of the times.

I was a Democrat longer than I have presently been a Republican. But I think that the current leadership of the Democratic Party, the leadership that we saw last week in San Francisco -- I think their instructions for getting to the convention were: Go west to San Francisco, and then turn left.

They've gone so far left that they've left the mainstream. And I know that those of you who still are Democrats, or who have been, I know that you've been thinking about these things, and you're aware of them, also. So, I want to put out my hand, and let you know that if you're starting to feel that your party has abandoned you, then we're holding out a hand and asking for your continuing help. We can't do it without you.

My friends, we want the support of every group, of every individual in this country, and we're going to fight for it from one end of this country to the other. We're going to ask you to help us build a new America, a freer nation. We're going to barnstorm this country. We're going to get out on the stump out there, and from stump to stump, we're going to tell the plain truth. We believe in freedom. We believe in America.

This election is about leadership. It's about what we want for our children -- a free nation, or more bondage of the tax-and-tax and spend-and-spend variety, a strong nation that is deeply proud of the ideals that it presents to the world, or a nation that begs on its knees for kindness from tyrants?

We want a free nation where our children can grow and become anything they want to be, or, on the other hand, those who want a tired place where a big government far away will take everything they work hard for.

We all want a great nation to be greater, a nation of free and equal Americans who stand together in the glow of fellowship and in the light of God. That's the country I'm working for, and that's the road that we want to walk down. And I say to you: Come on and walk down the road with me.

This is a special day for us, and already you've given us many gifts. As we flew into Newark, we saw the lovely steeples of Elizabeth. It almost seemed that they were reaching up to say, ``Come over to see us.'' And you do make us feel that welcome.

Your devotion to your city makes me understand why you say, ``Elizabeth is a proud lady.'' You know, so often when people talk of America's heartland, they speak of the Middle West or the Great Plains, and certainly those regions are deserving of that description. But there's another heartland in America -- a heartland of the streets; a kind of place that welcomes tremendous numbers of people -- Italians, Cubans, Puerto Ricans, Portuguese, blacks, Irish, Polish-Americans, and all the others here that the mayor mentioned; the kind of a place where more than 30 languages are spoken in an excellent school system, and they're proud of it. It's the kind of place that doesn't subtract from America's strength, but adds to it by bringing us new dreams, filling us with new strength, and enriching the values, traditions, and patriotism that we share. It's a place like Elizabeth, New Jersey, and you be proud of what you give America.

You know, somewhere in the history of every American family is a person or persons who became American not by birth, but by choice. I've always believed that ours is a chosen land, that it was placed here by some divine providence, placed here between the two oceans to be sought out and found by people from every corner of the Earth, people who had a special love for freedom and the courage to uproot themselves and leave their homelands and friends and to come here to create something new in all the history of mankind, a country where man is not beholden to government; government is beholden to man.

They came for freedom and opportunity. And they seized both with such a vengeance that no matter how often they fell down, they kept picking themselves up until they could leave a better life for their loved ones. And their examples of courage, multiplied millions of times over, created the greatest success story the world has ever known.

But 4 years ago we knew that dream was being stolen from us. Interest rates were rising to record thresholds of pain. Inflation had come like a thief in the night -- as you've already been told here today -- to rob us of our earnings, our savings, and to take the bread off our tables. And all this was done, mind you, under the guise of compassion and fairness. Well, it's true that those policies were fair in one sense; they didn't discriminate. They made everybody miserable.

But did they have the courage to rein in a government that was growing by 17 percent a year in cost? No. In fact, they said it was your fault. Do you remember when they told you that you suffered from a malaise? They said the problem wasn't government spending too much; the problem was that you weren't being taxed enough. Well, that was nonsense then, and it's nonsense today.

And then I went on to explain that there could be one situation that would defeat anyone in that regard. And since then, that has been distorted, and several voices have been raised, the latest one in Washington, to say that I was really waffling and holding the door open, saying, ``Well, I won't raise taxes -- well, I will.'' No.

What I said was -- and I think you'd all have to agree with the common sense of this -- if, when we have gotten government spending in Washington down to the point that it is the lowest that it can be reduced to and still allow the government to provide the services that government is responsible for to the people of this country, and then it should turn out that the percentage to maintain that minimum level is more of the gross national product than the percentage presently being taken in taxes, obviously, you would have to readjust. But that is only if you have gotten government down to where it cannot be reduced one more penny and perform those services.

It was not saying that, ``Well, if I get some deductions but can't get all I want -- '' No, if you raise taxes before you've gotten government down to that point, you will never get rid of government deficits and government spending.

Four years ago, a tyrant held our diplomats hostage. Our defenses had deteriorated to where many of our ships couldn't leave port. Many of our aircraft were so old that they'd been flown by the fathers of the current flyers, pilots of those machines.

Four years ago, the Soviets invaded the free nation of Afghanistan, the latest in the series of countries to fall to communism in that decade. The former Vice President said, ``I cannot understand; it just baffles me, why the Soviets these last few years have behaved as they have.'' He didn't understand. But the American people did.

You reminded Washington that we're a government of, by, and for the people; not the other way around. And you said it's time to put earnings back in the hands of the people, time to put trust back in the hands of the people, and time to put America back in the hands of the people.

Inflation has fallen from 12.6 percent in June of 1980 to under 4 percent; as a matter of fact, 3.3 percent for the last 3 months. And in that same period of time the Producers' Price Index, which indicates what the inflation rate's going to be down the road, has been zero for that period of time.

Now America's leading the world with the most powerful economic expansion in peacetime history. Nearly 7 million jobs have been created in the last 18 or 19 months. Investment is rising at the fastest rate in 30 years. And after-tax personal income is up by the sharpest amount since 1973. It's all our fault, and we'll take the blame.

The misery index and the inflation rate to the -- you know, you add the inflation rate to the unemployment rate. You'll remember that the previous administration, they did that in 1976. They said that Jerry Ford's misery rate, unemployment plus inflation, was 12\1/2\, and that was disgraceful and that no man had a right to seek reelection with a misery rate of that size. Well, it was 20 percent the day I walked into the Oval Office, and now it's only 10.3 percent, and that's our fault, again.

And please be patient, I have to take the responsibility for something else. Today, the young men and women who protect our freedom are better educated, have a higher percentage of high school graduates than any military force in our nation's history. They are better paid. They are better equipped. They are better trained than 4 years ago. They're keeping the peace and our freedoms more secure.

Look around the world, in the past 4 years, not a single country has fallen to communism, and that in itself makes it a safer world. But none have fallen to communism, but one nation has been set free from the clutches of Fidel Castro. I'm talking about Grenada. And we'll take the responsibility for that one, too.

Well, listen, when American soldiers and sailors and marines arrived in Grenada, thousands of people lined the streets to cheer and shower them with gratitude. Yet our critics in San Francisco were upset, angry, and ashamed. Well, I don't believe that our medical students who were getting an education there in the medical school in Grenada were upset to see those Army Rangers coming. And I don't believe their parents were upset to see them home safe again.

And they told me, one group, of how they were lying under the beds in their dormitory with the bullets coming through the building and the gunfight. And then they heard an American voice, identified himself as a sergeant in the Rangers. And he told them, ``Come on out.'' And they took them to the helicopters to get them out of there. And they -- these students told me the Rangers put themselves between them and where the firing was coming from, in order to get them to the helicopters. I don't believe the people of New Jersey are the least bit ashamed of America standing up for human freedom.

Well, this is 1984, and we might remember George Orwell's warning about '84, that ``. . . if thought corrupts language, language can also corrupt thought.'' Others may try to fool the public; our campaign will be one of clear thinking and honest talk with the American people. We will never accuse you of greed when you work to earn extra income to spend it the way you want to.

And while it's fine to talk in abstract concerns -- or about their concern for our great national family, how about a little help for the real families who support our churches, our neighborhoods, and our schools? The parents who sit around the table at night deciding how to pay their bills and put the kids through school -- how about a little compassion for them, too?

So, how about a vote on tuition tax credits -- a vote to help low- and middle-income parents paying to send their children to parochial or independent schools while they also pay their full share of taxes to support the public schools?

And fairness for families means a spouse working in the home should enjoy the same individual retirement right,IRA's, as a spouse working outside the home. Each spouse should be able to save and deduct from taxation up to $2,000 a year, and we'd like that bill passed now.

You know, when I see those who helped create a national crisis systematically resisting the good we're now trying to do, I'm reminded of a comment by a great leader. He said, ``Those . . . who are frightened by boldness and cowed by the necessity for making decisions, complain that all we have done is unnecessary and subject to great risks. Now that these people are coming out of their storm cellars, they forget there ever was a storm.'' Well, those words were spoken about the Great Depression of the thirties; they were spoken by President Franklin Delano Roosevelt in the fall of 1934.

I know there are many among you who are old enough to remember it firsthand, as I do, what we struggled through together in that Great Depression. And that's why I want to ask you something important -- a question you may have heard before. Tell me, are you better off than you were 4 years ago?

Now, the other side has a plan for your future. They call it new realism. But it would seem to begin right where their old ideas left off -- higher and higher taxes on your families. Now, is that what your idea of the American dream is all about?

The President. Well, we have a different vision. We must not stop until we simplify the entire tax system; until we make your taxes more fair, easier to understand; and most important, until we have a reform that brings your personal tax rates further down. And those incentives -- with those incentives must come a long overdue reform still bottled up by the House leadership -- a constitutional amendment mandating a balanced Federal budget, government spending no more than it takes in.

Dunn has reduced tax rates in 3 of the last 6 years. Growth has increased; jobs have increased; revenues have increased. And you've always had a balanced budget, because by law you can spend no more than 5 percent above the previous year's budget. It makes sense.

The President. No. Thank you very much. I'll have an answer in a minute for that, but I just wanted to tell you that despite more than 2 years of waiting, despite support from a majority of Democrates and Republicans, led by your own fighting Matt Rinaldo, the House leadership has blocked enterprise zones from coming to a vote, even though their own membership would vote for it if they would allow them to.

In the name of America, stop spreading bondage, and let's start spreading freedom. We can preserve the dream of America, but we must not waste the genius of one mind, the strength of one body, or the spirit of one soul. We need all our people, men and women, young and old, individuals of every race, to be happy, healthy, and whole. And that's what our job is all about.

Carmel, you show a lot of caring and involvement and allegiance. And these are the things by which our nation lives. God makes the world turn on its axis and keeps the Sun and the stars in place, but you are the people who keep America going, who make America happen every day.

I'm only the head of a civil government, a secular authority. It's probably true that politics is the prose of a culture, but religion is its poetry. Governments are passing things in the long history of the world, but faith and belief endure forever.

You know these things, of course. You show them in your actions as you honor your God, as you work in your parish, and as you carry the image of a saint through the streets. In doing these things, in adding to the religious and cultural life of our nation, you replenish our country. You reflect the values that help our nation flourish. And so, I think it's appropriate for me, as the head of a civil government, to simply say, thank you for being what you are -- the backbone and the best.

And I could talk about how there's a resurgence of pride in our country, a reemergence of the knowledge that we live in a good and decent place, and we represent good and decent things in the world. And once again our young people know that, and respond to it, and are proud of it.

Now, it's true that when you're out on the campaign trail and you start to get very eloquent about all the wonderful things you've accomplished, you can get yourself in trouble. I don't know if you ever heard the story about Teddy Roosevelt. And no matter what you may have heard, he did not tell me this story himself. [Laughter] About how once in a campaign he was giving a terrific old stemwinder of a speech and a heckler interrupted him very rudely.

Now, this is a fine and a happy evening, but just for a moment I want to be serious here. There are great issues at stake in this election, deeply serious issues. They have to do with how we live and how we care for each other.

Here's the first question: Why do some who claim to represent the party of compassion feel no compassion whatsoever for the most helpless among us -- the unborn? How can they parade down the street wearing compassion as if it were a cloak made of neon and they have no compassion for the most helpless of God's creatures?

Question two: Why did those who claim to represent the middle class take such high moral offense at the idea of giving the middle class a break by giving them tuition tax credits to help them bear the cost of sending their children to a parochial or independent school and then those children -- or those parents who pay for that pay taxes, their full amount of taxes to support the public schools? They ask no help in bearing the extra cost they incur, and isn't it fair, just bottom-line fair to help them with a tax credit? Now, why is the other side so opposed to giving the middle class that simple and compassionate help?

And question three: How can the leadership on the other side, as they did last week, open each session of their great convention with an injunction to the Lord and end each session with a prayer to God and still insist on denying that right to a child in a public school who might want to do that?

The issue was something that was illustrated in one of our States recently when some children, doing what they did at home, in the school cafeteria wanted to bow their heads and give thanks, say grace before they ate. And they were told they could not do it, and a court upheld the school authorities in saying that they couldn't do that. This was just simply the voluntary right of any individual who felt the urge and the need to be able to pray and shouldn't be denied because he was in a so-called public building.

Thankfully, a majority of Republicans and Democrats finally rose up in defiance yesterday and passed the equal-access bill. Now, by what logic do they resist? If they're so opposed to children witnessing prayer, why did they condone such a big show of it last week? I grant you they need prayer, but what do you suppose they were trying to prove or hide?

He was forced to stand in the brutal sun, this man who'd languished so long in a hospital bed after being shot. He was forced to stand in the brutal sun as Daniel Ortega, the leader of the Sandinista government, delivered a long and hate-filled diatribe against the West. Then he was booed and jeered by the Sandinistas when he tried to speak. The Sandinistas tried to humiliate His Holiness.

They didn't know that it's not possible to humiliate that kind of greatness. When they booed him and jeered him, he said, ``Silencio'' -- silence -- and they were silenced by the sheer force of his majesty.

Two weeks ago Pope John Paul II stood on the balcony overlooking St. Peter's Square, and he said that the Sandinista government is oppressing the Catholic Church of Nicaragua. He deplored the arrest and deportation of priests. He spoke out to protect the Catholic Archbishop of Managua against repeated pressure from the Sandinistas who, the Archbishop has charged, are trying to abolish the Church of Rome and replace it with a so-called popular church.

Why can't those who claim to represent the most enlightened opinion on Central America come to grips with what is happening there? Why can't they admit that the Sandinistas are only totalitarian thugs who are squelching freedom in their country, including the freedom of religion?

Those are just four questions. I ask you to ponder about them, think about them this evening or tomorrow, and to give them long thought. Three questions -- these questions, these four questions help define the differences between my administration and the other side. They help define what the issues this year are about. You can come to some hard truths as you answer these questions.

And if you have any doubt -- and I don't think you do -- about where we stand: We are for life and against abortion. We are for prayer in the schools. We are for tuition tax credits. And in Central America, we're rather more inclined to listen to the testimony of His Holiness the Pope than the claims of Communist Sandinistas.

And I'll let you in on something else I've been thinking about. I want to serve another 4 years as your President. I make no bones about it. And there's some very serious reasons for it, but there's one I haven't talked about. I've been thinking about it now and then at night, or in a spare moment, when I'm summing up a day or thinking about the next one.

I've been thinking that I feel something in common with Franklin Delano Roosevelt, the much-admired President of my youth -- I cast my first vote for President in 1932 for him -- and John Kennedy, that bright spirit, and Teddy Roosevelt and Harry Truman. They all loved the Presidency, loved the bully pulpit of the office, loved looking out for the interests of our country.

States Coast Guard was originally organized as ``a fleet of cutters'' to stop illegal smuggling from the sea and collect revenue due on goods coming to the young Nation. Later called the Revenue Cutter Service, this small organization combined with the Life Saving Service in 1915 and assumed its now famous name -- the United States Coast Guard.

Today, Coast Guard contributions to our Nation in the areas of national defense, maritime law enforcement, search and rescue, aids to navigation, merchant marine safety, environmental protection, ports and waterway safety, and boating safety have become a benchmark by which professional maritime excellence is judged.

This Nation relies heavily on the readiness of the Coast Guard's active duty, reserve, and civilian employees and the voluntary contribution of the 40,000 members of the Coast Guard Auxiliary to rescue victims, protect our environment, and defend this Nation, as the Coast Guard has done in every major conflict in which the United States has been involved.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-seventh day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

Throughout our history, the American spirit has been distinguished by the ready willingness of neighbors to join together and help one another. The tradition of voluntary community service is as important today as it was in the founding years of our country.

Our Nation's volunteer firefighters carry on this truly American tradition of citizen response for the common good. Like the Minutemen of our early years, these volunteers are ready to respond on short notice to help fellow citizens in need. Volunteer firefighters protect our lives, our families, and the economic life of our communities from the threat of destructive fire, often at great personal sacrifice. But these volunteers are more than firefighters. In many communities, they respond to a wide range of natural and technological emergencies.

These trained and organized volunteers, our neighbors, are a valuable national resource. It is fitting and proper that a grateful Nation should recognize the vital contributions of the one million men and women who serve in our Nation's volunteer fire and rescue companies and departments.

Soviet proposal for discussions in Vienna in September without preconditions. Our preparations are continuing vigorously, and we expect to be in Vienna. We do not believe that such discussions are impossible, and we are continuing to deal with this subject in private diplomatic channels.

The United States finds it very disturbing that the Soviets portray the United States as responsible for the breakdown of the nuclear negotiations in Geneva when the world knows the Soviets walked out of those discussions. Already existing nuclear systems deserve our most urgent attention. If the Soviets do not choose to listen to our views on this subject, they need not, but for us and for mankind, this subject is too important to ignore. This U.S. approach does not represent a precondition. We will take whatever the Soviets say on antisatellite weapons seriously and respond constructively. We simply point out that we wish to restore exchanges on the subject of offensive nuclear arms. The world has a right to expect the U.S.S.R. and the United States to maintain such discussions.

Patent applicants from States bound by chapter II are accorded extended time limits before having to initiate foreign patent processing, which permits a more thorough patent protection and commercial evaluation of the products involved.

The Treaty consists of two substantive chapters. Chapter I affords applicants a period of 20 months from the priority date of the international application to undertake national patent processing. During this period, applicants obtain an international search report to help them decide whether to proceed with patent prosecution.

Chapter II is optional and gives applicants additional time and an international preliminary examination report, thereby allowing them to become even more selective of the countries in which they ultimately decide to proceed.

The United States made a reservation concerning chapter II in 1975, primarily because of then-prevailing opinion that divergent patent examining methods and systems of other potential member countries made adherence impracticable. This concern has been alleviated. To carry out the provisions of chapter II, implementing legislation will be necessary. This legislation has been drafted and will be forwarded shortly. Article 64(6)(b) of the Treaty provides that the withdrawal of a reservation to chapter II shall take effect three months after the Director General of the World Intellectual Property Organization has received notification of such a withdrawal. To ensure that our domestic laws conform with our expanded international obligations, I do not plan to notify the Director General of the withdrawal of our reservation to chapter II until after the Senate has informed me of its advice and consent to the withdrawal and Congress has enacted all legislation necessary to implement that withdrawal domestically.

States. I recommend, therefore, that the Senate give early and favorable consideration to this matter and give its advice and consent to withdrawing the U.S. reservation previously made under Article 64(1)(a) of the Treaty.

Mr. Crim. There are several issues that are of unique interest to the people of Michigan and the people of Detroit. Right now the auto companies are negotiating with the UAW. Many of the workers are saying that Reaganomics has not worked for them, that the auto companies are registering record profits, that they have been forced to give concessions. What do you say to these workers?

Now, I hope that in the coming negotiations -- certainly, government should not interfere. As a former union president, myself, I believe that these problems are between management and labor to work out.

But I do think that we have to keep in mind -- yes, workers did make some concessions. On the other hand, while the automobile companies now are back in a profit position, there were several years there in which they were running tremendous losses. And I hope that there will be not only fairness, as there should be, but some restraint also in the negotiations, that we don't do anything right now at this point to turn off the recovery, the expansion that we're having. It is one of the best recoveries in all the seven or eight recessions that have occurred since World War II.

And other than that, I'm not going to inject myself into the middle of that battle. But I don't think it's fair for anyone to suggest that they have not benefited from this recovery. We were in a very precarious state -- our entire industrial capacity as a nation.

Mr. Crim. Mr. President, you promised during your campaign a balanced budget by the end of your first term. Instead of a balanced budget, we have record deficits. Chairman Lee Iacocca of Chrysler Corporation calls that ``the largest threat to a healthy auto industry that exists.'' How do you answer him?

The President. Well, I answer it by saying that we have had continuous deficits for 50 years. I've been one of the loudest voices, I guess, back over the years in saying that this was a false policy for this country to follow. It followed a policy that believed that a little inflation was good for us.

Now, when I promised an economic program that, before the end of my term -- first term -- would eliminate deficits, before the election even took place the economy had so worsened that I said that promise no longer could be kept, that the situation had changed from the time that I, with the help of some fine leaders in this country and business executives, had put together an economic plan to try and bring us down from inflation and deficits and everything else.

We are going to continue to try. The size of the deficits now were in large part brought about by the recession that we were in. They were cyclical, as it's called, because they were the product of that recession. As we recover, we're finding that our own projections of deficits are too high.

So, all of this is helping to bring down the deficits below the projected point. But more than that, we have to continue reducing government costs. The Federal Government simply costs too much and is taking too high a percentage of the gross national product. To continue doing that would run the risk of going back into the repeated cycles of recessions that we've had.

Mr. Crim. Mr. President, let's talk about something real pleasant now: an organization that has been going up faster than the gross national product, and I'm talking about our own Detroit Tigers. Have you been following their exploits?

It is true that the regulations for governing Social Security COLA's, as they're called -- cost-of-living increases -- prescribes that there is no cost-of-living increase if inflation is below 3 percent. Now, there is a possibility that it may fall just below 3 percent in the third quarter of this year, which is the measuring point as to whether or not -- or what the COLA will be.

And we have asked, as a part of our program that put Social Security on a sound financial footing, when it was due to go bankrupt along about July of 1983 -- and the bipartisan commission that came up with a proposal to fix this -- part of it called for a 6-month delay in a cost-of-living adjustment for the people on Social Security. And because of that, because of their taking that 6-month delay, we just felt that it was only fair that even if inflation went below the 3 point mark -- and it may very well do that, because for the last 3 months it's been running at 3.3 percent -- that it would only be fair for us for one more time to give this cost-of-living increase.

Francisco, said you had a secret tax plan; that regardless of who was elected President next year, or this year, taxes would have to be raised; that he was leveling with the American people, and you would not. What's your response to that, sir?

The President. Well, my response is that he was half right. He was right about the fact that he would give us a tax increase, because if you look at his record when he was a Senator, he's voted for every tax increase ever proposed -- and, I think, sometimes has proposed them himself. So, I'm quite sure that he would raise taxes.

I believe the biggest single factor in the recovery that we have right now which has resulted in a restoration of profits to the automobile industry, to the housing industry -- we're building twice as many homes as we were building in 1980, now. I mention those two industries because either one of them can start a recession all by itself. Well, to have a tax increase could very well upset this recovery. The tax cut that we've had is the biggest factor, as I say, in that recovery. And so, I have no secret plan.

What we do have -- I have asked the Treasury Department to study and bring to me by December some proposals for tax reform -- number one, to simplify it. The tax code has become so complicated that the average citizen just cannot compute what they owe the Government. And we want to have a more simple and a more fair tax system, and we want to see if we can't have one that will broaden the base so that we can actually reduce the rates on the individuals paying.

When you stop and think that because of the complexity of the tax law right now, there is probably a hundred billion dollars of tax that is legitimately owed and not being paid. And those who are freeloading on their fellow taxpayers, I think, should be brought into the payment of tax.

The President. Well, we have their finding that the steel industry has been harmed by imports, but they, then, will be coming back with recommendations as to what the answer should be, sometime in September. And my comment can only be that I am waiting to see what their recommendations are going to be.

The President. Well, you know, in the job that I'm in, I know that I can't really take sides with anyone. So, having been a sports announcer broadcasting major baseball myself, I can just wish them well.

Mr. Schneider. The first question is, Mr. Castro just celebrated yet another anniversary in power in Cuba. Lots of questions there: He reportedly wants to talk to the United States, and there are rumors in Miami right now that the United States is negotiating in some secret capacity with the Cubans, possibly about the return of the Mariel criminals. Is that true? What can you tell us about that?

The President. Yes, there's been an indication that they're willing to talk about this, and we have been in communication with them and certainly are ready to talk. No plans have been set, as yet, for that, but to talk about the so-called Marielitos.

The President. I believe so, unless they go back on things that they have already said to us. And we see no indication of that. Yes, I think it's a matter of numbers and deciding how many, but they've expressed a willingness to take back.

Those people thought that you supported that bill. Now we hear that if the House version of it is accepted and goes to your desk, you, in fact, will not sign it. That's what we've heard. Is that true, and if so, why this apparent flip-flop?

The President. Well now, Mike, it's no flip-flop with me. And I never comment on whether I'll veto something until I see it finally on my desk, because sometimes what's been an apple up on Capitol Hill, turns into an orange before it gets here, or vice versa. But it is true that I support the Senate version of that bill.

The House has injected some things in the bill that I find it very difficult to support. It would give us very great problems. Now, it hasn't gone into conference yet, but someplace in conference they usually come down between the two versions. And I will have to wait and see what is there.

Mr. Schneider. The question now refers back to Mr. Mondale's charges that -- he of course says that he will raise taxes, and he claims that you will, too. You say that you won't, that you'll try to cut spending. And there are many people in our area concerned that the spending cuts could come, of course, in Social Security or in Medicare packages, or in packages that aid the elderly.

The President. Well, first of all, with regard to Social Security, we have absolutely no plans whatsoever to change that. As you'll remember, Social Security was made the object of a great deal of demagoguery in the 1982 election. And there were a great many falsehoods spread which had the terrible effect of frightening many people dependent on that program, in spite of the fact that we tried in every way we could to tell them we were not going to pull the rug out from under them. But we were faced with Social Security bellying up bankrupt in July of '83. In fact, to get some checks out, we had to borrow money.

Then, after the election, we had a bipartisan commission put together, and we worked out a plan which has put Social Security on a sound footing for -- well, as far as we can see, to the year 2025. So, we're not making any changes in that.

Now, Medicare is a problem that we have to meet, because Medicare has something of the same problem that Social Security previously had, and it is faced -- not as immediate in danger, as was Social Security -- but it is faced with problems of fiscal insecurity in the next few years; before 1990. So, we are going to have to follow the same procedure and come up with a plan that ensures the fiscal soundness, because there are 28 million people in this country depending on Medicare for their health services.

Mr. Schneider. Mr. President, there are those who claim that a second Reagan administration would be a much more dogmatic, conservative administration, that you'd be pushing harder on your so-called social agenda -- pushing for a constitutional ban on abortion, for a ban on school busing. Would that happen under a second Reagan administration?

And, with regard to abortions, I feel that unless and until someone can establish that the unborn child is not a living human being, then that unborn child is protected by the constitutional protection of life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness. And if you found a body and you didn't know whether it was dead or alive, you wouldn't bury it until you found out for sure that it was not living. And I feel the same way about the unborn child.

In fact, all of the medical evidence, so far, proves definitely that the unborn child is a living human being. And we have no right to take its life unless it would be taking that life in protection of the mother's life.

Mr. Sawyer. Let's start with some good old-fashioned politics. Geraldine Ferraro has said that if this is a campaign without national debate, then it will dwindle to name-calling. Jimmy Carter has said he's convinced that you're going to try to avoid a debate. And you've said you're going to leave it up to your campaign manager. It's a critical issue. Why not decide yourself and declare whether or not you want to debate?

The President. I've said all the way, I support the idea of debate; debated in the last election and would do so in this next one. I did not accept that statement of Vice President Mondale that we should have a half a dozen or more debates. As a matter of fact, I think we could bore the pants off the viewers if we did something of that kind. But I believe that there is something that we can agree upon in the nature of debating, and I look forward to doing that.

The President. Frankly, I think two would be as many as the public should stand for. But, again, as I did say that I think that those who work on the planning of strategy and the schedules, and so forth, have to be considered in this, and I am looking forward to listening to their counsel and advice.

The President. That is another issue that I think has to be decided involving them and involving strategy. Remember, the election really is between the two candidates for President. You can't get elected Vice President unless the head of the ticket wins.

Agency under a cloud. You have reappointed her to an advisory committee on oceans and atmospheres, and that has upset environmental groups. Since she left the EPA in such a shambles, why reappoint her?

Anne Burford was called up to appear before a House committee. And the House committee was demanding documents from her, and we ruled, with the advice of the Justice Department, that we were going to stand for executive privilege and not make them available, because those documents were part -- well, they were investigatory reports. And if it developed that in the continuing investigation there was reason for legal action against other individuals, that could be compromised by opening up those records. So, she was simply carrying out our orders in refusing to make those records available and certainly didn't deserve the treatment that she received.

Chattahoochee River National Recreation Area. Originally, 6,500 acres were intended to be purchased. Under your administration, that has been cut to something less than half, and whether more critical lands will be purchased is up in the air. Will you free more money for purchase?

Mr. Sawyer. Mr. President, Nicaragua. You are giving money for what some people call a not-so-secret war there. You are supporting anti-Sandinista guerrillas, whose open aim is to overthrow the government. Yet your administration has been saying you don't support the overthrow. How do you square those two?

The President. No, actually, what those people are, those so-called guerrillas, or contras, as they're called in Nicaragua, are actually -- and for the most part, people who were participants in the original revolution and then had that revolution stolen from them by the Communist Sandinistas. And some of them were ousted from the country, some of them were jailed; they were denied any part in the government.

What we're trying to support down there is the honest desire of the people of Nicaragua to have the revolution that was promised them. The Sandinistas and the others had promised the Organization of American States that the revolution's goals were freedom of the press, freedom to have labor unions, human rights, freedom of speech and assembly, freedom of religion -- all the things that we believe are democratic.

Communist government, totalitarian and with a denial of the rights of the citizens, and the people down there are being oppressed by that government. And we believe that we have an obligation to support the legitimate demands of the Nicaraguan people.

Ms. Stanley. Mr. President, this is Rose Stanley from KAKE - TV in Wichita, Kansas. For our first question -- comes from the Breadbasket. Since the Department of Agriculture was formed in 1862, one of the perceived objectives was to preserve the family farm. The number of family farms has dwindled because their economic viability has declined. Realistically, is it still a realistic goal of government to preserve the family farm?

The President. Yes. As a matter of fact, I can understand what the problems have been, because agriculture was probably hurt worse in the cost-price squeeze of the recent recession and the inflation than probably any other segment of our society. The land values went up. The interest rates also went up.

They borrowed excessive amounts of money based on the artificial land value that had been created by inflation. And then, when we managed to bring inflation back down, and, hopefully, that we're going to eliminate it entirely, they were left with the depressed land values. But the cost of production rose 45 percent for the American farmer in just the brief period of a couple of years.

Now, we know that they're going through hardships. We have done a number of things to be of help and are trying to help all that we can. The PIK Program was part of that, that I think did save a number of farmers. But we are -- Secretary Block, our Secretary of Agriculture, is out on a listening expedition throughout the country, hearing the problems of the farmers and their recommendations so that we can come up with a new farm bill in 1985.

The President. Not at all. I think this was just a natural thing that could have happened to either party and should have happened. And I am one who has said for some time that I think we are in the near future going to see a woman President in this country. Now, I happen to hope she'll be a Republican woman.

And I think that our record would indicate that's very possible. After all, we took the lead in appointing a woman to the United States Supreme Court for the first time. It is the first time there have been three women as members of our Cabinet. And we have some 1,600 women in very top positions throughout our government here. Those of the -- some 4,000 that a President can appoint -- in our administration 1,600 of those are women already and doing fantastic and wonderful jobs.

So, I don't think a setback of this kind -- it -- in fact, the other day a Democratic Senator said the contest now is not whether a woman should be a candidate; it's whether is this the right woman for that particular job?

The President.  --  -- and it is very frustrating, because as Governor of California, I was the first one among the 50 Governors to start a survey and a search of State statutes and regulations to eliminate any that in their language discriminated against women. And we were most successful with that. When I came here to Washington, I instituted the same kind of search at the Federal level and then set out to encourage the rest of the Governors to do this at a State level. And about half of them right now are changing laws -- or State statutes and regulations to eliminate this.

We have changed a number of them here at the Federal level and have more to go. Many of them require legislation to change. We've changed what we can by Executive order. And so, I don't understand why there should be this attitude, except that sometimes I suspect that maybe some of the organized groups out there have a political bias also and are partial to one party over the other.

Ms. Stanley. Finally, during the next 4 years it's anticipated that the next President will have to fill up to five vacancies on the U.S. Supreme Court. What philosophical criteria will you be basing your decisions on?

The President. I want judges who will interpret the law and not legislate and think that their job is to make the law. And I think in recent years we've had some examples of the Court actually taking the job of the Legislature and legislating rather than interpreting.

Ms. Fuldheim. Mr. President, thank you very much for this opportunity. I wanted to ask you this question: Through the years you've been in office, why do you want to be President, with all of the burdens and responsibilities?

The President. Well, the funny thing is, I kind of greet that question with mixed emotions, because for all of my life, while I was active in supporting candidates and causes that I believed in, simply because I believe that you have to pay your way, and life had been very good to me, and the business that I was in gave me some recognition, and I could attract an audience and help at fundraisers and things -- I did that. But I never wanted or thought that I would seek public office.

And, you know, someone has once said that life begins when you begin to serve. And I found there that life did begin. I thought that I would regret leaving the occupation and profession that I had practiced for so long. But I found it so fulfilling. And now, at this stage of my life, I want to continue to serve.

No. No plans, nor do I believe that we need a tax increase. We're going to reduce the deficits by the way they should be reduced, which is reducing the cost of government. To me, a tax increase is a last resort. My opponent has made it plain that to him it's a first resort. And his record indicates he really feels that way.

Now, what I said that was misinterpreted -- I tried to explain that if, when we have gotten government costs down to the point at which they could not be reduced any farther and government still be able to perform the services it's responsible for, then, if the tax policy did not match the outgo, you would have to look and adjust the situation then. But we're nowhere near that. And I am still going to go after what I think is fat in government and get it out of there.

And believe me, I have no plans, other than this last resort thing that I mentioned -- if that should turn out to be true someday down the road, years from now -- I have no intention of asking for a tax increase.

Ms. Fuldheim. Mr. President, I also have the same attitude to fat that you do, only mine has to do with my body, not with taxes. [Laughter] Do you think that Jesse Jackson has increased the importance of the black vote in the United States?

The President. Oh, I think he has. I think he's been responsible for one thing -- something that maybe the rest of us couldn't have done -- and that is to get a great many people who hadn't bothered to participate in the political arena, who hadn't registered to vote, to get them to register and now to participate as voters.

That would really be our democracy at work. Over recent years we've seen declining numbers going to the polls to vote in elections, and I think part of it is because we've just satiated them with political campaigns that run too long -- until they seem like they're always hearing about a political campaign, whether at the local or State level, or at the national level. And, no, I'm glad to see more people registering and getting ready to participate.

Ms. Fuldheim. One final question, and this really is a serious one. All nations are beginning to construct more nuclear weapons. Our Defense Department said the other day that our nuclear armament is inadequate, and that we will have to increase it more to be competitive. I don't understand it. We spend billions of dollars.

The President. They are right about that -- unless we can persuade the Soviet Union, and until we can persuade them to come back to the so-called START and INF talks, which are negotiations to reduce the number of weapons on both sides.

But we have less nuclear power today than we had 20 years ago. We've withdrawn a thousand nuclear weapons from Europe, and we plan to withdraw another 1,400. In the last 10 years, the Soviet Union has added 800 ballistic missiles, intercontinental ballistic missiles of the MX type that we're seeking to build. We're trying to get permission from Congress to build 100 of those.

And we are so far behind that we run the risk of having lost a deterrent capability; in other words, having a capability that says to them, you better not fire -- just as they're saying to us, we better not fire. And so, what we're trying to do is update and modernize with these hundred weapons.

Our weapons that we have on hand right now are of such an early generation that the Soviets have produced and deployed about four new generations of weapons while we have produced none. And their weapons have greater accuracy, greater power, than our old-fashioned ones. So, we're seeking just a hundred MX missiles.

There are many serious things that will occupy our attention in the coming weeks and in the fall, but today I find my thoughts turning away from politics to something equally important, but happy, too.

Eleven weeks ago, I greeted the Olympic torch when it was carried to the White House by a young man, a fine young athlete who had carried it high for almost a mile. Today the torch arrives in Los Angeles, and I'm thinking of what a journey it knew, and what a country it traveled through.

They held the torch high and passed the flame on to one another. They took it up hills and through lonely towns in the darkness, along gray highways at twilight and through bright towns at noon. They carried it past the malls and the airports, through the suburbs and cities, up the hills of steel towns, and along the flat routes of America's heartland. They carried it through the gathering heat of the West in early summer, and they took it to Los Angeles, where today the torch lights the Olympic flame and the games begin.

Everywhere the torch went people came out of their homes and poured into the streets to cheer and wave the flag and urge the runners on. This outpouring reflected, I think, the new patriotism that has swept our land.

So much of that new spirit involves our young people. It's seemed to me for some time now that there's a spirit of renewal among the young. It's as if they understand the future is great and huge and waiting for them. They seem to know once again that America is worth loving, worth caring about. They seem to take a quiet pride in all this nation was and is; they show a happiness with our country that's wonderful to see.

And there are the young people who will represent America in the games themselves. They, too, show a marvelous spirit. They represent our country not in some kind of narrow, nationalist sense, but in a wider sense: They reflect the things we taught them about human conduct and human effort -- all the good things they learned on the playing fields and at the gym, on the city streets and in the playgrounds of America. In those places they learned that the pursuit of excellence is a fine thing in and of itself, and the elusive pursuit of perfection is one of the things that makes man human. They learned that you play by the rules, with a sense of fairness and generosity, that you don't cheat, and that you take both victory and defeat with the same kind of grace and dignity.

Our young athletes deserve great credit. They were born with great gifts -- God blessed them with the physical talent that made it possible for them to compete in sports. But after that -- after the original gift -- after that it was all effort.

To become champions they had to work hard, with discipline and desire and no small amount of tenacity. What they are and what they've done gives us a lift. It's always inspiring when we see young men and women try to resist gravity, to fight fatigue, to, in the words of the first astronauts, push out the edge of the envelope -- push out of the things that hold us down and push on to new possibilities, new records.

Today it begins, and our athletes are ready. They will stand there, over the next few days; they'll poise themselves on the blocks, stand at the edge of the diving board, or stand with their toes on the line and wait for the shot to go -- and they'll know they're not alone. They'll hear the roar of the crowds, the great substantial cheer of the crowds, and -- who knows? -- if they listen close, maybe they'll hear the sound of Jesse Owens cheering, Babe Didrikson and Jim Thorpe, maybe they'll hear the cheers of all the young American athletes who once stood on the blocks waiting for the race to begin. Our young people are running for their country, running for greatness, for achievement, for that moving thing in man that makes him push on to the impossible.

Thank you, Bill Simon. This is a genuine pleasure for me and for Nancy. We've been avid sports fans, and I have been all my life. And to be with you here, the men and women who will be wearing our colors in the 23d Olympiad of the modern games is a memory I know we're going to cherish.

I'm certain that you'll remember these games as the highlight of your life as well -- and not just the games. You've been preparing for this competition for many years. You know better than most it isn't just the will to win that counts; it's the will to prepare to win. And from what I see here, we're ready.

Journalists have described and analyzed this outpouring of unity and positive feeling. They also noted that this year's Fourth of July celebrations were extraordinarily joyous occasions. There is a new patriotism spreading across our country. It's an affection for our way of life, expressed by people who represent the width and breadth of our culturally diverse society. And the new patriotism is not a negative force that excludes, but a positive force, an attitude toward those things that are fundamental to America, that draws together our freedom, our decency, our sense of fairplay as a people.

In so many ways, you represent this new spirit. I know I speak for all your fellow citizens -- no matter what political persuasion, no matter what race or religion, no matter if poor, middle class, or affluent -- when I tell you that you are our team. And each and every one of you, well, we're with you a hundred percent.

During these games, you'll be competing against athletes from many nations, but most important, you're competing against yourself. All we expect is for you to do your best, to push yourself for one more fraction of a second or one notch higher or one inch further. Each time you do that, you've created a magic moment of beauty and excellence in which all of us will share.

The American ideal is not just winning; it's going as far as you can go. If by pushing yourself to the limit you set a record or win a medal, you'll hear us. We'll probably look a little silly expressing our pride in your accomplishment, but our affection and pride is something that you can count on. We'll be cheering -- win, lose, or draw.

Ueberroth has done an exceptional job. United States Olympic Committee President Bill Simon has assured me you're the best team ever. And Bill, himself, deserves our special thanks for all that he's done. And of course, I'd like to mention your executive director, Don Miller, and all the coaches and managers who've made this possible, and these captains who are here on these steps with us.

This has been a team effort all the way. Corporations have done their part. Individual contributions have played a major role. Those who couldn't give money, volunteered -- I understand 50,000 volunteers here, backstage -- to get these games underway. They've been donating their time and energy to the success of the games.

Many years ago, believe it or not, I competed in sports, and coaches were known for spurring us on with some pretty punchy phrases and dialog -- or monolog. And looking back now, I realize those coaches were just as excited at the time as we were. And the same is true right now, you can be certain of that. We're all in this together. And we know that we can count on you to push yourselves to the limit.

Gov. James R. Thompson of Illinois, first as director of the State of Illinois Washington office and later as executive assistant to the Governor. He was also director of the Governor's Cost Control Task Force.

The prospect for urban America is bright today because of the strength of the ongoing economic expansion. The rapid decline in unemployment, coupled with a very low level of inflation, has brought a renewal of prosperity and economic opportunity throughout most parts of our Nation.

These areas and groups need an extra boost to join the rest of the Nation, and that is why I have proposed legislation to permit the designation of Enterprise Zones in selected cities across America. On July 24, I called upon the House of Representatives to bring this key measure to the floor for a vote. This proposal has the best potential to build on the progress we have made and to create jobs, independence and hope for people in inner cities and other economically distressed areas. It is time for Congress to complete action on this vital legislation.

We will not be satisfied with our economic progress until it has spread to every town and neighborhood in our Nation. For many years, the National Urban League has led the way in directing the Nation's attention to the still unresolved problems of our inner cities. I congratulate you on your many decades of distinguished service to America, and I stand ready to work closely with you on ways we can achieve further progress.

In our meeting last February at the White House and other subsequent meetings with Governors, we've discussed the importance of keeping the economy on sound footing, and we've discussed the importance, also, of getting the Federal deficit under control and of reducing unemployment.

Regarding the deficit, I understand your concerns, especially about high interest rates and how they affect the States' own economic recovery. I'm pleased to report that we now estimate the deficit to be well below that which was projected last February. My recent signing of the deficit reduction downpayment package is clearly a first step. And I pledge that I'll continue to work to bring down deficits. We'll have to work together with Congress to get spending under control, as well as to pass a constitutional amendment requiring a balanced budget.

Joint [Job] Partnership Training Act. It's working well, and 70 percent of those undergoing training have been able to find permanent jobs. That's a dramatic improvement over the old CETA approach. The increased numbers of Americans working because of the economic expansion means more revenue for the States, as well as the Federal Government. And I know this is good news for all of us.

Association chairman. And to John Carlin I want to offer my congratulations on your election as the new chairman of NGA. I look forward to working with you and all of the members of NGA during your chairmanship.

And on a personal note, I think we all had a special feeling on Saturday evening as we watched you and our American athletes join together with other nations of the world with the common goal of excellence. And we were proud for you and proud for our country's athletes.

I'd like to thank you for the access that your administration has granted to the Governors. We have met with Cabinet Secretaries, with your staff, and with you to express our concerns about issues ranging from health care cost containment to highway funding. Those are issues that are near and dear to Governors' hearts, and we appreciate your accessibility, even if we do not always agree.

Your comments indicating your commitment to work with us on the pressing issues of the future are welcome, especially on the issue of deficit reduction. The downpayment just approved is welcome, but, obviously, as you say, only a first step. And we are committed to continue our efforts to work with you and the Congress.

In the Medicaid program, the waivers that have been granted by HHS will allow States to implement badly needed cost containment measures. However, we still need greater flexibility in this area, Mr. President, if we are to achieve our common goal: holding down health costs.

We are full partners in the Federal system, and we sincerely appreciate you calling in recognition of that partnership. We look forward to a continuing dialog with you and your administration on these and other issues.

The President. Jim, thank you. Governor Carlin, look forward to working with you. And, believe me, I am committed to what I have long held, the belief that our nation, as a federation of sovereign States, that is the very basis of our freedom. And so, I'll continue to work with all of you. And, again, thank you for letting me participate in this way.

Mr. Schwartz is president of the Medallic Art Co. in Danbury, CT. Previously he was executive vice president of the Medallic Art Co. He serves on the development board of Danbury Hospital in Connecticut and is past president of the Rotary Club of New York City.

There is only one thing to say, and I say it from the bottom of my heart and in the name of all the people of our country: Welcome home. We're so happy you are back safe and sound. You know, you may not know this, Nancy's birthday is Saturday. And whether you like it or not, she's already declared that you are the greatest birthday present she's ever gotten.

This has been a trying and a very demanding time for so many people, but for none more than you. I talked to many of your relatives. I met them at various locations throughout the country -- and now some of us have met again -- while you were being held. And I know you won't be surprised when I tell you how committed they were to winning your freedom and how full of caring and concern they were. I know that they're very proud of you, and I know from personal experience that you should be very proud of them.

All of America was concerned about you; many prayers were said for your safe release. In the days that you were away, our attention was never once distracted from your plight, and we wouldn't rest until you returned to us safe and whole. None of you were held prisoner because of any personal wrong that any of you had done to anyone; you were held simply because you were Americans. In the minds of your captors, you represented us. Well, whatever the presumed grievance or political motive that caused these actions, let there be no confusion -- a crime was committed against you. Hijacking is a crime; kidnaping is a crime; murder is a crime; and holding our people prisoner is a crime. When cruelty is inflicted on innocent people, it discredits whatever cause in whose name it is done. And those who commit such deeds are enemies of the peace.

The day your plane was hijacked, the terrorists focused their brutality on a brave young man who was a member of the Armed Forces of the United States. They beat Robbie Stethem without mercy and shot him to death. Our joy at your return is substantial, but so is our pain at what was done to that son of America. I know you care deeply about Robbie Stethem and what was done to him. We will not forget what was done to him. There will be no forgetting. His murderers must be brought to justice. Nor will we forget the seven Americans who were taken captive before you and who are captive still. They must be released. The homecoming won't be complete until all have come home.

But now we rejoice at your return. Nancy and I prayed for your safety, we prayed for your speedy return, and we weren't alone. Our prayers were only two among millions and millions. We felt a great national concern when you were taken, and it's truly a national joy, as you can see, that greets your return. You are back in the free land of America safe and sound. You withstood your ordeal with extraordinary composure and coolness.

Captain Testrake. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, dignitaries, ladies and gentlemen of the press, families of the ex-hostages, and the people of America, these words were written by one of our men, one of the hostages. They asked me if I would address them to you, and I wholeheartedly agree with these sentiments.

President Reagan and the United States Government for their continued efforts which resulted in the safe and peaceful end to our difficult situation. We hope that your efforts will bring back the seven remaining Americans still held very soon.

And just in closing, I'd like to say that many of my fellow hostages share with me the profound conviction that it was our Father, God, that brought us through this ordeal safely. And in the spirit of giving credit where credit is due, I just wonder if you'd join with me in a brief word of thanks to the Lord.

Our Father, we just gather before you in humble adoration and praise and thanks. For we know that it was your strong hands that held us safely through this ordeal, that gave us the courage and the strength to withstand in the darkest times. And, so, Father, we just thank you for this, and we give you all the praise and the glory, through Jesus. Amen.

Agriculture to appraise the condition of the soil, water, and related resources on the nonfederal lands of the Nation and to develop a national soil and water conservation program for assisting landowners and land users in their future conservation activities on these lands.

Guided by this program, the Department of Agriculture has extended more technical and financial assistance than ever before in areas with the most serious problems of soil erosion and dwindling water supplies. It has also begun to evaluate some of its other programs from the standpoint of their impact on soil and water resources.

This accompanying report covers Fiscal Year 1984. It displays soil and water conservation program accomplishments through a number of tables and appendices. The accomplishments are consistent with those reported through the 1986 budget request and the explanatory notes that provide program descriptions and details to support the budget request.

The signing of the Declaration of Independence on July 4, 1776 marked both the beginning of a new nation and the start of a great epoch in the history of political affairs. That day in Philadelphia, a Republic was born based on the idea of liberty for all. The Fourth of July is America's birthday celebration, but it is also a day of importance for anyone who believes in freedom.

The Declaration of Independence opened government to the people as never before. Each individual was acknowledged as possessing certain inalienable rights. And these rights in turn enabled our people to take part in their political system. Here was a true revolution, embodying the idea that government required the consent of those it governed. Overnight, Americans were acknowledged as citizens of a free land where they had once been only colonial subjects of a distant monarch.

This Independence Day, 1985, let us be guided by the wisdom of that great American statesman and of all our Founding Fathers. As we commemorate 209 years of liberty today, let us pray for God's blessing and His help in safeguarding the precious legacy of the Declaration of Independence.

Even though the differences between our nations are many and complex, as I made clear when we met last year, we can and must resolve these differences without threat or use of force, through discussion, patient effort and determination.

I'd like to take a few minutes out of your Fourth of July weekend, if I might, to talk about business. It's summer in Washington, and as sure as the heat and humidity, we could have predicted another seasonal occurrence: Once again, the budget process has broken down. Even with dangerously large deficits looming over the horizon threatening to destroy the economic progress we've made, it's still business as usual when it comes to the budget. We can only hope that the House will cooperate with us in doing what is right for America.

Unfortunately, as it stands now, the budget proposed by the House is simply not a serious document. At best it could win a prize for creative bookkeeping. Huge so-called savings are simply assumed or invented, funds are juggled back and forth between accounts to show phony deficit reductions, and billions of dollars of expenses are just wished away. Let me give you one example. Right now the Government charges the oil companies for their offshore leases -- sort of a yearly rent for the use of Federal property. Well, the House decided that they would take the next 4 years of revenue from certain offshore leases and count it all in 1986. Now, sure, that reduced the 1986 deficit by $4 billion, but it increased our deficits in later years by exactly that same amount.

A full quarter of the so-called deficit reductions in the House budget are gimmicks like this. Most of the rest comes from raiding the national defense. There is nothing proportionate or fair in the House's budgetary assault on defense. They propose making over half their reductions in this one area, which accounts for less than a third of total spending. What the House Budget Committee calls a defense spending freeze is really a drastic cut requiring a reduction from current plans in research and development, construction, and procurement of 19 percent in 1986, 23 percent in 1987, and 28 percent in 1988. If the House budget were adopted, it would deliver a severe blow to our national security.

The Senate has proposed a budget that is responsible and fair, that holds real defense spending constant and makes the necessary structural changes in domestic spending that will enable us to substantially reduce these deficits. But when the Senate and House budget conferees met, it quickly became clear that the House refused to give up its gimmicks or consider real cuts in domestic spending. If the pattern of past years repeats itself, we can expect the obstructionists to keep the process stymied until the final night before the deadline when they'll go into a budgetary feeding frenzy, loading up huge spending measures with goodies for every special interest group in sight. Well, enough is enough. We refuse to make a choice between a budget that threatens our national security and a spending orgy that undermines our economy.

Of course, as they do every year, some in Congress are using this annual collapse of the budget process as an excuse to call for a tax increase. Well, I've promised before and I will repeat that promise today, I will veto any tax hike that comes across my desk, no matter how it's disguised.

I have some advice for those who talk about tax hikes: Save your breath. I'm going to hold their feet to the fire on this budget until they do the right thing and get government spending under control.

Why shouldn't the U.S. Government be held to even the minimum standards of accountability that we demand of the smallest commercial bank? It's true that amending the Constitution is a lengthy and difficult procedure. Well, that's all the more reason to start right away. More immediate relief would come from a line-item veto that would enable me to veto individual budget items. And that is the way to cut the pork out of the massive appropriations bills that Congress sends me, without vetoing that part of the bill -- essentially human needs and our national security. If Congress can't or won't stand up to the special interests, give Presidents the line-item veto. This President would be glad to take them on.

By cutting taxes and stamping out inflation, we've put our economy back on the track of strong and solid growth. America's like a house that we build stronger and prouder every day. But right now, the American economy has termites. It's time to clean them out once and for all. Please tell your Representatives not to waste more time or money, but to come back here ready to put our fiscal house in order and make government live within its means. We must reduce the deficit and make a start on achieving a balanced budget.

The President. Good afternoon, and welcome to the White House. It's always refreshing to speak to representatives of the real America -- that vast and wonderful land where a special interest is a hobby like fishing and a lobbyist is somebody who hangs around in hotels. I want you to know how deeply I appreciate this opportunity to speak to you and, through you, to the American people.

I'd like to devote the bulk of our time together to answering your questions. First, however, permit me to say a word about the budget and then about our major new domestic policy initiative -- the effort to institute a fair share tax plan. Once again it seems that the budget process has broken down. Growing deficits appear to have made virtually no difference; for too many in this town, it's still business as usual. They're a little like sailors on a ship adrift, painting the gunnels and polishing the brass, but ignoring the broken rudder.

The main problem lies in the House, which has proposed a budget that juggles funds back and forth between accounts, invents savings, and simply wishes away massive costs -- a budget that would be laughed at by bookkeepers in any well run shop or business in the country. What the House Budget Committee calls a defense spending freeze, moreover, is really a deep cut. It would require us to scale back our spending on research and development, construction, and procurement by 19 percent next year, 23 percent in 1987, and 28 percent in 1988.

The Senate, by contrast, has to its credit proposed a budget that is responsible and fair, that at least holds real defense spending constant, and that makes the structural changes in domestic spending that will help us to grow out of these deficits. But when representatives of the Senate and House met in conference, it quickly became clear that certain Members of the House still refused to consider real cuts in domestic spending.

My friends, I can promise you that this year things are going to be different. By cutting taxes and forcing down inflation, we've created new growth, new jobs, and hope. And after so much progress, I flatly refuse to be cornered into a choice between a budget that undermines our national security and a spending spree that threatens our prosperity. Together, Republicans and Democrats must make genuine cuts in domestic spending. And to see that this finally happens, I'm willing to go to the American people again and again.

Each year, countless Americans pay more in Federal income taxes than the giant corporations they work for. Some wealthy individuals write off ocean cruises as educational; others deduct expenses for sky boxes at sports events. And with our steeply progressive tax code, working men and women struggling on behalf of their families find that the Government lays claim to a bigger chunk of each new dollar they earn. And for them, making economic progress is like climbing a wall with no ladder.

Our tax code has become in a fundamental sense un-American, and I mean that as a serious, moral, and economic assertion. Americans are an expansive and optimistic people. We constantly seek opportunity and work to better our lot. Yet our high marginal tax rates discourage risk-taking, savings, and work and thereby smother growth. Most Americans are straightforward and honest; yet our tax code constitutes one of the most complicated and convoluted legal codes ever devised. Americans look to the future, and yet we're weighed down by a tax code that is the result of decades of political deals that's become the very embodiment of the dead hand of the past. No wonder the underground economy is so big and thought to be growing. Americans today feel an abiding disappointment, even disgust, with the taxation that represents that most basic transaction between the Government and the people. My friends, this is no way to go about building economic growth.

Maybe it has to do with our early history as a nation of farmers, but when we Americans see a problem, we solve it. If there's a stump in the field, we hitch up the tractor and haul it out. If a new barn needs building, we gather together and raise it. And when we have a mess as big as the tax code that stifles growth and undermines our self-respect as a people, then forgive me, but it's time to clean out the stalls and put down fresh straw.

Our fair share tax plan for America would give families a dramatic benefit by nearly doubling the personal exemption to $2,000. This would mean that an income well into the $25,000 to $30,000 range -- a working family with two or three children would pay an effective tax rate of less than 10 percent. Perhaps the central idea in our proposal is this: By curtailing loopholes and eliminating deductions that are only used by a few, we can lower marginal rates sharply, increasing the rewards for savings, investment, and good, hard work. In other words, a fair share tax plan is a progrowth tax plan. Lower tax rates, a near doubling of the personal exemption, and an end to unfair deductions -- what it adds up to is simple justice, more jobs and renewed hope for our own future and that of our children.

A great deal has been said about a timetable for passage of our proposal. Well, my own idea is simple: By Thanksgiving Day of 1985, we should cook our turkey of a tax code and get our tax reform passed by both the House and the Senate. Then, by Christmas Day, America's new tax plan should be signed into law and presented to the people as the best gift of the year.

Q. Mr. President, Bill Glass from KPRC - TV in Houston. Thank you for the opportunity to ask you about something that's of great concern to people in Houston, where we are suffering an economic situation because of our oil-based economy. People are wondering how your tax plan is going to impact that industry in Houston and whether it's going to help or hurt our much-looked-for recovery?

The President. We believe it is not going to hurt. There have been some changes. We're phasing out the tax plan now -- I can't think of the right word that I want for it -- but the depletion allowance. But except for wells that are producing 10 or fewer barrels a day, to keep them in existence, from not shutting down -- but we also are keeping the tax breaks that come for exploring and finding -- the deduction of the intangibles and so forth. Because we think that is our real problem, is to make sure that we do not make it uneconomic to continue to explore. Half of our trade deficit today is the need for us to buy oil outside our own country. So, the more production we have here, the better off we think we are. We don't believe that it is going to militate against the industry.

Omaha, Nebraska, and the farmers in Nebraska say that they're concerned about something called farming the tax code or tax farmers; that is to say, people who invest in agriculture for a tax writeoff rather than for the product from the land. And they seem to think that your tax reform proposal doesn't go far enough to stop this kind of thing that they say is driving commodity prices down. Do you think that your tax reform proposal does go far enough, and would you consider any additional ways, and what do you think of the whole idea of tax farming; that is, investing in agriculture for a tax writeoff rather than for the product?

The President. Well, of course, we are pretty strict now, and have been for some several years, about hobby farms as versus real farms. I've had some experience with that; I've had a ranch for years. I can remember when it was deductible, and it isn't anymore.

No, we think that the best thing that we can do for the farm economy -- and I grant you, there's going to be some disruption in doing it, and we don't mean to pull the rug out instantly. We think that government itself created the bulk of the farm problems with programs that were well-intentioned, but programs that encouraged people to farm even if there was no market for their product. We would like to feel that we could get farming back into the open market. And we can point to the fact that that part of farming that is and has always been in the open market has never had the problems that the farms -- that in the part of agriculture that is government-regulated and with quotas and all that sort of thing -- that it seems to be the one that has the most problems. And I think that we are taking some steps that are going to make the tax farmers have to look elsewhere because one of our aims in this tax reform plan is to eliminate some of the so-called tax shelters that have been designed not to raise crops particularly but to give a tax writeoff.

The President. Well, I don't know what his motive is. I wouldn't ascribe any motive to him. I'll let him have that. But I know that he's been very vocal, particularly about the nondeductibility anymore of local and State taxes. And at the same time, he couples that with charging us that we're, once again, doing things for the rich. Well, I'd like to point out to him that less than a third of the people in this country itemize, and they are the people with the higher incomes, the so-called rich. They are the ones that benefit from the present tax deduction of State and local taxes. More than two-thirds of our people who don't deduct, who don't itemize on their bills, they get no benefit from that deduction at all. So, we don't see that we're doing any harm in taking it away.

Q. Mr. President, Patti Suarez, KWTV, Oklahoma City. There's a lot of talk about revenue neutrality. Some Congressmen are saying that your plan may fall anywhere from $12 billion to $20 billion short of revenue neutrality. My question is: Intangible drilling costs -- might they still be sacrificed to keep it revenue neutral? Are we going to keep intangible drilling cost deductions?

The President. I would object to that because I think it would be counterproductive to an industry that is very important. The exploring for oil is not done by the giant oil companies. The exploration is done by independent people who are out there, the so-called wildcatters, doing this.

And we want them to keep on doing it. So, no, I don't feel that we should. And as to that estimate that we're going to fall revenue short, I happen to think that some of those people are the same ones that estimated when we started our economic recovery program in 1981 that it wasn't going to work. Matter of fact, they named it Reaganomics, and it was going to be a failure. Well, it's a success, and they don't call it Reaganomics anymore.

Q. Mr. Reagan, Mike Olszewski, WERE Radio in Cleveland. Some families of the seven hostages still in Beirut have expressed interest in meeting with Syria's President in hopes of getting his help in securing the release of their loved ones. I'd like your opinion on that move, also your opinion of Florida Congressman Dan Mica's bill to provide compensation to Federal employees who fall victim to terrorism abroad.

The President. Well, to the first question here, I can't deny them if they feel that they want to try this and it could be of some help. Certainly, we would never interfere with that. But I do want everyone to know that -- because there's been some talk here and there, and even some of them out of their frustration and grief have said, out of sight out of mind -- that isn't true. There has never been a minute from the first kidnaping on that we've not been doing everything we can. Our great problem is the secrecy, the inability to locate and find. Are they being held by one group all together? Are they separated?

We have reason to believe now, from some of our intelligence gathering, that they are being moved around quite often. And our difficulty with taking some action is the very fact of their lives. And we're continuing, and we meant it when we tried our best to get them included with the 39 that came home. But evidently, they're in the hands of others not having to do with the same hijackers as this last time. We are continuing, we're using every effort we can to bring them back.

Q. Marlene Schneider, WFSB - TV, Hartford. I'm told that you are going to be having a meeting later this afternoon with the top leaders in the House and Senate on the budget impasse in conference, and I am very curious as to what exactly you are going to say to them.

The President. I'm going to be rather firm. [Laughter] And I'm going to say that this is a time to forget the 1986 election and partisan differences, that we've got a job to do, and the job to do is to make this country solvent again and to get the deficit eliminated. And that's what it's all going to be about.

Q. Nancy Chandler from KMTV in Omaha, Nebraska. Again, I have a lot of rural people who I speak to, and they are saying this tax code isn't going to expire. The tax laws are going to continue through into 1986 if we don't change the tax code -- our farm bill does not. Do we go back and go with the policies of the past, or can we expect the President to step in and also urge the House and the Senate to pass a new farm bill in -- [inaudible].

The President. Yes, we are working on a farm bill right now. We can't just shove everything aside and say only the budget and the tax plan are all we're talking about. There are a number of legislative matters that are all of vital importance.

The President. Well, my reaction -- I think I, in a way, answered it in what I said earlier about them. The situation is: How do you rescue someone if you don't know where they are? How do you rescue them if, at the same time, you would have to reveal yourselves to the point that you might be bringing home a body instead of a human being? And this has been our great problem all this time and long before this particular hijacking took place, is, as I say, the trying to learn where, and are they together, are they one or separate? And unfortunately it just isn't that easy to find out. We've had suspected targets over there, but, again, no knowledge that we could take an action that would not result in their death. And we're going to do everything we can to see that that doesn't happen.

But, as I say, we're continuing our efforts, and we have to feel that the success that we've had this time and part of our problem is -- and I think all of you can understand this -- part of our problem is we can't answer all your questions on these particular subjects because we can't say what we're going to do next Thursday or there might be someone on the other side that's a little uncomfortable about that. So, we just have to tell you that we're using everything that we know and everything that we have on this entire subject, but we can't talk specifics.

Good afternoon, and welcome to the White House. It's an honor for Nancy and me and George and Barbara [Bush] to have all these distinguished members of the Cabinet -- all for them to be able to spend this time with all of you before you depart for the United Nations World Conference on Women. You know, I can't tell you why, but somehow this feels like a family affair.

Your efforts in Nairobi can help to improve the lot of women around the world -- half the population of the globe -- and no challenge could be more important. Maureen tells me that the delegation will focus on four issues, each a matter of the greatest importance, each a matter to which the members of your delegation will bring wide knowledge and experience.

First, women's literacy. Millions of the world's women can neither read nor write; some because schools in their countries are scarce, and others because they live in societies that encourage education only for men. Now, I grant you that the men are more in need of it, but -- [laughter].

Your second focus will be upon women in development, the role that women play as a country becomes more modern. Modern society can offer longer, healthier, and more prosperous lives, but the transition from traditional to modern modes of existence can place families and individuals under great stress. Women not only participate in the economic and social developments which lead to modern life but provide an anchor, a source of stability, as their societies undergo these difficult changes. And you will seek to highlight and enhance this unique role.

Third, you will draw attention to domestic violence against women and children. In our own nation we have just begun to understand the extent of this problem and to take the first steps toward solving it. In other societies domestic violence is sometimes taken for granted or ignored.

Finally, your delegation will concentrate upon the plight of refugee women and children. As refugees, women face unique hardships. Many fall victim to rape and physical abuse. With their children, they often suffer discrimination in the distribution of food and medicine. In Nairobi you will seek to fasten the attention of the world upon these innocent women and children, and you will work to increase the number of women workers in refugee camps themselves. These, then, will be the issues that you champion.

Conference on Women in Mexico City in 1975 and in Copenhagen in 1980. At these conferences legitimate women's concerns, like the four on which you will concentrate, were all but pushed off the agenda. Commenting on the workings of the United Nations, former Ambassador Jeane Kirkpatrick, a member of your delegation, once said that the biggest challenge for the United States is whether we can learn to be effective at the politics played at the U.N. Well, given the way the Conferences went in Mexico City and Copenhagen, we can be certain that will apply in Nairobi as well.

To make certain that you operate effectively, you have divided your delegation into caucus teams, small groups that will work to establish rapport with other delegations. You have planned informal conversation groups, opportunities to get together in relaxed settings with delegates from other countries. And you'll be visiting development projects, including Peace Corps and AID locations near Nairobi, gaining insights into the problems of women in developing countries.

The members of your delegation firmly believe that the business of this Conference is women, not propaganda. Should it prove necessary, you'll be more than willing to fight to keep the Conference on track. Take it from someone who knows Maureen, that's the way it's going to be.

Previously he served as United States Ambassador to East Germany. Prior to that assignment, he was deputy head of the U.S. delegation to the Trilateral Negotiations on a Comprehensive Test Ban Treaty and deputy chairman of the U.S. delegation to SALT. Earlier he was deputy chief of mission at the U.S. Embassy in Lisbon. Mr. Okun entered the Foreign Service in 1955 and was assigned to Munich as a consular officer. He then served in Belo Horizonte as consul and in Brasilia as principal officer and then counselor of the U.S. Embassy. After training at the Naval War College, Mr. Okun was Special Assistant to the Secretary of State and then was transferred to the Department's Office of Soviet Affairs. Named political adviser to the commander in chief of U.S. Forces in Southern Europe, he served in Naples until his transfer to Lisbon.

Miss Byrne is currently a foreign affairs fellow at Georgetown University. Previously, she served as Ambassador to Burma, Ambassador to Mali, deputy chief of mission in Colombo, and a political officer in Paris. She also participated in the Geneva conference on Indochina. She entered the Foreign Service in 1949 and was assigned to Athens. After 2 years in Saigon, she was posted to the Laos desk in Washington. An assignment to Izmir was followed by a tour in Ankara. She served in Vientiane as a political officer and then was in charge of dependent areas affairs in the Bureau of International Organization Affairs. After a tour as a personnel officer, she was special assistant in the Central Administrative Office, followed by a training detail at the National War College. She then was political officer in Paris, specializing in Southeast Asia.

The Congress and the executive branch have worked long and hard to produce the compromise contained in this complex and controversial legislation. Lengthy negotiations nearly produced a bill in the final hours of the 98th Congress. The 99th Congress took up the legislation with renewed determination. The bill I have signed reflects that determination as well as congressional willingness to compromise to resolve difficult problems.

I believe that this new law, which reflects compromise by all concerned parties, strikes an acceptable balance between enhancing our commercial interests and protecting our national security interests.

To ensure national security, this law provides expanded enforcement authority, takes numerous steps to strengthen COCOM (an informal organization that provides for multilateral controls), and, by establishing new statutory crimes for illegal exports, provides enforcement officials with an effective tool to reduce illegal diversions.

COCOM members, liberalizes licensing where comparable goods are widely available in the international marketplace, and provides for expanded congressional and private sector roles in the export control program.

During the congressional deliberations on the EAA, I stated that there must be adequate discretionary authority to allow the President to manage the export control program. I regret that in the new law the Congress has prescribed several new administrative arrangements and reporting requirements that make the export control program more difficult to manage. However, I am pleased that the Congress also has acknowledged the administration's efforts to resolve issues administratively. One example of this is my recent instruction to the Commerce and Defense Departments to work together to develop licensing procedures for specific commodities and countries. These procedures are now in place and are being overseen by the National Security Council.

During the EAA debate, the Congress faced numerous controversial issues on which each of the competing sides had compelling arguments for its position. One such contentious issue was whether the contracts of U.S. exporters would be protected if foreign policy controls were imposed. The Congress agreed to compromise language that allows the President to break existing contracts if the strategic interests of the United States are threatened. This provision will allow U.S. exporters to be perceived as more reliable suppliers, while at the same time maintaining adequate presidential authority to respond to those instances where the country's strategic interests are at risk.

Another controversial issue addressed was the administrative arrangements for the enforcement of the act. The new law grants enhanced enforcement powers to the Customs Service and the Department of Commerce by providing both agencies with police powers. In addition, the new law grants primary authority to the Customs Service to conduct investigations overseas and provides that the Commerce Department's overseas activities will relate principally to prelicensing and postshipment investigations. It is clear that the Congress envisions significant roles for both agencies. Thus, I intend to direct both agencies to cooperate to ensure effective and complementary roles in enforcement of our export control laws.

This new law also contains provisions regarding congressional procedures for reviewing nuclear cooperation agreements. It adds a 30-day consultation period to the current 60-day congressional review period. Under these new procedures, the President has the discretion to approve execution of an agreement before transmitting it for either period. If approved for execution before the 30-day period, the agreement would not have to be resubmitted; a single submission would be legally sufficient. I expect that these new procedures for congressional review will apply to the agreement for cooperation with Finland, which I transmitted to the Congress on May 21, 1985.

It is clear that the new EAA involves a delicate balancing of national as well as programmatic objectives. I do want to acknowledge the invaluable role in securing final enactment of this legislation by the bill managers -- Senators Jake Garn and John Heinz and Representatives Don Bonker and Toby Roth.

The export controls were not significantly expanded during the emergency period, and the administration of the system of controls continued in the normal course. Accordingly, the government spent no funds over and above what would have been spent had the EAA remained in force without interruption.

Mr. Clark is a member of the board of directors of the Producers Cotton Oil Co. He also serves as a commissioner of the California Student Aid Commission. He retired from the Bank of America in 1983 after 42 years of service in various positions and locations throughout California. He is past president of the Fresno County and City Chamber of Commerce.

In a television address to the Nation on March 23, 1983, I challenged the scientific community to change the course of history by embarking on a research effort to counter Soviet threats with measures purely defensive -- measures to reassure people their security no longer depends alone on threats of mutual nuclear annihilation to deter a Soviet attack, but measures enabling us to intercept and destroy ballistic missiles before they reach our soil or that of our allies. A nonnuclear strategic defense makes good sense. It's better to protect lives than to avenge them. But another reason, equally simple and compelling, persuades us to its merit. As the Book of Luke says: ``If a strong man shall keep his court well guarded, he shall live in peace.'' Well, SDI, our Strategic Defense Initiative, could prove crucial to guarding security and peace for America and her allies.

The strategic challenges we face are far different from those in 1972, when the United States and the Soviet Union signed the SALT I and antiballistic missile treaties. When those treaties were signed, certain assumptions about the Soviets were made that -- well, to put it charitably -- have not proven justified. For example, it was assumed the treaties would lead to a stable balance and, ultimately, to real reductions in strategic arms. But the Soviet Union has never accepted any meaningful and verifiable reductions in offensive nuclear arms -- none. It was assumed the treaties were based on acceptance of parity in offensive weapons systems, but the Soviets have continued to race for superiority. As former Secretary of Defense Harold Brown put it, ``When we build, they build. When we stop, they build.'' It was assumed the Soviets would accept the innocent notion that being mutually vulnerable to attack was in our common interest. They haven't.

The Soviets have repeatedly condemned as provocative our research on defense against their first-strike missiles, while blanketing their own country with the most sophisticated air defense system ever seen to protect against our second-strike bombers. And while we dismantled our lone ABM system 10 years ago, the Soviets have consistently improved the world's only missile defense system deployed around Moscow. They've also developed and deployed the world's only operational killer satellite system and then proceeded to condemn the United States for daring even to test such a weapon.

Soviet Marshal Grechko testified to the Supreme Soviet: ``The treaty on limiting ABM systems imposes no limitations on the performance of research and experimental work aimed at resolving the problem of defending the country against nuclear missile attack.'' Thus, the Soviets have devoted a huge share of their military budget to a sophisticated strategic defense program which, in resources already allocated, far exceeds what the United States anticipates spending in the current decade.

Finally, it was assumed that the agreements signed would be complied with, but the Soviets are seriously violating them in both offensive and defensive areas. It is the Soviet Union that has violated the 1972 ABM treaty with its construction of a massive radar facility at Krasnoyarsk.

Given these facts, is it not preposterous for the Soviets, already researching defense technologies for two decades, to now condemn our embryonic SDI program? And as Paul Nitze, one of my chief arms control advisers, pointed out, Soviet hypocrisy is even more glaring when we realize who's taking advantage of our open society to propagandize against our SDI program. A letter to the New York Times denouncing SDI was signed by the very Soviet scientists who've been developing the Soviet strategic defense program; other Soviet scientists who signed have spent their entire careers developing offensive weapons. I intend to mention this when I meet with Mr.

Gorbachev in Geneva this November. I will tell him the United States not only has the right to go forward with research for a strategic missile defense, but in light of the scale of their program we'd be the greatest fools on Earth not to do so.

We're going to put our best scientists to work. We're going to cooperate with our allies. We're going to push forward in full compliance with the ABM treaty on a broad-based research program, whose results to date are immensely encouraging. And, yes, I hope we will one day develop a security shield that destroys weapons, not people.

Section 3 of the 25th Amendment to the Constitution and of the uncertainties of its application to such brief and temporary periods of incapacity. I do not believe that the drafters of this Amendment intended its application to situations such as the instant one.

Nevertheless, consistent with my long-standing arrangement with Vice President George Bush, and not intending to set a precedent binding anyone privileged to hold this Office in the future, I have determined and it is my intention and direction that Vice President George Bush shall discharge those powers and duties in my stead commencing with the administration of anesthesia to me in this instance.

Thomas P. O'Neill, Jr., Speaker of the House of Representatives. The Vice President temporarily assumed the powers and duties of the Office of the President from 11:28 a.m. until 7:22 p.m. on July 13. At 11:28 a.m. the President underwent intestinal surgery at Bethesda Naval Hospital for the removal of a polyp. Subsequent analysis revealed that it was malignant but that the cancer had not spread and no further therapy was necessary. The President recovered more rapidly than anticipated and was released from the hospital on July 20.

Following up on my letter to you of this date, please be advised I am able to resume the discharge of the Constitutional powers and duties of the Office of the President of the United States. I have informed the Vice President of my determination and my resumption of those powers and duties.

Now, to conductor John Williams and all the members of the Boston Pops, I know I speak for the entire audience when I say thank you for that wonderful performance. Through the years, 19 conductors have presided over the orchestra, including the beloved Arthur Fiedler. John Williams is a noted composer, a brilliant conductor, and, as I think you will all agree, a true showman. So, to one of America's oldest and most enjoyable cultural institutions -- thank you, again, and a very happy 100th birthday.

Now, having thanked the performers, I can't resist a remark or two about the audience. A diplomatic manual written long ago by a noted Frenchman comes as close as anything to describing you, the diplomats we here have come to know. ``A good diplomat,'' it states, ``must have an observant mind, a spirit of application which refuses to be distracted, a mind so fertile as easily to smooth away the difficulties, an equitable humor, always open, genial, civil, and agreeable.'' And for your untiring grace and charm, for the dedication which each of you represents your nation, we thank you.

Today we've enjoyed the beauty of music and the pleasures of a summer evening shared with friends. So, we need nothing more to remind us of the fruits of freedom and peace. My husband joins me in wishing and praying that good will may forever reign between the people of our country and those of yours.

Sec. 2. Functions. (a) The Commission shall study the issues surrounding defense management and organization, and report its findings and recommendations to the President and simultaneously submit a copy of its report to the Secretary of Defense.

Commission. However, members appointed from among private citizens may be allowed travel expenses, including per diem in lieu of subsistence, as authorized by law for persons serving intermittently in the government service (5 U.S.C. 5701 - 5707), to the extent funds are available.

The United States and the Soviet Union completed today the second round of nuclear and space talks in Geneva. The primary U.S. goal remains significant, equitable, and verifiable reductions in the size of existing nuclear arsenals. The United States entered the second round of the nuclear and space talks with specific, detailed proposals on the table to achieve this goal and was prepared to make progress with the Soviet Union in each of the three negotiating areas.

In the area of strategic nuclear offensive arms, the U.S. delegation has flexibility in pursuing the significant reductions that we seek and is prepared to negotiate a number of specific, alternative paths that could lead to such reductions. With respect to intermediate-range nuclear forces (INF), our ultimate goal remains the elimination of the entire class of nuclear weapons carried on land-based INF missiles. Towards this end, the U.S. delegation also has flexibility and is authorized to pursue an interim agreement resulting in equal U.S. and Soviet global limits at the lowest possible level.

We were equally prepared and remain prepared for detailed exchanges in the area of defense and space. During the second round, regrettably, the Soviet position has remained entrenched, with no movement in their formal positions. The Soviet delegation repeated their moratoria proposals while continuing to precondition progress -- or even detailed discussion -- of offensive nuclear reductions on acceptance of their demands for unilateral U.S. concessions involving unrealistic and unverifiable constraints on research in the defense and space area.

Late in this round the Soviets surfaced some concepts which could involve possible reductions in existing strategic offensive nuclear arsenals. However, the method of aggregation proposed in these concepts seems designed to favor preservation of the Soviet Union's primary area of advantage; that is, in prompt hard-target kill capability, the most worrisome element in the current strategic equation. Efforts by the U.S. delegation to elicit Soviet answers to our questions about these concepts -- with regard to issues such as numbers, ceilings, and rates of possible reduction -- have thus far essentially gone unanswered. In this regard, we are disappointed that the Soviet Union has been unable to deal in concrete terms and with hard numbers, even framed as overall negotiating goals. And while the United States immediately probed the Soviet concepts, the Soviets unfortunately have refused to engage in discussion of the U.S. proposals.

In sum, we are about where we had expected to be given that we are ending only the second round of negotiations of such complexity and importance. We hope that the Soviet Union will be more forthcoming during the next round of negotiations.

Ms. Pyle is supervisor of consumer marketing for the Mississippi Power Co. in Gulfport, MS. She has been with the Mississippi Power Co. since 1969 as an energy communications specialist and a home economist.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Anthony J. Calio to be Administrator of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, Department of Commerce. He would succeed John V. Byrne.

It represents a significant step in improving law enforcement cooperation and combatting terrorism, by excluding from the scope of the political offense exception serious offenses typically committed by terrorists, e.g., aircraft hijacking and sabotage, crimes against diplomats, hostage taking, and other heinous acts such as murder, manslaughter, malicious assault, and certain serious offenses involving firearms, explosives, and damage to property.

The Supplementary Treaty, in addition to narrowing the application of the political offense exception to extradition, will also help improve implementation of the current Extradition Treaty in several other respects. I recommend that the Senate give early and favorable consideration to the Supplementary Treaty and give its advice and consent to ratification.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Anne E. Stanley to be the Representative of the United States of America on the South Pacific Commission for a term of 2 years. She will succeed William McBride Love.

As the Senate considers S. 43, I wanted you to know and convey to your colleagues my strong support for this initiative. As you know, I asked the Congress to pass this legislation in my State of the Union Address on February 6th. I am pleased that under your leadership the Senate is acting judiciously on this important matter.

The line-item veto authority would provide a powerful tool for eliminating wasteful and unnecessary spending. I've often made known my willingness to use such a veto authority judiciously -- but firmly -- to curtail the excesses often embedded in otherwise meritorious legislation. As Governor of the State of California, I had firsthand experience with the line-item veto and found it necessary to keep spending in check and used the line-item veto on over 900 occasions to remove unnecessary spending from the budget. In every instance the legislature agreed with my decision.

I know you share my conviction that bringing Federal spending under control is essential if we are to sustain economic growth. Yet the uncertain outcome of that endeavor underscores the need to move forward on all fronts to hold down government spending.

The American people have a right to expect that all of us in government make every effort to eliminate deficit spending. I hope the Congress can move forward expeditiously on legislation providing line-item veto authority and not get sidetracked on procedural considerations. If the Congress acts responsibly on this issue, I pledge to do my part as well.

The Vice President. We're here today to announce the first private citizen passenger in the history of space flight. The President said last August that this passenger would be one of America's finest -- a teacher. Well, since then, as we've heard, NASA, with the help of the heads of our State school systems, has searched the Nation for a teacher with "the right stuff."  Really, there are thousands, thousands of teachers with the right stuff. And they're committed to quality in education; to teaching their students the basics -- reading, writing, mathematics, science, literature, history -- to teaching the foundations of our cultural heritage; to teaching the values that guide us as Americans; and to teaching that important, but difficult to obtain, quality -- clarity of thought.

We're honoring all those teachers of merit today, and we're doing something else because the finalists here with me and the more than a hundred semifinalists will all in the months ahead serve, as Jim has said, as a link between NASA and the Nation's school system. These teachers have all received special NASA training to pass on to other teachers and to their students. And together they and NASA will be a part of an exciting partnership for quality in education.

And the winner, the teacher who will be going into space: Christa McAuliffe. Where is -- is that you? [Laughter] Christa teaches in Concord High School in Concord, New Hampshire. She teaches high school social studies. She's been teaching for 12 years. She plans to keep a journal of her experiences in space. She said that -- and here's the quote -- "Just as the pioneer travelers of the Conestoga wagon days kept personal journies [journals], I as a space traveler would do the same." Well, I'm personally looking forward to reading that journal some day.

And by the way, Christa, while you're in the program, Concord High obviously will need substitute teachers to fill in. And it's only right that we provide -- [laughter] -- one of these substitutes. So, the first class you miss, your substitute will be my dear friend and the President's, Bill Bennett, the Secretary of Education.

Ms. McAuliffe. It's not often that a teacher is at a loss for words. I know my students wouldn't think so. I've made nine wonderful friends over the last 2 weeks. And when that shuttle goes, there might be one body, but there's going to be 10 souls that I'm taking with me.

Today the United States Government announced a reward of up to $100,000 for information leading to the effective prosecution and punishment of those responsible for the murders of six U.S. citizens on June 19, 1985, in San Salvador, El Salvador. Those with information in El Salvador should notify the investigating authorities of the Salvadoran Government. Those with information in the United States should notify the Office of Security, Department of State. Those with information in any other country should notify the nearest U.S. Embassy. Information received will be handled on a confidential basis, and the identities of informants will be protected.

The unique and historic significance of our Nation has always derived from our role as a model of political freedom, social justice, and personal opportunity. While not a perfect Nation, we have offered to the world a vision of liberty. It is a vision that has motivated all our national endeavors and serves us yet as an anchor of conscience. The humanity and justice of our collective political life and the freedom and limitless opportunity in our personal lives are an inspiration for the peoples of the world, both for those who are free to aspire and for those who are not.

Hostility to this fundamental principle still haunts the world, but our conviction that political freedom is the just inheritance of all nations and all people is firm. Our dedication to this principle has not been weakened by the sad history of conquest, captivity, and oppression to which so many of the world's nations have been subjected.

We are all aware of those many nations that are the victims of totalitarian ideologies, ruthless regimes, and occupying armies. These are the nations held captive by forces hostile to freedom, independence, and national self-determination. Their captivity and struggle against repression require a special courage and sacrifice. Those nations of Eastern Europe that have known conquest and captivity for decades; those struggling to save themselves from communist expansionism in Latin America; and the people of Afghanistan and Kampuchea struggling against invasion and military occupation by their neighbors: all require our special support. For those who seek freedom, security, and peace, we are the custodians of their dream.

Our Nation will continue to speak out for the freedom of those denied the benefits of liberty. We will continue to call for the speedy release of those who are unjustly persecuted and falsely imprisoned. So long as brave men and women suffer persecution because of their national origin, religious beliefs, and desire for liberty, the United States of America will demand that the signatories of the United Nations Charter and the Helsinki Accords live up to their obligations and respect the principles and spirit of those international agreements and understandings.

Each year we renew our resolve to support the struggle for freedom throughout the world by observing Captive Nations Week. It is a week in which all Americans are asked to remember that the liberties and freedoms which they enjoy as inherent rights are forbidden to many nations. It is a time to affirm publicly our convictions that, as long as the struggle from within these nations continues, and as long as we remain firm in our support, the light of freedom will not be extinguished. Together with the people of these captive nations, we fight against military occupation, political oppression, communist expansion, and totalitarian brutality.

First off, I'm feeling great, but I'm getting a little restless. A lot of you know how it is when you have to endure some enforced bed rest. You get this feeling that life's out there, and it's a big, shiny apple, and you just can't wait to get out and take a bite of it. I'm eager to get back to work.

I'll tell you what I think of the House budget proposal so far: I hope it gets well soon. In fact, I told one of the fine surgeons who operated on me that if Congress can't make the spending cuts we need, I'm going to send him up to Capitol Hill to do some real cutting. I know some are saying that we can just keep going with business as usual in the Federal spending department. But, well, forgive me, I don't have as much stomach for that kind of talk as I used to. But that's for another day.

Today I just wanted to say some thank-you's to some very special people. First, the doctors and nurses who helped me and healed me. Now I know why nearly everyone comes to America for a major operation. It's because we have the best doctors and nurses in the world. If you have to be sick, you're better off if you're sick right here in these United States of America.

I want to thank everyone -- heads of state, leaders, so many friends and citizens who have written and called and included me in their prayers. There were the balloons and flowers and what seemed like millions of cards. One of the nicest was the one I got from the nurses down the hall who sent me a card from the new babies in Pediatrics. It was signed with their little patients' tiny footprints.

I also want to mention a sort of cautionary note. We all tend to ignore the signs that something may be wrong with us. But may I say, speaking from personal experience, it's important to go and get a checkup if you think something isn't right. So, if you're listening to this right now, and it reminds you of something that you've been putting out of your mind, well, pick up the phone, call your doctor or local hospital, and talk to someone. Just tell them Dr. Reagan sent you.

I'd also like to indulge myself for a moment here. There's something I wanted to say, and I wanted to say it with Nancy at my side, as she is right now, as she always has been. First Ladies aren't elected, and they don't receive a salary. They've mostly been private persons forced to live public lives. And in my book, they've all been heroes. Abigail Adams helped invent America. Dolly Madison helped protect it. Eleanor Roosevelt was F.D.R.'s eyes and ears. And Nancy Reagan is my everything. When I look back on these days, Nancy, I'll remember your radiance and your strength, your support, and for taking part in the business in this nation. I say for myself, but also on behalf of the Nation, thank you, partner, thanks for everything. By the way, are you doing anything this evening?

There are a number of things that keep our country united: a shared reverence for certain ideals, for instance, and certain memories and traditions, but there's something more. We're a country of 230 million very different souls, and yet here we are -- liberals and conservatives, fundamentalists and agnostics, southerners and northerners, recent immigrants and Mayflower descendants -- arguing often enough and disagreeing with each other, but at the same time held together, always held together by a tie that can't be seen, yet can't be broken. It is, I think, the great unknowing love of Americans for Americans, the great unknowing love that keeps us together and for which, this day, I'm more thankful than ever.

The President. Great. A little sad. I was beginning to like it here. [Laughter] I know I can't say individual goodbyes, but I just want to thank you from the bottom of my heart. [Inaudible] I'm going to -- [inaudible]. There's another cartoon in the paper this morning. It's the second cartoon I've seen in which a Navy nurse is portrayed. And I'm going to wage a one-man campaign to shape those guys up and get them much closer to the truth about Navy nurses -- [laughter] -- and the way you've been portrayed.

Remotely controlled satellites have been sent on missions to Mars, Saturn, and Jupiter. If all goes well, the outer planets Uranus and Neptune will be studied as the Voyager spacecraft passes by in 1986 and 1989, respectively. Within the next year or so the first comet rendezvous are planned (Giacobini-Zinner and Halley), the powerful Hubble Space Telescope will be placed in orbit, and the Galileo Mission to Jupiter will be launched. Scientists around the world eagerly anticipate the results.

Within the past year, satellites have been launched from the shuttle's bay, repaired in space, and retrieved and returned to Earth for repair. We have conducted missions in which a European-designed and -built scientific laboratory -- Spacelab -- has flown in the shuttle bay's gravity-free environment during which data in a wide range of disciplines have been acquired, materials tested, and chemical reactions monitored.

Under NASA's direction, the next logical step in America's space program -- the space station -- is being planned, with development scheduled for the latter part of this decade. When it becomes operational in the early to mid-1990s, the space station will be a catalyst for expanding the peaceful uses of space for scientific, industrial, and commercial gain. The station will serve as a laboratory for materials processing and industrial and scientific research; as a permanent observatory for astronomy and Earth observations; as a storage and supply depot; and as a base from which to service other satellites or satellite clusters that will form the world's first space-based industrial park. Japan, Europe, and Canada have joined with us in partnerships that are designed to serve all our long-term interests.

Space exploration is little more than a quarter century old. In that brief period, more has been learned about the cosmos and our relation to it than in all the preceding centuries combined. The ever-increasing knowledge gained from peaceful space exploration, and the uses to which that knowledge is put, potentially benefit all those aboard Spaceship Earth. The spirit of July 20, 1969, lives on.

Administration, and we are extremely proud of our record in this regard. As leaders in the Federal government, we participate side by side with individuals, groups, voluntary organizations, and corporations to provide opportunities for others less fortunate. We do our part through our leadership of the Combined Federal Campaign in our respective agencies.

It gives me great pleasure to announce that Secretary of Transportation Elizabeth Hanford Dole has agreed to serve as Chairperson of the fall 1985 Combined Federal Campaign of the National Capital Area. I am asking that you support Secretary Dole by personally serving as Chairman of the campaign in your organization and appointing a top official as your Vice Chairman. Please advise Secretary Dole of the person you designate.

Your personal interest, visible support, and active participation are vital to the success of the campaign. Make a special effort to encourage your employees in the Washington area, and in all CFC locations worldwide, to support the Combined Federal Campaign at greater levels than ever before.

Over the past 24 years, Federal employees and members of the Armed Forces have had the opportunity to show their concern for those in need through participation in the Combined Federal Campaign. They have responded to the opportunity during this time by contributing over $1.1 billion to charitable organizations through the CFC.

Through the Combined Federal Campaign, we can assist the less fortunate in our country and extend a nurturing hand to friends around the world. We can help relieve pain and health problems now and support research to eliminate them in the future. We can help our neighbors without making them dependent on government.

You have a record of generosity and concern for others. I am confident that that proud record will continue in the fall 1985 Combined Federal Campaign. While the decision to give is personal and voluntary, I encourage each of you to join me in wholeheartedly supporting this year's CFC.

President Reagan. It is my pleasure today to welcome you, President Li. This is your first trip to the United States and the first visit by a Chinese head of state to our country. It's a great honor to have you, your wife, and the distinguished delegation who accompanied you as our guests.

During my visit to China last year, I had the opportunity to get to know President Li. Under the guidance of President Li and other wise leaders, the Chinese people are enjoying greater productivity and a rising standard of living.

The American people are working with them as friends and partners in enterprise. Trade between us is at a record level and continues to climb. Scientific, technological cooperation is being put to use in a wide range of endeavors, and this too can be expected to increase. Our educational and cultural exchanges -- already substantial -- are expanding. We're in the initial phases of cooperation in the control of narcotics and antiterrorism. And by our common opposition to aggression, we are not only enhancing our mutual security but bolstering world peace as well.

Both our peoples should be proud that in a few short years a solid foundation of good will has been laid. Ours is an increasingly productive relationship based not on personality or momentary concerns, but on a recognition that our nations share significant common interests and an understanding of the many benefits we've reaped from the good will between us. Now, this doesn't mean that there are no areas of disagreement; however, we will continue to put any differences in perspective. When I met with you, President Li, in the Great Hall of Beijing, I suggested a Chinese principle that can serve as a tool in building an ever-stronger bond between us: hu jing, hu hui -- mutual respect, mutual benefit. Let us proceed in that spirit -- hu jing, hu hui.

President Li, we Americans highly value the ties we have built with the people of China in these last 13 years. We rejoice with you over the economic success your country is enjoying, and I'm pleased to be playing a small part in this modernization effort. We wish for the people of China what we wish for ourselves -- to live in peace and to enjoy prosperity. By working together the people of both our countries can achieve this noble goal. We are pleased to have you with us.

The purpose of my coming to visit is to deepen mutual understanding, enhance our bilateral relations, increase the friendship between our two peoples, and safeguard world peace. I believe this purpose is in conformity with the interests and desires of our two peoples. Both China and the United States are great countries and both our peoples, great peoples. I am convinced that if China and the United States can establish a long-term and stable relationship of friendship and cooperation on the basis of the five principles of peaceful coexistence, it will greatly benefit our two peoples and world peace.

In the past two centuries or more the Sino-U.S. relations went through a tortuous road, with both exciting moments of joy and the painful periods that provoked thought. It is gratifying to note that since 1972 leaders of the two countries, judging the hour and sizing up the situation, have cooperated to lay down principles guiding bilateral relations and have reached a number of agreements that provide the foundation for the establishment of a long-term and a stable relationship of friendship.

The Sino-U.S. relations have made very big progress. A dozen years ago very few people could foresee the present level of development in our bilateral relations. However, I wish to point out that in our relations there are even today great potentials to be tapped and obstacles and difficulties to be overcome. The new situation demands our fresh efforts and new achievements. I hope that a dozen years hence, when we look back, we shall be able to feel gratified, as we do today, that as we proceed difficulties are increasingly reduced and our steps grow more vigorous.

He has been a State senator since January 1969 and has served as president of the senate and chairman of several committees, including the Senate Ways and Means Committee. He is president of the National Republican Legislators Association and past president of the National Conference of State Legislatures.

Although our stay was brief, I did, as the Chinese say, ``look at the flowers while riding horseback'' -- capturing lasting impressions not only of the magnificence of the culture and the land but also the bold vision of those directing China's future.

The progress we've made is a tribute to individuals with courage and foresight, like President Li, on both sides of the Pacific. The relationship we've built improves the material well-being and increases the security of our countries. Areas of disagreement exist; these should not be ignored, nor should they be permitted to inhibit us from acting together in these many areas of commonality. Historic truths determine our fundamental national interests, and they continue to draw our two peoples together.

After our meeting today, I'm happy to say I remain confident that Chinese-American cooperation will grow and strengthen in the years ahead. Underscoring the momentum of our relationship, I am delighted tonight to announce that the Chinese Government has invited Vice President Bush to China and that he has accepted this most gracious invitation. Such visits as yours, Mr.

President Li, by the time you return home you will have seen much of the United States and met many Americans in and out of government. You will have seen our industry, our people, and our land. We Americans came here from almost every nation, including China, to an undeveloped land, a wilderness. We're proud of what we've accomplished. And today we're proud to stand beside the people of China, who are striving to build a better life.

The proposed agreement with the People's Republic of China has been negotiated in accordance with the Nuclear Non-Proliferation Act, which sets forth certain requirements for new agreements for cooperation with other countries.

It is the first peaceful nuclear cooperation agreement with a Communist country and the only such agreement with another nuclear-weapon state (the United Kingdom and France are covered by U.S. agreements with EURATOM).

During the last several years, the People's Republic of China has developed ambitious plans for the installation of a substantial number of nuclear power stations. The proposed agreement reflects the desire of the Government of the United States and the Government of the People's Republic of China to establish a framework for peaceful nuclear cooperation. During the period of our negotiations and discussions, China took several important steps that clarify its non-proliferation and nuclear export policies. Premier Zhao has made important statements of China's non-proliferation policy that make clear that China will not contribute to proliferation.

Those statements have been endorsed by the National People's Congress, thereby giving them official status. Based on our talks with the Chinese, we can expect that China's policy of not assisting a non-nuclear weapon state to acquire nuclear explosives will be implemented in a manner consistent with the basic non-proliferation practices common to the United States and other suppliers. Further, in conjunction with China's membership in the International Atomic Energy Agency, effective January 1, 1984, China has said that it will require IAEA safeguards on its future nuclear export commitments to non-nuclear weapons states.

This agreement will have a significant, positive impact on overall U.S.-China relations. It will provide the United States and its companies an opportunity to participate in another aspect of China's energy programs, with possibly substantial economic benefit. The proposed agreement will, in my view, further the non-proliferation and other foreign policy interests of the United States.

I have also found that this agreement meets all applicable requirements of the Atomic Energy Act, as amended, for agreements for peaceful nuclear cooperation and therefore I am transmitting it to the Congress without exempting it from any requirement contained in section 123(a) of that Act.

The President. I'm going to do exactly what they've told me to do. The thing is, Hugh, in this -- one, the doctor himself was a little concerned because he'd used the term that I ``have cancer.'' He says the proper thing is I ``had cancer.'' And very -- to a minor effect -- that particular polyp, called adenoma type, is one that, if it is left, it begins to develop cancerous cells. Well, this one had. When they got it out, they found that there were a few of such cells, but it's gone, along with the surrounding tissue. It had not spread; no evidence of anything else. So, I am someone who does not have cancer. But, like everyone else, I'm apparently vulnerable to it. And, therefore, there will be a schedule of checkups for a period to see if it's going to return or if there was a cell that had escaped into the bloodstream or something.

The President. Well, I have a very real and deep faith. Probably, I'm indebted to my mother for that. And I figure that He will make a decision, and I can't doubt that whatever He decides will be the right decision.

The President. I can't foresee anything of that kind, and that is not just me talking, now. That's on the basis of all that I've been told by the doctors who were all involved in this. I can't see anything of that kind coming. But, as I said once when they were talking about my age before I was elected the first time, if I found myself ever physically incapacitated where I, in my own mind, knew I could not fulfill the requirements, I'd be the first one to say so and step down.

The President. No. They've tried to make something of the scheduling of these things. The first polyp had been taken out, the knowledge that I had another one yet to come out, and it was the kind that, as they said, doesn't become cancerous. The schedule was set, and I went in there fully prepared on a Friday afternoon to have that one snipped out. Also, they were going to do this examination then of the intestine to make sure. And I went in with a little handbag, fully convinced that I would be on my way to Camp David the next morning, Saturday. And they came back in after having taken out the polyp and told me that they had found this other type. And they said, about this other type, that we have no evidence whether there are cancer cells, but it is the kind that can be cancerous. And they said, now, you're all prepped, you're here -- and that prepping took a lot of imbibing of --  [laughter] -- certain fluids for hours before I went there.

The President. So, I said yes. And then they told me that, yes, there had been a few cancer cells in it, but it had not penetrated the outer wall. It was confined; there was no trace of this going anyplace else. And, as the doctor said, therefore, all you can say is you had cancer.

The President. I've got too many friends -- even my brother who -- good Lord, he had very severe cancer of the larynx. He was a very heavy smoker, which I have never been. But that was, golly, I guess in the neighborhood of 20 years ago, and he's doing just fine. So, I'll take the checkups that they recommend for them to keep track.

The President. No. If there was any change it was back in 1981, with the indication of mortality after the shooting, that I made up my mind that those things that I believed in doing, for whatever time I might have left.

Mr. Sidey. One of the things that's been commented on, Mr. President, is Mrs. Reagan, who was, as you said in your speech -- she has been remarkable in this. Has she become more of the Presidency in these last couple of weeks, or are we just noticing it?

The President. And it hasn't been easy because, as she herself admits, she is a worrier. And she has been through a lot, including a most traumatic experience, the death of her father. She was there and with him for a couple of weeks in the hospital, and both knew that he was dying. And then, to have what happened to me -- I recovered far more quickly than she did from the shooting. And then, along comes a thing like this. She can't resolve her concern.

The President. Yes, and with all the things here, Don's carrying out the things that I have said. I've witnessed no grabs for power on the part of anyone. Hugh, there seems to be a concerted effort, and has been for the last 4\1/2\ years, to try and build feuds within the administration. I think they thrive on -- some do -- on combat, and there just isn't anything to it.

Mr. Sidey. You talked of ``going home'' -- I was struck by it -- in the hospital. You mentioned it two or three times, how you wanted to go home and get into your bed. I've never heard a President talk of the White House with such affection and warmth. Now, what's the change?

The President. Well, yes. And, Hugh, I think again we go to -- Nancy is a nest-builder. If we stop in a hotel for a couple of days, she can't be in a suite for 5 minutes until she's moving the furniture around -- [laughter] -- to make it more homelike. In the hospital there for only those several days, she brought pictures up and some large framed photos that we have of her trying to give the dog a bath and so forth, and hung them on the walls. And at first, I kept saying, ``Honey, I'm going to be out of here in a few days. You're going to a lot of trouble.'' But I have to say, she was right.

The President. [Laughter] I think that's not permitted, but I have to say it is home. And she's done the same with the house at Camp David. That's similar to when we had a house in Los Angeles and the ranch.

And these nurses were all very trim and nice people and all, and they were a little disturbed by the image of a Bethesda nurse. So, when I left the hospital up there, I told all of them -- that's what I was saying when I turned my back and was talking to them -- I was telling them that I was going to do my utmost to see that the image as portrayed was corrected in the cartoon industry and that they were not properly portrayed. So, I told him that when I called him.

The President. Yes, yes, all of those things. The view I felt for a long time, that, even if there were no deficit, the Federal Government, out of a number of things and with the best of intentions, embarked on all kinds of programs, some of which are just not the proper function of government, things government shouldn't be doing, and some of which, even if it's doing them, they're not cost-effective at all. Job training programs in which the training was given, but the placement rate of people in jobs was extremely low. And for the cost of training, that was enough to send them to the finest university in the land. Things of that kind, things that we discovered in our own welfare reform.

Federal programs mandated on local and State government. And even if you were given some say in the administration of those programs, you were so bound and restricted by regulations and redtape that time after time you found yourself saying we could do this program twice as well and at half the price if we weren't bound by these restrictions. And yet it was the Government saying, you can't change, you've got to do these things this way.

Mr. Farley is currently president of Farley & Associates, a firm specializing in family and business insurance planning, in Tucson, AZ. He is a member of the Southern Arizona Association of Life Underwriters and the National Association of Life Underwriters.

Some of the recent economic reports might be seen as spectacular were they not becoming so routine. The Consumer Price Index increased by only two-tenths of 1 percent in June, following an identical two-tenths of 1 percent increase in May. The United States economic expansion is 31 months old. Employment stands near its highest level in history, and yet inflation is below 4 percent.

Most important, the outlook on this summer day for the balance of 1985 and beyond is very good for continued low inflation, renewed economic strength, and rising employment. Productivity growth is strengthening and interest rates have dropped significantly, invigorating housing markets and permitting businesses to better finance investments and machines, technologies, and products for the future. Add to this the increase in business orders, which provides incentives to rebuild inventories, and the pickup of other economics abroad, and we see all the parts falling in place for a new surge of robust expansion.

One of the most hopeful signs for our future is being seen in our black communities. We'll have to wait for the Census Bureau to release the latest poverty figures in August to confirm the new trend, but the evidence of progress seems clear. A record number of blacks -- some 10.6 million -- now have jobs. Since November 1982 the black unemployment rate has fallen by 6\1/2\ percentage points, and nearly one of every five new jobs generated went to a black man, woman, or teenager. Blacks have gained an average of 45,000 new jobs every month for the past 31 months -- twice the job gain rate of whites.

Those gains were created by the engines of enterprise, not the horse and buggy system of bureaucratic make-work that broke down long ago. They were created by people getting ahead and breaking free, not because of what society does for them, but what they do for themselves -- by people who know complete emancipation must be a spiritual struggle for brotherhood, a political struggle for participation at the ballot box, and an economic struggle for an opportunity society that creates jobs, not welfare; wealth, not poverty; and freedom, not dependency.

We're reaching out to every American who yearns to board the freedom train that can take them to the destination of their dreams. But that train can't keep moving if government keeps blocking the track. We can't rest until everyone who wants to work can find a real job. No American seeking opportunity through an expanding economy can break free if government erodes their take-home pay with new taxes. Minorities and women can't break free if government destroys their earning power with protectionist measures that raise prices and eventually cripple the job market and our economy as well. And workers searching for jobs and advancement can't break free if government upsets the marketplace with harebrained ideas like federally mandated comparable worth, a proposal that would take salary decisions out the hands of employers and employees and give government the power to determine what a fair salary is.

On another front, we'll keep speaking out, pushing as hard as we can, to give all Americans new opportunity to build a better life. That means passage of our tax reform to lower rates, nearly double the personal exemption, raise the standard deduction, and increase the earned-income tax credit. Tax reform is a must, because it would turn private energies away from efforts to save another dollar in taxes toward efforts to earn another dollar. This is how hope and opportunity are created.

We'll keep pushing for passage of enterprise zones as long as areas that could be new sites for economic development remain destitute landmarks of despair. Such neglect is an outrage, and those blocking this legislation should never have the nerve to say a word about compassion again.

Finally, to bring teenage unemployment rates down further, we've asked the Congress for a 3-year test of the youth employment opportunity wage. It enjoys bipartisan support -- leading black mayors, 114 historically black colleges, the Fraternal Order of Police, even the National Alliance of Postal Employees. It's time Congress passed this proposal that could create some 400,000 new jobs for our youth. We've got to believe in them if they're to believe in us.

President Reagan's central arms control objective, and the objective declared in the U.S.-Soviet joint statement issued in Geneva last January, is to eliminate nuclear weapons altogether. We, therefore, have proposed at the bargaining table in the nuclear and space talks in Geneva radical reductions in the size of existing nuclear arsenals, beginning with the most destabilizing ballistic missiles. We believe such radical reductions, coupled with possible future strategic defenses for both sides, are the most promising avenues to eliminate the danger of nuclear war. We regret that the Soviet Union to date has been unwilling to negotiate in concrete and detailed terms to achieve such reductions in Geneva. In this respect not only have they failed to address our desire for deep reductions and enhanced stability, but they have not been willing to present specific numerical levels supporting their own approach.

While we believe the most direct path is through equitable, verifiable reductions, we also believe that verifiable limitations on nuclear testing can play a useful, though more modest role. For that reason, President Reagan, in his speech to the U.N. General Assembly on September 24, 1984, proposed that the Soviet Union and the U.S. exchange visits of experts to measure directly at nuclear test sites the yields of nuclear weapons tests. The President views this proposal as a means to increase confidence in verifiable limits on underground testing. To date, the Soviet Union has refused to agree to this practical and fairminded approach.

As a demonstration of our seriousness, the President has extended to the Soviet leadership our invitation for a Soviet team to observe and to measure a nuclear test at our Nevada test site. This offer, which is unconditional, is a unilateral step which clearly demonstrates the U.S. intention to go the extra mile. The Soviet experts are invited to bring any instrumentation devices that the Soviet Union deems necessary to measure the yield of this test. This U.S. initiative demonstrates our commitment to achieving verifiable limitations in nuclear testing.

We would welcome Soviet interest in joining us in developing and putting into place truly verifiable and durable limits on nuclear testing. We believe the President's initiative is the most practical approach to begin addressing this serious problem. We reiterate there are no conditions to this far-reaching offer, and we look forward to a positive and timely Soviet response.

The Government of Japan today announced its Action Program for Imports. This program is to be the framework for Japan's market-opening activities over the next 3 years. It fulfills a commitment by Prime Minister Nakasone to provide such a program by the end of July; however, it is difficult to determine from the announcement whether the program will remove the bulk of these barriers in a timely fashion. So, we must reserve judgment until the effect of the program on our exports is realized.

The program focuses on long-term access to the Japanese market. Effective implementation of its initiatives would remove numerous nontariff barriers to trade with Japan. While a long-term effort is welcome, earlier implementation would help resolve the crucial trade problems confronting us today.

The action plan focuses primarily on specific trade barriers, but the removal of such barriers will not result in more imports without an accompanying increase in the willingness of Japanese businessmen and consumers to purchase imported goods. We hope the Prime Minister's countrymen will heed his call to reevaluate and alter their attitudes toward imports. An encouraging note is the recognition of the need for domestic demand expansion, which would result in higher levels of imports. Also announced are steps on the path to capital market liberalization, which we have long encouraged. We are especially aware of the need to improve investment opportunities in Japan.

This program comes at a crucial time in Japan's trading relations with us and with her other trading partners. While United States relations with Japan are amicable and cooperative in nearly all respects, trade issues have been a source of deep and growing concern. U.S. firms believe strongly that they have less access and opportunity to compete in the Japanese market than Japanese firms enjoy here. The administration has made righting this imbalance of market opportunities a number one priority with Japan. We will continue discussions with Japan in an ongoing effort to resolve these troublesome trade frictions. This afternoon the Economic Policy Council will begin a thorough examination and analysis of the plan. We will have more to say upon completion of this review.

Today Secretary [of State] Shultz and the Foreign Ministers of those nations, East and West as well as neutral and nonaligned, are meeting again in the capital of Finland to commemorate this important event.

Today I reaffirm our commitment to those principles and our equally firm dedication to give them meaning in the daily lives of all citizens whose governments have undertaken the obligations contained in the Helsinki Final Act.

The CSCE process has long been a source of hope that the division of Europe can be overcome and that the human freedoms enjoyed in the West will be honored and respected throughout the continent. The Helsinki process offers the peoples of East and West the way that, by patient and serious dialog, we can improve the lives of our individual citizens and increase security and cooperation among our states.

Sadly, despite some gains, the Soviet Union and several other signatories of the Helsinki Act have failed to keep their promises. Despite the solemn pledge that citizens have the right ``to know and act upon'' their rights, brave men and women have suffered for taking this commitment by their governments seriously. Those who have tried to exercise freedoms of religion, thought, conscience, and belief have often paid a tragic price. The Helsinki accords called for freer movement of people and ideas across the European divide, but that flow remains impeded, and in the case of the Soviet Union it is but a trickle.

The Helsinki accords and the Madrid concluding document of 1983 provided standards by which to judge the conduct of the 35 participating states and set down a process which can be used to ensure accountability. The United States will continue to uphold these standards and press for compliance with them. We consider this a commitment on the part of all those who voluntarily subscribed to the Final Act of the Helsinki accords.

As we mark this 10th anniversary and reflect on the hopes initially raised by the CSCE process, it is time to renew our efforts to ensure that those hopes were not totally without foundation. We rededicate ourselves to the code of conduct embodied in the Helsinki Final Act. We call upon all of those who participate with us in CSCE to fulfill their pledges. With commitment and determination, we can make the promise of the Helsinki accords' first 10 years the reality of this second decade of CSCE.

The President today announced his intention to nominate L. William Seidman to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation for a term of 6 years. He would succeed William M. Isaac.

The entertainment industry in America today has an enormous ability to inform and educate at the same time that it entertains. This fact is especially well-known to the thirty-six million Americans with disabilities, because they are aware of the concerted efforts being made by the entertainment industry to dispel the unfair stereotypes that still hinder the progress of disabled people in our society.

One of the most important messages the entertainment industry is delivering to the public is that people with disabilities can live full and rewarding lives. They ask only to be given the same opportunities to compete and achieve as everyone else. To provide them with this opportunity is not only fair, but makes available to society a rich pool of talents and ambitions that would otherwise be lost.

The entertainment industry deserves to be commended for its role in making these worthy developments possible. Because of the industry's continuing efforts, Americans with disabilities can look forward to brighter futures, filled with the wide variety of opportunities they deserve.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirtieth day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

Private Sector Survey on Cost Control conducted systematic studies of agencies to determine more effective and efficient approaches to delivering services to the public. Thousands of recommendations were made and a large number have been and are being implemented.

The Congress has also supported our efforts by giving the Executive branch important tools to improve efficiency, including milestone legislation such as the Paperwork Reduction Act, the Congressional Reports Elimination Acts, the Prompt Payment Act, the Debt Collection Act, and the Deficit Reduction Act.

Today, I am requesting your further assistance to build on this foundation of progress through your continued support of our efforts to improve government performance. I am also asking you to pass a joint resolution establishing productivity improvement as a national goal and to enact management legislation that is critical to further improving the government's operations and reducing its costs. Together we can enhance our government's ability to use business-like procedures, providing the public with higher quality and more timely services at a lower cost -- an objective shared by the Congress and the Executive branch.

The need for and importance of improving the efficiency with which the Federal government delivers goods and services to the American public cannot be overstated. The Federal government now accounts for 24.6% of the GNP. If we pattern our productivity efforts after those which have proven the most productive in the private sector, it is reasonable to expect that we could match or exceed the private sector's gains, which have recently climbed to about 3% per year.

The President's Management Improvement Program: Reform '88 has provided a solid foundation upon which to base this productivity improvement program, as great strides have been made in establishing effective cash and credit management programs, improving agency management systems, lowering administrative costs, and reducing waste and fraud. Some of our Federal agencies have already demonstrated that they can make real improvements in productivity when they commit their time and talent.

The success of this effort will be reinforced by an early expression of Congressional resolve to make productivity improvement a national goal. Each department and agency will report to me through the Office of Management and Budget on their productivity goals, and on both the progress and the problems in accomplishing them. On the basis of that report, our annual management report to the Congress, which is part of the budget, will also describe our efforts to achieve productivity improvements.

Reform '88, I have directed the Office of Management and Budget and agencies to transmit legislative proposals which would make it possible to improve substantially the effectiveness of the Executive branch. These management legislative initiatives cover the important areas of fraud prevention, payment integrity and simplification, procurement, reorganization authority, and reduction in regulatory and paperwork burdens. Some of these proposals have already been sent to the Congress, and others will be transmitted in the days ahead. I want to stress that each of these proposals plays an important role in improving government's management, reducing fraud and waste, or improving productivity. I hope that the Congress can enact them promptly.

Now is the time for us to redouble our efforts to improve the operations of government. The budget deficit, the need to make programs more responsive to their beneficiaries, the complexity of the problems we face, and the very size of government itself all require us to apply the best methods and procedures available to improve productivity. Enactment of the various legislative proposals outlined here will enable us to continue and strengthen our joint effort to improve government management.

Passage of these proposals will demonstrate our commitment to increased productivity and improved management practices in the Federal government. The American people want and deserve a Federal government that is fair, efficient, effective, and, above all, productive.

Federal government and ensure wiser use of each tax dollar, while simultaneously making government more responsive to the needs of our constituency -- the American public. Some observers of government activities have often said it was ``mission impossible,'' but through our progress so far, we have proved them wrong.

Improvement Program: Reform '88. As a direct result of your efforts, we are instituting vigorous new controls on program growth, trimming administrative costs, reducing waste and fraud, and streamlining the Federal field structure.

These achievements are substantial and are a necessary first phase in making government work better. Now it is time to focus on the next phase of Reform '88: improving our delivery of goods and services to the public. To facilitate this effort, I have asked the Congress to demonstrate its support for a government-wide program to improve Federal productivity by passing a joint resolution declaring productivity improvement as a national goal. In addition, I am asking the Congress to pass a legislative program to improve government management tools by addressing specific problems relating to fraud prevention, payment integrity and simplification, procurement, reorganization authority, and reductions in regulatory and paperwork burdens.

While Congress works to enact these measures, there is much we can do to lay the groundwork as we enter the beginning stages of the FY '87 budget process. You should begin by identifying specific priorities which will improve service delivery and agency productivity. These initiatives should concentrate on those programs which make a real difference to the American public, as well as on internal administrative processes.

Through demonstrated ability to institute progressive change, we have begun to stem the public's disillusionment with the Federal government's capability to serve them well at a reasonable price. I know you have as one of your highest priorities completion of the next phase of our management improvement journey -- improved delivery of public services through higher quality, improved timeliness, and lower cost to the taxpayers.

Not many people, even here in Washington, could name our Nation's Budget Directors for the past twenty years. But just about everyone knows who has held that post for the past four and a half years. Your analytical intelligence and obvious devotion to the public interest quickly made you one of my most important advisers. The fresh approach you brought to budget issues, and your courage in confronting long-established special interests, earned you the respect even of those who opposed us in specific areas. Most importantly, you have shown that it is possible to reduce Federal spending without sacrificing vital human services.

Federal Budget, it is easy to become discouraged by the sheer magnitude of the task and to wonder if you are really making any progress. But the public tributes coming your way from every quarter are proof that you have indeed made a difference. Future OMB Directors will be measured against the standard of your performance, and they will find it a hard standard to match.

I do so with heartfelt gratitude for the opportunity you have given me to participate in an historic and momentous venture. You set out to change the course of American history and to steer the nation back to its true strength, prosperity and greatness. You have succeeded to a remarkable degree and with permanent effect. Even though difficult problems still lie ahead, our nation's direction and goals are clear once again.

I will always be proud of whatever contributions I have made along the way. More importantly, I will always cherish the kindness, consideration and patience you afforded me -- sometimes under very trying circumstances. Changing decades' old habits and policies has necessarily given rise to contention and disagreements among all of us entrusted with the responsibilities of governance.

As you know, Jennifer and I are now the parents of a three-month old daughter. Just as Rachel is the pride of our lives, I know that someday the pride of her's will be that her father was privileged to serve President Ronald Reagan. With your leadership America was put on a new path that will mean a bright and hopeful future for her and millions of her fellow citizens. For this, we will always be grateful.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Guy Rice Doud to be a member of the Commission on Presidential Scholars during his tenure as National Teacher of the Year. He would succeed Therese Dozier.

This Agreement is one of a series negotiated in accordance with the Act. We have not sought to renegotiate the agreement for a number of reasons, and it has been extended for periods of one year to eighteen months since July 1982. The extension of this Agreement will permit U.S. fishermen to continue cooperative fisheries arrangements with Soviet fishermen. Unless the Agreement is extended these operations will cease, causing significant financial hardship to U.S. fishermen.

Literacy is not only necessary for making one's way in our complex society but also a necessary skill for citizens who wish to participate fully in our democratic society. A recent study indicates that as many as one in every eight American adults may be ``functionally illiterate.'' In light of the billions of dollars spent on private and public education, this is a disturbing fact.

Shortly after taking office, I created the Adult Literacy Initiative to address the growing urgency of this issue. Since then, we have seen a tremendous outpouring of support from the American people. The number of volunteer literacy tutors has increased dramatically, more public-private partnerships are being forged, and illiteracy has become a key concern at all levels of State and local government. Still, many people who need help in developing literacy skills are unaware of the services available to them. National Literacy Day provides an opportunity to alert every American to this problem and to the resources available to the dedicated men and women who so selflessly devote their energies to helping other people improve their reading and writing skills.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this first day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

America is a land of expanding economic opportunity in which each and every person can play a part based on talent and initiative. The openness and flexibility of our free market economy makes it unique among the countries of the world.

The spirit of our democracy affirms that unhindered opportunity for all Americans is essential to our economic well-being. That our citizens should be judged on the content of their character and be able to advance according to merit and achievement is an economic as well as a moral imperative.

To remain the leader in bringing new products and services to the marketplace, and to successfully compete with products made abroad, we must do everything in our power to continue providing the widest possible economic opportunity for all Americans. We must also continue expanding opportunities to ensure strong growth for minority businesses. These businesses are adding jobs to industries that only a few years ago barely existed. The many contributions made by these companies will help generate the managerial and technological developments and the skilled and experienced work force necessary to strengthen and build the American economy in an era of vigorous international competition.

Sec. 2. There is hereby delegated to the Secretary of State the authority vested in the President by Section 102(a) of the Act (5 U.S.C. 5702(a)) to establish maximum rates of per diem allowances and reimbursements for the actual and necessary expenses of official travel for employees of the Government to the extent that such authority pertains to travel status in localities (including the Trust Territories of the Pacific Islands) in any area situated outside the United States, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, and the possessions of the United States.

In my last report, I noted that on March 29 the United Nations Secretary General gave Greek and Turkish Cypriot representatives a draft framework agreement. That draft agreement contained an outline for an overall settlement and a specified process with summit meetings and working groups for reaching that desirable goal. Acceptance of the agreement would have led to immediate negotiations on all the outstanding issues, including such key questions as troop withdrawal, guarantees, and the ``three freedoms'' (freedom of settlement, freedom of movement, and the right to property).

During the period since my last report, American officials have continued their active efforts in support of the Secretary General's approach. It remains our view that his initiative presents the leaders of the two Cypriot communities with an historic opportunity to begin a process toward peace and reconciliation. We have continued to express our hope that they would embark on this path. We also stated our view that the Secretary General's ``integrated-whole'' concept, under which ``nothing is final until everything is final,'' would protect the interests of the parties throughout the negotiating process envisioned in the recent framework agreement.

The Turkish Cypriots have accepted the March 29 draft framework agreement. The Greek Cypriots have not accepted the document and instead have proposed the convening of an international conference or a high-level meeting between the leaders of the two Cypriot communities. The Secretary General summarized his view of the current situation in a June 11 report to the Security Council, which I have attached. He stated that since one side is not yet in a position to accept the March 29 draft framework agreement, the way is not yet open to proceed with the negotiations he has proposed for an overall solution. He added that, under the circumstances, the way forward will require careful reflection by all concerned.

We continue to believe that the Secretary General's effort offers the best prospect for achieving progress toward a just and lasting Cyprus settlement. The Secretary General will have our full confidence and support as he proceeds with his good offices mission. We urge the parties to work constructively with him in order to move forward toward a negotiated solution.

Since 1985 Mr. Boynton has been director for management development programs and director for the Pakistan development support training project since 1984. Since 1979, he has also been serving as a senior program officer with the Academy for Educational Development. Mr. Boynton first became affiliated with the academy in 1976 when he served as director for communication planning programs, and since that time he has developed and directed projects to assist less-developed countries in communications, education, and population studies funded by the U.S. Agency for International Development. The programs that he has supervised have aided Indonesia, Egypt, Peru, Honduras, Bahrain, and Bolivia. From 1970 to 1975, he was an education adviser with the U.S. Agency for International Development.

The President announced today that a provisional agreement has been reached to keep European Community agricultural markets open to U.S. exports. The agreement was reached after the United States threatened retaliation in the face of proposed EC tariffs in connection with the expansion of the EC to include Spain and Portugal. This agreement is important for American farmers in that it will allow U.S. exports of corn and sorghum to Spain to continue while further negotiations are conducted under the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade.

The President applauds the EC's flexibility in helping to avert a confrontation on this issue. He also congratulates U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter and Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng for skillfully negotiating this interim solution. He believes this arrangement will enhance the administration's policy of expanding trade through reduced protectionist barriers and increased fairness for U.S. exporters.

The dispute arose over new EC measures which took effect March 1, which had the potential of restricting over $600 million in U.S. farm exports to Spain. On March 31 the President announced his intention to take action against the new restrictions absent progress with the EC in resolving the dispute.

Mr. Kast is the chairman of the executive committee of DP Corporate Services, Inc., a computer services company in Livonia, MI. He is also serving as a management and marketing consultant to small and emerging businesses.

With the increasing mobility of persons and goods, there has been a growing awareness of the need for a form of will that will be widely accepted, regardless of where the testator may be domiciled or residing or where his property may be located at the time of his death. American probate law experts participated actively in the preparatory studies for the Convention, which was adopted at a diplomatic conference hosted by the United States at Washington in 1973. Ratification of the Convention by the United States has been recommended by the American College of Probate Counsel and the American Bar Association, as well as by the Secretary of State's Advisory Committee on Private International Law, on which leading national legal organizations are represented.

Countries ratifying or acceding to the Convention are required to introduce into their domestic law the rules regarding an international will that are set forth in an annex to the Convention. To give full effect to the Convention in the United States, implementing legislation will be required at the Federal level. Legislation will also be required in those States of the United States that wish to make it possible for testators to execute international wills in their jurisdiction. The distinctions between the two types of legislation are described in the accompanying report from the Department of State. As noted in that report, four States have already adopted the Uniform International Wills Act, in anticipation of United States ratification of the Convention, and it is expected that many more States will do so once ratification is assured. The United States instrument of ratification of the Convention will be deposited only after the necessary Federal legislation is enacted.

I have today signed H.R. 4515, the Urgent Supplemental Appropriations Act, 1986. The act provides urgently needed funds for the Commodity Credit Corporation, the Internal Revenue Service, Federal courts, disaster relief, and a number of other domestic programs, and for the enhancement of embassy security, as well as assistance for the Philippines and Ireland. The act also increases the mortgage loan insurance commitment limitation to accommodate the increased demand for Federal Housing Administration mortgage insurance.

H.R. 4515 specifies that certain loans held by the Federal Financing Bank and guaranteed by the Rural Electrification Administration could be prepaid without payment of the normal premium charged by the Federal Financing Bank. This provision was substantially improved in conference and later on the House and Senate floors by significantly reducing the number of utilities that can qualify for prepayment without the normal premium.

In signing this bill, I am assured that the prepayment provision is intended to be targeted carefully to assist only those REA guaranteed borrowers most in need of this form of financial assistance. It is my further understanding that regulations will be issued to establish conditions and criteria that will be formulated to ensure that such prepayment benefits have no adverse effect on the Federal Financing Bank and are extended only to the most financially troubled borrowers.

I am signing this bill into law with the further understanding that section 204 of title II restricts the use of appropriated funds only in connection with the preparation, promulgation, or implementation of new regulations of the type described in that section and in no other way restricts the ability of the executive branch to administer the program referred to therein, by Executive order, by implementation of existing regulations, or otherwise.

On July 3, the eve of the 210th anniversary of the signing of the Declaration of Independence, the torch of the newly restored Statue of Liberty in New York Harbor will be lit again. Its radiant beams held high above the dark waters will once again signal freedom's light and freedom's welcome.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 2nd day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

Since 1820, more than 52 million immigrants have come to the United States from all over the world. They have sought and found a new and better life for themselves and their children in this land of liberty and opportunity. The magnet that draws them is freedom and the beacon that guides them is hope. America offers liberty for all, encourages hope for betterment, and nurtures great expectations. In this free land a person can realize his dreams -- going as far as talent and drive can carry him. In return America asks each of us to do our best, to work hard, to respect the law, to cherish human rights, and to strive for the common good.

The immigrants who have so enriched America include people from every race, creed, and ethnic background. Yet all have been drawn here by shared values and a deep love of freedom. Most brought with them few material goods. But with their hearts and minds and toil they have contributed mightily to the building of this great Nation and endowed us with the riches of their achievements. Their spirit continues to nourish our own love of freedom and opportunity.

For more than three centuries, a human tide of men, women, and children have become new Americans. They have brought to us strength and moral fiber developed in civilizations centuries old, but fired anew by the dream of a better life in America. They have brought to us in this young country the treasure of a hundred ancient cultures. Their dreams gave them the courage to strike out for themselves, to leave behind familiar scenes, to part with friends and relatives, and to start a new life in a new land. The record of their success in every field of human endeavor is one of our proudest boasts. They have helped to make us the great Nation we are today.

Q. Mr. President, I wanted to open by asking you a question that one of my editors wanted us to ask you, but it may require some participation on your part. I mean, you may even have to stand up or something.

Q. Oh, okay. We wanted to ask you on the eve of this Liberty Weekend and your trip to New York to celebrate the Statue -- a couple of questions about that. Do you think it's time for Lady Liberty to put up her hand and say ``Stop'' to immigration at the Mexican border?

The President. Oh, I'm supporting the immigration bill because I think we have to have rules and regulations, and I think what that bill is meant to correct is some loss of control at our borders, where illegal immigration is threatening us now. No, we have to have control and have had; it's been traditional in our country for many years. And I agree with that, and I agree with the part of the legislation which says that some people -- even if they did illegally enter the country in times past -- have established themselves, have been law-abiding, raised children, and so forth here -- that there should be a provision whereby their status can be made legal and permanent.

The President. Yes. And I've never yielded on that point. I know that it is a difficult situation, and we want to remain in contact and be able to help bring about a change. I don't think anyone can support the policy of apartheid morally. And I know that the present government has taken steps, wants to find a solution to this problem, is opposed by another faction that does not want to change, just as sometimes we're opposed here in our own country with political factions.

Q. What things do you point to that they -- you say they want to find a solution and that they've arrested 3,000 people -- leaders, black leaders, put them in jail; they've got a state of emergency. How does this balance out? I mean, what kind of things have they done?

The President. Well, we have expressed our displeasure with the state of emergency. What we believe is that there must come a meeting and negotiations between leaders of the various black elements and the present government as to the formation of a government. Now, they've taken such steps as single citizenship already. They've done some things about the onerous pass laws and all of that -- the right of labor unions and so forth.

The President. Well, we're continuing to try, and I think that we have a better chance by remaining in contact with that government than following the lead that's been suggested up on the Hill with some legislation in which we would walk totally away and then be on the outside with no contact at all. I think that we have a long history, a relationship between the two countries, and that this is what has enabled us to keep a hand in so far.

Q. Mr. President, may I switch subjects on you? Vice President Bush said a couple of weeks ago that the administration was considering use of the military on drug smuggling. In light of the recent deaths of some famous athletes, I wonder what thoughts you have, whether you've made a decision?

The President. Well, remember, right now we have some participation by military, and I don't think that he was talking about making policemen out of soldiers at all. We had a task force that we set up down when Florida was the great entry point. And it was probably the first, most successful working together of levels of law enforcement at local, State, and Federal, and the various agencies of all of those working together, plus help from the military with radar, Coast Guard -- things of that kind. And it was so successful that we now have 12 of those task forces working because of the extensive borders and coastlines that we have. And we're always watching; if there are more opportunities for increasing that kind of cooperation, to deal with the problem of drugs coming into the country. Again, as I say, we want to draw the line at not saying that we're suddenly going to make our military have a police capability.

The President. Well, yes, and, as I say, if increasing that will help, because we already have that at work. I might also add that the military, like every other facet of our society, had its own problem with drugs internally. And they have done a magnificent job. They have virtually reduced it almost to zero in the military. I think what we have to face is there is a limit to what success we can have with simply trying to shut off the inflow of drugs, to take the drugs away from the users.

I know that what Nancy's been engaged in is, I think, what ultimately must be the answer, and that is to take the user away from the drugs, to turn the users off. And I think the terrible tragedy of these two young men and what has happened to them -- that maybe their lives would have had and will have a real meaning if we will, from them, move on to utilize all the resources we have.

Now, I know that Nancy has participated in movements all over the country that are showing remarkable success -- the ``Just Say No'' movement among children is having a great effect and the way parents have suddenly moved forward to enter into this battle. But that's going to be the only way, eventually, that we'll resolve it -- is when we, the people and as individuals and as groups, say we've had enough of this, and we're going to stop feeding the monsters money so they can continue their living in style at the cost of health and the life of our young people.

I would think that these two athletes, also -- this could be a great example to the athletes in our country, the professionals who are such heroes to our young people and to children -- for them to recognize their responsibility and for them to organize and take a position in this fight.

Q. New subject: Soviet dancing of late seems that you are a madly-in-love suitor courting this coy woman over in the Kremlin sometimes. You two seem to be in your own little dance. Are you planning to write to him soon?

The President. Yes. We have an answer in which he has made additional proposals with regard to not only the subject of arms control but the other things we discussed at Geneva, which had to do with the regional conflicts going on in the world, had to do with human rights and emigration and so forth. And we have that letter in our possession, and we're putting together our own reply because, again, I think it opened additional doors that make me optimistic that we're not only going to have a summit but that we're going to have a summit where we can reach agreement on some of the things that we obviously -- or the goals that we share. We have said from the very beginning that we would like a reduction of nuclear weapons, leading to the ultimate elimination of such weapons. Well, now they have said the same thing. And if we both want the same thing, we ought to be able to find a way to reach that goal.

The President. I can't remember the exact number of pages, but it was quite a packet -- and worthwhile. And so, we're studying that and our own reply, and, as I say, I hope that this will all become part of the agenda of a summit meeting.

The President. No. That, as you know, they had called off earlier on when we thought it was going to be held in July. We believe that there was some reason for that because this is a new administration there, and maybe we had been overly optimistic as to how quickly they could get together and move forward. But now we have reason to believe that such a meeting is possible.

Q. Besides your good lady, Mr. President, who is a good friend of yours; who is someone that you call up to talk about -- those deep nights of the soul, when you have those kinds of questions? Or do you ever have those?

The President. Well, as you know, we try to keep all former Presidents informed of things that are going on -- check with them, get their thinking, and so forth. And he is one of those -- and particularly has he been helpful in foreign affairs.

The President. I have done that, because he and I had a long friendship that, as fellow Californians, went back many years -- long before either one of us, I think, ever thought we would be in the present position. And so there is, I think, a closer bond. My acquaintanceship with the most recent is very slight. I knew him slightly, or for a short time, when we were Governors together. And then my relationship with President Ford was much more recent than that.

Q. Mr. President, we had good news this morning in the release of an American in Beirut, not usually counted among the Americans held there. I wondered what your view is about whether that will improve the chances of the others.

But, yes, that would -- the only problem is there is such a variety of groups that what one group may do may not have an effect on the other. Now, we know, with those hostages that we've been working so long and so hard at, the four or five that are still there -- we know that that particular group is the one known as the Hizballah. And there has never been a minute -- contrary to what some people think -- that we have not been working and following every lead we can that could lead to their release. And we've had some sharp disappointments when we thought maybe we were making some progress. But those disappointments don't stop us from continuing to try. So, I'll have to wait until I find out who this individual is and what group held him.

Mr. Speakes.  --  -- I think he got involved there with a faction of something. He had been held since the fall. We hadn't been directly involved in it except to pass along the message that, to whoever we could, that we would like him freed.

The President. Well, the evidence certainly has been inconclusive, and we know that he was a member of the military, but then so were a great many people. But so far, there seems to be great controversy over to what extent he might have participated in the terrible deeds that made up the Holocaust, and until we do know, why I think that we should hold our fire.

The President. Well, I have no plans for such a thing, but we continue to, again, listen. And I think some investigation is going forward in our own Justice Department to see if we can find out, because we do have some laws that are based on war crimes. And so we are trying to find out for ourselves legally what his position is.

The President. May I just top that with one thing, though? We must remember our relationship with Austria is a relationship between two nations, and Austria and the United States have had a friendly relationship and one which we hope will be maintained.

The President. Well, my own personal desire would be that we can go forward with what had been a tremendously successful program. No decision has been made. We've turned over the Rogers report [on the Challenger accident] to NASA, to Jim Fletcher there for him to take action on the things that are called for in that. One of our problems is that this tragedy has brought about a backlog of satellites for transport into space, and this may call, in an effort to reduce that backlog, may call for some immediate emphasis on unmanned launchers. And all of this is in the mill right now, and no final decision has been made.

Q. Do you worry that the recent space disasters could impact the SDI program? Does it trouble you that there are articles being written, America can't get anything into the sky -- how could we possibly have a defense shield?

The President. Well, I think before we get around to anything of that kind, we are still in such a state of research, although great progress is being made. I am amazed. But we still have some years of research ahead of us on this before -- and I think the other problem will be taken care of long before there is any need for testing.

The President. No, I'll tell you again. The Lord has been very good to me. When I was a sports announcer, I loved that, and I believed that that would probably be my career on out and was very happy with it. And then the opportunity came to switch to what originally had been a love of mine -- acting -- and I enjoyed that very much. I was a reluctant entrant into public life. I never believed for one minute that I would ever be tempted to want to serve in public office. As I say, I was so happy in what I was doing. And I was really kind of dragged kicking and screaming into seeking the governorship and thought that what I was doing was kind of a very temporary thing, because it was put to me on the basis that, with our party very divided after the '64 campaign, at odds that I might be able to help bring the party together, and that I offered a chance for victory in that gubernatorial race. And I've often said that I think when I finally, grudgingly, said yes that I really thought no farther than the election. They kept stressing that so much that it wasn't until after I had said yes that I said, hey, if I win this it goes on beyond November.

The President. Well, I'll tell you, I'm very grateful for that period there, because I think the closest thing to the Presidency in line of a job is being a Governor. There you sit at a desk in which the buck does stop when it gets there, and there's a great similarity. We are a federation of sovereign States, and so, the Governor sits closest to the salt in his State, above anyone except The President.

Q. Karen mentioned the whir of helicopters. I've often wondered how you feel when you come back from Camp David and the helicopter lands and the noise is horrendous and reporters are shouting questions at you -- what goes through your mind when that happens?

The President. Of course, there is a difference in size and opulence and so forth of this office. But, as I say, you're prepared for some of the things. It wasn't the great surprise that it must be to some other people who had not previously sat there and known that every day someone was going to put a schedule in front of them of what they were going to be doing every 15 minutes. I will say this, however, it took me quite a while to not turn around and look behind me when they played ``Ruffles and Flourishes'' -- [laughter] -- I was still wondering who they were doing that for. And it, well, I guess I can only tell you that the way I accept this is that maybe some people become President -- I don't know. I think the Presidency is an institution over which you have temporary custody.

The President. She does carry a purse. But I'll tell you, anytime I travel I wear a particular pair of cufflinks. They were given to me by Nancy, and they are made in the image of a page of a calendar in the month of March with a little stone on the 4th of March, which is our wedding anniversary.

Like all great holidays, the Fourth of July brings to mind the traditional ways we celebrate: dazzling fireworks displays light the skies; march music fills the air; parades with flags and floats and blaring bands brighten the broad avenues of our cities and the main streets of our small towns; families get together with friends and neighbors for picnics and barbecues; patriotic songs stir the heart. These are the images -- glad, bright, and touching -- that we have come to associate with the Fourth of July from the time we were children.

It is altogether fitting that we should celebrate this day with great joy, because it is the birthday of our beloved country. It is especially fitting that it should be celebrated as a family holiday and a community holiday, because it commemorates our solemn bonding together as a new nation -- the American Family.

It is a day not only for celebration but also for reflection -- a day to ponder what it was that forged 13 diverse colonies into an unbreakable union that has endured and grown and prospered for more than two centuries. What was the secret that emboldened a loose confederation of some two and a half million settlers on the Eastern rimland of the New World to challenge the might of the most powerful colonial empire on earth?

Quite simply, it was the courage and the vision of our Founding Fathers. They seized the unique historical moment Providence had placed within their grasp. Determined to protect and guarantee fundamental human rights, they felt called upon to bring our nation into being.

In order to give that new nation shape and direction they drew freely on the riches of the Judeo-Christian tradition with its central affirmation that God, not chance, rules in the affairs of men, and that each of us has an inviolable dignity because we have been fashioned in the image and likeness of our Creator. The Founding Fathers established a nation under God, ruled not by arbitrary decrees of kings or the whims of entrenched elites but by the consent of the governed. Theirs was the vision of a striving, God-fearing, self-reliant people living in the sunlight of justice and breathing the bracing air of liberty.

As the years unrolled, generations of Americans painted that vision across the broad canvass of the continent. It has always been the secret of our progress, our power, and our prosperity. Whenever we have allowed it to fade we have done so at our peril. Whenever it has burned bright we have amazed the world with our inventiveness, our daring, our achievements, and our magnanimity.

Through the years, America's promise of liberty and justice for all served as a magnet, drawing to our shores millions of people yearning to breathe the heady air of freedom. They flocked here from every continent, bringing with them the riches of their customs and their cultures; precious strands of every color, tone, and texture, to be woven into the rich tapestry of America.

In order to make headway toward our goal of reducing conventional forces in Europe in an equitable manner, the Western proposal of last December accepted the East's own framework for a first-phase agreement of limited duration. Under such an approach, there would be initial United States and Soviet reductions followed by a no-increase commitment on the forces in the area of all of the participants to the agreement. Most significantly, in the interest of meeting stated Eastern concerns, the West offered to set aside its longstanding requirement that East and West reach prior agreement on the levels of the forces which would be subject to an agreement. Unfortunately, the draft agreement which the East introduced on February 20, 1986, was woefully inadequate, particularly with respect to the vital issue of verification. Despite the recent assertions of Eastern leaders that their governments were willing to agree to reasonable verification measures, the East fell back on old proposals which had previously been rejected by the West as incapable of ensuring compliance with treaty obligations. Indeed, the East even backtracked from its earlier position on certain verification measures.

The United States and its allies will continue to make every effort to reach an equitable agreement in MBFR, as well as in other arms control areas. A significant move by the Warsaw Pact in the direction of the West in the Vienna negotiations would be an excellent first step in demonstrating whether the Warsaw Pact is indeed seriously interested in strengthening European security.

July 6, 1986, marks the fiftieth anniversary of the establishment of an airways traffic control system by the United States Bureau of Air Commerce. In that fifty-year period, the Nation's air traffic control system has evolved from reliance on relatively simple, unsophisticated equipment and procedures to today's highly sophisticated automated system, which safely and efficiently handles millions of flights each year and serves as a model for the world aviation community.

With the commitment and skill of thousands of Federal Aviation Administration employees, including air traffic controllers, electronic technicians, and engineers, the national air traffic control system offers a high level of safety and efficiency that has been its proud hallmark. Thus, as we celebrate National Air Traffic Control Day, let us remember with gratitude those who have dedicated themselves to making the system what it is today, and let us thank those who are working to make it even better for tomorrow.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 3rd day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

While we applaud those immigrants who stand out, whose contributions are easily discerned, we know that America's heroes are also those whose names are remembered by only a few. Many of them passed through this harbor, went by this lady, looked up at her torch, which we light tonight in their honor.

They were the men and women who labored all their lives so that their children would be well fed, clothed, and educated, the families that went through great hardship yet kept their honor, their dignity, and their faith in God. They passed on to their children those values, values that define civilization and are the prerequisites of human progress. They worked in our factories, on ships and railroads, in stores, and on road construction crews. They were teachers, lumberjacks, seamstresses, and journalists. They came from every land.

What was it that tied these profoundly different people together? What was it that made them not a gathering of individuals, but a nation? That bond that held them together, as it holds us together tonight, that bond that has stood every test and travail, is found deep in our national consciousness: an abiding love of liberty. For love of liberty, our forebears -- colonists, few in number and with little to defend themselves -- fought a war for independence with what was then the world's most powerful empire. For love of liberty, those who came before us tamed a vast wilderness and braved hardships which, at times, were beyond the limits of human endurance. For love of liberty, a bloody and heart-wrenching civil war was fought. And for love of liberty, Americans championed and still champion, even in times of peril, the cause of human freedom in far-off lands.

On this theme the poet Emma Lazarus, moved by this unique symbol of the love of liberty, wrote a very special dedication 100 years ago. The last few lines are ones we know so well; set to the music of Irving Berlin, they take on tonight a special meaning.

We are the keepers of the flame of liberty. We hold it high tonight for the world to see, a beacon of hope, a light unto the nations. And so with joy and celebration and with a prayer that this lamp shall never be extinguished, I ask that you all join me in this symbolic act of faith, this lighting of Miss Liberty's torch.

It will speak to us of the past, of the days when great ships like these dropped anchor in our harbors to unload tea from China, whale oil from open seas, and, yes, immigrants from around the world. It will speak to us of present and future amity between our nation and the many nations that have sent ships here today to lend their beauty -- the curve of their hulls, the lines of their masts and rigging as they stand out against the sea, the sky -- to our rejoicing. Passing in review today we see more than 20 of the 30 or so tall ships that are left in the world. The U.S. Coast Guard bark Eagle will lead the procession. Schooners, barks, brigantines, and ketches from more than 30 countries are entering the harbor.

Somehow, men have always found moving the sight of these vessels of wood and metal and canvas. Indeed, some centuries ago one writer of proverbs described as ``wonderful the way of a ship in the midst of a sea.'' Perhaps it has something to do with the knowledge that nothing binds sailing ships, nothing holds them back, that they can travel anywhere across the vast and trackless sea. Perhaps, indeed, these vessels embody our conception of liberty itself: to have before one no impediments, only open spaces; to chart one's own course and take the adventure of life as it comes; to be free as the wind -- as free as the tall ships themselves. It's fitting, then, that this procession should take place in honor of Lady Liberty. And as the wind swells the sails, so too may our hearts swell with pride that all that Liberty's sons and daughters have accomplished in this the land of the free. This spectacle has been literally years in the planning.

On behalf of the American people I want to thank Ambassador Bus Mosbacher and his entire Operation Sail staff for making this international celebration, this stately salute to Liberty. And now, Bus, where are you? Come forward.

President Reagan. I think I can answer that very easily. That happens to be a commercial undertaking, and it is a military team. And we cannot use the military in that sense in a commercial undertaking.

In a few moments the celebration will begin here in New York Harbor. It's going to be quite a show. I was just looking over the preparations and thinking about a saying that we had back in Hollywood about never doing a scene with kids or animals because they'd steal the scene every time. So, you can rest assured I wouldn't even think about trying to compete with a fireworks display, especially on the Fourth of July.

My remarks tonight will be brief, but it's worth remembering that all the celebration of this day is rooted in history. It's recorded that shortly after the Declaration of Independence was signed in Philadelphia celebrations took place throughout the land, and many of the former Colonists -- they were just starting to call themselves Americans -- set off cannons and marched in fife and drum parades.

What a contrast with the sober scene that had taken place a short time earlier in Independence Hall. Fifty-six men came forward to sign the parchment. It was noted at the time that they pledged their lives, their fortunes, and their sacred honors. And that was more than rhetoric; each of those men knew the penalty for high treason to the Crown. ``We must all hang together,'' Benjamin Franklin said, ``or, assuredly, we will all hang separately.'' And John Hancock, it is said, wrote his signature in large script so King George could see it without his spectacles. They were brave. They stayed brave through all the bloodshed of the coming years. Their courage created a nation built on a universal claim to human dignity, on the proposition that every man, woman, and child had a right to a future of freedom.

For just a moment, let us listen to the words again: ``We hold these truths to be self-evident, that all men are created equal, that they are endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable Rights, that among these are Life, Liberty, and the pursuit of Happiness.'' Last night when we rededicated Miss Liberty and relit her torch, we reflected on all the millions who came here in search of the dream of freedom inaugurated in Independence Hall. We reflected, too, on their courage in coming great distances and settling in a foreign land and then passing on to their children and their children's children the hope symbolized in this statue here just behind us: the hope that is America. It is a hope that someday every people and every nation of the world will know the blessings of liberty.

And I've seen the successors to these brave men, the young Americans in uniform all over the world, young Americans like you here tonight who man the mighty U.S.S. Kennedy and the Iowa and other ships of the line. I can assure you, you out there who are listening, that these young are like their fathers and their grandfathers, just as willing, just as brave. And we can be just as proud. But our prayer tonight is that the call for their courage will never come. And that it's important for us, too, to be brave; not so much the bravery of the battlefield, I mean the bravery of brotherhood.

All through our history, our Presidents and leaders have spoken of national unity and warned us that the real obstacle to moving forward the boundaries of freedom, the only permanent danger to the hope that is America, comes from within. It's easy enough to dismiss this as a kind of familiar exhortation. Yet the truth is that even two of our greatest Founding Fathers, John Adams and Thomas Jefferson, once learned this lesson late in life. They'd worked so closely together in Philadelphia for independence. But once that was gained and a government was formed, something called partisan politics began to get in the way. After a bitter and divisive campaign, Jefferson defeated Adams for the Presidency in 1800. And the night before Jefferson's inauguration, Adams slipped away to Boston, disappointed, brokenhearted, and bitter.

For years their estrangement lasted. But then when both had retired, Jefferson at 68 to Monticello and Adams at 76 to Quincy, they began through their letters to speak again to each other. Letters that discussed almost every conceivable subject: gardening, horseback riding, even sneezing as a cure for hiccups; but other subjects as well: the loss of loved ones, the mystery of grief and sorrow, the importance of religion, and of course the last thoughts, the final hopes of two old men, two great patriarchs, for the country that they had helped to found and loved so deeply. ``It carries me back,'' Jefferson wrote about correspondence with his cosigner of the Declaration of Independence, ``to the times when, beset with difficulties and dangers, we were fellow laborers in the same cause, struggling for what is most valuable to man, his right to self-government. Laboring always at the same oar, with some wave ever ahead threatening to overwhelm us and yet passing harmless . . . we rowed through the storm with heart and hand . . . .'' It was their last gift to us, this lesson in brotherhood, in tolerance for each other, this insight into America's strength as a nation. And when both died on the same day within hours of each other, that date was July 4th, 50 years exactly after that first gift to us, the Declaration of Independence.

My fellow Americans, it falls to us to keep faith with them and all the great Americans of our past. Believe me, if there's one impression I carry with me after the privilege of holding for 5\1/2\ years the office held by Adams and Jefferson and Lincoln, it is this: that the things that unite us -- America's past of which we're so proud, our hopes and aspirations for the future of the world and this much-loved country -- these things far outweigh what little divides us. And so tonight we reaffirm that Jew and gentile, we are one nation under God; that black and white, we are one nation indivisible; that Republican and Democrat, we are all Americans. Tonight, with heart and hand, through whatever trial and travail, we pledge ourselves to each other and to the cause of human freedom, the cause that has given light to this land and hope to the world.

Rudy Vallee was an American institution. A talented and creative pioneer in music, he delighted us all with his trademark raccoon coat and megaphone. His presence on the American music scene will always be remembered, and no one who saw Rudy on stage will ever forget the special magic he brought to his audiences. He was a dedicated patriot who interrupted his career to serve in the U.S. Coast Guard, and it was appropriate that Rudy's last moments were spent watching the illumination of the Statue of Liberty.

Well, I dare say we outdid them this time. In celebrating the statue, we're celebrating a great gift, the gift of one man with a vision, Frederic Bartholdi, who dedicated more than 20 years of his life to its realization. It was also the gift of one people who loved liberty to their brothers across the ocean, because all people who love liberty are truly brothers. Most of all, it was a gift not of governments, but of people, donating from their private savings, a gift of free people, giving freely. And isn't that appropriate for a statue dedicated to individual liberty? In this era of big government, we sometimes forget that many of our proudest achievements as a nation came not through government, but through private citizens, individuals whose genius and generosity flourished in this climate of freedom.

Some people look to the source of the American miracle in our abundant natural resources, others in the accident of history. But if you want to know the secret, you don't have to look any farther than that grand lady standing in New York Harbor. Freedom is the key. Freedom is what allowed individuals to make America great. Between the second and fourth of July, some 27,000 new Americans were sworn in across this country. Many of you saw the televised ceremony on Ellis Island. In these events, America makes a solemn bond with its new citizens and renews the promise to all that here is a refuge from oppression, here is a place where freedom and opportunity reign. The immigrant story has been repeated millions of times, stories such as that of one man who passed through Ellis Island years ago. A 15-year-old Italian immigrant who spoke not a word of English. Little did he imagine that his son, Antonin Scalia, would be appointed to the highest court in the land, there to uphold and protect our Constitution, the guardian of all our freedoms. Just one of many stories that shows us that every time we swear in a new citizen, America is rededicating herself to the cause of human liberty.

In these last couple of weeks we have rededicated ourselves to liberty in other important ways, too. Recently, the Congress has passed two landmark pieces of legislation that I'm sure put a smile on the face of our Statue of Liberty. The first was our historic effort to reform our nation's tax code, to make it simpler and fairer, to bring tax rates down, and to give families a long-overdue break. Throughout human history, taxes have been one of the foremost ways that governments intrude on the rights of citizens. In fact, as we all learned in school, our democratic American Revolution began with a tax revolt. Our forefathers knew that if you bind up a man's economic life with taxes, tariffs, and regulations, you deprive him of some of his most basic civil rights. They have a wonderful phrase describing economic liberty in the Declaration of Independence. They call it ``the pursuit of happiness.'' Well, with tax reform, we're going to make that pursuit a lot easier for all Americans.

The President today announced his intention to appoint John N. Lemasters to be a member of the President's National Security Telecommunications Advisory Committee. He would succeed Robert M. Flanagan.

The Supreme Court's decision today brings the focus of compliance with the Gramm-Rudman-Hollings deficit reduction targets back to where it belongs: on the Congress. In holding that the Comptroller General's role in the act's sequester process was unconstitutional, the Court has cleared the way for Congress itself to make the decisions necessary to achieve the deficit reduction targets for FY 1986 and FY 1987 and a balanced budget in FY 1991.

I believe the deficit targets of Gramm-Rudman-Hollings were and are a promise to the American people by their government -- a promise made only months ago -- to bring down the budget deficit over a period of years, starting with FY 1986. After the Supreme Court's decision today, I urge Congress to act promptly in order to make good on that pledge. Congress may do this for FY 1986 by acting immediately to ratify the February sequestrations of $11.7 billion. Since those cuts have already been absorbed, there is no reason for delay. For FY 1987 Congress must enact spending legislation that meets the $144 billion deficit target required by Gramm-Rudman-Hollings, without sacrificing our national defense or raising taxes.

The elimination of the Comptroller General's role in the sequester process should change little, except that now Congress must make the difficult choices. We were both elected by the American people to make these choices, and I call upon Congress to discharge its responsibilities and redeem its pledge.

The Highway Safety Act and the National Traffic and Motor Vehicle Safety Act, both enacted in 1966, initiated a national effort to reduce traffic deaths and injuries and require annual reports on the administration of the Acts. This is the 18th year that these reports have been prepared for your review.

I am especially proud that in 1984 we had the safest Christmas holiday season since the late 1940's. The national outrage over drunk driving, combined with tougher State laws, stepped-up enforcement, and private sector interest in the issue, have brought about a change in America's attitude about the use of alcohol and its consequences. I expect to see even more safety improvements in the years ahead.

Admiral Hyman G. Rickover was the father of the nuclear-powered Navy. His commitment to excellence and uncompromising devotion to duty were an integral part of American life for a generation. The nuclear-powered submarines, cruisers, and aircraft carriers deployed throughout the world today in defense of liberty are a major part of Admiral Rickover's legacy.

He was also a revered teacher who instilled in his pupils a desire to strive for the highest achievements. Countless thousands of sailors benefited from the skill and expertise of this talented public servant. Though he worked on tools of defense, he was a man of peace.

It is particularly poignant that his death should occur immediately following a weekend in which we celebrated the achievements of those Americans who came to our shores as immigrants. Few among them have had as distinguished a career as Admiral Rickover or contributed more to the maintenance of our freedom. We have lost a great American, and Nancy and I extend our deep sympathy to the Rickover family.

Mr. Drake. The first question I wanted to ask you, Mr. President, was about Ferdinand Marcos. And I wonder whether you feel, in the light of the events of the past months, whether he's abused the hospitality that you offered to him?

The President. No, I don't think so. And I can't put out of my mind the fact that -- and nor should any of us, I think -- that his leaving the islands was preceded by his denial of permission to the military, in that time of turbulence and street fighting and so forth, to take action, because the one thing he did not want was bloodshed or civil strife of that kind. And so, he left rather than permit that. And so, it still holds that he's welcome here as long as he wants to stay and can move on if he prefers.

The President. Well, at that time, and when I talked to him, he feels that he was elected President under their Constitution. The election was then certified by the legislature -- as I say, as their law called for. And he was talking in terms of hoping that there could be another test of this, another election in which he felt that he would be reestablished then as having been elected the President.

The President. Well, as I say, I don't know to what extent -- I haven't seen evidence to any extent that he's doing anything that has brought forth the little abortive coup that took place the other day.

The President. Well, I think the State Department made a statement that was more to that effect. And, as I say, that was one of the reasons why we tried to be helpful at the time when he left. We don't want the Philippines to descend into civil strife.

Mr. Drake. Let me switch to developments with the Soviet Union and the arms talks. In the last few weeks, ever since your SALT II decision, you and other White House officials have been fairly upbeat about what you consider to be the Soviets' attitude -- that they were being more serious and so forth.

Mr. Drake. And yet there doesn't seem to be any instances where you or officials have cited specifics. Can you share any specifics, either from Gorbachev's letter or from some of the specific proposals that we've seen from them recently, that gives some basis to this optimism?

The President. Well, yes. The very fact that here is, to my knowledge, the first Russian leader who has actually proposed reducing the number of weapons and who has also voiced the opinion that our goal should be the total elimination of nuclear weapons. Well, that's been our goal for years. In fact, I was campaigning on that in 1980 -- that I supported and would support and hoped that we could see the end of nuclear weapons -- total elimination. So, obviously there's more reason for optimism in this.

Now, as to specifics, let me point something out. The mix of weapons and all is such that you can have an agreement on an ultimate goal, like, for example, the proposal to cut the weapons by 50 percent. But then you can have disagreement on how do you best keep both sides equal while you're arriving at this with regard to the different mix. It isn't as if you're just talking about one specific kind of weapon. And let me point out that when we, in November, proposed an arms plan in response to some of his statements about the overall decrease in weapons, it took them until May to come back with their specific answer. Well, now, it's May, and -- no, it's only July yet, and we are working very hard on our response to his latest arms proposal. And we're very hopeful that we're coming closer to eliminating some of the differences under which we can say it's time now to come together on this.

The President. Well, yes, in that they are actually talking specific percentages and so forth of weapons. And this is unusual. This has not taken place before. And certainly we're going to give them the benefit of any doubt that they wouldn't be saying these things if they were not expecting us to come back with -- meeting that, as to whether we saw eye to eye with them on numbers and so forth. And, as I say, we're in the spirit of negotiation. That's what we're doing is framing our answer now.

Mr. Drake. Well, for instance, one of their reported offers -- in what some people seem to think is a fundamental change -- would permit research on SDI. Is that one of the things that we find promising, or is there a feeling here that that really isn't offering us a great deal?

The President. Well, we know that there are probably several years to go in the research that's carried on, and that is within the framework of present day treaties -- to conduct that kind of research. They have been doing that for much longer than we have, and we're aware of that.

Mr. Drake. What about the other proposal, that to some people stood out, as far as the Soviets' latest offer, was their proposal concerning forward-base systems and forward-base weapons -- the bombers and fighters on carriers within range of the Soviet Union and not counting them. Is that something that you consider an important departure for them?

The President. Well, yes. But this is what I mean about that mix of weapons that we all have. And we have felt -- now, maybe we'll have to change our mind on this -- we had felt for a time that the most destabilizing weapons were the intercontinental ballistic missiles -- that this is the one thing that when we say destabilizing, that when people think of nuclear war, they think of a button being pushed and 30 minutes later their world blows up. And so, we had thought if the approach could be to try and get at those weapons and arrive at some agreements and then take up the others -- because they have the other kind, too, just as we do. It's true they have placed greater reliance on the ballistic missile and we have placed more of ours on a triad, of having the submarine-launched, airborne, and the ballistic missile.

One of the reasons why the others are not as destabilizing is we are accustomed in the recent wars of weapons carrying -- or, I mean, submarines, ships, airplanes, carrying weapons that they can then launch or drop at the enemy place. And we know that there are defenses against those craft, that antiaircraft can shoot down an airplane or fighter planes, interceptors, can bring them down and so forth -- antisubmarine warfare.

The President. Oh, just recently somebody voiced this in a criticism of the whole thing in talking -- and, no, it never was. I was saying that the same destabilizing fear that people have of the, as I say, push the button and something blows up, does not apply to weapons carried by conventional craft. That's, in effect, what I was saying.

Mr. Drake. Well, I was curious whether in the letter you got from Chairman Gorbachev whether it was pretty much a formal document outlining their latest offers or whether there was anything of a personal nature that spoke to you?

Mr. Drake. One of the things I was curious about with the timing of the summit, if one happens, is that if it slips into 1987, as there has been some speculation, whether you would still be committed to going to Moscow in the same year?

The President. If it timed out that way. I am hoping, still, that the meeting will be held in '86. That was what we agreed to -- that an '86 meeting here and an '87 meeting in Moscow. If there are things that come up that make it impossible to have the meeting earlier than 1987, well, then, I think that the third meeting for Moscow would sort of have to be based on whatever the time spread was necessary to prepare for a third meeting.

Mr. Drake. How does the second meeting have to differ from the first meeting in terms of expectations, in terms of the necessity to arrive at some agreement by that point that's a little bit more concrete in the past?

The President. Well, I think, first of all, now we know each other. We have met. There have been discussions on these subjects. Remember that in that first meeting, for example, arms control or arms reductions -- this was just a subject in which there had been no real communication on details. At least now we would be sitting down, facing each other, with quite an experience between us of concrete offers and counteroffers to work on.

The President. Or if you could have one before that, it's all right with me. But I would hope that we could perhaps agree upon something that then, from maybe details, we would turn over to our negotiators in Geneva that we both have there.

Mr. Drake. One final question on the subject of the Soviets. There's some talk that your response to the Chairman is already drafted. Is there any way you could give some idea of how you're responding to him?

Mr. Drake. On turning to South Africa, there are a lot of people, including Republicans, who have been saying that we have not done enough to open ties with leaders of the black opposition there. And if the Botha government should not be able to hang on, that we would be faced with another hostile state in a strategic location. Do you think that there's any substance to that concern, and if so, what are we going to do about that?

The President. Well, no, it isn't so. And we do feel that there's a great need for communication with responsible black leaders there and have tried to bring it about. As a matter of fact, both Buthelezi, the Chief of the Zulus, the largest black group in South Africa, and Bishop Tutu -- they've both been here, and I've met with them.

The President. This is all right with me, on the recognition that the ANC, there is no question, has a Communist influence. But at the same time, I realize that there must be many of that organization that are not Communist. And so, it would have to be with the recognition that there is a radical element there that by its own statement and declaration wants only a violent settlement. And as long as they know that we're aware of that, yes, we could talk and express ourselves to them about how wrong we think that is. And perhaps the other elements of the ANC that don't support such radicalism would take a position themselves.

Mr. Drake. President Botha was pretty blunt when he rejected your appeal to allow public commemoration of the anniversary of the Soweto riots. What was your reaction to that? He did not really mince his words when he said that they would not accede to that.

The President. Well, there are some times when you give advice and the advice isn't taken. And from our vantage point over here, it seemed to us we were inviting more bloodshed and violence -- or, to do that was inviting more bloodshed and violence.

The President. Well, at least we want to stay to our policy so that we can continue contact. Yes, there are going to be times when, and are times when, there is disagreement. We've made suggestions that we thought might be profitable. He's there dealing with the problem, and he has factions behind him on both sides -- support for what he's trying to do. Because I believe he honestly is trying to take steps that will bring them closer to the end of apartheid. But he then has political elements in his government that don't want an end to apartheid. And so, he's got some tough judgments to make.

The President. But the things that are being proposed by too many people, we think, would only be hurtful to the people we're trying to help, that they would cause great economic hardship, not only to the blacks and the black workers in South Africa, but you have to remember that the frontline States, many of those solidly black governments surrounding them, their economies are actually dependent on the economy of South Africa. And we could wind up doing things that would be very hurtful to these other African States.

The President. Well, I don't know that that's a decision for us to make. It seems from our viewpoint over here that this could, if it is true that he is advocating negotiations rather than just outright violence, that then this could be most helpful.

The President. Well, I don't know. But he has stepped back and sort of disappeared from, you might say, public life. And you have to depend on just some observations in trying to get intelligence on that. There is an impression that the Government is more of a collective now, that there are other leaders of prominence surrounding him and having more of a voice in government than they previously had; although there's no evidence that he's been removed from the top spot in government. But there is no question he has not been active.

The President. Well, we can't help but recognize that it has and that the original fears that there would be an immediate outbreak of widespread terrorism has not taken place. But at the same time, we're not going to sit back and get overconfident. Terrorism is still present. Terrorism is still there and must be dealt with. I do think that we made some progress in Tokyo at the economic summit, where all of us agreed that we were going to work closer together on this matter.

Mr. Drake. I wanted to turn to domestic politics for a minute. This year, more than previous years, the religious right is making its presence felt in the Republican Party. And there's even a possibility that a television evangelist might be a Presidential candidate. As a practiced politician, do you have any fears that other voters who do not share fundamentalist taste might be turned off by this if this wing becomes a dominant element of the party?

The President. Well, I would hope not. And I haven't seen any efforts they've tried to dominate our party in any way. But I just have to go back to a time when there were people that felt that there was something wrong with an actor seeking public office. And my answer then and my answer now is that I don't think that any legitimate trades or professions should be barred from participation in public life. That's the meaning of democracy. You shouldn't judge someone by how they make their living.

Mr. Drake.  Well, just as a practical vote-getting matter, though, wouldn't it be a concern that mainstream voters, for lack of a better word, for whom religion is not the prime motivation, would be uncomfortable with, for instance, an active candidacy if Robertson should win the Republican nomination?

The President. Well, let's go back to another time when religion was an issue. There was a man running for President, nominated by his party, no member of his religion had ever served in the office of the Presidency. And he took his case directly to the other religions and spoke to them in their meetings and their gatherings and opened himself up to their questions and all. And he was elected President.

The President. No, but I think it's indicative of the American people and their broadmindedness when they're faced with the problem. And suddenly religious prejudice disappeared as an issue in that campaign. And I think the same thing is true today. I have confidence and trust in the people. They're the ones who will make the decision.

Mr. Drake. Well, speaking of 1988, I was curious as to whether you've done much thinking or whether you do much thinking about how you're going to spend your time. You're 2 years away from that date. Have you decided what it is you're going to do with yourself when you're out of this office?

Mr. Drake. Well, I mean, do you see yourself in the model of former President Nixon, who has become very active in speaking out on political matters, or sort of, Eisenhower, who retired and wasn't heard from all that much?

The President. No, but Ike had a health problem. I would think that once having done this you'd be active to the extent that you can be legitimately helpful. And I think you have an obligation to the things you believe in and to the party to not just withdraw and say, ``I'm not going to lift a finger.'' Now, I will remain neutral in primaries. I think as titular head of the party that's required, but I'm going to be very active and do everything I can for candidates that I believe in and causes that I believe in as long as I'm able.

Mr. Drake. Well, now I notice that the First Lady has a contract to write a book. I notice that Mike Deaver has a contract to write a book about you and the First Lady and the Presidency. Are you going to write a book?

The President. No, I haven't even discussed that. Having done a book once, I know something of what a chore it is. So, I can't say that I'm bubbling over with the delight at the prospect. But at the same time I suppose there is a responsibility to seriously consider such a thing as -- there'll be so many others that are writing about that and always are writing about their view. Maybe it is proper that the person they're writing about has a say.

Mr. Drake. Let me turn to some matters of interest in New York. When you were in New York on Saturday, you told Andrew O'Rourke, the man who's running against Governor Cuomo -- at least according to him -- that you were going to make a point of coming up to campaign for him. Do you think, considering what Governor Cuomo represents, is in your mind a high priority in beating him in '88 -- excuse me, this year?

The President. Well, having been a Governor myself, I have very strong feelings about the importance of the governorship. We are a federation of sovereign States. We have been through a half a century or so in which there was prevalent a widespread movement in Washington to try and minimize the States and reduce them to administrative districts of the Federal Government. I think that that movement has been halted, at least for a while. And, no, so, as I say, I feel the statehouse is a very important part of our democratic process, and, yes, I would like to be helpful if I can.

Mr. Drake.  I can't make you rise to the bait of Governor Cuomo, so -- let me, on one thing that relates to something another New York politician said, in your radio address a few weeks ago you said that the people in the Senate who are opposing the [Daniel A.] Manion nomination were mostly doing it because they were liberals who couldn't swallow his philosophy as a conservative. And last week Senator D'Amato, who is basically one of your own, said that he, too, thought that Manion did not have the highest legal qualifications and that he would hope that you would not press it. Does that sort of undercut the argument you made?

The President. Well, I'll have to have a talk with him because maybe he's heard some of the things that are being noised around about my nominee. I will never send a name up there that I do not believe is fully qualified for the position. And I will send names up there of people that I believe look upon the judicial process as one of interpreting the law, not writing it, and not trying to impose their social views on the people. We've had too much of that on the part of too many judges over recent years. And I think the attack against Manion is unfounded. As a matter of fact, it's been based on a number of outright falsehoods.

And this making something of the fact that the bar association only rated him as ``qualified'' -- there have been a couple of Presidents in fairly recent years who actually nominated people who were reported as ``unqualified'' by that bar association. And their judges were approved -- or their nominations approved. They say that it was because it was only ``qualified.'' Well, the last two Presidents before me -- between them there were a total of 282 judges that were appointed who were rated ``qualified'' by the bar association. I believe that the attack on Manion is nothing other than a disagreement with his political philosophy. And one of the most outspoken opponents in the Senate told him that to his face -- now is seeking to back away from that, but said that he had no quarrel with his qualifications or his character or integrity or anything of that kind -- he just disagreed with him politically.

Mr. Drake.  Let me wrap up with a pair of questions on Central America. Now that you have won the aid that you wanted to send to the contras, and it's not only our prestige behind them but our money, what happens now if they get beaten or defeated by the Sandinistas? What is the next step?

The President. Well, that next step would be based on what the followup would be. And if the Sandinistas are unchecked, that would be another Cuba. That would be a totalitarian, Communist State intent on spreading its revolution across other borders to other countries. And I think whoever was in this chair here would have to take appropriate action. And whatever that might be, you can't predict.

But I just believe that by giving the freedom fighters the tools they need to become a force -- this will provide the leverage that hopefully can bring the Sandinistas to the negotiating table to then discuss the democratization of their country and the goals which they, themselves, pledged to support in the revolution against Somoza: that they were supportive of the idea of a pluralistic, democratic society with freedom of speech and press and all those other things. And there can be no doubt, no question at all, but that the Sandinista government, once in power as the strongest faction of the revolutionaries, threw the other revolutionaries out and created a totalitarian, Communist government, which totally contravened the promise that they had made during the Somoza revolution.

Mr. Drake. One last point on it that I'm curious about. In retrospect, do you think -- it didn't matter because you won the contra vote -- but in retrospect, do you think that you should have called Tip O'Neill to ask him for that opportunity to go to the House rather than having your Chief of Staff do it?

The President. No, I think it was pure routine for it to be done that way. And very frankly, I think that it was unprecedented for the response that we got. Other Presidents have made the same request and have been granted permission to appear before one House of the Legislature, and several of those were Democrats.

Well, then there is someone who has already been up here -- Senator Jeremiah Denton. Jeremiah and I have shared many a platform, and I just have to tell you it always does something to stand here with a hero. Nancy and I were back in Sacramento the day a plane brought you back from those nearly 8 years of torture in a North Vietnam prison camp. And like millions of Americans, we watched that homecoming, that moment on television, and will never forget, as many Americans won't, you walking to that microphone and then saying those three simple words that said it all: ``God bless America.'' [Applause] For bravery, for keeping faith, for love of country -- I think you've just heard -- we all thank you. And now that you're in the Senate, I want all the good people here in Dothan to know that courage and patriotism continue to distinguish all that you do. Indeed, in the years since we were both first elected, you've become one of the most persuasive leaders on Capitol Hill and an effective spokesman for the great State of Alabama. You've led the way in rebuilding America's defenses, spoken out for godliness and decency in our national life, and stood up again and again for freedom around the world. And this is a good place for me to express my gratitude and to say that as far as I'm concerned, with Howell Heflin and Jeremiah Denton in the Senate, that people have good reason to be proud.

Now, my friends, I told you that we had important business to discuss, but permit just one more digression, something I have to tell you because I came from part of the heartland of America myself. I want you all to know what a pleasure it is -- and it was -- to board Air Force One, watch Washington slip away into the distance, and then head south, over the Great Smokies of North Carolina and Tennessee, over the red clay of Georgia, south to come at last to the wire grass country of Alabama and the good city of Dothan. It reminded me how important it is for a President to put some distance between himself and Washington every so often, to leave the special interests and the lobbyists behind and get out among the people. I guess what I'm trying to say is that Dothan has given me a gift today, the gift of returning to the real America, and for that I thank you.

And now let's get down to straight talk. There's an important issue up in Washington that's about to be decided, and as I said before, I'm here today because I need your help. And that issue is tax reform. Big government and the special interests are on one side, and you and I are on the other. It's been that way since the start. And since it's a good, old-fashioned, down-home, 6-year scrap with the special interests we're talking about, well, we'll get at it. The first round in this battle took place when I ran for office in 1980. Back then the American economy was in the worst mess since the Depression. Government was everywhere, running up taxes, causing inflation, raising interest rates, and taking bigger and bigger shares of our earnings. And to get big government off our backs and out of our pockets, during the campaign of 1980 I proposed a tax cut. The special interests -- all those whose way of life depended upon keeping government fat and wasteful -- said no. The people knew better. When they went to the ballot boxes, they said yes.

Well, when we took office in 1981, we enacted an across-the-board, personal income tax cut of nearly 25 percent. We also indexed tax brackets, making it impossible for inflation to push you into higher tax brackets, as it had been doing for the many years that inflation was running rampant. And again the special interests said no, claiming our plan would lead to economic ruin. And then all the opponents of the plan called it Reaganomics. And again the people said yes. And what's happened? Inflation and interest rates have dropped. Inflation alone has fallen from over 12 percent to under 2 percent for the last 12 months, and actually has been less than zero for the last few months. We've seen 3\1/2\ years of economic growth and the creation of more than 10 million new jobs -- more new jobs than Western Europe and Japan put together have created in the past 10 years. And thanks in large measure to our decontrol of oil, energy prices have fallen, including the price that you pay for gas. Isn't it good to pull up at the station today and watch the gallons on the pump add up faster than the dollars? Of course, after all these things happened, they stopped calling it Reaganomics. I'm aware of that.

You know, I have to interject something here. I come honestly by my feeling about taxes. As Governor of California, I inherited a situation with a great deficit and some problems. And we had to turn to taxes, because under the constitution there you can't come to the end of the fiscal year with a deficit. Such should happen to the Federal Government. Because you come into office there in the middle of the fiscal year, so I only had 6 months to clean things up, and, therefore, we had to turn to taxes. Well, very shortly my finance director came to me and said, ``We're going to have a surplus this year. And since you haven't been able to do some of the things you might have wanted to do because of the situation, maybe there's a program that you'd like to propose to use up this money.'' And I said, ``I do have one in mind. Let's give it back.'' Well, he said, ``It's never been done.'' And I said, ``Well, you never had an actor up here before either.'' [Laughter] Well, we gave it back. But I just wanted to tell you I'm prepared, also, for the kind of opposition we're getting to this tax reform now. Because a very prominent member of the government came in to see me. He stalked into my office, and he declared, ``Giving that money back is an unnecessary expenditure of public funds.'' [Laughter] Well, I think we ought to all try to remember where government's money comes from in the first place.

The last stage of the tax reform fight began more than a year ago when we proposed our new reform, one that would simplify the entire tax system, eliminate loopholes and tax shelters, lower most Americans tax rates even further, and make the whole system more fair. Some claimed the American people didn't care about tax reform any more. But that's not what I found when I took our tax reform campaign to places like Athens, Tennessee; Oshkosh, Wisconsin; and Harry Truman's hometown of Independence, Missouri. And that's not what I'm finding here today in Dothan, Alabama.

Our proposal went first to the House, and the special interests tried to kill it. And when they couldn't do that, they tried to wound it. And when they couldn't do that, they said it was bad for the country. But in the end, their fancy briefing papers and expense-account lunches were no match for the will of the people. The House, under the leadership of Dan Rostenkowski, passed a version of our proposal -- not completely to our liking, but nevertheless one that kept tax reform moving. Special interests, zero; America, one. Next, tax reform went to the Senate, and again the special interests fought it. And they did a pretty good job, and I have to admit there were moments there when even I had to wonder. But a bipartisan coalition of Senators that included present company and Finance Committee Chairman Packwood and Senators Long and Chafee and Danforth and Wallop and Moynihan and Bradley had the courage to lead a return to true reform. And led by Majority Leader Bob Dole, the Senate passed tax reform by the historic margin of 97 to 3. Soon after, a headline in the Washington Post read, ``The Impossible Became Inevitable.'' Special interests, zero; America, two.

And now, as Jeremiah and Howell will tell you, the version of tax reform approved by the Senate deserves special attention for the simple reason that it's especially good. Not good for Washington lobbyists or special interests, but good for you. Listen for a moment to a few of the facts. The tax reform bill the Senate approved would eliminate the complicated system of 14 tax brackets and replace it with just 2 at 15 and 27 percent. Now, sometimes you may be confused because you've heard it referred to as 15 tax brackets and that this reform would have 3. Well, in one way that's true. If you count 0 -- 0 and 15 and 27. And under this new and simpler tax, the average tax burden on individuals would be cut by some 6.4 percent, over 6 percent less a year -- that works out to some $215 in savings for the average taxpayer. The Senate-approved plan represents an improvement over current law for agriculture, too. It will provide more equal tax treatment for income earned in various kinds of farm activities. And it will sharply limit opportunities for people who make their money someplace else to take advantage of real farmers by using agriculture as a tax dodge. Isn't it time that we gave farming back to farmers?

And overall, it's estimated that under the Senate-approved tax reform bill, some two-thirds of all individual taxpayers will either get an income tax cut or remain off the tax rolls completely. Corporate tax brackets would be straightened out and the top corporate rate brought down to 33 percent so the playing field for business would be made more level and fair. And tax reform would represent perhaps the biggest antipoverty program in our history, taking some 6 million Americans off the tax rolls and enabling a family of four making $15,000 or less to pay no Federal income taxes whatsoever -- none. That's that zero bracket.

Now there's just one more round left in the fight, just one more chance for the special interests to score before we make it an even 3 to nothing and declare America the winner. That chance will be in the conference committee, where Members of the House and Senate must meet to iron out the differences between the bills that each chamber has passed. Before the special interests start in on the members of the conference -- and it indeed could begin meeting as early as this coming week -- let me state for you and the record some of the elements that I believe any final compromise must contain. Believe me, after coming through so many rounds, beginning all the way back in 1980, I'm not about to let up now.

First, any bill agreed upon in conference must hold the tax rates down. There's no doubt about it, lowering rates for both individuals and corporations represents the most important aspect of tax reform. It encourages growth. It allows simplification. And it promotes fairness. Let there be any significant departure from the two low individual rates of 15 and 27 percent and the top corporate rate of 33 percent that the Senate has already approved, and somebody's going to have to do a lot of explaining. Next, I urge the conference to retain provisions that would remove 6 million lower income Americans from the Federal income tax rolls altogether. There's no reason to force the working poor, people who are already struggling, to turn over a share of their earnings to the government. And to help families and individuals alike, I hope to see the conference increase the personal exemption to $2,000 except for the very richest taxpayers. This is vital. It's also important for the conference to preserve the taxpayers' ability to invest in IRA's -- especially for taxpayers who don't participate in a pension plan -- then reap the benefits of tax-deferred growth.

For American business, I hope to see the conference provide incentives for capital formation, incentives to foster truly productive investment. At the same time, the final bill must not hit the distressed sectors of our economy, sectors like farming and energy. Americans in these fields already have tough enough times as a result of forces beyond their control. And finally, I urge the conference to retain as an overriding goal the replacement of an inequitable tax system with one that's truly fair. Tax dodges have been going on long enough. The conference must grasp this opportunity to eliminate tax dodges and impose a minimum tax so that people and corporations who should pay do pay.

And what it comes down to in unvarnished language is this: Any bill I sign is going to have to promote strong economic growth with more jobs and incentives for all; promote productivity, investment, and international competitiveness in American business; and help the middle class, giving those people who get up and go to work in the morning and who support their churches and charities in the community and make this system work -- give them a tax cut by making those who have found ways to avoid most or all of their taxes now pay their fair share. You know, my friends, in the past 5\1/2\ years, the people have defeated the special interests again and again. We've gone from a tax system that smothered initiatives to one that has provided new incentives for hard work, investment, and growth; from an economy that was creating virtually no new jobs to one that's creating about a quarter of a million new jobs a month; from a sense of malaise and powerlessness to a sense of confidence in our nation, ourselves, and our future.

And today we have the opportunity to carry this peaceful revolution through to its conclusion: to lower taxes still further for most individuals, to help American business, and to make our tax code fairer and simpler for all. We have the opportunity, in other words, to reassert for ourselves, our children, and our grandchildren what is perhaps the fundamental principle of American life: that here government is the servant, not the master; that here it is government that acts at the convenience of the people.

Well, it's time for me to head back to Washington and get to work, but before we leave I want to show you something that Jeremiah gave me the last time that I visited your good State. He -- you can read it -- he told me that it would help cut taxes down to size. And here it is: our original tax ax. [Laughter] Now, I've been sharpening this thing. Now let's get back to Washington and put it to use.

I am today approving H.R. 4801, but I do so with serious reservations. First, I am concerned by the extremely wide latitude allowed the United States Sentencing Commission in setting guidelines for offenses carrying a maximum penalty of 2 years imprisonment. The purpose of the Sentencing Reform Act, which I submitted to the Congress as part of the Comprehensive Crime Control Act of 1983, was to establish a determinate sentencing system with narrow sentencing ranges for criminal offenses. The range of up to 6 months provided in this bill is far in excess of what we visualized in 1983 and, if implemented by the Sentencing Commission, would restore an undue measure of discretion to judges that could threaten to undermine the core purpose of the Sentencing Reform Act to establish fairness and certainty in sentencing by confining judicial discretion within a relatively narrow range. Second, the bill contains a technical flaw that may create an ambiguity with respect to the permissible range limits for life sentences. The word ``maximum'' in the next to last line should be ``minimum.'' This error should be corrected before the guidelines take effect. Third, I am concerned about this bill because it is only a small part of the much more comprehensive and much more important Senate bill, S. 1236, which would make dozens of needed technical and minor changes in the Comprehensive Crime Control Act of 1984, Public Law 98 - 473.

I therefore approve this bill with the understanding that the Sentencing Commission does not expect to utilize the full 6-month range for offenses carrying a maximum penalty of 2 years imprisonment and the expectation that the technical deficiencies will be corrected. The broad Senate-passed bill, S. 1236, which passed the Senate unanimously, unfortunately remains pending before the House Judiciary Committee. I hope the Congress will not abandon S. 1236, and I urge its prompt consideration by the House of Representatives.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Vance C. Miller to be a member of the Board of Directors of the Federal National Mortgage Association for a term ending on the date of the annual meeting of the stockholders in 1987. He would succeed Merrill Butler.

The sober and peaceful approach you have taken to deal with the political incident that took place in Manila this weekend is greatly admired. Once again, your leadership has shown the world the mettle of your government and the degree of support it enjoys among your people.

Note: The letter referred to President Aquino's successful handling of the failed attempt, by former President Marcos' running mate Arturo Tolentino, to form a new government. The original was not available for verification of the content of this letter, which was released by the Office of the Press Secretary on July 12.

One week ago we showed the world what it means to love liberty. The spectacular celebration of our independence and Miss Liberty's centennial will likely be described by historians as a reflection of the good will, joy, and confidence so apparent in our country. Instead of focusing on problems, America's looking for solutions. Instead of fretting about this or that shortcoming, we're out creating, building, and making things better. Instead of lamenting dangers, we're putting our best minds to work trying to find ways of making this a safer, more secure world.

And that's what I want to talk with you about today: our major research effort called the Strategic Defense Initiative, SDI, which is aimed at ridding this planet of the threat of nuclear annihilation. Back in 1983 we enlisted some of America's top scientists and set in motion a research program to see if we could find a way to defend mankind against ballistic missiles, an antimissile shield, if you will. Our SDI research is searching out a more effective, safe, and moral way to prevent war -- a deterrence based on defenses which threaten no one, a deterrence that will be viewed as a success not by the threat of deadly retaliation but, instead, by its ability to protect. And never was a purely defensive system so sorely needed. Since the early 1970's the Soviet Union has been racing forward in a vast and continuing military buildup, including the expansion of their offensive nuclear arsenal and an intense effort to develop their own strategic defense. And as described in a publication issued last October by our State and Defense Departments, the Soviets also have deployed the world's only antiballistic missile system. These Soviet strategic defense programs have been termed ``Red Shield'' in an article in this month's Reader's Digest. They were confirmed in an open letter issued last month by a group of 30 former Soviet scientists now living in the United States.

In stark contrast, we are defenseless against the most dangerous weapons in the history of mankind. Isn't it time to put our survival back under our own control? Our search for an effective defense is a key part of a three-pronged response to the Soviet threat. We also have been moving ahead to modernize our strategic forces and, simultaneously, to reach fair and verifiable arms reduction agreements with the Soviet Union. The Soviets have yet to agree to arms reduction despite the strenuous efforts of several U.S. administrations. However, our SDI research to make nuclear missiles less effective also makes these missiles more negotiable. And when we talk about negotiations, let's be clear: Our SDI research is not a bargaining chip. It's the number of offensive nuclear missiles that need to be reduced, not the effort to find a way to defend mankind against these deadly missiles. And reliable defenses could also serve as insurance against cheating or breaking out of an arms reduction agreement.

All this makes it evermore important to keep our strategic defense research moving forward. We have set up a well-managed program which, in just over 3 years, has already accomplished much. Even faster progress than expected has been made in developing the system's ``eyes'' -- scientists call them sensors -- and its ``brains,'' which guide an interceptor toward its target, and methods of stopping incoming missiles, especially with nonnuclear means. Technological advances now permit us to detect and track an aggressor's missiles in early flight. It is in this boost phase that missiles must be intercepted and knocked out to achieve the protection we're looking for. There have been some major achievements in the diplomatic field as well. Great Britain, West Germany, and Israel have signed agreements to participate in the research, and talks with other major allies are expected.

But thank you for joining Nancy and me in this, the second annual conferring of the National Medal of Arts. And permit me to thank our Committee on the Arts and Humanities and its Chairman, Andrew Heiskell, for proposing that we create the National Medal of Arts; the Congress for enacting the authorizing legislation; the National Council on the Arts for providing us once again with such a fine list of nominees; and Dan Terra, our Ambassador for Cultural Affairs, for continuing his tradition of holding a State Department reception on this occasion. As we award these 12 medals today, we celebrate 12 rich contributions to American arts; and, in a wider sense, we celebrate American culture itself, the culture of liberty, the culture in which artists are free to be true to themselves.

Nearly two centuries ago, when this grand old house was built, our nation comprised, for the most part, a narrow band of towns and villages hugging the eastern seaboard, a rugged and often unlettered people clinging to the edge of a vast continent. For art, drama, music, and learning Americans looked not to themselves but to Europeans, not to the New World but to the Old. And yet as those rugged people pushed west and gave birth to a great country, they likewise gave birth to a great, distinctive culture. First, American arts took on the twang of the frontier fiddle and the sharp, clean lines of our primitive paintings. And then came the joy of jazz, the sparkle and spectacle of film, the stirring sense of space and light in the work of artists from George Inness to Winslow Homer. In our own time we've seen the rise of superb regional orchestras, ballets, and opera companies, the coming of age of fine museums throughout the country, and the emergence of cities like New York and Los Angeles as art capitals of world importance.

So it is that in matters of culture today, Americans look not so much to the Old World as to the New -- to America itself -- and they do so with pride. Our administration has sought to emphasize these distinctively American aspects of our own culture, and Frank Hodsoll at the National Endowment for the Arts has devoted to this charge all his acumen and skill. Under Frank's leadership, the Endowment has helped to widen State and local support for the arts across the country. And with the support of the Congress, the Endowment is expanding arts programming to television and radio to reach all our people.

And today we have this wonderful event, this moment to pause and appreciate 12 magnificent contributions to the artistic life of our nation. We honor patrons -- those who enable the distinctively American tradition of private support for the arts to flourish. And we honor artists themselves -- their pains, their triumphs, their devotions, all of themselves that they've given to their work and hence to our nation.

Mrs. Reagan. Marian Anderson was born in Philadelphia, and at the age of 8 she started singing in choirs. She began her career as a contralto in Europe, and it was Sol Hurok who launched her career in the United States. In 1955 she made her debut with the New York Metropolitan Opera, thereby paving the way for the acceptance of black performers on the concert stage. Arturo Toscanini said that a voice like hers comes only once in a century. Marian Anderson is one of the greatest ladies of opera, and accepting for her today is her cousin, Miss Sandra Grimes.

Willem de Kooning was born in Rotterdam, Holland. He worked his way to our country as a wiper in the engine room of a steamship. Before establishing himself as the great painter that he is, he made signs and window displays; he was a carpenter, furniture designer, muralist, and began his work in abstraction in 1934. As a leader of abstract expressionism, he's influenced all modern painting and is acclaimed by all the world as America's great contribution to modern art. Accepting for him today is his wife, Elaine, who is also a fine painter.

Alan Lomax was born in Austin, Texas, and is without a doubt the world's most renowned folklorist. He's devoted his life and talent to collecting, compiling, and preserving the folk music of the United States and the world. As director-producer of an original folk music series on CBS Radio in the thirties and forties, he presented all Americans for the first time such then unknowns as Burl Ives, Pete Seeger, Leadbelly, and Woody Guthrie. For the past 24 years he's been a President's Scholar at Columbia University, where he has pioneered the study of expressive styles of culture. Recently we've seen his work in the television series ``American Patchwork.'' Mr. Lomax, you've truly enriched our understanding of the cultures of America and the world.

Lewis Mumford was born in Flushing, New York. He's one of our most distinguished historians, literary critics, and commentators on cities and urban design. He's the author of some 31 books and was the recipient of a National Book Award in 1961 for ``The City in History.'' Mr. Mumford has said of the city: ``If it ceases to be a milieu in which people can exist in reasonable contentment, it will be unprofitable to discuss architectural achievements.'' His concern for the whole of the city, as opposed to the single architectural triumph, has taught us how to strive for architecture as ``The Home of Man,'' the title of his highly original book on the philosophy of architecture. Accepting for Mr. Mumford today is his daughter, Mrs. Alison Morss.

Dominique de Menil began her career as a bold patron of the arts in the 1930's by giving Max Ernst his first one-man show. In 1941 she came to this country from Paris. She's organized exhibitions in New York and Houston as well as in France and Germany and is currently chairman of the Pompidou Art and Cultural Foundation in Paris. She's played a primary role in the renaissance of art institutions in Houston, where a new museum will soon house the world-acclaimed collection of Dominique de Menil and her late husband, John. We're honored to have her here today.

Exxon Corporation began its support of the arts in the forties, and today it's known by millions for its promotion of the arts of television through ``Great Performances'' and ``Live From Lincoln Center.'' A pioneer of the program ``Dance in America,'' Exxon not only brought dance into American living rooms but stimulated live dance performance across America. Exxon has also supported the technology of live broadcasts and simulcasts for audio fidelity. Over 300 new orchestral and chamber works by American composers have been brought to broad audiences by this corporation. Exxon is an outstanding example of enlightened corporate support for the arts, and with us today is Jack Clark, Exxon's senior vice president and director.

Seymour H. Knox was born in Buffalo, New York, where he still lives. As a collector and patron, his contribution to his birthplace is everlasting. Few know that he was a champion polo and squash player in his youth who represented our country in international competitions. However, he will be most remembered for his perceptive eye for the new and daring and as a collector of contemporary art. The Albright-Knox Gallery, under the leadership of Mr. Knox, set major precedents in opening its doors to modern art. And we're pleased to award him the National Medal of Arts.

The President. Well, thank you, Nancy. And thank you all. On behalf of the American people, I commend you, each of you, for crowning our nation's greatness with grace. You have forever set an example for artists and patrons in the years ahead to live up to. I know the Endowment will draw on these examples as it launches its new initiatives in arts education. Certainly the existence of strong music and fine arts curricula is important to keeping the humanities truly humanizing and the liberal arts truly liberating.

The President today announced his intention to appoint T. Kenneth Cribb, Jr., to be a member of the Council of the Administrative Conference of the United States for a term of 3 years. This is a reappointment.

Disputes exist between certain railroads represented by the National Carriers' Conference Committee of the National Railway Labor Conference and their employees represented by certain organizations designated on the lists attached hereto and made a part hereof.

The disputes, in the judgment of the National Mediation Board, threaten substantially to interrupt interstate commerce to a degree such as to deprive a section of the country of essential transportation service.

Section 1. Establishment of Board. There is established, effective July 15, 1986, a board of three members to be appointed by the President to investigate the disputes. No member shall be pecuniarily or otherwise interested in any organization of railroad employees or any carrier. The board shall perform its functions subject to the availability of funds.

The President announced today that he has established, effective July 15, 1986, Presidential Emergency Board No. 211 to investigate and make recommendations for settlement of current disputes between six railroad labor unions and most of the Nation's major railroads represented by the National Carriers' Conference Committee of the National Railway Labor Conference. The President took this action on the recommendation of the National Mediation Board, which has notified the President that the situation appears to be critical.

A nationwide railroad strike would have an immediate effect on the public. The Nation's railroads move more than one-third of all intercity freight traffic, more than 100 million tons each month. A strike against the railroads could result in the layoff of 600,000 employees in key rail-served industries after 2 weeks and 1.1 million workers after 4 weeks, in addition to approximately 300,000 railroad employees who would be idled. Cessation of operations on the freight railroads would halt the flow of $700 million worth of goods each day. Production and employment would be particularly affected in the motor vehicles, paper, coal mining, lumber, steel, glass, and plastics and chemical industries. Although inventories of coal at the Nation's coal-burning electric utility plants average more than 11 weeks of supply, 20 to 25 rail-served powerplants have less than 4 weeks of coal on hand and could run short of fuel if rail service were halted. In addition, railroads are one of the primary transporters of Department of Defense freight traffic, and a strike against the Nation's railroads would severely restrict the movements of this traffic. The Nation's freight railroads also operate trains carrying 150,000 commuters each day, more than three-quarters of them in and around Chicago, IL.

Consequently, the President invoked the Emergency Board procedures of the Railway Labor Act, which in part provide that the Board will report its findings and recommendations for settlement to the President within 30 days from the date of its creation. The parties must then consider the recommendations of the Emergency Board and endeavor to resolve their differences without engaging in self-help during a subsequent 30-day period.

The United States has informed the Soviet Union through diplomatic channels that it is prepared to convene a special session of the U.S.-U.S.S.R. Standing Consultative Commission (SCC) beginning on or about July 22 in Geneva. The United States will be prepared to respond to questions or concerns the Soviet Union has with respect to the President's May 27th decision on interim restraint. We would expect that in the context of such a discussion the Soviet Union will also be prepared to address U.S. concerns about Soviet noncompliance with arms control agreements.

In the absence of an adequate Soviet response, the President announced on May 27 of this year that henceforth the United States would base decisions regarding its strategic forces on the nature and magnitude of the threat posed by the Soviet Union rather than on standards contained in SALT agreements that had expired, were unratified, and were being violated by the Soviet Union. On May 27th the President also decided to retire two older Poseidon submarines as the eighth Trident submarine began sea trials. This means the United States will remain in technical observance of the terms of the SALT agreements for some months. Time remains for the Soviet Union to alter the situation which led the President to his May 27 decision. If the Soviet Union does, the President will take this into account.

As the President said when he announced his decision on May 27, we must now look to the future, not to the past. The primary task now facing both the United States and the Soviet Union is to build a new structure of arms control, one based on significant, equitable, and verifiable reductions in the size of existing U.S. and Soviet nuclear arsenals. This is what we are proposing in the Geneva negotiations.

This special session of the Standing Consultative Commission offers us the opportunity to renew the President's request that the Soviet Union join us in establishing an interim framework of truly mutual restraint.

The President. Mr. Prime Minister, it's a great pleasure to greet you and your family today. This is your first visit to the United States, and all Americans wish you a warm and heartfelt welcome. Over 36 years ago Liaquat Ali Khan, one of Pakistan's proud founders and one of your predecessors, traveled extensively through our country. He told the American people of the friendship and good will the people of your then-new country held for America and its ideals. He said he hoped that the future will unfold itself in ways which will make Pakistan and the United States comrades in the noble task of maintaining peace and in translating the great constructive dreams of democracy into reality.

Mr. Prime Minister, as the leader of one of our country's closest partners and as the elected Prime Minister of a constitutional government, your presence here today symbolizes the realization of Liaquat Ali Khan's dream. Under your wise leadership, Pakistan is making great strides in the transition toward democracy. And this progress is all the more remarkable because, even in a volatile environment, it's being accomplished peacefully. Such peaceful change bodes well for Pakistan's future.

Mr. Prime Minister, Americans well appreciate that building free institutions and making them function effectively requires patience, perseverance, tolerance, luck, and plain hard work. But the results are worth it. Freedom unleashes the creative spirit of the human spirit and carries a nation to its greatest potential. Pakistan is demonstrating this by its impressive rate of real economic growth: about 6 percent annually. Your country's agricultural base has been strengthened and new industries have increased Pakistan's manufacturing capabilities. The United States, as one of Pakistan's major trading partners, applauds your government's efforts to foster enterprise and bolster the economic well-being of your people. Mr. Prime Minister, we're aware of your deep commitment to expanding the boundaries of opportunity and improving the quality of life of your people. Through increased trade and business and through our 6-year program of assistance, which was recently renewed, we are playing and will continue to play a positive role in helping you achieve your goals.

During that early visit to our shores, Prime Minister Liaquat Ali Khan described challenges to the free people of his country and the world. ``Dark forces,'' he said, ``were at work threatening to extinguish the torch of civilization which liberal institutions are trying to keep alive.'' Well, those words proved remarkably and sadly prophetic. Today Pakistan, a peaceful, nonaligned nation, has been unwillingly thrust into the role of a frontline state, courageously standing in opposition to Soviet aggression in the region. The brutal Soviet occupation of Afghanistan -- which also was once nonaligned and free -- is now in its sixth year. The assault on this noble people, the attempt to obliterate their homes, their farms, their religion, and their culture, continues unabated. Even as we speak, the valiant freedom fighters in Afghanistan are fighting and dying for a cause no free man, no moral and enlightened individual, can ignore.

And the world should also note that in pursuit of their neocolonial war of aggression against Afghanistan, the Soviets have repeatedly violated Pakistan's sovereignty. They have exacted a heavy toll in lives and property. In the first 6 months of 1986 there were more attacks on Pakistan's territory than in all of 1985. Yet through it all, the courageous people of Pakistan and their government have remained stalwart in their opposition to the Soviet Union's brutal aggression. America deeply admires Pakistan's steadfastness and bravery in this noble stand. Pakistan also has been admirable in its generosity toward the nearly 3 million Afghans who have fled their country -- the single largest refugee population in the world. And by your actions, you have given new meaning to the historic traditions of Islamic hospitality. The United States is proud to be assisting you in this most humanitarian enterprise.

Your outstanding economic achievements and the progress you've made in your transition toward democracy are even more impressive -- some might even say amazing -- in light of the defense and refugee burden that you are forced to bear. The United States will continue to help where we can -- economically and in the modernization of your armed forces. The cooperation between our two nations is as broad and deep as the friendship between our peoples is firm and strong. I look forward to our talks today, Mr. Prime Minister, and I'm confident that we will both benefit greatly from the exchange. These talks give us an opportunity to reaffirm our commitment to stand together in the interest of peace, stability, and progress in southern Asia and throughout the world. Mr. Prime Minister, we welcome you.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, Mrs. Reagan, ladies and gentlemen: I thank you, Mr. President, for the gracious words you have spoken. I greatly appreciate, also, the warm reception that has been accorded to me and to my colleagues on our arrival. It is a manifestation, no doubt, of the friendly regards in which the United States holds Pakistan. The people of Pakistan fully reciprocate these sentiments. I bring to you their cordial greetings and best wishes.

For me, personally, this visit to the United States is an occasion of special significance, for I have the honor to come here as the elected representative of my people. We, in Pakistan, have always cherished democratic values. These are an essential part of our Islamic belief. Even when we have faced difficult circumstances, our faith in democracy has never wavered. The general elections held in Pakistan last year demonstrated our commitment to the democratic process. My government has since restored the Constitution along with all the fundamental rights. I'm sure all friends of Pakistan are gratified that the transition from martial law to constitutional rule has been accomplished in peace and stability.

I was particularly happy to receive your invitation, Mr. President. We have always entertained a profound respect for the United States, a great nation, conceived in liberty, the land of Washington and Lincoln, Roosevelt and Eisenhower. America has inspired generations of men the world over. The purpose of my visit is to look and to learn. I hope also that I may be able to reach out and inform the American people of our hopes and aspirations and share with you our concern in the face of the problems that confront us. The United States has a tradition of cooperation and support to foreign countries in their programs for economic development. Under your leadership the United States has renewed its commitments, also. To the effort for peace and security in our region, your economic assistance has been most valuable for Pakistan's progress. Your political and modern support has been invaluable in our struggle to safeguard principles, indispensable for the maintenance of freedom and independence in our region.

Mr. President, sir, it is an honor to meet you, and I look forward to the opportunity of exchanging views with a leader of your long experience. I'm confident that our talks will serve to deepen mutual understanding and to further promote cooperation between our countries. I look forward, also, to a stimulating exchange in meetings with the respected members in your administration and with the honorable Members of Congress. Myself, the Members of the Parliament of Pakistan, and the members of my entourage look forward keenly to meeting the American people in different walks of life.

Note: The President spoke at 10:10 a.m. at the South Portico of the White House, where the Prime Minister was accorded a formal welcome with full military honors. Following the ceremony, the President and the Prime Minister met privately in the Oval Office and then held an expanded meeting in the Cabinet Room.

The United States and the Soviet Union have agreed to have experts meet shortly to discuss issues related to nuclear testing. We have further agreed to begin these discussons without preconditions. The United States has long sought a meeting with the Soviets to present our concerns about the verification provisions of the Threshold Test Ban Treaty (TTBT) and the Peaceful Nuclear Explosions Treaty (PNET). These treaties were signed in the 1970's, but they have not been ratified. The United States determined in the early 1980's that U.S. ratification could not be considered until verification improvements were made and U.S. compliance concerns were answered. We have made repeated offers to the Soviet Government to present our ideas for improvements that would allow us to move forward on ratification of these treaties.

This upcoming meeting of experts will allow the United States to present its ideas and concerns to the Soviets and to hear Soviet concerns. The United States will be ready to present and discuss our views on verification improvements in existing agreements, which we believe are needed and achievable at this time. We hope the Soviets will be prepared to join in a constructive dialog.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Daniel Oliver, Chairman of the Federal Trade Commission, to be a member of the Council of the Administrative Conference of the United States for a term of 3 years. This is a reappointment.

The President today announced his intention to designate Carole Curb as a member of the Board of Governors of the United Service Organizations, Incorporated, for a term of 3 years. This is a reappointment.

Prime Minister Junejo, distinguished guests, and friends, Nancy and I welcome you to the White House. Mr. Prime Minister, our discussions today were upbeat, cordial, and productive, and will undoubtedly strengthen the bonds of friendship between our two nations. I'm pleased to report that, though today's meeting was our first, we talked with the directness and ease of two long-time colleagues. This tells me, far more than words alone, that the relations between our countries are in good shape and good hands.

Mr. Prime Minister, under your guidance Pakistan is moving toward the realization of its cherished democratic ideals. The democratic path is long and difficult, but free people travel that road together. America is with you, as you proceed toward this noble goal. We want you and the people of Pakistan to know, without doubt, even in the face of increasing Soviet pressures, we stand by you in defense of your sovereignty. Pakistan's determination to see Soviet troops out of Afghanistan strengthens the resolve of free men everywhere. Please take this message back to your people: We salute your courage and are proud of you. With you, we look to the day when a free Afghanistan will again be independent and truly nonaligned, the day when the millions of Afghans who have fled can return to their homes and their land to pursue their own destiny.

It's time to get on with the business of peace. We Americans understand and support the aspirations of the people of Pakistan for greater prosperity and progress in a region free of tension and threats of conflict. And we applaud and strongly support the steady improvement in relations between your country and India, and we're delighted with the commitment Pakistan and its south Asian partners have made to new ventures in regional cooperation.

Mr. Prime Minister, let us build on the solid foundation laid down by American and Pakistani leaders over the years. Our countries continue to share common interests and common goals. By standing together, we can make this a freer and a more peaceful world. Pakistan's national poet-philosopher Mohammad Iqbal once said: ``My life, O God, should be like that of a candle, so that through my efforts I may try to dispel the darkness of evil and illumine the whole world.'' Well, Pakistan and the United States, together, can be a light unto the world.

I know you've already been briefed by Don Regan, Mac Baldrige, Al Kingon, and Clayton Yeutter, so I also understand the importance of brevity in a speech. You'll remember that George Washington gave an inaugural address of just 135 words and became a great President. Of course, there was William Henry Harrison. He spoke at his inauguration for nearly 2 hours, caught pneumonia, and died within a month. [Laughter] I told him to keep it short. [Laughter] Well, I'm going to try to stay someplace between the two of them.

But it's an honor to speak to you. And before addressing the matter at hand, I want to take a moment to acknowledge all that you've done to provide our administration with encouragement and support. I'd especially like to note the work of the Pro-Trade Group and of COMET, Citizens for Open Markets and Expanded Trade. Of course, some of us have had our differences, but I think that's to be expected. But on issues from deficit-cutting to tax reform, the men and women in this room -- all of you -- and the organizations you represent, have stood with us, sharing our same enthusiasms and braving the same battles. So, for all you've done, my friends, I thank you. And something else. I just happen to have a feeling that we'll look back on these years with a certain amount of pride. I hope you feel the same way.

To come now to the issue of the day: world trade. I'd like to begin, if I may, with first principles, with the absolute fundamentals. It was David Ricardo who first advanced the theory of comparative advantage back in 1817. And it's absolutely not true that I remember reading about it at the time in the newspapers. [Laughter] But I do remember studying comparative advantage back at Eureka College, in Illinois, just as you studied it when you were in college, and just as economics students continue to study it today. The reason Ricardo has proven of lasting importance: His formulation was a breakthrough. He held, simply, that if each nation concentrated on the production of the articles that it could produce most efficiently, then traded those with other nations to obtain the articles it needed, not some but all nations would be likely to see their living standards rise. And with that insight, it became clear that tariffs and trade barriers blocked rather than promoted prosperity, that, indeed, the advance of nations was itself bound up with the advance of free trade.

And so widely is this accepted as a fundamental of economic thought and so clearly is it understood that our own nation earns tens of billions of dollars every year in foreign markets and has millions of jobs tied to exports, that it's safe to say everyone in this room supports the principle of keeping world trade unfettered and free. So, too, does virtually every serious economist in the country. And so, too, I believe, does nearly every Member of the Congress. What then is it that brings us here today? Well, I'm afraid there's only one term for it, and it isn't all that pretty: special interests.

Yes, the adjustments that we've had to undergo in recent years to put our economy back in good health has been especially difficult for certain sectors of our economy, notably sectors that are import-sensitive. But there can be no excuse for protectionist legislation. Really, it's destructionist legislation, legislation that would, in fact, hurt the Nation and injure even those few it was originally designed to serve. And there can be no excuse whatever for bills like the omnibus trade bill that the House has already passed. Forgive me; I called it a trade bill. What I meant to say was antitrade bill. Even when we took the small step of assisting the shakes and shingles industry, legal under international law, we encountered immediate retaliation as the Canadians imposed restrictions on U.S.-produced books, computers, and semiconductors -- an indication of the bitter trade war the House bill would provoke. Within America itself, the House bill would pit industry against industry, worker against worker, and region against region.

Those who support this and other protectionist legislation often claim that our administration doesn't have a coherent trade policy. Well, I have to tell you, that one sort of touches my temperature control. What they really mean, of course, is that we don't have a protectionist trade policy, and they're right. What we have instead is a policy, every aspect of which is aimed at keeping world trade free while making it more and more fair. This policy contains three main elements. First, we're going after unfair trading practices more aggressively than any previous administration. And permit me to mention just a few.

Action: In September 1985 I imposed deadlines for resolving two longstanding GATT disputes, one with Japan on leather goods, the second with the European Community on canned fruit. Result: In December of 1985 Japan improved market access for American leather goods and reduced tariffs on 137 items to bring the leather dispute to an end. At the same time, the European Community agreed to eliminate canned fruit subsidies, giving American producers the chance to compete.

Action: In December 1985 I directed the Commerce Department to investigate whether Japanese semiconductor chips were being dumped in the United States. Response: Last month I announced that we had reached the framework of an agreement with the Japanese that would bring an end to predatory pricing in the U.S. market and in turn improve American producers' access to the Japanese market. These negotiations should be made final at the end of this month, and if not, we'll go forward with the enforcement of our trade law.

The list goes on and on. In addition to the cases just mentioned, I've instructed Clay Yeutter to bring other unfair trade cases against Japan, the European Community, Korea, Taiwan, and Brazil. The message to the world is clear. The United States stands for free trade, of course. But make no mistake, trade must also be fair.

The second element of our trade policy centers on new and more liberal agreements with our trading partners -- agreements under which they would fully open their markets and treat American products as they treat their own. This is vital. International trade, as measured by the GATT, rose only 3 percent last year, down considerably from the 9-percent growth rate of 1984. So it is that our administration has for months now been advocating a new round of GATT talks. And I'm pleased to say that the preparatory committee is now meeting in Geneva. Indeed, it could have its work completed as early as this week or next. When it does, the stage will be set for the trade ministers to commence the new round of talks this September. This new round will prove of particular importance in removing barriers to those areas of trade, such as agriculture and services, that are growing so rapidly in importance.

I've saved perhaps the most important aspect of our trade policy for last: exchange rates. As you know, exchange rates have a tremendous impact on trade flows. In recognition of this, last September Secretary [of the Treasury] Baker hosted a meeting at the Plaza Hotel in New York of the finance ministers and central bankers of the five major industrial nations. There, all five agreed to engage in much closer economic cooperation. And since then, the dollar has dropped against European currencies and even more markedly against the yen. Needless to say, this will prove helpful to American exporters and import-sensitive industries. Later this year, as order books begin to reflect the new exchange rate relationships, our exports should begin to grow relative to our imports -- a good start in bringing the American trade deficit into balance. And to prevent undue currency fluctuations from disrupting this improvement, at the Tokyo summit we forged an agreement with the other national leaders to coordinate economic policies more closely.

An aggressive stance toward unfair trading practices, a new round of GATT talks, and exchange rate stabilization -- these represent a sound and formidable trade policy, a policy that has already done much to achieve results. Indeed, I would submit that the realities of world trade have already begun to shift in our order -- or our favor, I should say, and that, as I mentioned a moment ago, later this year we'll see our trade deficit begin to shrink. But that still leaves us with the special interests. In this town, opinions tend to lag well behind the realities. How then should we deal with protectionist sentiment?

Well, no doubt we can all agree that the House omnibus trade bill is out. We might as well declare an open trade war as pass that monster. Beyond that, dealing with special interests becomes a question of tactics. Perhaps there's as many answers as there are men and women in this room to that one. For my own part, I want to stress that there is a great deal of common ground between the administration and thoughtful Members of the Congress. We support, for example, legislation to permit a new round of trade talks, a $300 million war chest to combat unfair foreign subsidies, stronger protection for intellectual property rights, and reform of antitrust laws to make American business more competitive in world markets. At the same time, we understand that there's much under consideration in the Congress that we simply cannot accept.

So, we're determined to press on with the right trade policy and, most important, to do all we can to shift the political focus away from negative, protectionist legislation to positive, progrowth policies -- policies like comprehensive tax reform and spending reduction. For in the end, the protectionist sentiment has about it something of the side-show. The main question is not how to shelter the American economy but how to bring it into still wider contact with the rest of the world; not how to protect it from competition but how to release our boundless talent, creativity, and know-how so that America comes out of the competition a winner. After all, it's not protectionism but economic growth that in the past 3\1/2\ years has created more than 10 million American jobs.

You know, I've lived to see American agriculture become the most productive on Earth. I've seen American entertainment, from movies to rock 'n' roll, become popular around the world. And I've seen American innovation transform the world economy for all time with the development of the computer and the microchip. And after all that, well, I just have to believe the Americans can still outdesign, outproduce, outsell, outinnovate, and outcompete anybody on Earth.

My friends, you and I and virtually everyone in government know that Ricardo was right, that vigorous world trade leads to higher standards of living for all. So, I ask you to stand with us again in our dealings with the Congress on this matter. And please, join us in urging the Congress to stop shirking and get back to its real work -- not fostering economic timidity, but promoting economic incentives, innovation, and growth. Now, I took more than 135 words, but it was a little less than 2 hours. So -- [laughter] -- I'll call it quits here. And again, just thank all of you, and God bless you for all that you're doing. Thank you.

The President is pleased that the U.S. Senate has given its advice and consent to the ratification of the supplementary extradition treaty between the United States and the United Kingdom, amending the 1972 extradition treaty between our two countries.

The administration submitted the supplementary treaty to the Senate in July of last year. This has been a long process. We are gratified with the vote of approval, and we welcome this bipartisan call to combat political violence.

We strongly believe the supplementary treaty will further our efforts to develop effective tools in the fight against terrorism. Many in the Senate merit praise. We particularly thank Chairman Lugar, Senator Trible, and Senator Eagleton for their indispensable assistance.

Nancy and I were saddened to learn of the death of Congressman George O'Brien last evening. We considered George a friend, a dutiful and unyielding servant of the people he represented in Congress for the past 14 years, and a man who cared very much about the direction and future of his country. His full and unselfish life for the good of his fellow man will live on as an example to us all. We shall miss him.

It's wonderful to be here today. And I want to thank all of you for coming by, and a special hello to director Corky Bradshaw. Congratulations to your newly elected president, Cherie Harder, and vice president, Katherine Mooney. It does my heart good to see all of these smiling faces of yours out here, but it's especially good to know that you're in Washington this week to study and participate in the democratic process.

You know, part of a President's job is to prepare our nation for the future, for the years and even the decades ahead. And lately I've been making a point of speaking to those to whom our future belongs, young Americans like yourselves. This spring I spoke to a group of high school students here in the Rose Garden. The weather was a little more comfortable than this. And then last month I went up to Glassboro, New Jersey, to speak at a high school commencement. And both times I shared thoughts similar to those I'd like to discuss with you today: my hopes for world peace and freedom, my conviction that Americans of your generation have every reason to look to our country's future with confidence and self-assurance. The challenges America must face in the world, the challenges that you must face as you become America's leaders, are twofold. I'm confident you'll achieve both of them. The first is expanding the boundaries of democracy and freedom by curbing, in the face of totalitarian expansion, that urge on the part of some governments to seek domination of even more territory and peoples. And the second is new to my generation but something you've already lived with all your lives: the threat of nuclear war. So, as I said some years ago in an address to the British Parliament, we have before us these two tasks: promoting the cause of freedom and keeping the peace by avoiding the kind of war that could obliterate civilization itself. In both efforts, diplomacy, of course, is important. And that's why in our arms control negotiations we've been pressing for real reductions in strategic nuclear weapons.

But something else is also important. Call it readiness; call it deterrence; call it the common sense that knows we must use all our resources, including our creative and technological genius, to remain strong and free. You may remember from your history books how, back in the 1930's when the threat of World War II was growing, statesmen like Winston Churchill called for rebuilding the defenses of democratic nations and for research that would develop new defenses. We know today that some of these inventions, like radar, did, in the end, enable the democracies to help defend themselves. Yet history might well have been different if only the democracies had developed these defenses earlier and, by making technological breakthroughs, established the kind of deterrence that could have prevented a world war. I know there's a lot of debate today about defense budgets and about whether we should be maintaining our strength. There had been four wars in my lifetime. Not one of them started because this country was too strong. Mainly, they started because others thought we wouldn't defend our rights or our freedom.

We don't intend to make the same mistake, and this means performing research to develop new options. Today if a foreign country were to launch a nuclear attack on America, a President would be forced to respond in kind. But the research program we've begun could produce the means to destroy the incoming nuclear weapons before they reached our country and without launching a counterattack of our own, thereby saving millions of lives in our own nation and in other nations.

In other words, our research could produce a system that would destroy missiles instead of people. We call it the Strategic Defense Initiative -- or as you see it all the time referred to as SDI. Washington's just crazy about giving everything initials. This initiative would have the further benefit that it would limit the possible destruction done by accidental war or war caused by the act of a single terrorist or madman. And in foreign relations, SDI has already proven a boon. Indeed, the very fact that we're pushing forward with SDI has helped speed up the arms reduction process. SDI is not a bargaining chip in this process, but its existence may have helped to persuade the Soviet Union that constantly adding to their arsenal of offensive nuclear weapons will no longer give them a corresponding military advantage. In simple language, our SDI research will help take the profit out of the Soviet buildup in offensive arms. The Strategic Defense Initiative represents, in short, an instrument of hope -- hope that we can build a better world; and hope that you young Americans need never know the horror of war; hope that, in peace, we can expand human freedom until it encircles the globe.

This hope of human freedom is something we Americans thought about a lot over the Fourth of July. And I suspect that you're learning this week what I mentioned in New York Harbor: Here in America, we have inherited a precious legacy -- the freedom to govern ourselves. And let me just take a moment here to speak on a special project that deserves all of our support. The most powerful tool that you and I have with which to preserve our liberties and shape our own futures is our right to vote. Yet, tragically, in every election, millions of Americans fail to exercise this special privilege. And worse, of those not voting, the highest percentage is among our young people, ages 18 to 24. We ought to think very hard about the number of countries in the world who have fought for that privilege and how today 85 -- 90 percent of their people turn out in an election. And here, where we have fought and so many have given their lives for that right to vote, almost half our people regularly just don't bother to go and vote.

And that's why I would like to take a moment now to thank the men and women who, through another national, nonpartisan project, one called Vote America, are working in their own communities to encourage more citizens, especially our youth, to register and to vote. And in keeping with the same spirit of participation and commitment that has restored the Statue of Liberty, I want to ask each of you to take part in this national effort by urging your friends and family to vote in this -- because this is an election year -- and every election. And through our votes, each of us can make a mark on this great nation of ours. After all, America's freedom, in fact our very future, depends on America's voters. Maybe you've heard your folks speak of a onetime entertainer, kind of a cowboy philosopher at the same time that he was a great entertainer, Will Rogers. And Will Rogers once observed -- he said: ``You know, the people you send to public office are no better and no worse than anyone else. But they're all better than the people that don't vote at all.'' He made a lot of sense in his way.

Furthering democracy really is at the heart of what America's all about -- the conviction that we as a people can never truly rest until every man, woman, and child on Earth knows the blessings of liberty. Ray Charles -- you've heard him, the great, blind singer, pianist -- he explains -- well, you've heard him, I know. He loves to sing, ``America the Beautiful.'' And this explains his feelings about our country this way -- he said: ``You've got people who would give up their lives trying to get here. I know of no place in the world where people do that. I don't know of any country in the world that's as glorious as ours. When you match America against anyplace, it is still the heaven of the world, by far.'' So, in practicing democracy, please always bear in mind the blessing that is America; just as, I assure you, those of us who are older bear in mind our own blessing in having young people such as yourselves, young people who love their country and are committed to the cause of freedom.

One other thing, many people made great sacrifices so that all of us could live in freedom. And no group sacrificed more dramatically than the members of the American Legion and the Legion Auxiliary. It's a funny thing: Some people don't know how to stop giving; they just keep going on. And that's why Girls Nation and Boys Nation, which will be here next week, and all the other great things the American Legion does exist today. So, when you get back home, do me a favor: Tell the Legionnaires and their ladies the Gipper was asking about them and said thanks.

The President. No, but I think what you all ought to worry about is the violation of the journalistic rules that led to that story. Because that story, according to the transcript which I've read, is a complete distortion of the truth.

At this moment, just two blocks from the White House, more than 1,000 relatives of the men still missing from the Vietnam war are gathered for the 17th annual meeting of the National League of Families. Like the story of their loved ones in Vietnam, their story, too, is one of heroism.

Only a few short years ago, there was little interest and less hope here in Washington about the POW/MIA issue. The matter was given little priority by the intelligence community. The national media featured only occasional reports, and there were no international negotiations. The Governments of Vietnam and Laos believed America was no longer really interested in her lost sons. All of this now has dramatically changed. Today our intelligence is far better than it was in the past. The media, the government, and all of America are concerned. And today we're engaged in negotiations with both Vietnam and Laos -- negotiations that have helped return more of our men to their families than at any time since the end of the war. These men died in battle for their country, and it's only right and fitting that they finally rest now in the Nation they loved so dearly and for which they so willingly sacrificed.

So, there have been steps foward, but this doesn't mean that there still isn't need for more progress, much more progress. In Laos our joint crash-site evacuations are bringing results, but many questions still remain. I'm glad to report that the Lao Government has pledged to answer these questions, and I look forward to an improving relationship and the acceleration of our joint efforts. I also want to express appreciation for the increasing cooperation of the Government of Vietnam in the humanitarian quest. Other differences must not be allowed to interfere in our effort to resolve this issue. We must continue to go forward. It's the only responsible path, and it is in the interest of both our peoples.

There are a number of people to thank for what has been accomplished. Believe me, we could not have come this far without the critical bipartisan support of our friends in Congress. The Senate Veterans' Affairs Committee has held difficult hearings to pursue whether a factual basis exists for many of the public claims about our missing men. The Asian and Pacific Affairs Subcommittee of the House of Representatives has played a most responsible role, as have other longtime advocates of this issue in both Houses. There are others who also need to be thanked. And so, to our national veterans organizations and especially our Vietnam veterans, I want to extend my gratitude for your support of this administration's efforts and those of the National League of Families. And to all the others in this administration, including the many Vietnam veterans and returned POW's interviewing in the refugee camps in Southeast Asia, those in the identification lab in Hawaii, in the Defense Intelligence Agency in Washington, and across the negotiating table in Hanoi, you have my profound thanks for undertaking and staying with this most exacting and difficult task.

But finally, there is that one group that deserves our thanks most of all -- the real heroes in this: the fathers and mothers, the wives, the sons and daughters, and other relatives of our POW's and MIA's. They never gave up. They never stopped loving. And on behalf of every American, I want to promise each of them today: We mean to end your heartache and uncertainty. We will vigorously pursue the answers you seek and deserve. We will apply every resource we can to achieve the fullest possible accounting of your relatives still missing in Southeast Asia.

This is, of course, a difficult and emotional issue. It's no secret there are those who want to promise easy solutions or even exploit this issue for selfish reasons. But we have made progress. And the truth is we will continue to make progress as long as we stick with the facts and keep faith with each other and demonstrate the unity of purpose so fundamental to our cause. All Americans, after all, have a common goal in this endeavor: Freedom for any prisoner who may still be held in Southeast Asia and justice for all of the families who've worked so long to resolve the fate of our POW's and MIA's in Vietnam. They were our loved ones and our fellow Americans; and they were, I'm certain time will tell, part of a noble cause and history's heroes.

Well, a special thanks to those Members of Congress who are with us here and demonstrating their continued support of Captive Nations Week. A couple of weeks ago, we had a celebration up in New York, and you probably heard about it. And throughout the width and breadth of our country, we had that celebration. It was quite a party. But there was more to that joyous occasion than dazzling fireworks, spectacular entertainment, and flag-waving pageantry. As we emphasized over the Liberty Weekend, our country's made up of people who came here from nearly every corner of the Earth to better themselves and to be made free. And thus, there's a spiritual bond between the citizens of our country and all people everywhere who yearn for freedom.

Seriously though, I've received letters from desperate people pleading for us to be firm in our resolve. I had a special guest, Anatoly Shcharanskiy, who was here. And he'd been a prisoner, as you know, of the Gulag. And he told me how word of things that we say here in America spread from prisoner to prisoner. I wish that it would be possible to relate to all our people everything that he told in the line of stories.

I can tell you one little story here. Sometime ago I received a letter. It was smuggled out of the Soviet Union. Ten women incarcerated in a labor camp there, and they managed to get this letter out. And it was delivered to me in a kind of a presentation, so I couldn't bring the original letter in here. But I was very carefully -- that, I cut as a pattern, is the size of the entire letter, written and signed by 10 women prisoners, so tiny that you know that nothing but a strong magnifying glass could allow someone to interpret the Russian writing into English. But it was telling me that we are still the only hope of people like themselves. And then it was accompanied by a little larger piece of paper, about the same width but about that high, which contained the record of the hunger strikes that all 10 had been on in that labor camp as measures of protest.

Well, I don't suggest that it's impossible to improve relations with the Soviet Union or the other Communist regimes. Progress was made that we can build on when I met General Secretary Gorbachev in Geneva. But, however, wishful thinking is not the way to a better world. Meaningful progress can be realized by facing our differences, not glossing them over. Human rights and humanitarian issues cannot be ignored or trivialized. We care about those people, those separated families, who are now brutally cut off from contact with wives or husbands and relatives. We share their suffering, and we will not forget them or ignore their plight. I believe the Soviet Union wants better relations. Well, let's begin, then, by loosening restrictions on travel and personal contacts between our peoples. And in Geneva we talked about that. It's time to see the followthrough, to see deeds now, not words. Opening up immigration and travel would be demonstrable progress with little cost and little risk. Our goal is not just to live in peace with the Soviet Union but that all mankind live in freedom. And peace is an outgrowth of freedom.

Until all peoples are free to travel and speak with each other, it behooves us to keep Radio Free Europe, Radio Liberty, Radio Marti, and Voice of America broadcasting the truth to those who are denied it.

Until freedom is no longer threatened by a massive military buildup, as has been happening in the Soviet Union since the early 1970's, we must remain vigilant and prepared. Until the Soviets stop trying, through force of arms, to turn Afghanistan, Nicaragua, Angola, and other Third World countries into colonies of their empire, we'll continue to support freedom fighters who are struggling for their independence. Until the people of the Baltic States and Eastern Europe are free to choose their own system of government, we will continue to speak up for their rights and champion their cause. That's what Captive Nations Week is all about.

During the last decade, nations like Vietnam and Cambodia were added to the list of captive nations, which included Romania, Poland, and the Ukraine. One of the accomplishments of which I'm most proud is that during our term here there have been no new captive nations. [Applause] Thank you. In fact, we brought one small country, Grenada, back into the family of free people. There aren't any signs down there about ``Yankee, go home.'' I've been there and seen.

But in July of 1959 the United States Congress, by joint resolution, authorized the President and future Presidents to declare this, the third week in July, as Captive Nations Week. And we have with us today the individual who conceived the idea, then spearheaded the drive to make Captive Nations Week a reality. He's been a distinguished professor at Georgetown. He's done a tremendous job as our Ambassador to the Bahamas for the past few years. And last but not least, he's the father of my national security adviser on Eastern Europe. Now, that's what I call service above and beyond the call of duty. [Laughter] But I'm going to ask him to join me here as I sign this year's proclamation here. And would Ambassador Zimmermann and would the Members of the Congress kind of gather around here, because everybody had a part in this.

This vision of the future has been a beacon of hope and guidance both for those individuals who seek refuge here and for those nations whose aspirations for self-determination have been crushed by the Soviet empire. Deprived of basic human rights, their peoples are the victims of ruthless regimes run according to totalitarian ideologies. These are the nations held captive by forces hostile to freedom, independence, and national self-determination. These captive nations include those of Eastern Europe that have known foreign occupation and communist tyranny for decades; those struggling to throw off communist domination in Latin America; and the people of Afghanistan, Southeast Asia, and Africa struggling against foreign invasion, military occupation, and communist oppression.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-first day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

We are pleased to announce the successful conclusion of two trade policy actions, initiated by the President last fall, aimed at securing open markets for U.S. firms. Resolution of the two actions admits U.S. firms to the $5 billion Korean insurance market and provides comprehensive protection of foreign patents, copyrights, and trademarks in Korea. The President emphasized in his trade policy action plan in September 1985 that he would move vigorously to improve conditions for U.S. firms in individual foreign markets. Last fall he used his authority under section 301 of the 1974 Trade Act to initiate investigations of access to the Korean insurance market and of intellectual property protection in Korea.

The outcome of the insurance investigation enables U.S. insurance firms to underwrite both life and nonlife insurance in Korea. Korean insurance authorities have told us that they will be prepared in the weeks ahead to receive license applications and to provide all necessary information on the technical requirements.

The U.S. and Korean Governments have agreed to establish consultative mechanisms to discuss matters related to both these issues. Opening foreign markets for U.S. firms in the services sector and universal protection of intellectual property rights are major U.S. goals for the forthcoming new round of multilateral trade negotiations. These are also significant objectives of our current consultations with individual countries under our Generalized System of Preferences for developing countries.

We welcome this meeting between King Hassan and Prime Minister Peres. It symbolizes the change that has occurred in the Middle East and creates a context which can enhance the peace process. We have always urged direct contact between the Arabs and the Israelis as an essential step in the dialog leading to peace. The U.S. was aware of this meeting, but we regard it as a Moroccan-Israeli initiative, which we strongly welcome.

Well, a warm welcome to your national president, Rick Malir, to your other national officers, and to John Kelley of Chevrolet, the company that has done so much to make your visit to Washington possible. And by the way, I thought you might like to know that we have somebody here at the White House who has a place in his heart for the FFA. You see, my Special Assistant for Legislative Affairs, Fred McClure of Texas, used to be an FFA State president and national officer.

Well, this is the sixth time in 6 years that I've spoken here at the White House to a gathering of the Future Farmers of America. It's something I make a point of, because there's no finer organization in the country than the FFA, and I'm sure you agree. America is grateful for its farmers; they're the best in the world. It's true that lately farmers have had a long run of just plain bad luck: embargoes during the last administration; inflation; and now, in one part of our country, a great drought. Believe me, our administration, under the fine guidance of Secretary [of Agriculture] Lyng, is committed to seeing farmers through. We're spending more on farming than ever before. Indeed, aid to farming has risen faster than defense spending.

Already, the future is beginning to look up. Interest rates are down, easing the terms that farmers have to pay to get in the spring planting or purchase new livestock or equipment. And with the tax reform now under consideration in the Congress, we'll be limiting the ability of those who make their money someplace else to take advantage of agriculture by using it as a tax dodge. In other words, we'll be giving farming back to farmers. So, while times may be tough, the future for American farmers -- your future -- I think, looks bright.

The President. Okay. This takes place in Kansas. [Laughter] There was an old Kansas farmer there. He had a piece of creekbottom land that had never been developed at all -- it was all rocks and brush and all messed up. And he started in on it, clearing it -- the underbrush, and hauling away the rocks, then cultivating the soil there. And he planted a garden -- everything from vegetables on to corn, and it really became a garden spot. And he was pretty proud of what he'd done. So, one Sunday morning in church after the service he asked the preacher if he wouldn't stop by to have a look.

I've always liked that joke because it makes a good point: God did give us this great and good land, but it's up to us to make it flourish and to preserve its freedom, to see it grow, and to keep it a nation of greatness. Soon my generation will pass that task on to you, and I wondered for awhile about what I might say to you as you prepare to become America's leaders. Then it occurred to me that there could be no better way to give you hope for the future than to speak to you for a moment about the past. In particular, the part of the American story that I've witnessed in my own lifetime.

When I was about your age, if you can take your minds back that far -- [laughter] -- America was in the midst of a Great Depression. And really -- that Great Depression -- you had to experience it to know how unusual, how unique it was. Things we've called recessions in recent years were booming prosperity compared to that particular thing that happened in our country. In fact, the unemployment rate had risen to just about a quarter of the work force -- a fourth of all Americans were out of work.

And just think of all we take for granted today that we didn't even use to -- well, it didn't even use to exist -- things like television and computers and space flights. You may not believe it, but you're looking at a fellow who can actually remember what a thrill it was listening and waiting for the word to hear that Charles Lindbergh had landed safely in France -- the first individual to ever fly across the Atlantic Ocean. Now, that same fellow also happens to remember what it was like to gather around the television a little later and watch the first Americans walk on the Moon. Imagine it -- in a single lifetime -- from Charles Lindbergh in that solo flight across the Atlantic to Moon landings. And they wonder why I'm an optimist.

Well, what about your generation? I'm convinced that you're on the verge of a new age. Today freedom is on the march throughout the world. Just a decade ago, for example, there were very few democracies in Latin America. Now 90 percent of the people in Latin America live in democracies or countries that are moving swiftly into that situation. Peace itself is moving to a surer footing, especially with the research on our Strategic Defense Initiative, SDI, as it's referred to. Washington is very big on initials. A defense system, SDI is, that may soon be able to protect our nation and our allies from ballistic missiles, just as a roof protects us from the rain. And our economy is growing as America leads the world in a technological revolution -- a revolution ranging from tiny microchips to voyages through the outer reaches of the solar system, from home computers to agricultural breakthroughs like new disease-resistant crops. And all of this awaits you. Of course you'll face challenges; so must each generation as it comes of age. But you need only be true to the values that made this nation great, and they were very simple -- faith and family, hard work, and freedom -- and you, too, will know greatness.

Well, it's time for me to do what the little girl who wrote me a letter after I got this job told me to do. She told me all the problems that I had solved, and she had them down pretty good to what they were. And then she wound up with a P.S. that said, ``Now get back to the Oval Office and get to work.'' [Laughter] So, if you have any suggestions for next year's farm joke, let me know. [Laughter] I try not to repeat. But in the meantime, again, it's great to have all of you here.

President today announced his intention to nominate James Edward Nolan, Jr., to be Director of the Office of Foreign Missions, Department of State, with the rank of Ambassador. This is a new position.

Vice President, Secretary [of State] Shultz, I would like to express my appreciation to Leonard Marks, the World Affairs Council, and the Foreign Policy Association for helping bring this group together today. For more than a year now, the world's attention has been focused upon South Africa -- the deepening political crisis there, the widening cycle of violence. And today I'd like to outline American policy toward that troubled republic and toward the region of which it is a part, a region of vital importance to the West.

The root cause of South Africa's disorder is apartheid, that rigid system of racial segregation, wherein black people have been treated as third-class citizens in a nation they helped to build. America's view of apartheid has been and remains clear. Apartheid is morally wrong and politically unacceptable. The United States cannot maintain cordial relations with a government whose power rests upon the denial of rights to a majority of its people based on race. If South America [South Africa] wishes to belong to the family of Western nations, an end to apartheid is a precondition.

Americans, I believe, are united in this conviction. Second, apartheid must be dismantled. Time is running out for the moderates of all races in South Africa. But if we Americans are agreed upon the goal, a free and multiracial South Africa associated with free nations and the West, there is deep disagreement about how to reach it.

First, a little history: For a quarter century now, the American Government has been separating itself from the South African Government. In 1962 President Kennedy imposed an embargo on military sales. Last September I issued an Executive order further restricting U.S. dealings with the Pretoria Government. For the past 18 months the marketplace has been sending unmistakable signals of its own. U.S. bank lending to South Africa has been virtually halted. No significant new investment has come in. Some Western businessmen have packed up and gone home.

And now we've reached a critical juncture. Many in Congress and some in Europe are clamoring for sweeping sanctions against South Africa. The Prime Minister of Great Britain has denounced punitive sanctions as ``immoral'' and ``utterly repugnant.'' Well, let me tell you why we believe Mrs. Thatcher is right. The primary victims of an economic boycott of South Africa would be the very people we seek to help. Most of the workers who would lose jobs because of sanctions would be black workers. We do not believe the way to help the people of South Africa is to cripple the economy upon which they and their families depend for survival.

Paton, South Africa's great writer, for years the conscience of his country, has declared himself emphatically: ``I am totally opposed to disinvestment,'' he says. ``It is primarily for a moral reason. Those who will pay most grievously for disinvestment will be the black workers of South Africa. I take very seriously the teachings of the gospels. In particular, the parables about giving drink to the thirsty and food to the hungry. I will not help to cause any such suffering to any black person.'' Nor will we.

Western nations have poured billions in foreign aid and investment loans into southern Africa. Does it make sense to aid these countries with one hand and with the other to smash the industrial engine upon which their future depends? Wherever blacks seek equal opportunity, higher wages, better working conditions, their strongest allies are the American, British, French, German, and Dutch businessmen who bring to South Africa ideas of social justice formed in their own countries. If disinvestment is mandated, these progressive Western forces will depart; and South African proprietors will inherit, at fire sale prices, their farms and factories and plants and mines. And how would this end apartheid? Our own experience teaches us that racial progress comes swiftest and easiest, not during economic depression, but in times of prosperity and growth. Our own history teaches us that capitalism is the natural enemy of such feudal institutions as apartheid.

Nevertheless, we share the outrage Americans have come to feel. Night after night, week after week, television has brought us reports of violence by South African security forces, bringing injury and death to peaceful demonstrators and innocent bystanders. More recently, we read of violent attacks by blacks against blacks.

Congress: the mining of roads, the bombings of public places, designed to bring about further repression, the imposition of martial law, eventually creating the conditions for racial war. The most common method of terror is the so-called necklace. In this barbaric way of reprisal, a tire is filled with kerosene or gasoline, placed around the neck of an alleged collaborator, and ignited. The victim may be a black policeman, a teacher, a soldier, a civil servant. It makes no difference. The atrocity is designed to terrorize blacks into ending all racial cooperation and to polarize South Africa as prelude to a final, climactic struggle for power.

In defending their society and people, the South African Government has a right and responsibility to maintain order in the face of terrorists. But by its tactics, the Government is only accelerating the descent into bloodletting.

Moderates are being trapped between the intimidation of radical youths and countergangs of vigilantes. And the Government's state of emergency, next, went beyond the law of necessity. It, too, went outside the law by sweeping up thousands of students, civic leaders, church leaders, and labor leaders; thereby contributing to futher radicalization. Such repressive measures will bring South Africa neither peace nor security.

It's a tragedy that most Americans only see or read about the dead and injured in South Africa -- from terrorism, violence, and repression. For behind the terrible television pictures lies another truth: South Africa is a complex and diverse society in a state of transition. More and more South Africans have come to recognize that change is essential for survival. The realization has come hard and late, but the realization has finally come to Pretoria that apartheid belongs to the past. In recent years there's been a dramatic change. Black workers have been permitted to unionize, bargain collectively, and build the strongest free trade union movement in all of Africa. The infamous pass laws have been ended, as have many of the laws denying blacks the right to live, work, and own property in South Africa's cities. Citizenship, wrongly stripped away, has been restored to nearly 6 million blacks.

We must remember, as the British historian Paul Johnson reminds us, that South Africa is an African country as well as a Western country. And reviewing the history of that continent in the quarter century since independence, historian Johnson does not see South Africa as a failure. ``Only in South Africa,'' he writes, ``have the real incomes of blacks risen very substantially. .

Despite apartheid, tens of thousands of black Africans migrate into South Africa from neighboring countries to escape poverty and take advantage of the opportunities in an economy that produces nearly a third of the income in all of sub-Saharan Africa. It's tragic that in the current crisis social and economic progress has been arrested. And yet in contemporary South Africa -- before the state of emergency -- there was a broad measure of freedom of speech, of the press, and of religion there. Indeed, it's hard to think of a single country in the Soviet bloc, or many in the United Nations, where political critics have the same freedom to be heard as did outspoken critics of the South African Government.

But by Western standards, South Africa still falls short, terribly short, on the scales of economic and social justice. South Africa's actions to dismantle apartheid must not end now. The state of emergency must be lifted. There must be an opening of the political process. That the black people of South Africa should have a voice in their own governance is an idea whose time has come. There can be no turning back. In the multiracial society that is South Africa, no single race can monopolize the reins of political power. Black churches, black unions, and, indeed, genuine black nationalists have a legitimate role to play in the future of their country. But the South African Government is under no obligation to negotiate the future of the country with any organization that proclaims a goal of creating a Communist state and uses terrorist tactics and violence to achieve it.

Well, the answer is: We cannot. In southern Africa our national ideals and strategic interests come together. South Africa matters because we believe that all men are created equal and are endowed by their Creator with unalienable rights. South Africa matters because of who we are. One of eight Americans can trace his ancestry to Africa.

Strategically, this is one of the most vital regions of the world. Around the Cape of Good Hope passes the oil of the Persian Gulf, which is indispensable to the industrial economies of Western Europe. Southern Africa and South Africa are the repository of many of the vital minerals -- vanadium, manganese, chromium, platinum -- for which the West has no other secure source of supply. The Soviet Union is not unaware of the stakes. A decade ago, using an army of Cuban mercenaries provided by Fidel Castro, Moscow installed a client regime in Angola. Today the Soviet Union is providing that regime with the weapons to attack UNITA, a black liberation movement which seeks for Angolans the same right to be represented in their government that black South Africans seek for themselves.

Apartheid threatens our vital interests in southern Africa, because it's drawing neighboring states into the vortex of violence. Repeatedly, within the last 18 months, South African forces have struck into neighboring states. I repeat our condemnation of such behavior. Also the Soviet-armed guerrillas of the African National Congress, operating both within South Africa and from some neighboring countries, have embarked upon new acts of terrorism inside South Africa. I also condemn that behavior. But South Africa cannot shift the blame for these problems onto neighboring states, especially when those neighbors take steps to stop guerrilla actions from being mounted from their own territory.

If this rising hostility in southern Africa, between Pretoria and the frontline states, explodes, the Soviet Union will be the main beneficiary. And the critical ocean corridor of South Africa and the strategic minerals of the region would be at risk. Thus, it would be an historic act of folly for the United States and the West, out of anguish and frustration and anger, to write off South Africa. Ultimately, however, the fate of South Africa will be decided there, not here. We Americans stand ready to help. But whether South Africa emerges democratic and free or takes a course leading to a downward spiral of poverty and repression will finally be their choice, not ours.

The key to the future lies with the South African Government. As I urge Western nations to maintain communication and involvement in South Africa, I urge Mr. Botha not to retreat into the ``laager,'' not to cut off contact with the West. Americans and South Africans have never been enemies, and we understand the apprehension and fear and concern of all of your people.

To the black, colored, and Asian peoples of South Africa, too long treated as second and third class subjects, I can only say: In your hopes for freedom, social justice, and self-determination, you have a friend and ally in the United States. Maintain your hopes for peace and reconciliation, and we will do our part to keep that road open.

We understand that behind the rage and resentment in the townships is the memory of real injustices inflicted upon generations of South Africans. ``Those to whom evil is done,'' the poet wrote, ``often do evil in return.'' But if the people of South Africa are to have a future in a free country, where the rights of all are respected, the desire for retribution will have to be set aside. Otherwise the future will be lost in a bloody quarrel over the past.

It would be an act of arrogance to insist that uniquely American ideas and institutions, rooted in our own history and traditions, be transplanted to South African soil. Solutions to South Africa's political crisis must come from South Africans themselves. Black and white, colored and Asian, they have their own traditions. But let me outline what we believe are necessary components of progress toward political peace.

First, a timetable for elimination of apartheid laws should be set. Second, all political prisoners should be released. Third, Nelson Mandela should be released to participate in the country's political process. Fourth, black political movements should be unbanned. Fifth, both the Government and its opponents should begin a dialog about constructing a political system that rests upon the consent of the governed, where the rights of majorities and minorities and individuals are protected by law. And the dialog should be initiated by those with power and authority: the South African Government itself. Sixth, if postapartheid South Africa is to remain the economic locomotive of southern Africa, its strong and developed economy must not be crippled.

And, therefore, I urge the Congress and the countries of Western Europe to resist this emotional clamor for punitive sanctions. If Congress imposes sanctions, it would destroy America's flexibility, discard our diplomatic leverage, and deepen the crisis. To make a difference, Americans, who are a force for decency and progress in the world, must remain involved. We must stay and work, not cut and run. It should be our policy to build in South Africa, not to bring down.

Too often in the past, we Americans, acting out of anger and frustration and impatience, have turned our backs on flawed regimes, only to see disaster follow. Those who tell us the moral thing to do is embargo the South African economy and write off South Africa should tell us exactly what they believe will rise in its place. What foreign power would fill the vacuum if its ties with the West are broken?

To be effective, however, our policy must be coordinated with our key Western allies and with the frontline states in southern Africa. These countries have the greatest concern and potential leverage on the situation in South Africa.

I intend to pursue the following steps. Secretary Shultz has already begun intensive consultations with our Western allies, whose roots and presence in South Africa are greater than our own, on ways to encourage internal negotiations. We want the process to begin now, and we want open channels to all the principal parties. The key nations of the West must act in concert, and together we can make the difference. We fully support the current efforts of the British Government to revive hopes for negotiations. Foreign Secretary Howe's visits with South Africa's leaders this week will be of particular significance.

And second, I urge the leaders of the region to join us in seeking a future South Africa where countries live in peace and cooperation. South Africa is the nation where the industrial revolution first came to Africa. Its economy is a mighty engine that could pull southern Africa into a prosperous future. The other nations of southern Africa -- from Kinshasa to the Cape -- are rich in natural resources and human resources.

I have directed Secretary Shultz and AID Administrator McPherson to undertake a study of America's assistance role in southern Africa to determine what needs to be done and what can be done to expand the trade, private investment, and transport prospects of southern Africa's landlocked nations. In the past 5 years we have provided almost a billion dollars in assistance to South Africa's neighbors. And this year we hope to provide an additional $45 million to black South Africans.

We're determined to remain involved, diplomatically and economically, with all the states of southern Africa that wish constructive relations with the United States. This administration is not only against broad economic sanctions and against apartheid; we are for a new South Africa, a new nation where all that has been built up over generations is not destroyed, a new society where participation in the social, cultural, and political life is open to all peoples -- a new South Africa that comes home to the family of free nations where she belongs. To achieve that, we need not a Western withdrawal but deeper involvement by the Western business community as agents of change and progress and growth. The international business community needs not only to be supported in South Africa but energized. We'll be at work on that task. If we wish to foster the process of transformation, one of the best vehicles for change is through the involvement of black South Africans in business, job-related activities, and labor unions.

But the vision of a better life cannot be realized so long as apartheid endures and instability reigns in South Africa. If the peoples of southern Africa are to prosper, leaders and peoples of the region, of all races, will have to elevate their common interests above their ethnic divisions. We and our allies cannot dictate to the government of a sovereign nation. Nor should we try. But we can offer to help find a solution that is fair to all the people of South Africa. We can volunteer to stand by and help bring about dialog between leaders of the various factions and groups that make up the population of South Africa. We can counsel and advise and make it plain to all that we are there as friends of all the people of South Africa.

In that tormented land, the window remains open for peaceful change. For how long, we know not. But we in the West, privileged and prosperous and free, must not be the ones to slam it shut. Now is a time for healing. The people of South Africa, of all races, deserve a chance to build a better future. And we must not deny or destroy that chance.

Thank you very much, and I owe some thanks for that wonderful introduction. But I'd like to begin by reintroducing myself. [Laughter] It's true my name is Reagan, and I'm President of the sister Republic of the great State of Texas.

But, ladies and gentlemen, this wonderful city of Dallas has great and fond memories for me: the primaries of 1976 and 1980 and then that nomination night in 1984. In fact, flying over the convention center this morning, I started asking myself: ``I wonder how folks down there would feel about giving it one more try.'' [Applause] Well, thank you for that. Thank you for that, but I'm kidding, of course. What I'm not kidding about is how much has changed, how better things are for our country because you and I and millions of other Americans refused to believe America's best days were behind her, that the old values and the virtues just couldn't cut it anymore.

You remember 1980: the worst economic mess since the Great Depression, foreign governments that routinely insulted this great nation and her citizens, and leadership in Washington that blamed the American people instead of itself for all our problems. The people knew different. As somebody put it: ``98 percent of the adults in this country are decent, hardworking, honest Americans.'' And the quote then goes on to say: ``It's the other lousy 2 percent that get all the publicity, but then we elected them.'' [Laughter] Well, we set to work to change all that. We went to the American people and told them: ``The economy's gone sour, and taxes are too high. We're overregulated. And there's one simple reason for it. The Federal Government is too big, and it spends too much money.'' And we told the American people there was one way to end the years of tax and tax and spend and spend, and that was to elect fewer liberals and a whole lot more Republicans.

And the people heard us, and we started moving. One example: taxes -- they were too high and the liberals in Washington wanted them to go higher. But we didn't just stand fast; we cut taxes and then indexed them to the rate of inflation, thereby ending that hidden tax of bracket creep. Still, the old habits of tax and tax and spend and spend died hard, and the liberals found a battle cry for their campaign in 1984: ``We're going to raise your taxes,'' they shouted at the American people. And in November the American people shouted right back: ``Oh, no, you're not. We're voting for the other guys. We're pulling the Republican lever.'' And, ladies and gentlemen, I think we Republicans had a right to the support that we got.

Our policies brought down inflation, taxes, interest rates, and created 6 million new jobs by 1984 and another 4 million jobs since 1984. As soon as they stopped calling it Reaganomics, I knew it must be working.

But now, I didn't come here to talk about Washington. But there is a special reason for bringing up this issue of taxes and economic growth today. Let me remind you that in the first years of the eighties, Texas was a leader of America's economic recovery, with 1 million new jobs created and the incorporation of 150,000 new businesses. The State government, too, was in great shape. No new taxes were passed. There was a billion dollar surplus. And the size of the State budget was actually reduced by 5 percent. But then you know what happened? That other party took over in Austin. And sure enough, the State budget increased by 15 percent. The number of State employees rose by 12,000. And there was a tax increase -- and that huge, huge tax increase that the then-Governor promised you would never happen. And, yes, of course, now there's a budget deficit and a special session of the legislature to deal with it.

But now it's election time again; and the Democrats in Austin are promising the people of this great State that they've learned their lesson, that, honest, this time they aren't going to increase spending and taxes. Well, may I offer some advice from a fellow who deals with the liberals every day in Washington: When it comes to tax and tax and spend and spend, some of them mean well, but they're just like Oscar Wilde: They can resist everything but temptation. Believe me, these liberals never met a tax they didn't like.

So, let's say something else flat out: One of the most important steps that Texas can take towards full economic recovery is to say no to any more years of tax and tax and spend and spend in Austin. The best way to restore a favorable climate for business and economic expansion is to put my good friend and your good friend back in the Austin statehouse -- a tough man for tough times. He was a great Deputy Secretary of Defense, a great Republican Governor during the great Texas prosperity, a man who doesn't break his promises -- Bill Clements.

I think it's a tragedy that hard times have hit Texas and that unemployment is as high as it is in this great State. I want you all to know that this administration in Washington is aware of Texas problems, and we're going to do everything in our power to see this State and every State shares again in full prosperity. I'm down here to tell you this administration is wholeheartedly committed to a strong, domestic energy industry. We proved that when we decontrolled the price of oil. And we'll press and press again until Congress passes comprehensive decontrol of our natural gas supplies and until they take the other steps that we have proposed to protect America's energy future. And let me pledge that with the help of the people of your great State, this administration is determined that America will never again be captive to a foreign oil cartel.

My friends, it isn't just partriotism that's back in style; it's words like hope and vision and future and optimism. And let me tell you that no State in the Union has a better claim on these words, no State knows more about builders and dreamers and visionaries than this one. And I'm down here to tell you today, Bill Clements is one of those builders and dreamers and visionaries. Under his leadership, and with some help from his friends in this administration, it's going to be comeback time for Texas. Texas led the way to prosperity once before, and with Bill Clements as her Governor, she'll lead the way again. And I hope the people of Texas know that by electing Bill Clements they won't only be putting Texas back on the road to economic good times, they'll also be sending a message to the rest of the country, and especially to the Democratic Party leadership -- a message that says: Stop the taxing; stop the spending; and help the administration in Washington make government live within its means.

Well, now, ladies and gentlemen, when we proposed tax reform, official Washington said it couldn't be done. Well, today tax reform is nearly a reality. And the Senate's tax reform plan keeps the incentives for domestic exploration, which is critical to our national security. Yet our very ability to maneuver such initiatives through the Congress is what's at stake this fall. Because in addition to putting great Republicans like Bill Clements in statehouses around the country, we Republicans must protect our majority in the Senate and elect more Republicans to the House of Representatives. And I'm asking everyone here today to help.

And we must dedicate ourselves to winning other races crucial to the ticket, such as Judge Roy Barrerra's race for attorney general. He represents an opportunity for Texas to elect a leader of the highest caliber.

Believe me, the liberals in Washington know what's at stake in this election. They know that this may well be their last chance to steer American politics way over to the left. They know that if we Republicans do well this November it's going to permanently alter the political landscape.

They know that I need Congressman Joe Barton to return to the House next year and continue as my ally serving the people of Texas. And let me tell you this: Nothing convinces the Washington liberals of this more than what happened here in Texas in 1984, when you elected the largest number of Republican Congressmen and State legislators in your history. And more importantly, you sent Phil Gramm to the Senate, and that's not even to mention a whole batch of Republicans elected to county-level posts our party had never even thought about winning before. So, whatever you do, don't stop now.

You see, on holding down taxes and spending, on appointing tough judges, on keeping up our defenses and dealing firmly with the Soviets, the liberal Democrat leadership knows the fundamental differences between the Republican Party and the Democratic Party are beginning to sink in with the average voter. Take another issue that's come to the fore recently, an issue where partisan politics shouldn't even play a role. All of you know that a Communist government has taken over in Nicaragua. In addition to engaging in widespread repression of human rights, this government is establishing a base camp for Cuban-Soviet aggression on the North American mainland. But today there are about 20,000 freedom fighters who need our help in restoring democracy to that country. And a few weeks ago we won a crucial vote in the House of Representatives that will help them to do just that.

And by the way, I think you know I've mentioned in the past that Nicaragua is only a 2-day drive from the Texas border. And since I'm here now, I can explain: Don't mistake my reference to the Texas border. The Communist Sandinista regime in Nicaragua has made a lot of mistakes, but even they know better than to get themselves in a tangle with a bunch of Texans. Even with all the tanks and gunships from the Soviet Union, my guess is that the Sandinistas would make it about as far as the shopping center in Pecos before Roger Staubach came out of retirement -- [laughter] -- teamed up with some off-duty Texas Rangers and the front four of the Dallas Cowboys, and pushed the Sandinistas down the river, out across the Gulf, and right back to Havana where they belong. Come to think of it, they don't even belong in Havana either, but don't get me started on that. [Laughter] But what's really at stake here is restoring our bipartisan consensus on national security issues. Believe me, you'll send that message to the liberals in Washington if you'll elect more Republican officeholders here in Texas. Well, time is running -- I only wish I could stay longer.

I've mentioned a number of important Texas Republicans, but of course there's one Texas Republican to whom I and every American owes a great debt. He's been a great Vice President, and all of us thank the great State of Texas for sharing George Bush with all of America. And let me mention two more who ran and served well: former Congressmen Tom Loeffler and Kent Hance. For so many reasons, I love being in this wonderful State. You're rightfully proud of your great heritage; never take it for granted. Believe me, no visitor can come here without thinking about those 183 heroes who crossed that line in the dust, that line that Travis drew with his sword at the Alamo.

And that's what it's all been about these last few years: bringing America together again, restoring her greatness. And that's why you and I -- black, white, Asian, and Hispanic -- must continue to serve together in the cause of human freedom and the dream that is America. I'm asking every one of you to go back to your homes now and talk to your neighbors. Tell them the eyes of America are upon you. Tell them how important it is to put Bill Clements in the statehouse, to send more Republicans to Washington, and keep America on the upward road to peace and prosperity for all.

I know if you do that you're going to be talking to some of your friends and neighbors who are Democrats. And I know that in a gathering this big there must be many here who either are or, like myself, were once Democrats and then changed. And I want you to emphasize that, and when I've been talking here -- have you noticed I used the word the ``Democratic leadership'' several times?

Not much attention was paid to, some years ago, several years ago, when an organization of political scientists in this country conducted some studies and surveys. And they did it by assuming that the people who represented the party at the national convention, including the party officials there -- they were the leadership of the party. And then out beyond that were the great rank and file of the party members. So, they took the leading issues, the things of great interest to the people, and they surveyed the delegates to the Democratic Convention and the delegates to the Republican Convention on their approach to these problems. And they were polls apart -- the Democratic leadership from the Republican leadership. Then they polled the rank and file Democrats nationwide and the Republicans nationwide and found that the rank and file of the Democrats -- their views on all those important issues were virtually identical with the rank and file members of the Republican Party, and the Republican Party was completely in keeping with and in the context of how they felt with the leadership that had represented them at the convention. But the difference between the rank and file Democrats and their leadership -- they, too, were polls apart. That's why, yes, there are a great many Democrats out there who feel and think as we do. And whether they decide to change the party registration or not -- as some of us did -- I think at least they should know that they would be voting for people who share their ideas and ideals if this time they vote Republican.

The President. Well, thank you, Paula, and thank all of you very much. A few weeks ago our country celebrated Liberty Weekend, and that was quite a party. Well, it's terrific to be here in Miami with people who never stop celebrating American freedom. America is proud that our citizens came here from every corner of the world to better themselves and to live in freedom. And nowhere is that spirit, the American spirit, more alive and kicking than right here in Miami. And I want to thank Jeb Bush, in particular, for his efforts to bring more and more of our new citizens into the Republican fold.

In these last 5\1/2\ years we've rebuilt America's defensive strength and reinvigorated our alliances with other free nations. One of the changes that we've helped bring about makes me particularly happy: Today the brave men and women who defend this country are receiving the praise and gratitude they so rightfully deserve. We've restored the pride in wearing the uniform of the military services of the United States of America.

Only a decade ago there were those who were counting America out, and freedom was in retreat. Countries in Africa and Central America seemed on the verge of succumbing to Communist totalitarianism. When I was first inaugurated, the question being asked then was: Could El Salvador be saved? And many thought the answer to the question was no, and they objected to our trying to help El Salvador become a democracy. And many of those who opposed our help to El Salvador are now opposed to our helping the freedom fighters in Nicaragua and El Salvador.

This is Captive Nations Week. It's a time set aside to remember our brothers and sisters who languish under Communist tyranny. During our ceremony this year, which was held on Monday, I mentioned a fact of which I'm very proud. Under this administration, no new countries have been added to the list of captive nations; and in fact, one small country, Grenada, has had its freedom restored.

And reflecting the change that has taken place over these last 5\1/2\ years, the question heard today is not whether El Salvador will fall to Communist dictatorship -- El Salvador is now a solid democracy -- but whether democracy will prevail in Nicaragua. And the world should note that Americans, Democrats and Republicans, are again standing together to meet any threat to our national security and any challenge to the cause of human freedom. Now, symbolic of this new solidarity and resolve was the bipartisan support that was given in the House of Representatives to a bill that provided aid to the Nicaraguan freedom fighters. That wasn't a victory for any political party. It was a victory for freedom and democracy.

When that bill passed, it sent a clear message to the enemies of freedom: No dictatorial power will be permitted, through the inaction of the United States, to arm a clique of its followers and hijack any country in this hemisphere. It's the birthright of every American -- and that includes everyone from the North Slope of Alaska to the tip of Tierra del Fuego -- to live in freedom. Dictatorships of right and left take notice: We, the people of the United States, will provide our fellow Americans, from every country, the means to protect their birthright from aggression.

Today freedom is on the offensive, and young idealists are no longer being taken in by Castro as they once were. You know, he's been a great illusionist, but only for a time. Today the continued harshness of his rule, the political prisoners who fill the jails of Castro's gulag, even his own long demagogic harangues of the Cuban people, reveal the true nature of communism. It is a cruel system that doesn't work. It produces misery, tyranny, and deprivation -- and little else.

The President. Thank you. I have to tell you something. You know that that's in the Constitution that it can't be, but I have to tell you something. [Applause] Now, wait a minute. [Applause] But I'm going to tell you what I think. I think that any President who will try to get the Constitution changed should not be doing it for himself. He should be doing it for those who will follow him. Well, I have to tell you I think it should be changed, because I think it's only democratic for the people to be able to vote for someone as many times as they want.

The President. Well, listen. Well, I want to talk about Nicaragua again. The Communist regime -- which even the New York Times compares to Stalin's -- has thrown labor leaders in jail and brutally beaten down any attempt to maintain an independent union movement. And that's totally consistent with what Castro did when he captured power. Now, I understand that we have with us someplace here today a lady who was a respected Cuban labor leader in the days before Castro, Mercedes Chirino. Mercedes, many people forget that I, too, was a union leader. And let me say to you: History is on the side of the free, and someday the working people of Cuba will again work and prosper in the warm sunshine of liberty and justice. All of you who have been so supportive over these last 5\1/2\ years -- the Cuban-American Foundation, Concerned Citizens for Democracy, and so many others -- can be proud that you are writing the history of freedom. So much depends on us.

I'm also here in Miami in support of another lady, a gutsy individual who has played a unique and irreplaceable role putting America back on the right track. The progress that we've talked about here today could not have happened without her. I hope each and every one of you will do everything you can to see that Paula Hawkins is reelected to the United States Senate.

The President. Now, it's not good enough just to vote for her. I'm asking you to get your friends to vote for her, to walk your precincts, to organize the phone banks. It's a lot to ask, but do it for your families, for Florida, for your country, and -- if I might be presumptuous a bit -- do it for the Gipper.

Paula deserves your support. It's as simple as that. The big taxers and the big spenders gave this country double-digit inflation, economic decline, sky-high interest rates, and unprecedented national pessimism. Paula threw herself, heart and soul, into some of the hardest fought economic policy battles in the history of this Republic. And with the help of the people and the skill and dedication of elected officials like Paula, we turned the economy around. We crushed inflation. We ushered in economic growth that has surprised even our own critics. Let me ask you: Does anyone here want to go back to those bad old days?

The President. Well, Paula has been more than a teamplayer. She's been out in front of the pack, leading the way. Paula, for example, has a deep understanding of the ideological battle this country must win. She saw a need. She made an enormous effort. Roadblocks were put in our path all along the way. And yet she persevered. And thanks to her commitment -- and let there be no doubt, it wouldn't have happened without her -- today Radio Marti is broadcasting the truth to the people of Cuba.

On another front, Paula recognized the magnitude of the threat that vicious drug smugglers pose to this State. And again she played an essential role in activating the Federal Government to cope in Florida's assistance. And today the fight is far from won, but thanks to Paula we've launched what can only be described as a war on drugs. And 11 percent of the Federal drug enforcement budget is spent in your State. So, let no one doubt our resolve. The drugpushers and the merchants of death who supply them are on notice: The time is right to retire from the trade for health reasons.

She's earned the admiration of all Washington with the courageous way that she has overcome two back operations and is stronger than ever. This lady may be recovering, but she still knows how to twist arms. [Laughter] And every time I see her she hands me something to do. [Laughter] She was over at the White House last week. And before she left, she'd gotten the decision she wanted and was outside announcing that -- even though the inflation rate has remained below the trigger level -- all Social Security recipients will be getting a full cost-of-living increase.

We've got some serious issues coming up. The big taxers are going to keep trying to get their hands on your wallet, especially if they can regain control of the Senate. During the last decade the Federal tax take more than doubled. Ordinary working people ended up paying taxes at rates that had once been reserved for the affluent and the rich. I think Floridians want someone representing them who believes that people deserve to keep the money they earn, someone who prefers to ask the Federal Government rather than the American family to tighten its belt. Paula Hawkins is a low taxer. She's for more take-home pay and less government. And that's the kind of person we need in, and in control of, the United States Senate.

She's also the kind of Senator that we want and can count on to back up our efforts to put tough law and order judges on the bench. As a matter of fact, let me just tell you a little something. There was a very important thing going on in the Senate today, and there was -- I didn't know -- I have come here by way of Texas -- whether Paula was going to be with us here. She just arrived at the airport here from Washington on her own just a few minutes ahead of me. She stayed because the judge that I had nominated, that had to be ratified by the Senate -- and a little lynch mob had organized resistance against his appointment. We won by one vote. She knows we don't need sociology majors as judges. We need individuals who feel a heavy responsibility to protect the innocent and put the criminals where they belong -- behind bars.

And finally, we don't want to return control of the United States Senate to people whose only idea for reducing Federal deficit spending is gutting the United States military and weakening our defenses. If we ask our military personnel to put their lives on the line for us, we're not going to give them anything less than the top quality equipment they need to do their job and come home safely.

As one of the fastest growing States, Florida needs leaders with vision. Paula certainly fits that bill. And it's clear, by those seeking the Republican gubernatorial nomination, we have quality and experience there on our side. Florida has a Republican team that's worthy of its future. There's no reason that Florida should not lead our country into the 21st century. And what kind of country do we want? We want a strong, prosperous, and secure America -- an America that remains true to the promise of liberty and opportunity that we celebrated on Liberty Weekend.

Thank you, and thank you, Paula. And you know, I have to tell you -- because I understand that the previous speech, just a little while ago, was piped into -- if not all -- most of you here -- I feel like I'm in an instant replay. [Laughter] But I'll try not to say the same things twice, although I will say that it's great to be in Miami and great to be with so many old friends, veterans of hard-fought campaigns and crusades. Political strategists think of Florida as a bellwether State. Well, you folks down here not only reflect national trends, you start them. I hope I can count on you to be in the forefront of a trend that will ensure that the United States Senate remains in Republican hands, and that means reelecting Senator Paula Hawkins.

And if anybody can do it, you can. Florida's got top-quality party leaders like Jeanie Austin and Alec Courtelis and Jeb Bush bringing more and more Republicans into the fold. It seems like another lifetime when the South, including Florida, was considered a stronghold of the other party. There's a story, you know, about a candidate who was running for Congress in one of the Southern States back in the 1960's. And he was out in the countryside campaigning. And when he told a farmer that he was a Republican, the old guy says, ``Wait a minute till I get Ma. She's never seen a Republican.'' [Laughter] Well, he came back with Ma, and in the meantime, was wondering -- and then they told him that wouldn't he make them a political speech. Well, he looked around and needed kind of a podium. And the only thing there was a pile of stuff that had come out of the stable.

But seriously though, over the years many articles have been written about a coming national realignment. And no one need wait any longer; it's here. Many Democrats are realizing that their party no longer represents those values and ideals in which they believe. That happened to me. Years ago I was a New Deal Democrat from the very beginning, and I'll bet some of you were as well. And maybe there are some among you that you may not have gotten around to switching parties, but you sort of support the party that we now belong to. And when it comes to realignment, there's every reason to be optimistic. I say that because -- and this may be true for you as well -- I've been meeting a lot of Democrats recently who've become Republicans. I just met one who's running for office in Louisiana. And as of today he reregistered as a Republican. But, you know, I haven't been meeting anybody who's going the other way.

And if I could just tell you something that -- several years ago an organization of political scientists were interested in what might be happening to the parties -- this is really true -- and they did a study. And they took the two national conventions, Republican and Democrat, first, and they surveyed those as the leaders of their two parties -- that's why they were the delegates to the convention. And they surveyed them on the basis of a lot of major issues, as to how they felt about those and what they would do about those issues. And they found, of course, that the Democrat and the political -- or the Republican leadership as, by the delegates, was polls apart. Then, they went out and did a survey nationwide of the rank and file members of the two parties. And to their surprise, they found that the Republican rank and file were identical in their views with their leadership. They found that the rank and file Democrats across the country were totally out of step with their leadership. And then they compared the polls of the two -- the rank and file members -- and found that the Democrat rank and filers were almost identical with the beliefs of the Republicans. So, when you're talking to your friends, and some of them are still Democrat, you might point out that actually some of us that have changed already, and a lot that should change, is because we didn't leave the Democratic Party, it left us a long time ago. Well, Winston Churchill, in the Parliament of England, changed parties when he was a young man. And he said when people were looking a little aside at him about doing this, he said, ``Some men change party for principle, and some men change principle for party.'' Well, that's what's happening today, and that's why it's vital that we remain the party of principle, the party of a strong, opportunity-filled America.

Perhaps the most tangible reason for optimism is that young people are supporting our cause in numbers no one could ever have predicted a decade ago. As a matter of fact, when I first became a Republican and started attending some Republican meetings some years ago, I would go home to Nancy and say, ``You know, the only young people there looked like they couldn't join anything else.'' [Laughter] But not so today.

I've been on the campuses of a number of universities. I've been in high schools very recently and talking to young people. I've seen these young people of ours in those places -- in shops and factories and on military bases and out on aircraft carriers. And I saw them at the rally when I came into the hotel, where you were listening. I think this is one of the finest generations of young people this country has ever seen. They want the same things we wanted: a chance to live life to its fullest, to own a home, to have the opportunity to go as far as their talent and their hard work will take them.

And when I remember back when I was Governor -- and if I went near a campus in those days, they'd hang me in effigy or for real. [Laughter] But looking at these young people today, their patriotism, the spirit that they have, I'm convinced the 21st century is going to be in good hands. They sense that the reforms we've struggled to put in place, the efforts that we've made to invigorate our economy, and the commitment we've made to the security of our country are really for them, the young people of America. And they're right.

It's getting a bit hard to remember, but it wasn't that long ago -- and this is when that other party was in control of both Houses of Congress, the Presidency, and all of the executive departments and agencies -- that the so-called leaders of America were telling all of us, including young people, to lower our expectations. Do you remember? We were told that the problems plaguing our society were unsolvable. The refrain was heard that America's best days were behind us. And the picture of a bleak future was being painted. Well, America's left those bad old days and the politicians who gave us those bad old days behind. And all I can say is: Ain't it great?

We may have every reason to be optimistic. Nevertheless, I hope that none of us will be complacent. This is especially true here in Florida. A tough race is coming up. Yet I can't think of an individual who has done more for the cause in which we all so firmly believe than your own Senator, Paula Hawkins. Paula Hawkins was over at the White House the other day, and I told her she just simply had to be reelected. And I just added a few words to that in the lobby. And believe me, I could have gone on forever. As I mentioned out there, Paula is one of the hardest working individuals I've met in public office. She truly is an inspiration to all of us. And while you're out working for Paula, please don't forget the other Republican candidates. You have some great individuals down here. Florida, for example, deserves a future-oriented, Republican Governor. I know that Craig Kiser is running for State comptroller, and he is an inspiration to us all.

I spoke about a moment ago. Instead of looking -- or lowering their expectations, we want them to dream great dreams. America's best days do lie ahead. By doing what we're doing, we're making certain of that. And if any of you here are of the other party and thinking of changing, don't wait and do it as I did. I made up my mind that I could no longer support the party that I'd belonged to all my adult life, and I campaigned for Republicans. And I did Republican fundraisers back when I was in that Hollywood world. But I hadn't gotten around to reregistering. And yet the Republicans began to take me for granted. And then one night I was making a speech at a Republican fundraiser.

From the mountain country of Greenville and Spartanburg to the port city of Charleston to the capital here in Columbia, your economy is becoming richly varied and diverse. In education scores are going up. And South Carolina, always renowned for its past, has become famous, as well, as a State of opportunity, a State of the future.

Even when times were tough, you show your mettle. And today South Carolina's farmers are suffering from drought, as are farmers throughout the Southeast. The drought is reaching tragic proportions. The drought is one of the worst of the century, and I want you to know that our administration stands ready to help. I've sent a Federal team to South Carolina and other States to assess the situation. I've directed Secretary of Agriculture Lyng to provide farmers affected by the drought with emergency assistance. He'll hold a press conference in Washington today to describe the details of the help that we're going to provide here in South Carolina and in those other States.

We directed Air Force planes to take part in Operation Haylift, flying in forage donated by farmers in Iowa, Indiana, Illinois, and Missouri. And that is pretty typical of this land of ours, isn't it? I believe there was a time in your past when that kind of help went the other way -- from this State. In addition, private railroad lines and truckers have begun donating transportation in growing numbers, bringing in still more of the hay that's so badly needed. Just moments ago I was at the airport where some of that hay is, as you've been told, being airlifted in. On the faces of those South Carolina farmers -- what dignity and what determination, to stick it out until better days. I said in Texas yesterday that it isn't just patriotism that's back in style, it's words like hope and vision and future. And today I'd like to add a new word: together.

Americans are together again, helping each other as we used to. Indeed, recently there was an article in a Washington paper that suggested the ``me'' decade of the seventies has been replaced by the ``we'' decade of the eighties. And nowhere is that truer than here in South Carolina. My friends, in good times and bad, you've been doing America proud.

And now it's only right for me to recognize some of the South Carolinians who make this State so great. Permit me to begin with a man who's held statewide office in South Carolina since before most South Carolinians were born. He has a special place in my heart because he's one of the few people in Washington who calls me Junior -- [laughter] -- the senior Senator from South Carolina, the President pro tempore of the Senate, and one of the preeminent figures in the life of our nation -- Strom Thurmond.

There is Congressman Floyd Spence, who is an outstanding member of the South Carolina delegation in Washington. There's State Senator Arthur Ravenel, running for Congress down in the First District. There's Bill Workman, mayor of Greenville and candidate for Congress in the Fourth District. And there's Henry McMaster, your nominee for the United States Senate. And to give you some idea of how much I value Henry, he was my appointee for U.S. Attorney here in South Carolina. And Henry proved instrumental in our drug enforcement effort. In fact, his Operation Jackpot was one of the first major breakthroughs in our war on drugs. Now Henry's in a contest that will help determine whether Republicans retain control of the Senate or lose it to the other party.

And getting to that serious business I mentioned, I think you know that I've come here today to say a few words about the next Governor and Lieutenant Governor of South Carolina. And I believe you have a pretty good idea that while they've served in the Congress these two men have earned reputations as leaders on Capitol Hill and effective Representatives of the people of this great State.

But in telling you about Carroll and Tommy, permit me to describe what all three of us have been working so hard up in Washington to accomplish. First, there's the economy. Back in the years when we were first elected, the American economy was in the worst mess since the Great Depression. Taxes were rising.

Inflation stood in double digits. Interest rates were soaring at the highest levels in more than a century. Unemployment was high and rising. And growth in our economy had ground to a virtual halt. Those who believed in big government blamed the people. Carroll, Tommy, and I believed in you, the people. We blamed big government, not you.

To get big government off your backs and out of your pockets, we slowed government growth; we slashed needless regulations and enacted across-the-board personal income tax cut of nearly 25 percent. Then we indexed taxes, making it impossible for inflation to push you into higher tax brackets anymore. Critics dubbed this plan, as you've been told, Reaganomics and predicted economic ruin.

They seemed to say, ``Just wait, the sky will fall.'' Well, something fell all right, but it happened to be interest rates and inflation. And today inflation has fallen from more than 12 percent to under 2. And for the last few months it has been less than zero, while the prime rate of interest has plummeted from more than 20 percent to about 8 percent. We've seen 3\1/2\ years of economic growth. We've seen the creation of more than 10 million new jobs. That's more new jobs than Western Europe and Japan put together have created in the last 10 years. And thanks in large measure to our decontrol of oil, we've seen energy prices tumble, including the price you pay for gas. And isn't it good to pull into the station today and watch the gallons on the pump add up faster than the dollars? Well, you know, all of those things -- I could tell it was working, the whole idea, when they stopped calling it Reaganomics.

But in the midst of this expansion, certain sectors of our economy have lagged behind -- for instance, farming and industries that are sensitive to imports. I pledge to you that I will not rest until every area of our country and every sector of our economy shares in the national prosperity. Now, sometimes Carroll and Tommy and I differ on how to help those hardest hit, but we agree they must be helped. And I assure you, we're in complete accord on our fundamental approach: not more government, more economic growth.

Now we have the opportunity to scrap this tax code that's smothering us with high taxes and endless complexities and replace it with one that actually promotes fairness and economic growth. Now, I realize in the tax reform package it doesn't get after these things within that program, such as I've just read. We started out in 1913 with 16 words in the amendment that created the income tax.

In addition to taking part in this economic restoration, Carroll and Tommy have lent unstinting and stalwart support to the rebuilding of our nation's defenses. With their help, we've taken the Navy from fewer than 480 battle-ready ships to more than 540 -- well on the way to our goal of 600.

We've provided new and better equipment throughout the services. And we've seen morale among our men and women in uniform surge as we've given them the pay and the training that they deserve. You know, of all the things that go with this job, I'm more proud of the young men and women in uniform in our country today than of anything else. You might be interested to know that they have the highest level of intelligence ever in the history of our military. We have the highest percentage of high school graduates than ever in the history of the military; even when, in those times of stress, we've resorted to the draft.

You know, you in South Carolina have always treated the Armed Services with esteem, even when other regions in the country thought it was somehow unstylish or old-fashioned. And isn't it good to have the entire Nation join you once again in treating our men and women in uniform with respect? I get letters from them every once in a while, and I don't even bother to put them in a file. I put them in the drawer of my desk so I can keep looking at them every once in a while. One youngster with the marine -- or with the submarine division -- and he wrote me. And his one line that closed it -- he said, ``We might not be the biggest navy in the world anymore; we're just the best.'' Something else, I just have to believe it will be one long stretch before any nickel-and-dime dictator or terrorist chooses to tangle with the United States of America.

And now, I served as a Governor myself for 8 years, and I can tell you that the experience your next Governor has gained up in Washington will serve him well -- very well -- here in South Carolina. Through four terms in Congress, Carroll has demonstrated his belief in lean and efficient government.

Carroll's also pointed out that when I was running for President this last time and he was my State chairman, his opponent in this race served as the principal spokesman for that other fellow. Sort of looks as though what's shaping up here in South Carolina is a replay of the contest between Reagan and Mondale. Carroll, just go easy on him. [Laughter] But I say this only half in jest. You see, this race in South Carolina has national importance. It pits the new against the old, trust in the people against belief in big government, the sound values of the people of this State against the schemes and social programs of the liberal Democratic leadership.

I emphasize that leadership. I know that I couldn't be in a room in South Carolina with this many people that there weren't others in here, like myself, who were Democrats and switched. I know also that there're probably some in here who are still Democrats. And that's fine. Because I don't know whether you're aware that a political science study was made not too long ago about the two political parties and what has happened. First they checked on all of the delegates to the two national conventions -- and seeing them as the leaders of their two parties. And then they checked them against very solid issues of the day and found that those leaders of the two parties were polls apart. Then they checked the rank and file membership of the Democratic and Republican Parties across the Nation and found the rank and file membership of the two parties were virtually identical and that the rank and file Democrats -- good, patriotic citizens in this country -- were way out of step with the leadership that has somehow gotten control of that once great party.

I mentioned a moment ago that yesterday we were in Texas and Florida. And not long before that I spoke in Alabama, and before that in New Jersey. And everywhere I've gone, I've seen something that touched me, something that gives heart to all of us who can still remember the self-doubt, the weakness abroad and at home, that marked so much of the sixties and the seventies.

And I see it here today in Carolina. Call it confidence, self-assurance, what you will. It's a renewed understanding that, for all our faults, ours is a nation of goodness and greatness; that despite our mistakes in the world, we've stood for human freedom with greater consistency and courage than any other nation in history; that if only we have faith, if only we look not to government but to ourselves, we can build upon this economic expansion to create a new and lasting era of prosperity. Now, come to think of it, what I've seen has a name. It's called patriotism. This new confidence and energy, this new patriotism, is what Carroll and Tommy and I've been working in Washington to achieve. And now Carroll and Tommy want to carry on their work here at home. And my friends, let's help them win one -- win one for you and for South Carolina and, if you won't throw me out for this, win one for the Gipper.

Coliseum. Carroll A. Campbell was the Republican gubernatorial candidate, and Thomas Hartnett was the Republican candidate for Lieutenant Governor. Prior to the luncheon, the President attended a reception for major donors to the candidates' campaign. Following the luncheon, he returned to Washington, DC.

President today announced his intention to appoint Leonard H.O. Spearman to be a member of the Board for International Food and Agricultural Development for a term of 3 years. He would succeed Benjamin F. Payton.

For the past 6 years Dr. Spearman has been president of Texas Southern University in Houston. In June of this year he completed his tenure as president and assumed the position of distinguished professor of psychology at the university. Previously, he was with the U.S.

For a few years, we allowed our leaders to forget what a great and creative people we Americans are. And today, as I've said before on a number of occasions, today America is back. And the future rests not in big, impersonal forces, but with us, in our own choices and actions as a people. In all the long history of mankind, no nation has ever afforded its people greater liberty or depended more for its very survival upon their own diligence than our own. And you young gentlemen, in this land of the free, you only have to reach for greatness to attain it.

There was a Frenchman more than a century ago, came to this country -- already abroad they had seen the great progress that this young nation was making. And he came here, and he went back. His name was de Tocqueville, and he wrote a book called ``Democracy in America.'' And there's one line in that that, I guess, has been quoted more than any author has ever had a line quoted. Because he said that he had searched for the greatness of America when he was here. He'd looked at our teaming harbors. He'd looked at our great manufacturing, our farms, and our cities. And he said he did not find the secret of our greatness.

Well now, listen, I'm not going to go on with a speech anymore. I just welcomed the opportunity and thought -- I know I've only got a few minutes out here -- but I thought that maybe some of you must have at some time or other said, ``If I had a chance, I'd like to ask him . . .'' And you have a chance. There's a microphone right here in front, and if somebody has a question that they'd like answered -- all right. I ought to be able to do some tricks or something while they're getting to the microphone.

Q. Senator Scott Whitaker, of Colorado. I happen to believe personally that our continued research and technology and progress are one of our greatest resources. And I realize that at this time that we are pursuing the Strategic Defense Initative program. However, I also realize that these sudden Soviet bargaining attempts to reach an agreement usually involve a sacrifice in that program, and it seems to be our biggest bargaining chip. And I don't know if that's their motivation -- out of fear of what we already know or what is to come. I'm wondering, how much are we willing to sacrifice in that program to reach an agreement?

The President. Well, I would never let it become a bargaining chip in the sense of that if they would do something we'd give it up and not go forward. Let me just put it as simply as I can. And you'll understand, there are a lot of details that -- at the moment with negotiations to come and so forth -- that I don't feel free to say. But I have made it plain from the very beginning that I believe this concept of a defense plan, where today our only defense is deterrence. Our only defense is to say that, ``If you ever'' -- to them -- ``If you ever use those missiles on us, we'll blow you up, too, with ours.'' Well, that's not very sensible for the world sitting -- both of us sitting here saying, ``We'll destroy the world.'' So, my feeling about the strategic defense is that if and when our research reveals there is such a credible weapon, or a defensive system, that is when we should step forth to the world and say that we would be willing to use that to get nuclear weapons eliminated completely in the world.

The President. I think that he, of course, has been raised in all of his entire life in that system. I think he's dedicated to the system, believes in their system. But I think also that he is a modern man in contrast to some that we have dealt with there in times past.

He realizes that there are great economic problems. And I believe that he can be dealt with, that he knows that there must be some changes if he is to resolve some of the problems that are besetting them. And what our great hope is with regard to arms reduction -- and he is the first Russian leader that I know of who has ever proposed the actual elimination of some of their own nuclear weapons -- that he believes that, for the sake of their economy, that it might be in their own interest and practical for them to join in reducing these great stores of arms and ending an arms race, which is so costly to them that it has been the principal cause of their economic problems.

I found him, well, completely different than others that I had dealt with. For example -- if I could just tell one little incident -- we were under the impression that if we could come back from the Geneva summit just with an agreement to have another summit meeting that the meeting would have been a success. And on the very first day, just he and I talking, and he mentions something that he wished that I could see in Russia. And I said, ``We've got a lot of things, why, I wish you could see.'' I said, ``Why don't we agree right now that the next summit in 1986 will be in the United States? You've never been there.'' And he, smilingly, said, ``Yes. And you've never seen in Russia. And in '87, we'll have the third one in the Soviet Union.'' Our people couldn't believe that it was settled that easily. So, I do think that -- I realize he's also got problems, though. He's -- just as I have -- he's not all alone and able to say this is what we're going to do and have everyone in his government there agree with him. I think he gets some arguments now and then.

Here is a law that was passed in 1913, put in the Constitution, only 16 words; and it now takes a shelf 57 feet long to hold all the tax regulations and rules of the Internal Revenue Code. And that's why we've not only needed a tax code that is fairer, but a tax code that is also simpler so that most people don't have to hire legal advice to help them make out their tax. It's the only fiduciary thing that you will have facing you in your life -- or has been under the present system -- in which someone tells you that you have to figure out how much you owe. And even their own employees don't know the rules and regulations enough to help you. And then if you make a mistake in how much you owe, you've got to pay a penalty, a fine, and maybe interest in order to square yourself.

And so, what we're coming up with is a tax program that gets back to the beginning in which the rates were very low. Put the rates down low. And to do that, then, eliminate many of the numerous loopholes that were put in the law because the tax had become so unjust and so high. Instead of lowering the rates, they'd put in other loopholes and say, ``Well, if you spend money on this, you don't have to pay tax on this.'' And what we created were what we call some loopholes in which certain people, and even businesses, could figure out ways to avoid paying any tax or much tax at all. That won't be true in this new tax system when it's adopted. And the rates will be low, and it will be fair. As a matter of fact, we anticipate that about 6 million people at the lowest end of the scale will be dropped from the tax rolls completely.

The President. You are right. As a matter of fact, the American people in a recent poll showed that they believe that drugs are the number one problem in the United States. They put it above nuclear war or the desire for peace or unemployment or anything else. Several times more than that -- 71 percent of the people said our greatest problem today is drugs. I can tell you now -- you know, I'm sure that my wife, Nancy, has been out in front in what I think is going to have to be the answer. We can do everything with law enforcement that's possible to try and intercept the drugs and keep them from coming in to be sold. But with a country like ours and borders as great as ours and the seacoasts and all, there's no way, no matter what efforts we do, that we can totally shut off the supply of drugs to those who want them.

So, the real answer is going to have to be: Let's turn the customers off. Let's persuade the customers to abandon the drugs. And as a matter of fact, we, right now, are in the midst of talking a plan. There's a great deal going on. And as you know, the organization is nationwide now among young people and children, of Just Say No. And that came out of an answer to a question that Nancy gave in Oakland, California, speaking to young people like yourselves. And someone had asked a question about what could they do. And she said, ``Just say, no.'' Well, now there's a nationwide organization young people belong to, called Just Say No.

But we are, right now, planning a nationwide effort to go at this program mainly from the -- we'll continue the effort to cut them off -- the drugs -- but to go at this from the standpoint of persuading you that it is in your best interest to just say no to drugs.

I believe they've come further than they ever have before. We have had meetings with the Vietnam Government now about this, and apparently there is better cooperation than we've ever had. But we, at the same time, are making every effort that we can when there is a report, as you so often get, and someone says they've seen someone or they've seen prisoners here or there -- we still go out of our way to track those down and find out the truth about it. And we're going to continue everything that we can do, not only in meeting with them, but in this same thing, to track down and find -- get the final story on the missing in action and the former POW's.

This isn't the first war where this has happened. The other wars in the past -- as some of the gentlemen who sponsor this thing that brings you to Washington know -- in wars past there have -- well, that's why we have a grave to the Unknown Soldier -- never been identified in our past wars. But it is true that there has been -- they were refusing to give us information, and more and more they have at least been providing us with the information on the missing and those that can be identified as dead. But we're still going to keep on in the event -- so far, we have never been able to track down evidence when reports have been made of actual, remaining, living POW's still held there. But when we're tracking down every lead that we get to be sure that that is so.

I'm sorry that I can't take some more here. I shouldn't have talked so long at first. But I want to, again -- I've been familiar with this particular program for a long time. I'm grateful to the American Legion for sponsoring it, and I hope that you found it productive and haven't been too bewildered here in the puzzle palaces on the Potomac. [Laughter] Sometimes those of us who are here all the time get a little bewildered. But there are a lot of people trying very hard to make things right.

We hope that our efforts will produce agreement not only in arms control but in the other important regional and bilateral issues that too often are sources of tensions between the United States and the Soviet Union. It is our policy to eliminate, where possible, these sources of tension.

United States remains committed to the objective of significant reductions on offensive nuclear weapons, long-range strategic missiles, and intermediate nuclear forces. We look upon the energetic research effort of our government toward finding a defense against these weapons of mass destruction to be an essential part of the task of reducing the effectiveness and the very need for these offensive weapons.

I hope you're relaxed and in a cool place, because I want to start this Saturday afternoon off talking about a hot topic: the economy. To begin with, the most recent statistics show that the economy grew much faster in 1985 and the beginning of this year than we previously thought. Gross national product figures for real growth in '85 were revised up almost a full point, and growth in the first quarter of '86 was a strong 3.8 percent. Now, that's pretty good, especially compared to the performance of some of our major trading partners, such as Germany and Japan, which actually saw their gross national products shrink in the first quarter.

The news on inflation continues to be even better than our hopes. Consumer prices actually fell during the first half of this year, giving us the lowest rate of inflation in more than 30 years. All this adds up to an economic expansion which is stronger than we originally thought and is now one of the longest peacetime expansions in half a century.

In many other ways, too, our economy is showing itself strong and ready for more growth. Sales are up. Real disposable income -- that's the part of your paycheck you get to keep after taxes -- is up a hefty 7.2 percent. Housing investment is up. Interest rates are falling. And the stock market is up an incredible 30 percent in just 1 year. Those people in the market are investing in a big way in America's future. As lower oil prices work their way through the economy and as the lower dollar improves U.S. sales abroad, things will look even better.

But not all the news was as good as we'd hoped: Some of the figures indicate slower second quarter growth than expected. Now, you won't be surprised to hear that the doom and gloom artists, who said this current expansion could never happen, have been painting dark pictures and saying that our expansion may be over.

The fact is, there are some temporary factors that slowed the growth in our economy for a short time. Part of the problem is the slow and even negative growth I mentioned earlier in our major industrialized trading partners. If they're growing slower than we are, they simply can't afford to buy as much from us, and that hurts our economy, too. Also, important industries in some regions of the country are struggling with special problems.

I'm thinking especially of oil, agriculture, steel, and textiles. The workers and families in those troubled industries are always on my mind, and that's all the more reason I'm determined to keep this economy moving, creating jobs and opportunity, so as to ease as much as possible those sometimes unavoidable adjustments.

But some of the slower growth we saw last quarter was actually the result of some very good news on the horizon, and that's the tax reform bill. The uncertainty that was an unavoidable part of the legislative process on the Hill [bill] has likely caused some businesses to hesitate with their investment and other economic decisions. When the tax bill is finalized and businessmen and venture capitalists know the new ground rules, then we can expect business to really start moving. Some people, too, are probably postponing realizing income until the more favorable rates of tax reform come into effect. To give an example: If you heard there was a department store sale on Saturday, would you rush to the store on Friday and make a lot of purchases, or would you wait till Saturday? Well, likewise, our economy is waiting for tax reform's lower rates. In that sense, this temporary, slower growth we're experiencing is a sign of anticipation about the future and better times to come.

When we came into office on a hot summer day -- well, we didn't come into office on a hot summer day -- the economy had about as much energy as a hound dog on a hot summer day. Some people said that we'd never get it on its feet again.

Well, we cut tax rates nearly 25 percent across the board and squashed inflation, and we let loose one of the longest peacetime expansions ever. Our robust economy has created over 10 million jobs since the recovery began -- more than Western Europe and Japan combined. Imagine, then, the effect of tax reform's dramatic tax rate cuts, coming as they will on top of an economy that is fit and healthy and ready for action.

I am grateful that our prayers for the safe return of Father Lawrence Jenco have been answered. Since he was seized in January of 1985, we have been working continuously for his release and that of the other Americans taken hostage in Lebanon. I am pleased at this development but will not be satisfied until all those who are held hostage, of whatever nationality, are released. I speak for the American people when I say that we are truly grateful for the work of all those of many different nationalities and organizations who continue to work for the safe return of all hostages. I also wish to express our thanks for the way in which the Syrian Government expedited the delivery of Father Jenco from where he was released in Lebanon to our Embassy in Damascus.

I note that those who held Father Jenco have, in effect, declared their ability to control the fate of the remaining American hostages. While we continue to work for the safe release of all those held, we hold their captors and those who support them responsible for the safety of the remaining American hostages.

Well, not all politicians are like that -- not all. I think next time I have a distinguished gathering here in this room I'm going to have to paraphrase Jack Kennedy's line and say that this is the greatest accumulation of talent in this one room since the time I greeted Vladimir Horowitz alone. [Laughter] I must say it's an honor to play host to the man who, as one British critic put it, is simply the greatest pianist dead or alive. I also like the story of Sir Thomas Beecham, who jokingly criticized your performance at a concerto saying, ``Really, Mr. Horowitz, you can't play like that.'' [Laughter] He said, ``It shows the orchestra up.'' [Laughter] Well, considered by piano connoisseurs the most dazzling virtuoso since Liszt set the standard in the 19th century, you have influenced countless young pianists and inspired multitudes of listeners.

The President. And I'm glad that this is such a small, intimate gathering, because what I really wanted was the chance to thank you personally for being our emissary of good will to the people of the Soviet Union.

The President. It's appropriate that we're together in the Roosevelt Room, because behind us, here on the mantel, is the first Nobel Peace Prize ever awarded to an American. It was given to Teddy Roosevelt for his part in negotiating an end to the Russo-Japanese War -- a little known fact, but significant today because your recent journey to the Soviet Union was also a pilgrimage of peace.

You said in an interview that your hope was to set out the good, to make the good better; and you did just that. Your music spoke to the heart of the land where you were born, and it spoke to all of our hearts. And in the beautiful moments, you reminded all of us of our common humanity. You brought us closer as people to people, as the American people and people who live in the Soviet Union. You were our ambassador of the heart, and for that I want to thank you both for myself and for all of America.

He has said that it remains the purpose of his life to bring meaning to music each time he plays. With masterful technique, consummate musicianship, and profound humanity, Vladimir Horowitz brings not only meaning to music, but joy and beauty and meaning to all our lives. This adopted son of America, the last of the great romantics as he is sometimes called, is more than a national treasure, he is a treasure to people the world over.

I note with regard to the first numbered paragraph that the force goal was adopted by the North Atlantic Council constituted as the Defense Planning Committee in accordance with the North Atlantic Treaty. I am pleased to make this certification on a program so vital to our national defense. We are earnestly seeking, as our top priority in the chemical weapons area, a comprehensive and verifiable ban on all chemical weapons. Until we achieve that goal, we must maintain a safe and viable chemical weapon stockpile to deter use of chemicals by our potential adversaries. I appreciate your continued support for this program.

This certification to Congress will allow the United States to proceed with the modernization of the chemical weapons deterrent stockpile so critical to our nation's security. U.S. policy on chemical warfare remains unchanged. The United States renounces the first use of lethal and incapacitating chemical weapons. A comprehensive, effectively verifiable global ban on all chemical weapons remains our foremost priority.

However, until such a ban is attained, we will pursue deterrence through a strong defensive posture and a credible retaliatory capability. The chemical weapons threat to U.S. forces is a worldwide threat, not limited to NATO. The small, readily deployable stockpile of binary munitions which we seek will provide the flexibility to meet and deter this threat.

Recognizing the conclusions reached in the Defense Planning Committee, and within the context of those conclusions and of national statements and reservations expressed in the Defense Planning Committee, the Military Committee took note of the briefing of the U.S. plan for the contingency deployment of chemical weapons.

We are a nation of families. We take pride in our families, and we value family life. The family is the most basic unit in our society. It teaches us the values of loyalty, independence, responsibility, and mutual love. We look to our families for care, support, and protection. Strong, stable families are the vital cells of a society that is healthy and free. But to remain strong, families require nurturing; their bonds must be reinforced. A family reunion is a wonderful way to strengthen and preserve those family ties.

A family reunion can be a time of growth and learning, offering us an opportunity to gain a new perspective on ourselves and others. Each family has its own history, personality, sense of accomplishment, and dreams for the future. The family reunion provides an ideal setting for renewing these shared riches of the spirit. It is a time to learn, to laugh, and to renew the ties of affection. Family reunions bridge generations and remind us of our roots. I encourage all families to use the family reunion to tap these roots again and to renew their pledge of love and concern for each other. I also ask families to reach out to those who lack the support of families and to share their love and spirit with them.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-ninth day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

I want to talk today about a serious subject, one of those serious subjects that can often seem dry and academic, but which can be so important to all of our lives. In the swirl of issues and events that is Washington, there remains one overriding purpose, the purpose toward which everything else we do in this town is -- or should be -- aimed. I guess I would define it this way: creating a peaceful and safe world in which we can all securely enjoy the rights and freedoms that have been given to us by God. Being free and prosperous in a world at peace -- that's our ultimate goal. That is, as you might say, the business at hand here in Washington.

Toward that end, few issues cut deeper than our relations with the Soviet Union. There are many issues on the U.S.-Soviet agenda: arms reduction, human rights, Soviet involvement in regional conflicts around the world, and possibilities for bilateral cooperation -- all of these are important. But today I want to share with you some of the latest developments in our ongoing efforts to negotiate radical reductions in nuclear arms with the Soviet Union. When I spoke in Glassboro a little over a month ago, speaking to a high school graduation there, I said there were encouraging signs to the negotiating table. I spoke of a possible moment of opportunity in our relations with the Soviet Union. The Soviets have put forward proposals on a range of issues, from nuclear powerplant safety to conventional force reductions to nuclear arms reductions. And as I said at Glassboro, while we cannot accept all these proposals as they stand, we feel the Soviets have begun to make a serious effort. In that speech I stressed my own commitment to move the process forward, to pursue every opportunity to seek real and verifiable reductions in nuclear weapons.

I have now sent a letter to General Secretary Gorbachev that underlines my determination to keep the momentum going. Now, unfortunately I can't satisfy what I know must be your curiosity about the specifics of that letter. In the past we've criticized the Soviets for making their proposals public, because serious exchanges usually take place in private. Negotiations are sensitive plants that can wither up and die in the glare of publicity. But even though I can't get specific about these negotiations, I can tell you of my renewed hopes for their success. I am hopeful that we have reached a stage where misunderstanding or suspicion in themselves will no longer keep us from our goal.

Each side has a candid, realistic view of the other's positions and intentions. This candor has assisted the negotiating process, and I believe if the Soviets sincerely want equitable and verifiable nuclear arms reductions, there will be such nuclear arms reductions. While I can't discuss the specific proposals in my letter, I can say that they are responsive to Soviet concerns. They seek out areas of convergence, they address the ultimate goal of eliminating all nuclear weapons while identifying practical steps that can move us in that direction. I also agreed to the Soviets' suggestion of a work plan involving a series of preparatory meetings that could lead to a productive summit later this year.

And as I said, I think we are seeing the first cautious steps in this direction from the other side. The second pillar is our Strategic Defense Initiative, research on which has advanced more rapidly than the projections of even a few years ago. We won't bargain away SDI, because it is a promising area of technology that could release the world from the threat of nuclear ballistic missiles. We must continue our SDI program on schedule. What we seek is a transition to a world in which deterrence no longer depends solely on the threat of mutual annihilation.

MAD spells what it is -- it's really mad, but it was mutual assured destruction, and the idea being that there would be peace between us as long as each one of us knew that the other fellow could retaliate if we shot first -- and blow us up, too. And since we never intended to shoot first, that meant that we'd have to take the first one and then hope we had enough left that they'd think twice before there would be a first one. Well, the offensive and defensive parts of the equation now are clearly related, and both are part of our discussion with the Soviet Union. So, I must emphasize -- to the extent that some Members of Congress slow down or undercut SDI, they undercut hopes for progress in arms reductions.

We do not seek the Strategic Defense Initiative to enable us to be safe from their weapons while we still have our offensive weapons to shoot at them -- not in any way. We look at the Strategic Defense Initiative -- if our research develops that there is such a practical system, then we look at that as the means of getting everybody in the world, including ourselves, to get rid of their nuclear missiles. And we're doing our share.

We've responded constructively. We've made clear our serious desire for a better relationship with the Soviet Union. But now the ball is in the Soviet court. As I said in Glassboro, if both sides genuinely want progress, then this could represent a turning point in the effort to make ours a safer and more peaceful world.

Our arms reduction negotiations with the Soviet Union will not succeed overnight. They'll certainly be a long, arduous process. For the first time, however, we're not only pointed in the right direction -- toward reduction and eventual elimination of nuclear weapons -- we have begun to move, both sides, down that road. As I look out on you from a little more than seven decades plus of experience, believe me, I reflect on how important that road is. I have seen four wars in my lifetime. I know the heartbreak, the human suffering that war causes. Each generation seeks for succeeding generations an end to war, a time of peace and freedom. Well, this dream is mine today. And I can only hope that years hence you'll be able to say to the generation succeeding your own that you were witness to one of the birthdates of this dream, this dream of freedom and of peace.

Well, listen, thank you all, and I hope this has been and is being a valuable experience for all of you -- to see behind the front and where the wheels are going around. Sometimes, I know it looks a little unwashed -- [laughter] -- but all in all, as Churchill once said about democracy: With all its faults, it's better than any other system anyone else has ever devised. But it depends on all of us and all of you. It can't work without the people.

We the people will allow the Government to do the following things, and it can't do anything other than what we have specifically given it the right to do. And as long as we keep that kind of a system in this country, we will be a superpower.

Nuclear medicine is an invaluable medical resource that contributes significantly to improvements in the diagnosis and treatment of patients in the United States. It also provides powerful tools for biomedical research.

Today, nuclear medicine allows physicians to probe the bodies of patients without using a scalpel. Three-dimensional images of organs such as the heart and kidneys can be obtained, leading to early diagnosis of disease.

In addition to images of anatomy, nuclear medicine yields information on subtle chemical processes as they occur in the body. For example, investigators can now examine the brain's processing of glucose, which it uses as a source of energy. Due to advances in nuclear medicine, the underlying pathological changes in such illnesses as Alzheimer's disease and schizophrenia are now closer to being understood.

The field is growing so fast that what today seems a breakthrough will tomorrow be routine. Powerful tools such as positron emission tomography, or PET, are being brought to bear on heart disease and cancer. Where nuclear medicine techniques were once used to provide images of tumors, the tumors themselves may now be located and treated using specially targeted isotopes linked to antibodies specific to the tumor.

All across the country, from medical centers to community hospitals, nuclear medicine departments are becoming as common as x-ray laboratories. This field unites the skills of medicine, physics, chemistry, and mathematics in a common focus -- healing the sick.

Thank you, Charlie, and thank you all for being here today and for all that you're doing to help America. Drug abuse has been a major concern of Nancy's and mine, as you've just been told, dating back to a time long before we came to the White House. Our concern, of course, was not shared by everyone. And during the late 1960's and into the last decade, a flippant and irresponsible attitude toward drug use permeated too much of our society. The gurus of hedonism and permissiveness were given a respectable hearing back in those days; the heartache and misery came along later.

Pundits and commentators have said a great deal about the positive changes that America has gone through these last 5\1/2\ years. I think one of the most heartwarming -- and one of which I am exceptionally proud -- is the change in attitude toward drugs. I'm particularly proud of the role that Nancy has played in this. As you probably know, she's made the fight against drug abuse a national crusade.

Well, just the other day in a Cabinet meeting, Secretary [of State] Shultz told me something that we hadn't been aware of: that how often foreign ministers praise her for the work she's doing and the example that she is setting. And all of this came from a idea she had -- and ladies, you can be proud -- she decided to have some meetings of the First Ladies from a number of other countries. And they picked up the baton there and have been doing it ever since.

Nancy recently said that -- and I'll quote: ``We must create an atmosphere of intolerance for drug use in this country.'' Well, I don't think I can say it any better than that. The time has come to give notice that individual drug use is threatening the health and safety of all our citizens. We must make it clear that we are no longer willing to tolerate illegal drugs or the sellers or the users. Our object is not to punish users but to help them; and not to throw them in jail but to free them from dependency; not to ruin their lives by putting them behind bars but to prevent their lives from being ruined by drugs.

The first step, of course, is making certain that individual drug users and everyone else understand that in a free society we're all accountable for our actions. If this problem is to be solved, drug users can no longer excuse themselves by blaming society. As individuals, they're responsible. The rest of us must be clear that, while we are sympathetic, we will no longer tolerate the use of illegal drugs by anyone. The time has come for each and every one of us to make a personal and moral commitment to actively oppose the use of illegal drugs, in all forms and in all places. We must remove all traces of illegal drugs from our nation.

You and your organizations, not only in the United States but internationally, can be proud that you're leading the way in this noble endeavor. I simply don't have ample opportunity here and now to mention all of your organizations and all that you've done, but I must mention a few.

We have a long way to go. But there's ample room for optimism. International cooperation is increasing. This is no longer looked at as just a problem for the Americans. And you've already heard from my good friend Charlie Wick on what's going on in the international arena. Nevertheless, we must continue to prove we mean business at home. And now is the time to show drug users that we mean to reach our goal of a drug-free generation in the United States.

Talk to your local and district prosecutors about getting tough on the lowlifes who are selling drugs to our kids. Talk to your local religious leaders about what they can do about drug abuse. This is a moral as well as a health and safety issue. Meet with the business and labor leaders in your community. You may find that many are working on getting drugs out of the working place. You have much in common. And lastly, set up a partnership; get others involved in this fight.

Now may be the time for communities across America to launch an offensive against drugs. In Boston, for example, the Boston Herald, the electronic media, the Bank of Boston, the police, and the sports teams are launching a longtime effort to fight drug abuse. I can't tell you how strongly Nancy and I feel about getting you involved in reaching these goals. We need your help, and I hope you'll take me up on the challenge.

You should know that I'll be inviting each of your organizations back to the White House 1 year from now so that I can hear about the progress you've made, the programs you've established, and any results you've achieved in your communities as well as internationally. As I said earlier, please pass on my thanks to all your members who are doing much to make this the kind of country and the kind of world that God intended it to be.

When the President came into office in 1981, there was a lack of information or a focused national program on drug abuse. The main effort of the Government had been to reduce the supply of heroin. Legal, criminal, and moral issues surrounding drug use were confusing to the young and, really, to all citizens.

Recognizing this, the President began a campaign that was designed to improve drug-law enforcement, to strengthen international cooperation, to expand drug abuse health functions, to reduce drug abuse in the military, and he created a nationwide drug abuse awareness effort to strengthen public attitudes.

Within the military, since 1981, this has been our most successful program. There has been a two-thirds drop in drug abuse in that timeframe. We found when we came in that 27 percent of all military personnel used drugs, and in some units the rate of drug use was nearly 50 percent. Independent studies show that last year we have reduced drug use in the military to less than 9 percent of all personnel. That is a 67-percent, two-thirds, drop in the number of people that were using drugs. The Secretary of Defense believes that there is more that can be done, and he is planning to continue the program of protection, prevention, rehabilitation, and education. And this will certainly be a model for the President's program.

In addition, the First Lady's leadership and dedication to the youth of America and the world has been a focal point of our efforts. She has had a crusade that has set the tone, really, on an international basis. She has raised the consciousness in the advertising industry, the television networks, in the high schools, sports programs, the medical profession, the entertainment industry, law enforcement officers, and many others joining in a nationwide effort to reduce drugs.

President's program has been successful thus far, but the President is convinced that the best way to achieve the ultimate objective of total eradication of drug abuse and illegal trafficking is to reduce the demand side of the drug equation. To do that he intends to use the full power of the Presidency to accomplish his goal. This means a blend of the substantive program implementation and a personal communications effort to make sure that his program enjoys the support that will be needed to achieve his goal of total eradication of drugs.

He understands that the powers behind the drug industry are well entrenched. He recognizes this will not be an easy job, but he believes that the American people are ready to do something about drugs. He wants the public at large to face the program head on, and he believes it's imperative that we do it now. He believes there is a turnaround in public support, a major change in attitude: that we must do something about drugs, and we must do it now. The idea is to take the potential user away from drugs, and this will require the united effort of many elements of our society. The President's strategy, which is being finalized, will seek to remove drug abuse from schools, the workplace, athletic programs, and from all elements of our society. The President will seek to form a partnership with government, industry, schools, and the American public. He believes this must be truly a national effort if it is to succeed.

The General Order also prevented possible dual licensing procedures for shipments from the United States to Libya by permitting a license issued by the Treasury Department to serve as authorization under the Export Administration Regulations for export from the United States. The Department of Transportation issued Order 86 - 2 - 23 on January 30, 1986, which prohibits U.S. and foreign air carriers from selling in the United States any transportation by air that includes a stop in Libya, and engaging in any transaction in the United States relating to transportation to or from Libya. The Order also prohibited U.S. air carriers from engaging in transactions anywhere in the world that relate to transportation services to Libya. The Order was served on all U.S. and foreign air carriers.

Regulations, the Office of Foreign Assets Control issued specific licenses to five U.S. oil companies and 13 service companies, authorizing them to complete the winding down of their Libyan operations after the effective dates of the prohibitions in Executive Order No. 12543. In all cases, the specific licenses were issued to foster the orderly withdrawal of these companies from Libya in an attempt to avoid substantial economic windfalls to the Government of Libya through the outright forfeiture of U.S. assets located in Libya. Each specific license authorizing an extension of Libyan operations expired on or before June 30, 1986.

I am announcing today that the United States and Japan have reached an agreement on semiconductor trade. This agreement represents an important step toward freer and more equitable world trade and will enhance the ability of our semiconductor manufacturers to compete fairly in the Japanese market. It will also help prevent Japanese manufacturers from dumping semiconductors in the United States and in third countries.

This agreement successfully addresses a series of trade complaints raised by the U.S. semiconductor industry and this administration charging Japanese chip manufacturers with impeding U.S. access to their market, while dumping semiconductors on world markets and violating U.S. dumping laws. With the agreement of the Government of Japan to this landmark pact, the United States suspends the pending 301 market access case and EPROM semiconductor dumping case. The 256K semiconductor dumping case will be suspended August 1. By holding to our free market principles, but at the same time insisting on fair trade, we have created a climate in which the U.S. semiconductor industry should substantially increase its sales position in Japan. We have also set an important precedent to help prevent future unfair trade practices in other high technology industries.

I have said time and again, we will not stand idly by as American workers are threatened by unfair trading practices. We have and we will take the tough actions that are necessary to ensure that all nations play by the same rules.

I recognize that the budget cuts resulting from the fiscal year 1986 sequestration order represent an imperfect way to reduce the Federal budget deficit. However, I remain firmly committed to the goal of a balanced budget and continue to believe that Gramm-Rudman-Hollings provides valuable incentives and tools to reach that goal. It is my hope that the Congress will act to avoid the necessity of a sequestration in fiscal year 1987 by enacting a budget that meets the deficit target of not more than $144 billion.

Japan to meet the commitments and objectives of the Agreement would be inconsistent with a trade agreement or an unjustifiable act that would burden or restrict U.S. commerce. Therefore, I instruct the United States Trade Representative to report to me on: (1) the results of each of the periodic consultations held pursuant to the Agreement; and (2) annual improvements in foreign-based semiconductor firms' access to the Japanese market. I also direct the United States Trade Representative and the Secretary of Commerce to take any further action that may become appropriate to implement the Agreement. Finally, the Section 301 proceeding on semiconductors shall be suspended and shall remain suspended as long as the objectives and commitments of the Agreement are fulfilled.

Good morning to all of you. And thank you, Ed, for that encouraging report. These documents are a testament to the fine work and success of the U.S. delegation. I'm not surprised, however, because our delegation was composed of high-level officials and experts from all relevant agencies of the Federal Government. It also included experts from the State and local governments and the private sector, all of whom are vital to our domestic successes in controlling drug abuse. But the important point is that you've brought home real accomplishments -- accomplishments that will make a difference in the years to come.

On behalf of the American people, Nancy and I thank you for your contributions to this battle to save the youth of our country. An effort like this takes a great team, and a great team requires strong leadership. And this delegation is an example of the best in both categories. You had that strong leadership in the Attorney General, who was head of the delegation; in Deputy Secretary of State John Whitehead; and in Ambassador Vernon Walters, our Ambassador to the United Nations. And I'd also like to single out for thanks Ambassador Ann Wrobleski and Ambassador Bruce Chapman, both of whom worked for nearly 2 years on conference preparations, and Dr. Macdonald, head of the White House Drug Abuse Policy Office.

I want to commend you on both your goals and your strategy. You have demonstrated that good planning and strong execution will lead to positive results in U.N. meetings. Dealing with 138 countries at once gives new meaning to the word ``complex.'' Yet your strategies for handling this situation showed the skill and the talent our country can bring to bear when we're fully committed. I understand that Vernon Walters called this perhaps the best U.N. conference he's seen in years -- and with reason. This was the first time that the U.N. has held a conference on all aspects of drug abuse, including not only the problems of the users but drug production and trafficking. And it's important to note that this was a very high-level meeting, attended by representatives of ministerial rank.

But the big news involves these two items: First, there was agreement that drug abuse is a global problem. You see, until this conference, some had argued that drug abuse was only a problem of our wealthier, industrialized nations, like our own. But now there's a widespread understanding that drug abuse affects people around the world and that even in poorer nations drug abuse poses a threat. For this reason, the Declaration of Political Will adopted by the conference confirms the commitment of 138 nations to take action in the fight against drugs. Second, the conference agreed to a long list of concrete, practical steps all countries can take to make a difference. And as part of this effort to be practical -- to go beyond discussions to action -- negotiations have begun on the drafting of an international convention against drug trafficking, which will be a legally binding document.

The President. Well, let me announce in advance that I am making a brief announcement here, and then the judge and I are going to depart. And I won't say to you, ``No questions.'' I know better than that, having been in here before. There will be no answers.

The President. Well, it's with great pleasure and deep respect for his extraordinary abilities that I today announce my intention to nominate United States Court of Appeals Judge Robert H. Bork to be an Associate Justice of the Supreme Court. Judge Bork is recognized as a premier constitutional authority. His outstanding intellect and unrivaled scholarly credentials are reflected in his thoughtful examination of the broad, fundamental legal issues of our times. When confirmed by the Senate as an appellate judge in 1982, the American Bar Association gave him its highest rating: ``exceptionally well qualified.'' On the bench, he has been well prepared, evenhanded, and openminded.

In taking this action today, I'm mindful of the importance of this nomination. The Supreme Court of the United States is the custodian of our Constitution. Justices of the Supreme Court must not only be jurists of the highest competence; they must be attentive to the specific rights guaranteed in our Constitution and proper role of the courts in our democratic system.

Judge Bork, widely regarded as the most prominent and intellectually powerful advocate of judicial restraint, shares my view that judges' personal preferences and values should not be part of their constitutional interpretations. The guiding principle of judicial restraint recognizes that under the Constitution it is the exclusive province of the legislatures to enact laws and the role of the courts to interpret them. We're fortunate to be able to draw upon such an impressive legal mind, an experienced judge and a man who already has devoted so much of his life to public service. He'll bring credit to the Court and his colleagues, as well as to his country and the Constitution.

Justice Lewis Powell, in announcing his retirement, said the courts should not be hampered by operating at less than full strength. And with this in mind, I urge the Senate to expedite its consideration of Judge Bork so the Court will have nine Justices when its October term begins. And I have every expectation that it will do so.

Canada is the closest friend and ally of the United States. Our countries share not only the world's longest undefended border but also common ideals such as freedom, democracy, human rights, justice, and an ardent desire for a peaceful world.

Other factors bind our countries together as well. The United States and Canada fought side by side against tyranny in two world wars and in other conflicts. Both of our countries have welcomed immigrants from around the globe, and our cultures have been similarly strengthened and enriched thereby. Many cultural and economic exchanges between the United States and Canada have also fostered our special relationship.

The ability to read and write is a true blessing and treasure. It enables us not only to discover and learn from the rich legacy of recorded human experience but also to understand and take full part in basic activities essential to daily life. Those who do not have these skills must forego many of life's possibilities, and society loses many of the contributions these people could otherwise make. Every American can be truly grateful to the dedicated citizens among us who give others the beautiful and lasting gift of literacy.

In the years since I created the Adult Literacy Initiative, more and more Americans have decided to help foster reading and writing skills. Volunteers and private-public partnerships do a great deal of good. Nevertheless, studies show that more needs to be done before ``functional illiteracy'' is a thing of the past, so we must continue our efforts to reach all who lack literacy.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this second day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

The Founding Fathers of our country knew that without economic freedom there can be no political freedom. Their rallying cry of ``No taxation without representation'' reflects that fundamental precept. They knew that the right to earn your own keep and keep what you earn is central to America's understanding of what it means to be free. This country was built by people seeking to support themselves and their families by their own labor, people who treasured the right to work and dispose of their earnings as they saw fit, people who were willing to take economic risks.

C. Require that every piece of legislation forcing increased expenditures by State and local governments include an assessment of the spending impact, the likely source of funding, and the ability of these governments to fulfill the mandates of the legislation.

Freedom to Participate in a Free Market: You have the right to contract freely for goods and services and to achieve your full potential without government limits on opportunity, economic independence, and growth.

Happy Fourth of July! Today we celebrate our country's independence and its freedom. It's a time to enjoy ourselves with friends and family, watch the fireworks, and perhaps to reflect a bit on the meaning of it all.

Certainly freedom is something I had in mind this week when I nominated Judge Robert Bork to be an Associate Justice of the Supreme Court. Judge Bork is recognized by his colleagues and peers as a brilliant legal scholar and a fair-minded jurist who believes his role is to interpret the law, not make it. He is also a highly respected teacher, having devoted 15 years as a distinguished professor at one of this nation's most prestigious law schools.

As a member of the United States Court of Appeals, Judge Bork has always heard each case with an open mind, following the law and legal precedent -- not his personal preferences. In arriving at a decision, no appellate judge in America has a finer record. Not a single one of his more than 100 majority opinions has ever been reversed by the Supreme Court. To maintain the independence of the judiciary, I hope that we can keep politics out of the confirmation process and promptly schedule hearings. The American people deserve a Supreme Court with nine Justices operating at full strength. This, of course, is serious business because the Court plays such a significant role in the preservation of our way of life and the protection of our liberty.

Yesterday, I hope none of you missed the announcement I made of a new policy initiative which has a lot to do with the principles we commemorate on the Fourth of July. During a ceremony at the Jefferson Memorial here in Washington, we discussed the four basic economic freedoms: the freedom to work, the freedom to enjoy the fruits of one's labor, the freedom to own and control one's property, and the freedom to participate in a free market. Then, in the shadow of the statue of Thomas Jefferson, I presented a package of fundamental economic reforms designed to protect those freedoms: the equivalent of an economic bill of rights. We don't have time now to go into all the proposals, but I'd like to tell you about a few of the important ones.

The centerpiece is something aimed at one of our toughest domestic challenges -- deficit spending. It's about time we constitutionally mandate the Federal Government to do what every American family must do, and that is balance its budget. That doesn't mean taking more out of your pocket by raising taxes. In fact, our Economic Bill of Rights suggests a balanced budget amendment should contain a provision requiring more than a mere majority vote in Congress -- which is all it takes now -- to raise your taxes.

Our reform also calls for full disclosure of the vital details of pending legislation. The people, as well as State and local government, have the right to know precisely how much fulfilling the will of Congress is going to cost them. Similarly, we deserve ``truth in spending'' from Congress. Any new legislation which calls for increased spending should indicate where the money is coming from.

And part of any reform must be reestablishing certain checks and balances set down in the Constitution by our Founding Fathers. As of late, for example, the Presidential veto, a powerful force for responsible government, has been all but emasculated by changes in the way Congress does business. It's imperative we reestablish this Presidential authority by granting to the Chief Executive of the United States the tool now used by the chief executives of 43 States in keeping spending under control. I'm talking about a line-item veto, which lets the President cut out the fat, but keep the meat of all legislation that gets to his desk.

We the people, deserve to know that our jobs, paychecks, homes, and pensions are safe from the taxers and regulators of big government. Jefferson warned us of this threat 200 years ago. Our Economic Bill of Rights is designed to protect the economic freedom of all Americans and to keep our country growing and prospering.

I hope you've heard the most recent figures which indicate that unemployment continues its steady decline -- we're down to 6 percent -- that prices are steady, and that the economy continues to grow. We've come a long way in the last 6\1/2\ years. The economic bill of rights, the package of basic reforms I proposed yesterday, will protect the progress we've made and keep our country moving forward. On this Fourth of July let us reaffirm that together, living in freedom, there's nothing we Americans can't do.

I've watched as your organization led the Nation in the fight against drugs back in 1969 -- even as others talked of tolerance and experimentation -- and you've been a leader in that fight ever since. With your help, America is winning. We're getting the message across that drugs are an evil, pure and simple, and we're convincing our children to say that magic word when it comes to drugs, to just say no. I can't help but insert something here. I don't know whether you know where that phrase came from about ``Just say no.'' Nancy was speaking to some schoolchildren in Oakland, California, and a little girl asked a question about what do you do if someone offers drugs? Nancy said, ``Just say no.'' And today there are over 12,000 Just Say No Clubs in schools across the United States.

And by the way, speaking of the spirit of voluntarism and your great generosity reminds me of a story about a friend from my show business days who couldn't have been more the opposite, the famously stingy Jack Benny. Jack was having lunch with another famous entertainer of the time, Edgar Bergen. In those days, Edgar Bergen and his dummy, Charlie McCarthy, were the biggest things on radio. Well, there was a group of show business types there, and after lunch when the check arrived, Benny picked it up, even though by that time his cheapness had become legend. Someone turned to him and said, ``Jack, I'm surprised you asked for the check.'' Benny said, ``So was I.'' [Laughter] ``And it's absolutely the last time I'll ever have lunch with a ventriloquist.'' [Laughter] Well, after telling that, though, I have to make it plain that that was all part of the act. Jack wasn't really that way; indeed, he was the soul of generosity and kindness. The other was just part of the public performance, his act.

The great generosity of the Kiwanis is what's become legend. The services you perform reach beyond the direct beneficiaries to embrace all of America in a community of caring. You represent America's heart -- good, strong, knowing. You give generously, and you give well, often putting comparable government programs to shame. You know the difference between private charity and public programs, that with personal giving there are two winners: the person who gives as well as the person who receives -- and very often it's the giver who receives the most precious gift. Personal, private charity humanizes society. It makes us more aware of each other, of our hopes and needs, of our sorrows and joys. It makes us all more compassionate. The Kiwanians have demonstrated this compassion and caring over and over again in thousands of communities, and for that reason I'm today proud to announce that you have been selected to receive my Private Sector Initiative Citation award for all that you've done to fight school-age drug abuse. Nancy and I congratulate you all on a job well done.

And because you exemplify what is best about our private life, I want to talk to you today about what we must do to protect that way of life. I want to enlist your support in the campaign I began on July 3d on the steps of the Jefferson Memorial. There I called on America to complete the work of the author of the Declaration of Independence with an Economic Bill of Rights that will restore to Americans the freedoms our Founding Fathers assumed we would always have and protect us and future generations from the encroachments of big government in our lives. Make no mistake, we face a clear and present danger in Congress. The momentum of big government, which we've managed to hold back these last few years, has only been gathering steam, getting ready to burst through all the restraints that we've imposed upon it.

Piece of the action? That sounds more like a movie review of ``The Untouchables.'' [Laughter] A piece of the action -- like the UDAG program that will spend millions of your tax dollars to build luxury hotels, restaurants, and condominiums; or the so-called demonstration projects in the highway bill that don't demonstrate anything but the ability of some in Congress to bring home the bacon. A piece of the action -- sometimes the waste is absurd, like the 1,000 acres of underwater property the Federal Government is planning on buying. The shameful secret of the farm programs is that one of the biggest recipients of agricultural subsidies in America isn't even an American. He's the Prince of Liechtenstein, and he happens to own a few hundred thousand acres in Texas.

But what happens in the years ahead? Can we always count on the occupant of the Oval Office to stand fast against this tide? Will the next President hold the line against tax hikes and big spending? And even if he's determined, the fact is, the Presidential veto power has been seriously weakened in the last 15 years. The checks and balances our Founding Fathers designed into our Constitution have been put awry by a Congress unwilling to give up its spendthrift ways.

Later in life, when Jefferson examined our Constitution, he found one glaring omission: a failure to include an article in the Constitution that would prohibit government borrowing, what we've come to call deficit financing. His concern ran deeper than his well-founded fears of profligate government. From history and experience, he knew that it was in the economic realm that the oppression of government was most often keenly felt. He knew that a government with no limit on borrowing was a government with no limit on its power over the individual, that this power to borrow was like a wedge that could be driven between the individual and his God-given rights of freedom and property.

When I signed the tax reform bill, I said that these last decades had seen an expansion and strengthening of our civil liberties, but that our economic rights have been too often neglected, even abused. Well, it's time that abuse stopped. And that's why we're calling for an Economic Bill of Rights that will complement and strengthen Jefferson's political Bill of Rights. So, Congress: Sit up and take notice. The people are entitled to the fruits of their labor and shall not be burdened by excessive taxation. Therefore, more than a mere majority of the Congress will be required to raise taxes under our plan.

Let me just say something here. On one of the talk shows over the weekend, I heard someone complaining that to ask for more than a 50 percent plus one vote to raise taxes was somehow pulled out of the blue and unusual and didn't make sense. Well, it's not that unusual. Why should 50 percent of the Representatives plus one be able to pass something as important as more money out of your pockets, while there were 50 percent less one who didn't want that to happen? And it isn't that unusual. When I was Governor of California, it took two-thirds of the legislature to approve the budget. And in voting bond issues, which is government borrowing, it took 60 percent of the vote, not 50 percent plus one. We're a federation of sovereign States, and sometimes I think the Federal Government should take more of a close look at how well some of the States are doing and improve itself accordingly.

The people are entitled to pursue their own livelihood, free from excessive regulation and tax-subsidized competition. And I will appoint a Presidential commission to spearhead efforts to privatize public-owned enterprises.

The burden of government shall not be hidden from view. The Congress shall require that a financial impact statement accompany each bill, specifying the effect on economic growth, employment, and competition overseas.

Welfare programs must not harm the structure of family and community. Through the use of incentives, the Congress will seek to lift the least fortunate to independence and full participation in American life and economy.

And we shall take seriously the 5th and 14th amendment guarantees to ``life, liberty, and property.'' Whenever government expropriates the use or value of private property, whether outright or through government regulations, owners will be justly compensated.

This is the recurrent challenge, the one from which we cannot shrink. Today we have the chance to write into the structure of the law guarantees of our so-much-abused economic freedoms, to ensure that this generation and the next will enjoy the fruits of their labor, will continue to live in a land of hope and opportunity where big government no longer blocks the doors to progress. We can proclaim this truth to be self-evident, that the American dream is our sacred birthright, that in this time for choosing, with one voice, we proudly choose freedom.

Last month in Venice, I joined with the leaders of the other six industrialized democracies in calling for a major reform in world agricultural trade. All of us recognized that only by working together could we solve the problems in agriculture facing each of our countries. Today in Geneva, U.S. negotiators from the Department of Agriculture and the Office of the U.S. Trade Representative will present the most ambitious proposal for world agricultural trade reform ever offered. The United States will call for a total phaseout of all policies that distort trade in agriculture by the year 2000.

It has become clear that ultimately no one benefits from the current agriculture policies employed around the world -- not farmers, not consumers, and not taxpayers. It is equally clear no nation can unilaterally abandon current policies without being devastated by the policies of other countries. The only hope is for a major international agreement that commits everyone to the same actions and timetable. The heart of our proposal is the elimination, over a 10-year period, of all export subsidies, all barriers to each other's markets (including tariffs and quotas), and all domestic subsidies that affect trade. Farm policies that provide payments to farmers and do not affect pricing or production decisions would not be required to be eliminated. Finally, our proposal calls for instituting uniform food health regulations around the world to prevent nontariff barriers to agricultural trade.

I fully recognize that this proposal is ambitious, that the negotiations will not be easy, and that any agreement will not be painless. But if we are successful, agriculture around the world, once out from under the yoke of government policies, will flourish, benefiting farmers and consumers in all nations. Today, I renew my commitment, as I did along with all our trading partners in Venice, to achieve the goal of free agriculture markets around the world by the year 2000.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Tom Loeffler, of Texas, as Principal Coordinator for Central America in the White House Office of Legislative Affairs. This is a new position. Mr. Loeffler will serve as a coordinator for legislative activities in support of administration initiatives regarding Central America. He will be responsible for ensuring close coordination of those individuals involved in this area from the White House staff, the NSC staff, the Office of Management and Budget, the Department of State, the Department of Defense, and other agencies. He will serve in this capacity until such time as relevant legislative actions have been completed for this session of Congress.

When the Commission submitted its final report last year, the President asked Mr. Packard to return later for an update on implementation of the Commission's recommendations. Meeting informally, Mr. Packard and the former Commissioners will receive briefings from the Office of the Secretary of Defense, the Organization of the Joint Chiefs of Staff, the Office of Management and Budget, representatives of industry and others, concerning the changes in defense management and organization now underway.

The Commission's charter ran from June 1985 to July 1986. Its recommendations, initially contained in an interim report, were endorsed by the President in April 1986. The Commission issued its final report in June 1986. The Commission presented recommendations on national security planning and budgeting, military organization and command, acquisition organization and procedures, and government-industry accountability.

The President met today with J. Peter Grace, chairman of W.R. Grace Co. and founder of the Grace commission, and pledged his support for Grace's intention to establish a new private sector coalition -- a taxpayer's commission -- united against wasteful Federal spending. The President stated that reducing wasteful spending remains an important weapon in the administration's deficit reduction arsenal.

The administration remains committed to the goal as stated in the Economic Bill of Rights, to eliminate Federal competition with the private sector for functions that can be better provided outside of government and at less cost. The new commission is an indication of private sector support for the President's continuing efforts for a smaller, less intrusive, and more efficient Federal Government.

Through the President's management improvement program, Reform '88, as well as the President's Council on Integrity and Efficiency (PCIE), this administration's management reform initiatives have begun to focus on Federal Government management eliminating waste and inefficient practices and freeing resources to be used for more productive purposes. The taxpayer's commission is expected to draw upon the experience of the original Grace commission -- a privately funded organization which in 1984 recommended 2,478 suggestions for increased government efficiency.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Stephen J. Ledogar, of Connecticut, a career member of the Senior Foreign Service, Class of Minister-Counselor, to be Representative of the United States of America for Mutual and Balanced Force Reductions Negotiations (MBFR). He would succeed Robert Dean Blackwill. Mr. Ledogar is presently the United States Representative to the European Conventional Arms Negotiations, a secretarial appointment, and will continue in this capacity and serve concurrently and without additional compensation as the Representative of the U.S.A. to MBFR. The President also announced his intention to nominate Mr. Ledogar for the rank of Ambassador during the tenure of his service in both positions.

The U.S.-FRG social security agreement is similar in objective to the social security agreements in force with Belgium, Canada, Italy, Norway, Sweden, Switzerland, and the United Kingdom. Such bilateral agreements, generally known as totalization agreements, provide for limited coordination between the United States and foreign social security systems to overcome the problems of gaps in protection and of dual coverage and taxation for workers who move from one country to the other. The present Supplementary Agreement would amend the original agreement with the Federal Republic of Germany and its related administrative agreement to update and simplify several of their provisions to take account of changes in U.S. and German law and to simplify the method of computing U.S. benefit amounts.

On July 13, we celebrate the Bicentennial of the Northwest Ordinance, considered one of the foundation documents of our Nation because it became a model for the Constitution and the Bill of Rights and because of its significance for the expansion of the Union.

The Confederation Congress adopted the Northwest Ordinance at the same time the Constitutional Convention in Philadelphia was drafting the new United States Constitution. The Ordinance embodied the highest ideals of a free people; its principles of civil liberty and its blueprint for national expansion so impressed the delegates to the Constitutional Convention that it became an important influence on the Constitution they were writing.

The Northwest Ordinance was vitally important for individual and civil rights in the United States. It forbade slavery in the Territory and guaranteed all citizens equality before the law. The Ordinance provided complete freedom of religion, the writ of habeas corpus, trial by jury, proportionate representation in the legislature, reasonable bail, no cruel or unusual punishment, and no deprivation of liberty or property but by the judgment of peers. The Ordinance also required full compensation for property or services taken for the common preservation and, in the just preservation of rights and property, forbade interference with bona fide private contracts and engagements.

Finally, the Northwest Ordinance recognized that religion, morality, and knowledge are all necessary elements for good government. It proclaimed that schools and the means of education would forever be encouraged to ensure the establishment of good government throughout the Territory.

In recognition of the importance of the Northwest Ordinance of 1787, the Congress, by House Joint Resolution 181, has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation calling upon the people of the United States to observe the Bicentennial of the enactment of this law.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this eighth day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Before lunch today, I had a talk with Congresswoman Johnson and Mayor McNamara and 11 other distinguished citizens of New Britain. And I know that some were Republicans and some were Democrats, and they represented many occupations and backgrounds. And we had a good discussion, and I got to straighten out some things that I thought might be not straightened out in some people's minds. I don't know whether we agreed on everything -- everyone was very polite -- but I think we do agree on the principles of economic freedom that all of us cherish.

We had a lively discussion there, though, as the mayor can attest. And today on the city steps, I'll be asking New Britain to join a great national discussion, the kind that our founders launched 200 years ago when they drafted our Constitution and submitted it to the people for ratification, the kind that the 14 of us were having a few minutes ago. If we didn't agree on everything, well, neither did the generation that gave us the Constitution.

But I'm here today because I believe that the outcome of this discussion will determine the strength and health of our nation and what it stands for in the decades to come. I'll be talking out there about what I hope will be among the most important legacies of my Presidency: the Economic Bill of Rights. Now, you've heard a lot about this from our critics. On one hand they say it's a ploy, something I've cooked up to distract attention from whatever -- I don't know, but -- [laughter]. On the other hand, they say little that's new here, which I guess means it's made up of things that I believed in and fought to achieve for years, and now I'm working to make certain that America doesn't lose all that we've done.

Well, it can be one or the other, not both, and I'll plead guilty to the second charge. I went to Washington to do a job: lower taxes, restore our defenses, cut the size and intrusiveness of government, tune up the carburetor and step on the gas of the greatest engine against poverty and for opportunity in the history of man -- the free enterprise system of the United States of America. We've achieved a great deal of that. We still have a government that spends too much and a deficit that's too large. As long as we have those, we can't be sure that the growth that we've enjoyed these last 4\1/2\ years will continue.

Today I'll talk about the way that things were before I came into office and the way they are now and about the role of economic freedom and the opportunities that America offers all peoples. But I thought I'd make one especially important point to you; it's about poverty. Between 1979 and 1980, in the years before we were elected, the breakdown of our economy hit the poor the hardest. The poverty rates soared, growing at the fastest rate even as 3 million people were pushed into poverty in that brief time. With our recovery, that rise has been stopped and poverty has dropped at the fastest pace in 15 years. Although today New Britain's unemployment rate is 3.9 percent, which is very much lower than the national average, I know many families here were hurt by those economic dislocations. So, a lot's at stake in what I'll be talking about today.

Well today, 7 years later, things are much fairer for all Americans. We've polished up the American dream, and now it shines as never before, a great star of hope once again for all the world. We did it by freeing Americans of the burdens of too much taxation and regulation and of the threat of inflation. And, yes, we did it also by respecting our country's most deeply held and cherished traditional values.

I know you have a big memorial out in the park. Over the two centuries, generations of Americans have fought, and many have died, to protect America's freedom, America's values, and America's promise. Well, it's the least we in our time can do to make sure that all our nation has achieved in these last several years to protect America's dream and promise -- see that it is for generations to come.

The President. Thank you. Thank you all. And a special thanks for that great music to the 102d Army National Guard band. You know, seeing the band, I can't help saying that one of the great things about being President is visiting our young men and women in uniform around the world. They're keeping the peace, protecting freedom, and in the last few years they've even freed one small nation, Grenada, from Communist oppression. They're the best, and we're darn proud of them. And let me also say thanks to your Mayor, William McNamara, to Secretary of Commerce Malcolm Baldrige, and to one of Congress' best -- you're lucky to have her -- Nancy Johnson.

Well, Nancy's not like that. You know where she stands. And not long ago I said I was going to go around the country talking about an economic bill of rights, because we in America have come to a time for choosing what kind of a future we'll have. Somebody asked why, of all the cities in the country, I'm starting here in New Britain. Well, it's just that New Britain is the place to be. And when it comes to hard work, to a spirit of enterprise, and to patriotism and love of freedom, to the strength that comes from faith and family, when it comes to the depth of character that builds a family, a community, and our nation, you can't be in any better place than right here in New Britain.

For the last 7 years, New Britain's story has been America's story. You remember 7 years ago. Inflation was sprinting so fast that just about every time you shopped for groceries or stopped for gas, prices had gone up. And whenever the family made a little extra to keep up with the rising cost of living, Washington took extra in taxes, and you ended up with less. Mortgage rates had climbed so high that young couples had to forget the American dream of owning their own homes. Between high taxes and high interest rates, it was becoming harder to pursue that other dream so many Americans have -- the dream of starting your own business. Jobs here were becoming more and more scarce, and what with inflation and a stagnating economy, it was hard to think of anyone who could keep up.

Well, we, the American people, made a choice back in 1980. We decided not to continue the policies of government growing bigger and bigger without end. We decided that high taxes and government that had gotten too big were the source of our economic mess. We decided to teach Washington a simple lesson: that government must work for America and not the other way around. So, joining together, we cut tax rates -- twice. We cut job-strangling regulations. We cut the growth of government spending. And we said the secret to restoring America's greatness was where that greatness had come from in the first place: in the churches and synagogues, in the neighborhoods, in the homes, and in the dreams of every American. It's not government, it's the American people who have made America great.

By the way, one of the things I like about New Britain is that you've gone ahead with things Washington still hasn't got the hang of -- like enterprise zones. When Congress blocked our enterprise zones proposal, Connecticut and New Britain got started on their own. And we're standing in the enterprise zone right now. Today, between 5 and 10 percent of all the jobs in New Britain are here thanks in part to the enterprise zone. I think Congress could learn a thing or two from New Britain.

But you know the results of what we have been able to do. Inflation and interest rates are down; growth is up. Families can buy more with what they earn. Across America and here in New Britain, entrepreneurs are starting new businesses and creating new jobs in record numbers, while major, established companies like Stanley Works now beat foreign competition at home and are expanding exports as well. New homes are springing up like daisies. By Thanksgiving, our economic expansion in American history -- well, it'll be the longest economic peacetime expansion in that American history. Because of it, the unemployment figures out last week were the best in this decade. You can walk through neighborhoods all over America and find that more people have held jobs this year than ever before in our history.

Yes, a bigger proportion of Americans have been at work this year than ever before in the history of the United States of America, and I'm determined to keep it that way. I had to learn -- I don't know whether you know that the potential employment pool of America is considered to be everybody, male and female, above the age of 16. And today over 61 percent of that total group have jobs.

Now before I go any further, I'd like to ask you a few questions. I'd like to know how you feel about this, so after each question, why, you just shout back yes or no, and make it so loud they can hear you all the way to Washington. [Laughter] Do you want to go back to the days of inflation and stagnation?

The President. You know, I sort of thought those might be your answers. Well, that's why I'm here today. In my TV address 3 weeks ago, I told you we've come to breakpoint, a time for choosing. And that's why last week I proposed an Economic Bill of Rights to protect economic growth and opportunity for you, your family, and all the American people.

Now this choice is not about ideology, not about left or right, but about backward or forward -- back to the nightmare of inflation, stagnation, higher taxes, and unrestrained government spending, or forward on the road that has brought so much bright hope and opportunity to America these last 4\1/2\ years.

Like the first Bill of Rights almost 200 years ago, the Economic Bill of Rights is built on our belief that America means freedom. Our political freedoms -- press, speech, worship -- are all guaranteed in our first Bill of Rights, which also protects some, though not all, economic freedoms. As people in Communist countries around the world have found, political freedom and economic freedom go hand in hand. Lose economic freedom, and soon we'll lose political freedom, too. And when economic freedoms fade, so do opportunity, prosperity, and hope.

The Economic Bill of Rights will guarantee four basic economic freedoms. As I said, the freedom to work where you choose. Second, the freedom to enjoy the fruits of your labor: what Americans make by honest effort, whether profits from a business or the money in a paycheck, government should not take away. And then the freedom to own and control property: to trade or exchange it and not to have it taken through threat or coercion. And finally, the freedom to participate in a free market: to contract freely for goods and services, and to achieve one's full potential without government limits on opportunity, economic independence, and growth.

Just as our political freedoms need protection by and from the Government, our economic freedoms need the same recognition and protection. And this is not a distant or abstract matter. Your right to these freedoms is at the heart of the battles over taxes and government spending that are going on right now in Washington. The big spenders think they're in the driver's seat again in Washington. After our years of progress, they want to shift America into reverse. Well, I believe it's time, once and for all, to show them that, in the United States of America, it's the American people who are really at the wheel, and that's what the Economic Bill of Rights is all about.

The field of battle is the Federal deficit. And let me clear something up. You've heard leaders on Capitol Hill shout and point fingers and say that I'm responsible for the big deficits. They're the same ones who, year after year, have shouted dead on arrival when I've sent up budgets that cut the excessive spending they love. I haven't been given a budget since I came to Washington as President. Then they've said that defense spending is the only place cuts are possible. So in the 3 years before Gramm-Rudman-Hollings, they cut billions from our defense requests and then turned around and added more than three times as much as they had cut from defense to the domestic spending.

As part of protecting our economic freedoms, we, the American people, have a right to the truth about Federal spending. The Economic Bill of Rights will guarantee us that right. The Economic Bill of Rights will put into our system of checks and balances a tool for focusing a spotlight on spending that we, the American people, might think is wrong. It gives the President something that 43 Governors have: the ability to veto spending, project by project, to force bad spending out of hiding to where Congress has to vote on it in the open, where you can see what's going on. I'm talking about a line-item veto.

The Economic Bill of Rights will also say that if the Federal Government wants to spend more on new programs, it must find the money to pay for it -- not borrow it. And to make sure nobody cheats, it will include a provision that 44 States have in their constitutions and that 85 percent of the American people want. It's long overdue -- a balanced budget amendment in our Constitution. And to make sure that Congress doesn't use a balanced budget amendment as an excuse for raising taxes, the Economic Bill of Rights will say that if taxes are raised, more than a bare majority of the Congress will have to do it. It should take more than 50 percent plus one of the Congress to impose an increase in your taxes. What's wrong with saying 60 percent or even two-thirds must agree to increase taxes? Raising taxes must never again be the easy way out. In the last 6 years, as I've told you, we've cut tax rates twice. Let's be sure that taxes stay cut. And this is what the Economic Bill of Rights is all about.

Now, some in Washington say the chances of enacting it are zero. But when it comes to amending the Constitution, the States don't have to wait for Congress to act. And if necessary, I'll go to the States and ask their help. The American people want a balanced budget amendment, and the American people deserve a balanced budget amendment. And I am determined that the American people will get a balanced budget amendment.

Now, you may have heard of some people, maybe even some that are present, talk about a certain lameduck and the end of an era. Well, all that lameduck is for the birds. [Laughter] The era we've begun won't end any time soon, because it's not my era, it's yours, the era of the American people. You did this. And in America, when you, the people, put your foot down, you're the boss. You'll make the Economic Bill of Rights part of America's heritage.

For two centuries men and women have escaped oppression, crossed the continents, crossed the oceans to find their way to this land of freedom and opportunity. And many of them settled, at last, in this city. We're all custodians, guardians of the freedoms they found -- the freedoms that our nation's Founders passed down to us. This year, in this 200th-year anniversary of our Constitution, let us, like those Founders, make a gift of freedom's guarantee to the generations that will follow us. We'll be guaranteeing America's opportunities and strength, as well. We can do this because we are a free people -- because we are Americans. Let us start here and start now. Let us dedicate ourselves to the task ahead, to give our children, ourselves, and the generations to come an Economic Bill of Rights.

And hard work -- your hard work -- and support of millions of Americans hasn't just brought us a long way in a few years; it's created a revolution. And sometimes the hardest thing in the world is to understand how the present will look to historians of the future. But take it from me, once you've had a little time to think about what's happened, we may even be astonished ourselves. So many old myths have been exposed and old ways of doing things changed.

When we first proposed tax cuts, for example, there were those who were certain that our plan would cause even larger deficits, because revenues would shrink. We all know what happened. An economy featuring growth and opportunity produced $44 billion more in revenues by 1985.

And then, finally, there were those who said that cutting taxes would cause more inflation. Boy, do I remember that one. Believe me, the now-embarrassing quotes make a lengthy list. Anyway, after 2 years of back-to-back, double-digit inflation -- the first time that had happened since World War I -- we saw inflation head downward and stay down. Today it's between 3 or 4 percent, and once again the critics were wrong.

There were other stories, too, not just predictions that unemployment was going to go higher but that high levels of unemployment were here to stay. Some folks even said we had to get used to unemployment rates of 7 and 8 percent or even higher. But we created over 13 million new jobs instead, and last month the total unemployment rate hit an even 6 percent.

So, you see, it's more than a question of just silencing our critics; America astonished the world. Chicago school economics, supply-side economics, call it what you will -- I noticed that it was even known as Reaganomics at one point until it started working -- [laughter] -- all of it is fast becoming orthodoxy. It's not just that Milton Freidman or Friedrich Von Hayek or George Stigler have won Nobel prizes; other younger names, unheard of a few years ago, are now also celebrated. People are reading George Gilder. They know what the Laffer curve is. And a few months ago the French Government inducted Paul Craig Roberts into the Legion of Honor.

And the acclaim given these economists and thinkers is evidence of a worldwide revolution, proof that they were right and the conventional wisdom was wrong. They were right for a very simple reason: They understood the power of the human spirit. They understood the capacity of the individual, once released from the stultifying hand of government, to reach and climb, and build and dream, and to achieve and succeed, and make life better for all humankind.

And from the outset, this idea of economic freedom has been our political lodestar. That's why in creating our political revolution for this economic freedom our goal was simple, as Jefferson said about the revolution of his own time: ``to place before mankind the common sense of the subject.'' All we said was this: Give the American people a chance, and they'll come through. They'll make the difference. They'll get us out of the worst economic mess since the Depression. And they have, building one of the mightiest prosperities in our history, a prosperity that I know every one of us in this room is determined to keep making stronger with every passing month and every passing year.

But let's face it, old myths die hard. [Laughter] Lately, we've been hearing from Capitol Hill about a return to the old days. In fact, this week Congress pored over 100 different ways to increase taxes. Maybe they should use next week to look for 100 ways to cut spending. It's all a matter of setting the right priority. I'm here to tell you today -- and I hope Congress takes notice -- what ails us now is what has always ailed us: The Federal Government is too big, and it spends too much money. So, let me assure you, any budget-busting spending legislation or tax increases sent down here from Capitol Hill are heading right back up Pennsylvania Avenue stamped with the most respectable four-letter word I know: V-E-T-O.

But think of this, too: Hasn't the time come to get around this year-in and year-out battle on the budget and taxes? The burden always seems to fall on those fighting fiscal abuses. Don't we need to stop fighting for 2 yards and a cloud of dust and put the ball in the air instead? And isn't it time to institutionalize our economic reforms? We have to make sure the great American spirit is never again shackled by big government, that the future of other generations of Americans is never again mortgaged on the national debt.

With our new Economic Bill of Rights we can do just that. We can get a balanced budget amendment, a line-item veto, a super majority on tax increases. We can pass truth-in-spending legislation that will force the Federal Government to be candid with the American people, to say how much new programs are going to cost and spell out the intent to finance them. And by packaging these changes into a bill of economic rights, we're only making our message easier to understand. And we're making that larger point I talked about earlier. There is no end to what the human spirit can achieve if it is left alone to strive and succeed. We know freedom works politically; our first Bill of Rights was testament to that fact. And now we need to drive home the lesson of the last few years, the lesson of the new economics: that economic freedom works too.

So, let's get together, you and I, and provide them with that opportunity. Let's work to get the provisions embodied in our Economic Bill of Rights on the floor of the House and Senate. Let's give our public servants a chance to show their stuff: to vote for less spending, lower taxes, and revolutionary new safeguards against government encroachment of our economic freedom.

I want to just say one thing to you, again, about those figures to make a point definite with you. Those figures about the people in the upper brackets paying more, a greater share of the tax burden than they were before the tax cuts. Now, what we did was completely different than those who have said, ``Well,'' you know, ``tax those people up there, the fat cats.'' We're hearing more of that today. Why are they paying a higher percentage at lower tax rates? Because when you make it worthwhile, the tax shelters don't look as attractive, and there's a reason to have a little ambition and make a dollar if you can keep more of it.

Remember back when it was a 90-percent bracket? I was in Hollywood at the time. You'd be surprised how many actors started turning down parts after they got in that bracket. Who wants to work for 10 cents on the dollar? So, that's exactly what has happened in this instance. We have put incentive where it should be, and so everybody is paying their fair share of taxes. And we're going to keep it that way.

We are now in our 56th month of economic growth, close to the longest peacetime expansion in our entire history. We've enjoyed low inflation and job creation that has captured the imagination of the world. Over 13 million jobs have come into existence. And contrary to what some critics of our administration have been suggesting, most of the jobs -- over 60 percent of them -- are in the higher paying occupations. Our country's in the middle of a great jump forward.

In these last few years, many American companies have restructured, cut overhead, brought down costs, and significantly improved quality. They've computerized their operations and invested in the most up-to-date technology. Last year, this innovation pushed manufacturing productivity in the United States ahead by 3.5 percent, a greater increase than in any other major industrialized nation. Unlike the late 1970's, when our major corporations seemed to be lagging behind, today they are again pulling out in front.

In the last decade, our most productive citizens -- the ones we depend on to carry our flag in a highly competitive world market -- had their investment capital taxed away and were hamstrung by well-meaning, yet often intrusive, regulation. High taxes and overregulation were dragging us down. We've done our best in these 6\1/2\ years to turn that situation around, and it's beginning to pay off. Federal tax rates are no longer increasing, draining even more resources out of the private sector into the bureaucracy. We've also kept under control the bureaucratic impulse to issue more and more regulations, mandates, and edicts telling us how to run our lives and businesses. We've done our best to free our economy and get government out of the way.

In recent months, I've visited several companies, like Harley-Davidson in Pennsylvania and Dictaphone Corporation in Florida. The confidence of the men and women who work for these American corporations was inspiring; it reflects a mood in companies across this land. If you could meet them as I did, you'd be confident that American workers, if provided the tools and permitted to compete on a level playing field, can outproduce any rival and keep the ``Made in the U.S.A.'' label something to be proud of.

Lean, fast-moving, and efficient: American corporations are moving into the world market, and the latest figures suggest they are more than holding their own. In the last few months, we've seen an overall surge of American exports. In fact, from the third quarter of 1986 to the first quarter of 1987, exports were increasing at an annual rate of 14 percent and imports were declining at an annual rate of almost 5 percent. In short, our country turned the corner on our trade deficit last fall, and the situation continues to improve.

The increased competitiveness of American business, the positive adjustment that has occurred in the international exchange rates, the improvement of the economies of our trading partners, and our ongoing efforts to pry open any foreign markets closed to American goods -- all of this has helped us meet the trade deficit challenge.

Ironically, just at a time when we're making great progress, Congress is seriously considering legislation that could set us back. The last thing our economy needs now is congressional action that is behind the curve. In the proposed bill, Congress takes aim at a problem that is correcting itself. It's a little like closing the barn door when the horse is trying to get back in. If the Congress really wants to help solve the trade deficit, the single best thing it could do is cut the Federal budget deficit. Now's the time to be talking about opening markets, not closing them; about expanding trade, not putting up roadblocks. What is called for now is hard work at the negotiating tables with our trading partners and innovative thinking.

Well, that's just what we've been doing, especially concerning the international market in agriculture. This week, following through on an initiative we set in motion at the Tokyo economic summit last year, we proposed dramatic reform of the free world's agricultural trading system. Our idea is to open world markets and, over a 10-year period, to end the costly subsidies and price controls that are a heavy weight tied around the necks of the Western economies. Free from this burden, everyone, including the farmers, will be better off. Trade, commerce, and competition are positive forces carrying mankind to new levels of prosperity. And, as usual, Americans are leading the way.

I have signed into law H.R. 1827, which provides supplemental appropriations for fiscal year 1987. It includes essential funding for assistance to the Central American democracies, for high-priority defense requirements, and for military assistance to the Philippines. It also provides needed funding for the Commodity Credit Corporation, the Internal Revenue Service, the Immigration and Naturalization Service, veterans benefits, and a number of other domestic programs.

Before presenting this bill for my signature, the Congress deleted restrictive language that would have limited my authority to test and deploy nuclear weapons, and would have required mandatory compliance with the unratified SALT II agreement. These provisions would have undercut our national security and our negotiating leverage with the Soviets. Had they remained, the bill would have been vetoed.

While I am pleased that this bill includes funding for essential programs and that certain objectionable provisions affecting our national security were deleted, several other aspects of H.R. 1827 require comment.

Section 505 of this bill contains a restriction on the use of funds that is designed to prevent the Secretary of Transportation and the Maritime Administration from adopting rules on the subject of Construction Differential Subsidy (CDS) repayment. I have signed this bill into law based on the understanding that because this restriction on their authority is not retroactive, it will have no effect on vessel owners who previously repaid their subsidies pursuant to a CDS repayment rule published in the Federal Register on June 22, 1987. Instead, this provision of section 505 will affect only further repayments by vessel owners. Were it otherwise, a restriction on rulemaking in this area could cost the taxpayers more than $100 million in payments to vessel owners who have previously repaid their subsidies.

As is clear from the proviso lifting the restriction, if and when the Congress alters the existing statutory scheme, this portion of section 505 represents an attempt by the Congress to use a spending limitation as an indirect means of regulating the Executive's interpretation and enforcement of the law, while leaving the law itself substantively unchanged.

Article II of the Constitution assigns responsibility for executing the law to the President. While the Congress is empowered to enact new or different laws, it may not indirectly interpret and implement existing laws, which is an essential function allocated by the Constitution to the executive branch. If the Congress disagrees with a statutory interpretation advanced by the executive branch -- or with the efforts of the executive branch to defend or prosecute judicial action based on that interpretation -- the Congress may, of course, amend the underlying statute. The use of an appropriations bill for this purpose, however, is inconsistent with the constitutional scheme of separation of powers.

Accordingly, I believe it is my constitutional responsibility to interpret this spending restriction in section 505 consistently with the President's power and duty to take care that the laws be faithfully executed -- a power and duty that of necessity include responding to any judicial challenge to past or future actions of the Department of Transportation.

This bill also includes a provision that could permit Rural Electrification Administration borrowers to prepay outstanding Federal Financing Bank loans without paying the premium due under their loan agreement. This could result in a loss of about $2 billion in forgiven premiums. This new subsidy must be considered in light of the more than $50 billion in life-of-loan subsidies that Rural Electrification Administration borrowers will receive on loan advances made since 1973. This provision could have serious adverse effects on the operation of the Federal Financing Bank. As a result, this provision must be interpreted consistently with other provisions of law requiring the Secretary of the Treasury to protect the integrity of the Federal Financing Bank.

H.R. 1827 is a prime example of how not to legislate on budgetary matters. As has been the case with other omnibus appropriations bills that have been presented for my signature, H.R. 1827 presented a choice between many expensive, undesirable, and unnecessary provisions on the one hand, or a shutdown of important government programs on the other. For example, without this bill, funding for loans to farmers would be cut off just as it is needed for summer crops. Yet, to avoid a critical disruption in this program, I must sign away $1.7 billion in unrequested funding for other entirely unrelated programs.

In accordance with my commitment to reduce spending to meet Gramm-Rudman-Hollings deficit reduction targets, I submitted to the Congress a request for supplemental appropriations that were more than offset by proposed spending reductions. The Congress, however, rejected virtually all of these proposed spending reductions, and as a result H.R. 1827 provides $6.67 billion more budget authority than I requested. It misses the goal of deficit-neutrality by more than $6.4 billion.

Well, thank you all very much, Governor Orr. And I know that some place here is Secretary Bowen. I figured it was right to have a doctor -- there he is -- proper to have a doctor as the Secretary of Health and Human Services. I brought him along not because I'm sick or anything but -- [laughter] -- because we were coming to Indiana. But I thank you all -- all of the public officials who are here and your Congressman John Myers. And I thank you for taking time from your busy schedules to spend a few moments with a fellow midwesterner.

Driving into Danville today felt like coming home, so much does Hendricks County feel -- or remind me of growing up in Illinois. There are the beautiful homes so well cared for, the American flag on display everywhere, and of course this wonderful county courthouse.

Now, I'm campaigning throughout the country again -- last month to community leaders and business people in Florida, then to the people of a Connecticut city that has come back to economic life during this expansion, and still elsewhere later this July. And this time I'm stumping for something I believe even more important, even more historic than tax reform. It's an Economic Bill of Rights. I first announced this campaign on the steps of the Jefferson Memorial during the Fourth of July weekend, outlining four essential guarantees for all Americans: The freedom to work -- and that means eliminating government barriers to opportunity; the freedom to enjoy the fruits of your own labor -- and that means bringing to an end, once and for all, excessive government borrowing, spending, and taxation; and the freedom to own and control your own property, including intellectual property like technological innovations; the freedom to participate in a free market -- and that means government must work to foster, not hinder, economic growth.

Now, I'll be speaking about all of this in more detail downtown later this morning. In particular, I'll present our specific proposals for ensuring these four basic economic freedoms. But I asked to have you come here today because I wanted to be able to talk with local people like yourselves.

You see, 200 and more years ago, when our Constitution and Bill of Rights were being debated, the debates took place in towns like Danville, in farming communities like the towns in rural Indiana, in virtually every community in America. The people themselves -- the farmers, the craftsmen, and local officials -- were directly involved. It's this kind of involvement on the part of the people themselves that I'd like to see take place again. And so, I'm asking you to help me start a national discussion by taking up the issue of economic rights in your own communities.

I just have to believe that if we get away from the lawyers and the lobbyists of Washington and away from the special interests that seem to dominate things so back there on the banks of the Potomac, if we get away from all of that and ask the people whether it isn't time at last to do things like pass a balanced budget amendment, the people will say yes. There's such a thing as common sense in America, and if you can't always find it in the Capitol building in Washington, isn't it good to know that you can still find it in places like the Hendricks County Courthouse?

Looking around this magnificent building, one final thought. The aim of our Economic Bill of Rights is the same as that of the political Bill of Rights in the Constitution: freedom. And seeing those names on the wall, these names of everyday Americans who served in our Armed Forces for that great cause, well, it just reminds you how deep the love of freedom goes out here in the heartland.

I suppose that, as they did with tax reform, the pundits are going to say of our Economic Bill of Rights: It can never be done. Well, I just happen to have an answer for those critics. Let them do what I've done. Just let them for awhile travel here. In short, my friends, if anybody back in Washington wants to know what can and can't be done, let them spend one day among the good people of Indiana. If I could enlarge, this isn't about Indiana, but just let me tell you a little incident in my life -- has to do with a Midwestern State. We're all here in the heartland of the country -- Indiana, Illinois, Iowa. This has to do with Iowa.

Lieutenant Governor Mutz, Mayor Hudnut, Congressman Myers, thank you, and thank all of you. And a special thanks to your outgoing president, John Horsley, for inviting me here. And I want all of you to know that it's good to be back in Indiana, and it's good to once again speak to the National Association of Counties.

But I come to you today with immense respect and respect for the hundreds and hundreds of, well, people that are here and -- I was told how many were here, 4,000, so I'd better say that instead of the hundreds. But I come before you today with immense respect and respect for the offices you hold -- so close to the people themselves -- respect for your service to our nation at the most basic levels of our democracy. You know many of your constituents by face and by name. And you preside at commission and board meetings, where they voice their concerns. You know what it is to be stopped on the street to explain a decision. In recent years, you've worked imaginatively to increase private economic development in your communities -- the best way to ensure economic growth. And day in and day out, you know what it is to be held responsible for government actions. You know what it is, in short, to do the will of the people.

This is why I want to enlist you in the campaign that I began on the 3d of July on the steps of the Jefferson Memorial. There I called on all Americans to complete the work of the authors of the Declaration of Independence with an Economic Bill of Rights, a bill that will restore to us the freedoms that our Founding Fathers believed we should always have, a bill of rights that will protect us and future generations from the needless and wrongful encroachment of government upon our lives.

For make no mistake, the danger is grave. And many in Congress are intent upon returning to the days of unrestrained and irresponsible government -- present company, I might add, is excepted. I know which side Governor Myers -- or Congressman Myers is on. Consider, for example, the so-called budget process. Delay after delay, missed deadline after missed deadline -- the entire budget process looks like intentionally staged chaos, chaos to provide a cover for those in Congress whose aim is to shift resources from the people's interest to the special interests.

Indeed, a recent article in the Washington Post described how one member of the House Public Works and Transportation Committee circulated a bill asking -- well, it was to fill in the blanks, and the form was asking other members to sign up for their favorite pork-barrel project. And according to the Post, few could resist grabbing -- quote -- ``a piece of the action.'' Now, I've spoken before about this congressional urge to grab a piece of the action, but this is so important for you and all the American people to understand that I'd like to give you examples. To begin with, there's the highway bill with its massive demonstration projects that give more of the funds to a few, hand-picked areas. This approach deprives you of the necessary resources to return Federal dollars to places where they're really needed. I vetoed that bill earlier this year. By one vote, Congress managed to override my veto. Why? Well, in part, so that Congress could allow a certain major city to add an extension to its mass transit system. The system will be so expensive, and for so few people, that it would be cheaper to buy each rider a new car every 5 years for the next half a century.

I could go on and on. There's the Federal program that will spend millions to build luxury hotels, restaurants, and condominiums -- that's right, fancy condominiums. I barely had time to figure out what ``yuppies'' were before Congress started to subsidize them. [Laughter] There are the farm programs that provide little or nothing for the many family farms, but that gave one wealthy farmer more than $13 million and that gave hundreds of thousands of dollars to a Texas landowner who is neither American nor in need of public assistance. He's the Crown Prince of Liechtenstein.

But there's one program Congress recently voted on that pretty much says it all. This year the Congress of the United States, in its deep and unfathomable wisdom, voted 8 million of your tax dollars to establish -- get ready -- a center for the study of weeds. Now, I don't know whether I want to know any more about weeds. [Laughter] But you know, there are some days sitting in that Oval Office, with these bills coming across my desk, when I don't know whether to laugh or cry.

Now, I have been accused in recent days of campaigning for our Economic Bill of Rights in order to distract attention from other events in Washington. Well, it so happens that I've been campaigning for economic rights for more than three decades, and I intend to go on doing so for years to come. But more important, the truth is just the other way around. There are those who would like to distract attention from the real business of government: putting an end to unrestrained spending. And I'm convinced that the great majority of Americans believe simply this: Stop the spending, and no more taxes.

And while I am getting a few things off my chest, something else has been bothering me lately. Critics have claimed that in opposing our administration on the issues, they're at some kind of an unfair disadvantage, that this Presidency is somehow based more on personality than on policy. Well, the truth is, no President can remain popular unless he retains the fundamental support of the American people on the issues. So, I invite my critics -- I welcome my critics -- to go after me on the issues just as hard as they please. We'll let the people decide who's right and who's wrong.

Tax hikes, budget-busting spending bills, job-destroying protectionism, a new round of soaring inflation -- the momentum in Washington is building. As I've said since the beginning of this campaign, today virtually all that stands between us and a return to the malaise economy of the 1970's is the Presidential veto. And to make this point so clear that Congress can't possibly understand [misunderstand] me, permit me once again to repeat my commitment. As far as I'm concerned, our tax reform for the American people is, to borrow the title of the current hit movie, untouchable. And if any tax hike ever comes across my desk, my handling of the veto pen will make the way Elliott Ness went after Al Capone look like child's play.

But important as the Presidential veto power may be, we dare not rely upon it alone. No, we need more to protect the hard-won achievements of these past 6 years. And it is for this reason -- to protect our prosperity and our jobs, to promote more growth and opportunity -- that I have proposed our Economic Bill of Rights. Listen for a moment to the specific provisions -- and Congress, take notice.

The people are entitled to the fruits of their labor and shall not be burdened by excessive taxation. What does this mean? It means that more than a mere majority of the Congress should be required to raise taxes -- not just 50 percent plus one, maybe 60 percent, maybe two-thirds. I know when I was Governor of California it took two-thirds of the legislature to pass the budget, and it took 60 percent of the voters to pass a bond issue. They've cried out in fright in Washington as if I've suggested something unconstitutional with regard to raising taxes.

Special interest legislation shall not be hidden from the people. The President shall have the right to veto individual appropriations. The President shall have the line-item veto. I used it 943 times when I was a Governor, and I miss it in Washington.

The Government shall take seriously the 5th and 14th amendment guarantees to ``life, liberty, and property.'' Whenever government expropriates the use or value of private property, whether outright or through government regulations, owners will be justly compensated.

These last two points, truth in Federal spending and the requirement for a financial impact statement, bear directly upon your work as county officials. For in recent years, Congress hasn't been satisfied with just spending hundreds of billions of Federal funds. Congress has wanted to spend still more money, including the funds of State and local governments.

You all know how it works. The Federal Government appropriates millions for this or that program, then mandates that you participate in the program by spending millions of your own dollars or by complying with certain national standards to avoid the loss of Federal funds. In all this, ``mandates'' is just a fancy word for big government in Washington pushing around the levels of government that are closest to the people.

Under our proposals, whenever Congress considered legislation that would impose costs on State and local governments, a statement of those costs would appear in the legislation itself, not buried in some obscure committee report. Still more significant, Congress would be required to state what they expect the impact to be on State and local governments and where the funds would come from, not leave it to local officials like you to explain to your constituents why you're forced to raise taxes because of something that happened in Washington. These simple measures would force the Federal Government to do what it should have been doing all along: take federalism seriously and treat State and local governments with respect.

In our own nation, too, we have recent examples that prove how important it is for government to respect economic rights. Consider the Federal income tax. No property is more private, no property is more personal, even intimate, than an individual's income. It directly represents the labor, day-in and day-out, of one's mind and hands. It's used for the necessities of life itself, to provide for one's family, to make possible the adventure of building a better life. Yet during the 1970's, the Federal Government showed a high-handed disregard for this most fundamental form of property, taxing it at higher and higher levels, permitting inflation to raise effective tax rates again and again.

Well, our administration changed all that. We cut tax rates, indexed tax brackets, then simplified the entire tax system with our historic tax reform. And the result? The connection between effort and reward was reestablished, giving virtually every participant in our economy new incentives for achievement. Today unemployment stands at the lowest rate in almost 8 years. Government revenues at the Federal level and for most State and local governments have actually gone up. The stock and bond markets have risen to record highs. And come this Thanksgiving, this tax cut-led expansion -- if it's still going on -- on Thanksgiving Day will go into the books as the longest peacetime expansion ever to take place in this nation. And perhaps most important, we've seen the creation of more than 13 million new jobs.

Yet all that we've achieved -- our hard-won victory over inflation, the millions of new jobs -- all these are in danger. It is our duty to protect them, to secure for ourselves and our children the economic rights that will enable our nation, now and into the 21st century, to become a still greater land, a land of ever-increasing prosperity and ever-widening opportunity. In this bicentennial year of our Constitution, I submit to you that we see in the vision of the Founding Fathers and in the Constitution itself the promise of a government that is good, because it respects its citizens' rights, both political and economic, and that has chosen once and for all to live within its own means. And now I ask you to join me; join me, my friends, in making that promise come true.

With the death of Nathan Perlmutter, we have all suffered a tremendous loss. His passing leaves a void which cannot be filled. But he also leaves a legacy which will long be remembered and cherished. We will not forget his devotion to his family, the Jewish people, and his country; nor his devotion to the very highest principles: truth, respect for the inalienable rights of individuals, and human freedom.

I personally take some consolation in the fact that only 3 weeks ago I was able to award him a richly deserved Presidential Medal of Freedom, our nation's highest civilian honor. Although he was then already too ill to attend the ceremony, I had the pleasure of talking with Nate by phone before the event. I also had the pleasure of giving the award to Ruth Ann Perlmutter, his wife and collaborator in all his many achievements. To her and the rest of Nathan Perlmutter's family, Nancy and I send our heartfelt condolences.

The President met today with members of his Foreign Intelligence Advisory Board to receive a briefing on the Board's findings and recommendations regarding the procedures and practices to protect classified information and activities at our foreign missions worldwide. The Board's report is classified.

The Advisory Board as well as the panels chaired by former Defense Secretary Laird and former Defense Secretary Schlesinger have together conducted comprehensive, hard-hitting, thorough studies of the serious counterintelligence and security issues that confront our Embassy in Moscow and throughout the world. The studies have underscored the gravity of the challenges we face as a result of Soviet actions against our mission in the U.S.S.R. and the implications for the security of our overseas missions revealed by the discoveries we have made around the world, in Moscow, and in recent espionage investigations. The studies have made clear the need for determined, bold action to continue to meet this problem head on and now.

The recommendations contained in the reports are comprehensive. They address options for providing our mission in the U.S.S.R. with the secure environment our personnel need to conduct our relations with the Soviet Union. They address systemic changes in the way we construct our facilities overseas to assure that we never again face the situation we now confront in Moscow. They also make recommendations regarding the structure and conduct of our security and counterintelligence programs worldwide to attempt to prevent any repetition of the serious breakdown in our defenses to the activities of hostile intelligence services we have recently discovered in our Moscow Embassy.

This administration has given high priority to improving our ability to detect and counter espionage as well as other threats and activities directed by foreign intelligence services against United States Government establishments or persons. Our decisions, which will affect the security of our overseas presence for decades to come, will require the best minds and talent we can muster as a nation. Solutions will also require resources. In the next 2 weeks the President, together with Secretary Shultz and his senior advisers, will review the recommendations these panels have made to determine what measures are required. In this review, the administration will be consulting with Congress, which has a major role to play in meeting this challenge.

This year, as the American Podiatric Medical Association celebrates its 75th anniversary, we can be truly grateful for the foot care provided by doctors of podiatric medicine and for the continuing benefits of research into medical problems of the foot.

According to medical estimates, the average person walks 115,000 miles in a lifetime. We do this on feet that contain an intricate network of muscles, other tissues, and one fourth of all our bones. Each year, millions of Americans need professional foot care because of injury, neglect or abuse of their feet, the effects of aging or heredity, and diseases such as arthritis and diabetes.

Basic medical research offers significant promise for the prevention and relief of many foot health complaints. New approaches to diagnosis and treatment, however, are also needed to eliminate foot problems. Private, voluntary organizations and the Federal government have developed a strong and enduring partnership committed to research on foot problems and other disorders of the musculoskeletal system. We can have every confidence that concerted efforts will ultimately uncover even more effective treatments for such problems.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fourteenth day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

We know what's made this growth and progress possible. We got government out of your pockets and out of the way. I was once asked what the difference is between a small business and a big business, and I answered, ``Well, a big business is what a small business would be if the government would get out of its way and leave it alone.'' It's economic freedom that brings economic opportunity. And the many of you who have built your businesses up from scratch know that this thing we call economic freedom isn't some fuzzy, philosophical concept; it's a day-to-day reality for you. It's often a question of survival, the difference between making it and not, between regulations and taxes that are just too steep to hurdle over and opportunity that gives you running room and a chance to compete.

That's why on July 3d I stood at the steps of the Jefferson Memorial and spoke of my commitment, for the rest of my political career, to campaign for an Economic Bill of Rights. We saw in the late sixties and seventies how so much of the promise of the civil rights movement seemed to be stolen as our economy faltered, as opportunity was ground down under the heavy hand of big government and the oppressive effects of taxes, inflation, and regulation. Minorities fought a courageous battle to win their rights, to purchase a ticket on the train of economic progress. They won that right, but no sooner had they climbed aboard than they saw that train slow down and grind to a halt. It was bitter irony that meant more decades of frustration and anger -- too often, hopelessness and despair.

What went wrong? The civil rights movement was one of the proudest moments in our history, when our nation righted ancient wrongs, when we extended to all Americans God-given rights promised in our Constitution, and we made ourselves live up to our ideals. Those were great achievements in those days, but they just didn't go far enough.

It should not be forgotten that the civil rights movement was in great part a struggle against discriminatory government regulations. That's what Jim Crow laws were. That wasn't anything just dreamed up in a neighborhood; this was under the law. But at the same time that some freedoms were being fought for and won, the laws that violated those freedoms were struck down and removed from the books, the Government was steadily and massively encroaching on other individual freedoms, and the regulatory apparatus reached out to touch and control almost every aspect of our economic life. Civil rights are empty rights if not accompanied by economic opportunity. Our country fought for the right of all to sit at a lunch counter. At the same time, the Government was making it harder and harder to own one. We fought for the right of all Americans to hold whatever job they were qualified for but made it even harder to find any job at all.

Yes, it created opportunity for those who had before been economically disenfranchised: the poor and minorities. After the largest increase in history, we first stopped and then reversed the upward spiral in poverty not through growth in government but through growth in the economy, not by creating more welfare but by creating more jobs. In our economic expansion, what the Europeans call the economic miracle, growth in minority employment has substantially outpaced that of the overall population. Still, while opportunities are improving, we won't be satisfied until everyone who wants a job has a job.

Well, I must have promised a hundred times to veto any tax hike that ever comes across my desk, and that promise still stands, but they keep coming back, calling for more taxes. And I thought I was the one who needed a hearing aid. [Laughter] No, there will be no tax increase while I'm in office. It's time now to institutionalize our gains, to write into law guarantees of our economic rights and ensure our prosperity not only in this generation but in the next. Let's stop overspending with a balanced budget amendment to the Constitution. Let's cut out the pork and waste with a line-item veto. And let's protect our paychecks by requiring more than a mere majority in Congress to raise taxes.

One of the things I've been talking about as part of the Economic Bill of Rights is the need for a sort of financial impact statement, very much like an environmental impact statement. It would require Congress to notify the American people as to the economic consequences of their programs. There's a perfect example of that coming up for a vote in this Congress, something that hits hardest at minorities, young people, and the poor. It's the effort by some in Congress, under pressure from special interests, to raise the minimum wage.

It's said that if you put 10 economists in a room and ask a question, you'll get 10 different answers. I can make jokes like that, because my degree was in economics. [Laughter] I thought it was honorary when they gave it to me, but -- [laughter] -- but you know, that story is not the case with the minimum wage; most economists agree that raising the minimum wage reduces employment. Economists call it disemployment, but it amounts to the same thing: fewer jobs than there would have been.

In fact, there are numerous economic studies that make just that point. We've had a lot of years of raises in the minimum wage. Our Labor Department has estimated that every 10-percent increase in the minimum wage will mean 100,000 to 200,000 fewer jobs. Some in Congress want to raise the minimum wage more than 38 percent over the next 3 years. That could mean 800,000 jobs down the drain, jobs that already exist or jobs, hope, and opportunity that will never be created.

This administration wants no part of a bill that will cost hundreds of thousands of teenagers and young adults the opportunity to get a job and to get the invaluable experience that goes with it. We won't be party to jinxing another generation. That's the real cost of the minimum wage legislation before Congress. And if eliminating 800,000 jobs is what some in Congress really want to do, then they should be made to stand up and admit as much to the American people.

Some 20 years ago, I remember quoting one of the leading commentators of the period. ``The profit motive is outmoded,'' he said. ``It must be replaced by the incentives of the welfare state. The distribution of goods must be affected by a planned economy.'' It seems incredible to us now, but he was only parroting the accepted wisdom of the period. I called my speech ``A Time For Choosing.'' Well, the choice is still before us, whether we're going to be dragged back into big government or if we're going to push forward, if we're going to write protections of our economic freedoms into law so that politicians can never again threaten our economy with bankruptcy and stagnation. Yes, we've learned a lot since those days, in great part through the example of men and women such as you, living examples of the American dream. And your kind of businesses have played a major part in creating those 13 million new jobs in these last few years.

That's the American dream, a dream that all of you every day are making a reality. In this time for choosing, let's make sure that it stays that way, that the story of America continues to be the story of people like Mirta de Perales, a story of hope, faith, and freedom. Let's complete the civil rights movement by writing a guarantee of the American dream into the Constitution, a guarantee that America will always be, for our children and our children's children, the land of opportunity.

One such way to recognize this major athletic event is to join together in support of American athletes now in training to represent this great country in Canada and Korea. Thousands of American athletes participate annually in the Olympic movement all over the world. The International Olympic Games are held every 4 years and are the culmination of the skill and prowess resulting from countless hours of work and preparation.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this fifteenth day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Cresencio Arcos, Jr., as Principal Coordinator for Public Diplomacy on Central America in the White House Office of Communications. This is a new position. Mr. Arcos will direct interagency public diplomacy efforts in support of administration initiatives in Central America. He will coordinate activities involving the White House, the National Security Council, the Department of State, the Department of Defense, USIA, and other agencies. He will serve in this capacity for at least the next 90 days.

Well, for 93 years now, the National Civic League has worked to promote just that spirit, that distinctively American spirit of cooperation. And for 38 of these years, the League's All-America Cities Awards program has recognized outstanding citizen action in attacking local problems. Just think of the numbers involved: More than 3,500 communities representing some 100 million of our citizens have participated in the competition, and more than 350 communities have been given the coveted award. As we celebrate the bicentennial year of our Constitution, we're all especially aware of the need for good citizenship like that promoted by these awards. And so it is that I take great pleasure in making the following presentations.

Through the Short North Business Association, Columbus undertook a neighborhood revitalization program that has overseen, in conjunction with the Columbus Neighborhood Design Assistance Center, $1.4 million in capital improvements in a formerly blighted inner city area.

With the help of 300 volunteers, civic leaders of Hickory transformed a decaying local historic landmark into the Arts Center, which has become one of the outstanding cultural facilities in the Southeast. In addition, local citizens are working to develop strategies and recommendations to make their area an even better place in which to live and work in the 1990's and beyond.

The League of Women Voters in Olympia led a coalition of 11 community organizations to reorganize the city government and was able to generate $44 million in public and private reinvestment funds that resulted in 90 new businesses relocating to downtown Olympia, creating 290 new jobs. An expanded job creation program pursued in cooperation with surrounding communities resulted in 390 volunteers recruiting 40 new companies that have hired 1,850 employees, reduced unemployment from 12.2 percent to 7.7 percent, contributed $400,000 to local tax collection, and added $10 million in retail sales.

Pensacola citizens established a nonprofit community development corporation that began a revolving loan fund that has provided $840,000 over 2 years for the establishment or expansion of 17 small businesses, creating 103 new jobs. Several local banks work in a partnership with the corporation that has been so successful, and the State of Florida is now using it as a model.

The Pittsburgh city government became a working partner with community groups and private investors through the creation of the city's first housing department. Since it was created, more than 15,000 loans have been made to help low and middle income owners renovate their homes, and almost 2,000 below-market-rate mortgages have been approved for first-time home buyers.

A citizen coalition in Prince George's County championed a fiscal turnaround, a business-financed public relations and marketing campaign, and a privately led revitalization of county economic growth and development. Of particular note is the Advisory Council for Business and Industry, which undertook an aggressive advertising and recruitment campaign to highlight the achievements of the county school system and attract talented new teachers and received nearly 7,000 applications for teaching positions.

In late 1984 Richmond community leaders began a project to help workers dislocated by recent plant closings. Within 6 months, 90 percent of the workers targeted were employed and a permanent career opportunities center was opened. At the same time, Richmond community schools initiated an incentive program giving $100 awards to students who achieved 100-percent attendance records. Perfect attendance jumped from 37 to 222 students, and expulsions dropped by more than 30 percent. The next year perfect attendance remained high, even without the rewards.

Vancouver undertook a major citywide initiative to play host to an exhibition of world-class contemporary Japanese works in order to bridge a growing cultural gap in the Vancouver-Portland area. This project was a great success and helped create an awareness within the community of how much more there is to learn about the history, culture, and national character of their Pacific neighbor.

Well, congratulations to each of you once again. From our neighbors in Prince George's County, Maryland, to the other side of the continent and the towns of Olympia and Vancouver, Washington -- you're all demonstrating the spirit of initiative and cooperation that made our nation great and will keep her great. And on behalf of all Americans, I thank you.

Clean air and water, productive and beautiful lands, abundant wildlife, and plentiful energy and natural resources are part of America's heritage. Throughout history Americans have sustained a deep, abiding relationship with their land and a reverence for this natural resource heritage. Prior to colonial settlement, native Americans strongly maintained these attitudes and the vast majority of Americans today hold similar values. My commitment to the conservation and stewardship of this treasured national heritage by the American people is guided by these beliefs.

However, this report also makes clear that despite these positive trends, programs and policies governing environmental protection and natural resource preservation are in need of change. The potential to devote virtually infinite resources to any of a number of environmental problems with diminishing benefits requires approaches that strike balances. This report suggests mechanisms for better striking those balances.

Also, we are becoming increasingly aware that many environmental problems do not stop at national boundaries and that international and global environmental problems will increasingly require coordinated attention. This report, consequently, provides the first government in-depth review of the international environment as it pertains to the United States since 1981. The conclusion of the first Environmental Quality Report in 1970 that ``National environmental goals must be developed and pursued in the realization that the human environment is global in nature, and that international cooperation must be a principal ingredient to effective environmental management'' is even more pertinent today.

We can be proud of our environmental achievements. Also, we can look forward to a future of an enhanced national environmental heritage combined with economic prosperity if, as a nation, we move forthrightly to deal with complex environmental issues in a thoughtful, analytical manner, striking appropriate balances between competing social values.

I have determined that the extension of relief as provided under Proclamation 5074, as subsequently modified under my national policy for the steel industry, is consistent with our national economic interest.

I will, therefore, proclaim the extension of import relief in the form currently in effect. I will impose this relief for a period to extend from July 20, 1987, through September 30, 1989, in order to provide time for this industry to complete important investment projects, improve productivity, and regain profitability. I have decided to provide relief in a form consistent with my belief in minimal government interference in the marketplace, in a manner that facilitates the orderly adjustment of the industry while recognizing the substantial differences in the competitive conditions of the various segments of this industry.

In recognition of the weaker competitive position of the stainless steel bar, rod, and alloy tool steel sectors, I will proclaim the extension of global quotas for these products in the form currently in effect, as modified by headnote 10(g)(ii) of Subpart A, part 2 of the Appendix to the Tariff Schedules of the United States.

In order to facilitate the orderly transition between my original import relief measure and the extension that I will proclaim, as well as to provide adequate time for the negotiation or renegotiation of orderly marketing agreements, I will extend the country allocations for stainless steel bar and wire rod and alloy tool steel for a period of 92 days, to end on October 19, 1987, at the levels cited in the Annex to my proclamation.

For stainless steel wire rod, imports will be limited during the remainder of the first year of extended import relief to 10,213 net tons; imports in the second year will be limited to 13,926 net tons; and imports in the final period will be limited to 2,869 net tons.

For alloy tool steel, imports will be limited to 13,182 net tons during the remainder of the first year of extended import relief; imports in the second year will be limited to 17,977 net tons; and imports in the final period will be limited to 3,703 net tons.

The President has decided to extend existing import relief for the specialty steel industry until September 30, 1989, when the remainder of his national steel program expires. This import relief will be in the form of declining tariffs for stainless steel sheet, strip, and plate, and quotas for stainless steel rod, bar, and alloy tool steel.

The widespread trade problems in the specialty steel industry stem from a variety of sources. Part of the difficulties arise from persistent global overproduction, some of it subsidized, as well as trade barriers and distortive practices used by our trading partners to protect their domestic industries and to stimulate exports. The President took these factors into consideration on July 5, 1983, when he made his original decision to grant import relief under section 201 of the Trade Act of 1974. These factors were a major consideration in today's decision, as well.

The President's decision to extend import relief to the specialty steel industry is part of his comprehensive approach to trade problems in steel. The objective of that program is to bring an end to constant trade disputes over steel by reversing global trends toward excess capacity, greater subsidization, and increasingly protected foreign markets. The relief announced today is in the form most consistent with the President's belief that government should interfere with the marketplace as little as possible and that when government action is necessary it should facilitate orderly adjustment in the industry.

The U.S. International Trade Commission (USITC) has found that the economic condition of companies producing stainless steel sheet, strip, and plate is stronger than other segments of the industry. Further, many of these imports are already covered by bilateral arrangements negotiated under the President's national steel program. Therefore, a modest tariff starting at 3 percent and declining to 1 percent of the value, will be imposed on importation of these products.

In recognition of the weaker competitive position of the stainless steel bar and wire rod and alloy tool steel sectors, the President has decided to maintain the existing quota program with continued increases in the quotas established in 1983. In addition, the President has again authorized the U.S. Trade Representative to allocate unilaterally these quantitative restrictions on a country-by-country basis or to negotiate or renegotiate bilateral arrangements with our trading partners in order to provide for such country allocations.

In order to facilitate the orderly transition between the original import relief and this extension, as well as to provide time for the expected negotiations, the President has decided to extend for 90 days, through October 19, 1987, the allocations provided during the final year of the existing import relief for stainless steel bar and wire rod and alloy tool steel.

The President today announced his intention to appoint Marina von Neumann Whitman to be a member of the Advisory Committee for Trade Negotiations for a term of 2 years. She would succeed Robert B. Delano.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Jerald C. Newman to be a member of the National Commission on Libraries and Information Science for a term expiring July 19, 1992. Upon confirmation, he will be redesignated Chairman. This is a reappointment.

The President. It has been my pleasure to welcome Prime Minister Thatcher back to Washington after her remarkable reelection triumph. She is beginning an historic third consecutive term in office, and her visit today reflects the close cooperation and friendship between our peoples and governments. It's no secret that I personally admire the Prime Minister and that we share a common faith in freedom and enterprise. She's a strong and principled leader in the international area.

Today we had a comprehensive and thorough discussion of the issues confronting our countries and the Western alliance. We looked at a number of challenges in a variety of areas, from arms reduction to the Middle East to terrorism. Consistent with the working relationship we've developed these last 6 years, we enjoy a high degree of agreement on the major issues of the day.

One issue we discussed in detail was the status of negotiations with the Soviets on conventional and nuclear arms reductions. These negotiations have been a constant topic of consultation with the alliance. Today the Prime Minister and I reaffirmed the priorities we set out last November at Camp David, priorities the NATO foreign ministers endorsed last month in Reykjavik.

The Prime Minister and I also discussed in some detail the actions that our two countries are taking with respect to the war between Iran and Iraq, particularly our strategic interests in the region, our activities to protect shipping, and our diplomatic activities in the United Nations. Prime Minister Thatcher noted in this connection that the Royal Navy has been providing protection for British ships in the Gulf for some time. Similarly, the United Nations delegations of our two countries are pushing for strong Security Council action. It is time for an immediate end to the Iran-Iraq war, and we believe the United Nations Secretary-General should personally undertake a mission to achieve that end. If either or both of the warring parties refuse the United Nations call for a cessation of the fighting, an arms embargo should be brought to bear on those who reject this chance to end this bloody and senseless conflict.

Today Prime Minister Thatcher and I also reviewed the general prospects for peace in the Middle East, including the proposals for an international conference and the conditions necessary for peace negotiations to be successful.

Our own talks today were highly successful. As I said, it was a pleasure to have the Prime Minister here. I wish her Godspeed as she now continues her journey on to Jamaica this evening, and I look forward to seeing her again soon.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, ladies and gentlemen -- Mr. President, I'm most grateful for your kind words and for your invitation to visit Washington. I very much wanted to come to the United States right at the beginning of my third term to underline once again the absolutely essential importance to us of the United Kingdom-United States relationship. And I'm glad to report that it is as strong and as special today as it has ever been.

Great changes are taking place in the world, including historic changes in the Soviet Union. It's a time of unprecedented opportunity if we are wise and skillful enough to grasp it. Now, more than ever, we need American leadership, and your President is uniquely able to give it and will give it. We must not let slip the tremendous gains of the last few years. America and Europe together can secure that more stable and peaceful world, which has been our hope and our dream, if we face up to the challenges ahead.

Mr. President, our talks today have covered those challenges: our wish to reduce the number of nuclear weapons, always keeping in mind the great preponderance that the Soviet Union enjoys in chemical weapons and conventional forces. We must ensure that the strong defense of the West is preserved at every step. We must watch the strategy, watch the tactics, and watch the presentation.

The Middle East -- where the President and I both see an opportunity to take a major step forward in the peace process and have committed ourselves to work for it. The countries of the region should not have to go on spending such enormous sums on defense rather than on their development. And we must help them take the difficult steps necessary for peace.

And we must continue policies which lead to the economic growth and prosperity which we need in order to meet our own people's ambition for a better life and, at the same time, to provide the resources to help others to raise their standard of living.

The President and I are at one in wanting to see an agreement eliminating intermediate nuclear missiles on a global basis. The main elements are on the table. Effective verification is vital; trust is not enough. Performance has to be checked at every stage. The Soviet Union has massive stockpiles of modern chemical weapons, and we do not. This puts our Armed Forces at a wholly unacceptable disadvantage. The United States and United Kingdom have put forward proposals to eliminate or otherwise deal with this imbalance. The President and I also confirmed the priorities for future arms control negotiations on which we arrived at Camp David last November. We reaffirmed the vital importance of nuclear deterrence in preserving peace.

And second, we discussed the prospect for peace in the Middle East. We agreed -- and here, Mr. President, I use words which we both formally endorsed -- we agreed that direct negotiations between the parties are the only practical way to proceed. We explored how an international conference might contribute to bringing about such negotiations. Clearly, it would not have the right to impose solutions or to veto agreements reached by the parties. And we must continue to make progress in the peace process and commit ourselves to work for that.

And third, we devoted particular attention to the Iran-Iraq war and the Gulf, where we strongly support the proposed Security Council resolution calling for a cease-fire and withdrawal. We hope that it will lead initially to an end to attacks on shipping in the Gulf and, ultimately, to a negotiated end to the conflict. In the meantime, as you said, Mr. President, we are each protecting our own merchant ships and tankers.

And fourth, we agreed on the importance of resisting protectionist measures, in whatever guise, and on the need to reduce agricultural support and protection. No one is blameless, and we will not make progress by casting stones at others. It must be a cooperative effort.

Mr. President, may I thank you once again for your hospitality, for America's friendship and staunch leadership of the West, and for these constructive talks to chart the way ahead. Ladies and gentlemen, thank you. Mr. President, thank you.

In his May 29 report to the Security Council, which I have attached as required by law, the U.N. Secretary General reviewed recent developments in the search for a peaceful Cyprus settlement. He noted his increasing concern over the situation in Cyprus, citing specifically the existing deadlock in efforts to resume negotiations between the parties; distrust between the leaders of the two communities; tensions over Varosha; military build-ups on the island; and the problems facing the U.N. Forces in Cyprus (UNFICYP).

The Secretary General noted that if this trend was to be reversed, it would be essential to find a means of resuming an effective negotiating process. Progress toward that goal, he said, was blocked at present by the conditions the two sides had set for negotiations to take place. While the Turkish Cypriot side insisted that discussions cannot proceed unless the Greek Cypriot side also accepted the Secretary General's March 1986 draft framework agreement, the Greek Cypriot side said that it would not comment on that document until what it termed the basic issues of the Cyprus problem were addressed. The Greek Cypriot side also continued to press for the convening of an international conference, a proposal rejected by the Turkish Cypriot side and the Government of Turkey, and about which Security Council members were also divided.

The Secretary General said in his report that both sides assured him of their readiness to negotiate seriously about the establishment of the federal republic envisaged in their high-level agreements of 1977 and 1979. He also noted his continued belief that his February 1987 proposal for informal discussions, to which the Greek Cypriot side had responded favorably, could help create the conditions for resumption of substantive negotiations. He urged the parties to bear in mind the risk that if they continued to insist on the conditions they had set for negotiations to take place, there would be no realistic prospect of negotiating a settlement of the Cyprus problem.

This situation is also a matter of concern to the United States, which sincerely seeks the achievement of progress toward a negotiated Cyprus settlement. Consequently, we commend the Secretary General's continued efforts with the parties to resume the negotiating process he launched in August 1984 and to build on the progress achieved so as to achieve an overall agreement that would address as an integrated whole all the issues of concern to the parties.

Throughout this period, the United States continued to provide its strong support to the Secretary General's efforts. To this end, we maintained a dialogue with all the concerned parties both on the negotiating process and the situation on the island. In addition, Under Secretary Derwinski visited Turkey and Greece June 2 to 6. While in Athens, he met with President Kyprianou, at the latter's request.

For nearly three decades Captive Nations Week has symbolized the American people's solidarity with all throughout the world who courageously seek freedom and independence from Soviet domination. During this week, we recall that the liberties we enjoy are denied to many by the Soviet empire; and we publicly affirm our admiration for captive nations, who keep the light of freedom burning brightly as they oppose military occupation and brutal totalitarian oppression.

Our Nation offers the world a vision of inalienable political, religious, and economic rights. This vision has always been shared among peoples subjugated by Soviet imperialism; and so has resistance, ever the catalyst of liberty. Today, a struggle that began in Ukraine 70 years ago is taking place throughout the Soviet empire. In the last year alone, people have risen up to demand basic human rights in Czechoslovakia, East Germany, Hungary, Poland, Kazakhstan, Latvia, Moldavia, and among the Crimean Tatars. And across the globe, in Afghanistan, Angola, Cambodia, and Nicaragua, courageous freedom fighters battle tyranny. All captive nations deserve and require our special support. For those seeking to enjoy humanity's birthright of liberty, independence, and justice, we serve as guardians of their dream.

Thus, we must and will continue to speak out on the plight of captive nations. We will continue to call for the speedy release of the persecuted and the falsely imprisoned -- people such as Gunars Astra, Lev Lukyanenko, Mart Niklus, and Viktoras Petkus. So long as brave individuals suffer because of their nationality, faith, and desire for human rights, the United States of America will demand that every signatory of the United Nations Charter and the Helsinki Accords live up to its obligations and respect the principles and spirit of these international agreements.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventeenth day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation Fifty years ago, a milestone in our Nation's artistic history was achieved when ``Snow White and the Seven Dwarfs'' became the first full-length animated feature film, and the movie soundtrack album became the first original soundtrack recording ever released. Since that historic ground-breaking for a new genre in the motion picture art, moviegoers have enjoyed a long and colorful succession of animated films.

As we celebrate the 50th anniversary of the first animated feature-length film, we can be grateful for the art of film animation, which brings to the screen such magic and lasting vitality. We can also be grateful for the contribution that animation has made to producing so many family films during the last half-century -- films embodying the fundamental values of good over evil, courage, and decency that Americans so cherish. Through animation, we have witnessed the wonders of nature, ancient fables, tales of American heroes, and stories of youthful adventure. In recent years, our love for technology and the future has been reflected in computer-generated graphic art and animation.

The achievements in the motion picture art that have followed since the debut of the first feature-length animated film in 1937 have mirrored the artistic development of American culture and the advancement of our Nation's innovation and technology. By recognizing this anniversary, we pay tribute to the triumph of creative genius that has prospered in our free enterprise system as nowhere else in the world. We recognize that, where men and women are free to express their creative talents, there is no limit to their potential achievement.

In recognition of the special place of animation in American film history, the Congress, by House Joint Resolution 122, has authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation calling upon the people of the United States to celebrate the week beginning July 16, 1987, with appropriate observances of the 50th anniversary of the animated feature film.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this eighteenth day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

I am pleased to send to you the annual report of the National Science Foundation (NSF) for Fiscal Year 1986. This report describes research supported by the Foundation in the mathematical, physical, biological, social, behavioral, and information sciences, in engineering, and in education in those fields.

We face international challenges in science, engineering, and technology, but I am confident about our ability to meet those challenges. NSF has been and will remain a key part of the national effort to keep vital our great capabilities in research and productivity and to stay ahead of world competition through innovation and new discoveries.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Dean Burch to be a member of the Board of Trustees of the Barry Goldwater Scholarship and Excellence in Education Foundation for a term of 6 years. This is a new position.

Mr. Bakshian is the author or coauthor of six books. His articles, essays, and reviews on history, politics, humor, and the arts have appeared frequently in major American and overseas publications. He served in the White House as Deputy Assistant to the President and Director of Presidential Speechwriting, 1981 - 1983. Mr. Bakshian also served in the Nixon and Ford administrations.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation For more than three and one-half centuries, Czechs and Czech Americans, through talent, industriousness, and energy, have been compiling a proud record of achievement in our country. All Americans are glad to join our fellow citizens of Czech descent in celebrating this precious and living heritage, as well as the extensive ties between our peoples here and in Europe.

Czechs have long sought liberty and opportunity in the United States, and they have distinguished themselves here in every field of endeavor -- in science, religion, literature, the professions, business, labor, and the armed forces, the arts, government, sports, and countless other fields. Among the first North Americans ever canonized was a Czech American, St. John Nepomucene Neumann, a missionary and later a bishop of Philadelphia in the 19th century. In that century hundreds of thousands of Czechs came to America, seeking freedom and economic opportunity. In this century as well, Czechs have sought freedom in this country from Nazi and Soviet oppression -- most recently from the brutal Soviet-led invasion of Czechoslovakia in 1968.

Connections of Czechs and America flow in both directions. The United States is inextricably linked to the founding of Czechoslovakia. President Woodrow Wilson strongly advocated independence for Czechs and others. The Czechoslovak Declaration of Independence was drafted in Washington, D.C., and the Constitution of the first Czechoslovak Republic was modelled on the United States Constitution, whose bicentennial we observed this year. The great statesman Thomas Masaryk, who married an American, cited the profound influence of the writings of Thomas Jefferson and other American democrats on his own philosophy.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twentieth day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

We can also be grateful indeed for the entire program of Special Olympics. Its comprehensive local as well as national programs foster self-challenge and discovery and help the physically and mentally impaired form a healthy self-image, develop positive interpersonal skills and relationships, and realize all they have to offer. Special Olympics is one of several advances -- along with recent progress in scientific and medical research and increased integration of handicapped and developmentally disabled people into the workplace -- that have led to a dramatic change in public perception of the capabilities of this important segment of our population. That is truly cause for celebration, at this Special Olympiad and always.

The United Nations Security Council has taken an historic step today toward ending the increasingly dangerous conflict between Iran and Iraq. The Security Council's firm action offers a rare opportunity for a reduction of tensions and a just peace in this vital area of the world. We must not let that opportunity slip away. We hope that both countries will comply with the Security Council's cease-fire and withdrawal order. Secretary-General Perez de Cuellar will vigorously renew his mediation effort with the two governments. I have pledged to the Secretary-General that the United States will spare no effort to support this process.

I urge all members of the United Nations to join in using their influence with the belligerents to persuade them to bring an end to this tragic war. None of us can afford continuation of this bloody and destructive conflict, now in its seventh year. Too many have suffered and died already; too many new dangers have been created by the recent escalation and spread of the war. That is why the United States has been so actively seeking peace. That is why there has been unprecedented recent cooperation among the members of the Security Council, cooperation which testifies not only to the increasing gravity of the problem but also to the strength of the international commitment to resolving it.

As we act to help transform the Security Council's mandatory resolution into reality, the United States will also stand by its commitments to the security and stability of its nonbelligerent friends in the region. In doing so, we seek simply to deter growing threats to vital U.S. and international interests and to hasten a just settlement of the Iran-Iraq war. Peace is our objective, not taking sides or provocation.

The administration and the Congress both have examined the situation in the Gulf very closely over the past several weeks. As we move ahead to defend our interests and enhance the chances for peace in that crucial region, it is essential that we try to work together. Not to do so would only undercut our diplomatic efforts, embolden our adversaries, and cast grave doubts upon the ability of the United States to conduct its foreign policy effectively and honor its commitments.

I appreciate your presence here today and deeply appreciate all that many of you have been doing to ensure that our countrymen continue to enjoy the richness and beauty of America. There's a story I like to tell, and I've told it an awful lot of times, but I hope I haven't told it to any of you.

It has to do with an old farmer who picked up some creek-bottom land. It was all covered with rocks and overgrown with brush, but he set to work. And he hauled the rocks away, and he cleaned the brush. And he cultivated, and he fertilized, and he planted. And he had a garden spot. And one day at church, he asked the preacher if he wouldn't, after church, come on out and see what he'd done.

Well, today we're honoring praiseworthy citizens who are giving God a hand in preserving our precious gifts. Unlike the farmer in the story, more often than not, those we honor today are protecting our land from some of mankind's more wasteful and destructive ways. Some of America's greatest assets are, of course, the parks, national forests, and other public lands that have been set aside for the benefit and enjoyment of our people and for future generations. When one thinks of America, one thinks of purple mountain majesties, of bald eagles, of natural beauty, and of great halls where our ancestors gathered to lay the foundations of our democracy.

We take pride in our freedom, and we also take pride in the natural grandeur of our land. And there's much to be proud of. We have in our country the world's first and best national park system, national forests and wildlife refuges, an extraordinary urban park system, and preserved historic sites. And all this is the legacy of caring individuals, perhaps like the ones we honor today, who acted to see that these treasures were preserved and passed on. Our administration has been solidly committed to the restoration and maintenance of this inheritance. In the past 6 1/2 years, we've spent $1 billion to restore our national parks, which had been permitted to fall in some disrepair over a period of time. In the past 6 1/2 years, as I say, we've done that, and we've strictly upheld laws protecting our endangered species and have vigorously pursued plans to recover them. We've moved to stem the serious loss of vital wetlands, and we've set aside millions of acres of wilderness, created 29 new wildlife refuges, and protected thousands of miles of scenic rivers and trails.

One of the hallmarks of our administration has been the concerted effort we've made to mobilize the American people, to get them involved in helping each other and in community building projects instead of just waiting for government. We call it our private sector initiatives program. When Secretary Hodel came to me with the idea of a Take Pride in America campaign, I thought it was terrific. If we really rely -- or totally rely on government, whether in conserving our public lands or in any other worthy endeavors, the job is not going to get done. Public land managers have a tough assignment, and they take their responsibility seriously, yet I'm certain they will verify that there can be no greater boon to the conservation and preservation of America's national treasures than the active involvement of the American people. This is what the Take Pride in America campaign is all about.

It was some 20 years ago when Lady Bird Johnson first brought this issue to the American people. We owe her a debt of gratitude, and I think we can show her our appreciation under this campaign. Today we recognize individuals and organizations who are doers, who are protecting what belongs to all Americans.

I want to thank our celebrities and each and every one of you for the role that you are playing. I know the Ad Council has given time to send the word over the airwaves and across the country, and they deserve a special thanks. And so, too, do Secretaries Bennett, Hodel, and Lyng who -- well, they, too, have given us inspiring and energetic leadership.

They've been selected from over 500 nominees. Let me suggest, however, that all those who contribute their time and effort are winners. And clearly, our country is the greatest winner of all. And this is the first time this award ceremony, or a part of it, has been held here at the White House. I think it underscores how important we feel this issue is. And our citizens need to know that they can and should make a difference. Could I ask the 38 award winners to stand? [Applause] And that's what the rest of us will do, is applaud you. You have made a difference, and we do all applaud you.

Addington most recently served as the minority chief counsel of the Committee on Foreign Affairs of the House of Representatives. He served previously as an Assistant General Counsel at the Central Intelligence Agency and as counsel to the Subcommittee on Legislation of the Permanent Select Committee on Intelligence of the House of Representatives.

President today announced the creation of a new interagency advisory board dedicated to the administration's welfare reform initiative. The action is designed to enhance coordination of Federal public assistance programs and policies that now cut across department lines and to create a focal point for intergovernmental coordination. The Interagency Low Income Opportunity Advisory Board will provide a focal point within the Federal Government for developing and coordinating new policies to aid low income individuals and families and for facilitating implementation of those policies.

Board Chairman will be Charles D. Hobbs, Assistant to the President, and it will include representatives of the following agencies: the Office of Management and Budget, and the Departments of Agriculture, Health and Human Services, Housing and Urban Development, Justice, Labor, and Interior. Other members may be designated by the President from time to time. When the Board considers a program for which any other executive department or agency has responsibility, that department or agency will have representation on the Board for that purpose.

Chairman will advise the President with respect to the system of Federal public assistance programs, activities, and related matters and will recommend to the President policies and guidelines pertaining to public assistance matters for all related programs within the executive branch. He will, in addition, review policy alternatives with outside groups -- especially multiprogram reform concepts or proposals of the States -- and with executive departments and agencies, the heads of which have been instructed, to the extent permitted by law, to cooperate with the Chairman in carrying out his functions. He will also monitor the implementation of public assistance policies.

Union Address to Congress on January 27, 1987, when he asked Congress to approve a major new national strategy to reform America's flawed welfare system. The first step toward the reform envisioned by the President is the establishment of widespread, long-term experimentation in welfare reform through community-based and State-sponsored demonstration projects. The creation of an interagency policy forum devoted to this purpose will provide a means of integrating the many disparate Federal public assistance programs and policies that have the common purpose of alleviating poverty.

I remain willing to work with the Congress on a more acceptable bill and will reserve final judgment until action is completed on the trade legislation. But any bill that raises the cost of living for American families and reduces the ability of American business to compete in the world economy goes in exactly the wrong direction.

Each year, we set aside a special week to salute the many contributions of minority business men and women to our Nation's economic well-being and to celebrate the free market that makes these contributions possible. Our observance of Minority Enterprise Development Week this year, during the Bicentennial of the Constitution, summons us to reflect on the debt every business man and woman -- and each of us -- owes to the fundamental principles of freedom and justice guaranteed by this great charter.

By creating a limited form of government, our Constitution protects the inalienable rights of all Americans and ensures equal opportunity for all. Our free market economy springs from these principles. The equality of opportunity it creates makes our Nation prosperous, expands our technological prowess, and keeps our country economically competitive. The more than 840,000 minority American entrepreneurs exemplify the success our economic freedom offers. These energetic business men and women inspire all Americans as they create jobs, bring new products and services to the marketplace, and enhance our quality of life.

Constitution and the laws of the United States, do hereby proclaim the week of October 4 through October 10, 1987, as Minority Enterprise Development Week. I call upon all Americans to join together with minority business enterprises across our country in appropriate observances.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-second day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Well, thank you all, and welcome to the Old Executive Office Building. We have officials here today representing States from Maine to California, and I want to thank you all for taking the time out from your busy schedules to join us. But, Governor Orr, ladies and gentlemen, I have to tell you that wherever Americans from different States -- or whenever -- get together, I always find myself enjoying the sense of diversity and the different outlooks, different approaches to problems, and even different accents.

But this diversity is important, because it's one of our chief strengths as a nation. And from the first, our administration has worked to restore federalism to its rightful place at the very heart of our system of government. We shifted certain programs from Federal to State management. We reduced a large number of complicated programs involving State and local governments into a much smaller number of block grants. And today we're still working to give greater power and independence to State and local governments. As part of our effort to achieve welfare reform, earlier this week I established an Interagency Low Income Opportunity Advisory Board. And this Board will help to coordinate existing waiver authority, providing what might be called one-stop shopping for State officials seeking to try local solutions to welfare problems.

Relief, chaired by the Vice President, made its recommendations on the use of alternative fuels, such as methanol, ethanol, and compressed natural gas. This may sound like a technical issue, but it has dramatic implications for virtually every aspect of American life. You see, used correctly, these fuels can reduce pollution significantly, and the Task Force recommendations would allow States to include alternative fuels as a central part of their air quality attainment plans, if they so choose. This would prove crucial in helping a number of States avoid nonattainment sanctions and the imposition of other, more costly and intrusive regulatory burdens.

Perhaps the most significant step we've taken to return power to the State and local governments has been our effort to limit the growth of the central government here in Washington. Now, it's true that in the early days many of you faced difficulties as we cut back Federal financing of some State and local affairs. But since then, we've seen 55 months of economic expansion: inflation and interest rates down, the stock and bond markets up, over 13 million jobs created, and unemployment at the lowest level in just about 8 years. From your point of view, it's especially important to note that this expansion has put State and local governments in good economic shape. It's economic growth, more than anything else -- more than Federal grants and programs -- that is required to keep the finances of State and local governments healthy. Even in the large cities that demand special attention from so many of you, a study last year by the Urban Institute concluded that budgets are, by and large, in good condition. Indeed, the study found that as early as the end of 1982 America's major cities were financially better off than they had been at any time during the 1970's.

Well, as we've limited government here in Washington, you in State and local governments have been taking the lead on issue after issue. In Governor Orr's Indiana, we've seen merit pay for State employees. We've seen the teacher career ladder in Tennessee. We've seen job programs in Oregon, New Hampshire, Illinois, and elsewhere. And we've seen tax incentives used to promote economic growth in programs like Pennsylvania's economic revitalization tax credit. At last, power has stopped flowing to Washington and begun to flow back where it belongs: to you, in your State and local governments. In the words of the Christian Science Monitor: ``Decentralization of power could be one of the most long-lasting effects of the Reagan Presidency.'' If I'd ad-libbed that instead of quoting that I would let my name out, but -- [laughter].

This brings me to the reason I asked you here today, and that is our Economic Bill of Rights. You see, today all the accomplishments of these past 6\1/2\ years -- the economic expansion, the shift of power away from Washington and back to State and local governments -- all these are threatened. For make no mistake, there are those in Congress who would impose tax hikes and fatten the Federal budget still more, weakening the economy and gathering ever greater power to the banks of the Potomac.

Economic Bill of Rights would prevent this, putting in place constitutional and other changes that would make the accomplishments of these past 6\1/2\ years secure, for our own time and generations to come. More than that, the Economic Bill of Rights would affect each of you directly, giving you still greater scope for taking the initiatives so important to the American people at the State and local level.

Economic Bill of Rights itself has 10 points, and I know that Ken Cribb has gone over these in some detail for you. But there are two areas in particular that I'd like to draw to your attention. First, the burden of government shall not be hidden from view. The Congress shall require that a financial impact statement accompany each bill, specifying the effect on economic growth and employment. Second, there will be truth in Federal spending. At last, Congress will specify how every single new program is to be paid for.

I've said, these two points bear directly upon your work as State and local officials, for as I pointed out when I spoke to the National Association of Counties last week in Indiana, in recent years Congress hasn't been satisfied with just spending hundreds of billions of dollars of Federal funds. Congress has wanted to spend still more money, including the funds of State and local governments. And you all know only too well how it works. The Federal Government appropriates millions for this or that program, then mandates that your States or local governments participate in the program by spending millions of your own dollars or by complying with certain national standards to avoid the loss of Federal funds. Well, whatever the fancy technical explanation, what it comes down to is the Federal Government spending your money for you.

Our proposals would change all that. Under legislation that we'll submit shortly, whenever Congress considered bills that would impose costs on State and local governments, a statement of those costs would appear in the bill itself, not buried in some obscure committee report. Still more significant, Congress would be required to state where it expects needed State and local funds to come from, not leave you to try to explain to your constituents why you're forced to raise taxes because of something that happened in Washington. These simple measures would force the Federal Government to stop treating you like bureaucrats whose job it is to do Washington's business and start treating you with the respect that is the simple right of democratically elected officials playing a central role in the American way of government.

I just have to believe that if we get away from Washington and out to the State and local levels where you live and work, that if we ask the American people whether it isn't time at last to do things like pass a balanced budget amendment, the American people will say yes. My friends, there is still a thing called common sense in America. You know, I can't help but point out to you -- maybe I don't need to remind you -- but back, oh, before all this great increase in the Federal Government's power began, born of the Great Depression, the total tax dollar in United States -- Federal, State, and local -- two-thirds of it was for State and local governments, and only one-third for the Federal Government. That's just about been reversed. You're now on the short end of the stick at the State and local level.

As a matter of fact, I remember a President ran for election in 1932 on the platform that he would cut Federal spending by 25 percent, that he would restore to States and local communities the authority and autonomy that had been unjustly seized by the Federal Government. Well, that's our program now. Didn't seem to work out back then. Matter of fact, it seemed to be reversed. But this is what we believe in: federalism. That is the great, unique thing that gives this country its hold on freedom and everything else.

Well, don't you let that happen. And we're not going to let it happen as long as we can fight back and get it back to the federalism the way it's supposed to be. Sooner or later, that common sense I mentioned has a way of making itself felt, even in Washington. For the cause of fiscal reform, I think these are very exciting days ahead. And, again, I just want to thank you all for being here and letting me get this off my chest to you. And if we all stick together, it's going to have to happen in spite of some objection from Capitol Hill. [Applause] Thank you all very much.

Somebody brought a speech in to my desk last night, and it was one that I'd made in 1964, before I ever thought I would be in public life. But I was out traveling the mashed potato circuit -- you know, in Hollywood, if you don't sing or dance, you wind up as an after dinner speaker. [Laughter] And I was pretty interested, I had kind of forgotten about this. In those days I'd prepare my own words I was going to speak. But I saw one that was criticizing the Federal Government in that speech. And one little incident you might enjoy.

I had found an actual incident of a man in Washington who sat at a desk, and his job was receiving papers that came from various areas, reading them and seeing where they were supposed to go, initialing them and sending them on to the proper department and agency. And then one day he got a paper, he did that, he sent it on. And 24 hours later it came back to him. It was a classified paper -- says, ``You weren't supposed to read this. Erase your initials, and initial the erasure.'' [Laughter] Well, we'll get things like that all stopped one of these days.

Secretary Gorbachev, in an interview published today, indicated that the Soviet Union is now prepared to agree to eliminate all longer range INF missiles, including the 100 warheads that they have previously insisted on keeping. We welcome reports of Soviet acceptance of the President's proposal for the global elimination of U.S. and Soviet longer range INF missiles, initially made in November of 1981. Such an agreement, if achieved, would result in the complete global elimination of this class of missiles. This would substantially reduce the Soviet nuclear threat to both Europe and Asia. It would facilitate verification as well.

General Secretary also indicated that he is prepared to agree to the elimination of shorter range INF missiles. With the strong support of our allies, we made such a proposal in Geneva on June 16, which would eliminate U.S. and Soviet SRINF missiles on a global basis. We have seen statements of positive Soviet response before, only to later discover unacceptable conditions. We therefore look forward to seeing their official statement at the Geneva negotiations. Our delegation is prepared to work constructively there to reach an effectively verifiable agreement.

We believe now is the time for progress in reducing strategic offensive weapons, as well. Our START delegation looks forward to prompt tabling of a Soviet draft treaty to match the one we have tabled more than 10 weeks ago, so we can get down to work on this subject as well.

In approving this measure, I must note concern about the appointment of members of both the National Board and the local boards. If read literally, the measure could be interpreted as requiring the Director of FEMA to appoint to the National Board any individual nominated by one of six private organizations.

Any such construction would raise serious questions as to whether the bill violates the appointments clause of the Constitution. Moreover, if the organizations' recommendations are not deemed advisory, further constitutional questions could be raised under the establishment clause with respect to appointment of both the National Board and the local boards, because four of the six organizations are affiliated with religious organizations. In order to avoid these constitutional infirmities, I have signed the bill with the understanding that the nominations made by the private organizations under H.R.

The Commission's 13 members are drawn from a wide range of backgrounds and points of view. They bring together expertise in scientific investigation, medical care and its costs, public health, private research, and both State and National Government, as well as in fields that deal with the many issues of ethics, law, and behavior involved in the AIDS epidemic.

Commission will proceed under the leadership of Dr. Eugene Mayberry, the chief executive officer of the Mayo Clinic. The President has asked Dr. Mayberry to move quickly, and the Commission will deliver its first report to the President within 90 days. It will produce a final report within a year. The President believes that the spread of AIDS is a cause of deep concern, but not panic. If Americans work together with common sense and common purpose, the President believes we will, in the end, defeat this common threat.

Thank you all very much, and welcome to the White House. And since I understand that you've been in here for a couple of hours -- [laughter] -- you will bless me when you go out and find out that we refused to have this this morning in the Rose Garden. [Laughter] It's a little warm.

Well, on my desk in the Oval Office, there sits a plaque that says, ``It can be done.'' It's a belief that I deeply hold true. And there's no community, no problem, no individual that cannot be helped through private sector initiative.

When individuals and organizations are willing to get involved, there's no limit to the good that can be done. It's a tradition as old as our country, that in America neighbors help neighbors. You here today are proof that this great American tradition lives on. The problems and challenges you've addressed are diverse; the solutions all share a common foundation: that of one man or woman reaching out to another.

When floods ravaged communities around Chicago, it was volunteers from the private sector who sat on battered boxes and listened to the tales of grief and helped the healing process and future begin. Their employer made it possible for this act of kindness to take place, releasing their employees from work and organizing efforts to aid those in need with cleanup assistance, replacement of household goods, and daily meals for over 1,400.

When it comes to the fight against drug abuse, the American Association of Advertising Agencies estimates that 9 out of 10 Americans over the age of 12 will be exposed to at least one of their many antidrug campaigns. The association has mobilized the creative resources of over 300 advertising agencies and multiple trade unions -- as they put it -- denormalize drug use over the next 3 years.

Angeles there's a group called Share that's close to Nancy's and my heart. Each year the members of Share -- women in the entertainment community, including stars like Lucille Ball, Carol Burnett, and others -- put on a wonderful show to raise funds for mentally retarded children. Share has been so successful that, just this year, the organization has been able to fund a new wing at the Cedars-Sinai Medical Center in Los Angeles -- a wing devoted to research on retardation.

And now that may be changing. It is changing, in fact. Last November the first International Conference on Private Sector Initiatives was held in Paris, France, and they had asked us if we would participate and tell them how it worked. And while I was in Venice just several weeks ago for the economic summit, I attended an Italian-American Conference on Private Sector Initiatives. And standing at a podium like this, I looked out and saw a few friendly faces from our own country who were there for that particular meeting. The Italian national task force, formed as a result of that conference, met 2 days ago in Italy to develop their own plan of action.

President's Citation Program for Private Sector Initiatives to recognize and showcase outstanding examples of community involvement. And the backbone of that program is the C-Flag -- the flag by which good-neighbor organizations can be identified. And people still ask what does the ``C'' stand for? Well, it stands for commitment, a commitment to respond to the needs of others. This year over 3,500 organizations proudly fly the C-Flag with its slogan, ``We can, we care.'' And today I'm proud to be here with the 100 winners of the Private Sector Initiatives Citation for 1987 and to bestow this crystal tetrahedron to the 30 top programs. I especially want to thank Bill Taylor of the American Society of Association Executives for all of the help his organization gives in administering this program. You do a fine job, Bill.

I thank you all very much. As you know, generally, when I talk to a group like this, I open with a joke or two to put all of us at ease and get things rolling, and I hope you'll forgive me if I skip that today. I've just come from the ward you have here for children who have AIDS. And let me just make a promise to those children and all others who have contracted this disease: We will -- I will do all that God gives us the power to do to find a cure for AIDS. We'll not stop, we'll not rest, until we've sent AIDS the way of smallpox and polio.

Those are words of resolve, and now I'd like to add a few words of hope. One of the amazing stories of modern medicine is the progress that we've already made against AIDS. I know this is old news to you in this room. So many of the breakthroughs were achieved right here in this building. But for our friends in the press, I thought I should put the speed of progress in perspective. Just think that the day I was sworn in as President we didn't even know that AIDS existed. It wasn't until 5 months later that the disease was discovered. But only 3 years after that, in a laboratory on this campus, Dr. Robert Gallo isolated the AIDS virus. This was, of course, at about the same time, as is often the case, similar work was being done by Dr. Luc Montagnier at the Pasteur Institute in Paris. Within a year, a blood test was available.

And now a treatment drug, AZT, is also on the market -- also developed here in this building by Dr. Sam Broder, whom I met earlier this afternoon. Dr. Broder told me, by the way, that more progress is coming. He mentioned work on a number of new and promising drugs for treating AIDS. And I understand that a vaccine will soon go into testing.

As these drugs and vaccines come along, I'm determined that redtape will not keep them away from those in need. We will make certain that they get the same kind of accelerated review from the Food and Drug Administration that got the AZT application approved in only 4 months -- record time.

I know that everyone here understands how dazzling the progress against AIDS has been. It took 40 years of study to learn as much about polio. It took 19 years to develop a vaccine against hepatitis B. To keep up the momentum, this year the Federal Government will spend $317 million on AIDS research and development and $845 million overall, and next year we'll spend 30 percent more on research and $1.26 billion overall. Spending on AIDS has been one of the fastest growing areas of the Federal budget. The limits on research progress today are not the limits of spending but of the scientific process itself. Growing cultures, monitoring the spread of infection, conducting tests -- all of this takes time.

Today we're taking another big step against AIDS. This morning at the White House we announced the members of the Presidential Commission on the Human Immunodeficiency Virus Epidemic. Dr. Eugene Mayberry, the chief executive officer of the Mayo Clinic, is Chairman of the Commission, the members of which are drawn from a wide range of backgrounds and points of view. And I say Dr.

What we need right now in the battle against AIDS is a good strong dose of common sense. It seems to me common sense to recognize that, when it comes to stopping the spread of AIDS, medicine and morality teach the same lessons. It's also common sense that ignorance about the extent of the spread of AIDS won't help anyone -- those who have it, those who might get it, those who are looking for ways of preventing its spread. This is why I called recently for certain kinds of testing. I hope the Commission will help us all put aside our suspicions and work together with common sense against this common threat.

I wish I could say that the vast amounts of money and effort that we're putting into AIDS research will give us a cure in a week or a year or by an absolutely certain date. The truth is, none of us knows for certain just when a cure will come. It might not be until the late 1990's. It might not be until later. That's why prevention and treatment are so important now. But in the spirit of hope, let's not forget, a cure might possibly arrive much sooner.

A few weeks ago I was reading about another field of astonishingly rapid scientific progress -- not in medicine but in physics. Despite all the advances of the last year, in what has become known as the phenomenon of superconductivity, one problem was said to be years from solving: that of finding material that could handle what I, as a layman, would call large amounts of electricity. Well, the next week, another report appeared announcing that the problem had been solved. What some said would be years in coming happened just one week later. I don't know if the day will come when such progress will be in the cards for AIDS research, but that's my hope. And after the visit to the ward today and after the death by AIDS of friends and former associates, this is my prayer: One way or another, whether by breakthrough or steady progress, we will beat this disease.

I was listening to the panel and going on a tour today, I couldn't help remembering something that W.H. Auden said, that the true men of action in our times are not politicians or statesmen but scientists. Dr. Mayberry and the Commission will be working with you and many others to chart the Nation's course against this disease. I believe that when the medical history of our times is written you and they will go down as among our greatest men and women of action.

President of a joint resolution they expect to be passed soon expressing full support for General Vessey's mission and calling upon the Vietnamese to respond positively on the POW-MIA issue. The President is grateful for the strong bipartisan support of our policy on this issue.

Thank you, and thank you, Ambassador Dobriansky. I want to express my deep appreciation to the Ukrainian Catholic Church for permitting us to use this shrine. And let us look forward to the day when Ukrainian Catholics and members of the Ukrainian Orthodox Church will again be free to gather and worship in churches like this in their own homeland.

There are indications of change coming from the Soviet Union, and those are welcomed. But we should not and cannot turn our attention away from those who look toward the day there is improvement in human rights and basic freedoms.

Today we come together to declare again our solidarity with those whose nations have been captured by communism. This commemoration is in keeping with the vision of our Founding Fathers, who saw our new land as an inspiration to all mankind, a bastion of freedom, and a shining beacon of hope for all the world's oppressed. And that's what America is all about, and together, we intend to keep her that way.

A member of my staff recently brought to my attention a document that reflects this traditional American commitment to the universality of human freedom. The document concerns Governor Lazlo Kossuth, one of the leaders of the Hungarian revolution of 1848, an uprising that, except for the brutal intercession of Russian troops, would have allowed the Hungarian Nation to move toward liberty and independence.

I wish we had a few of 'em with us so they could pay a little visit to Capitol Hill the next time Congress is about to vote on support for the freedom fighters. Clearly, there is still a noninterventionist sentiment in the United States, although it's tempered by an understanding that our country cannot live in isolation, as we did before World War II, and that the free people of the world look to us for leadership.

Our global commitment to freedom does not mandate the sending of arms or troops, but at the very least it means that any people whose liberty is denied or whose independence is violated -- that these people know we Americans are on their side.

We are the keepers of the flame. It's up to us to foster the legacy of those who came before us and to ensure America remains a champion of liberty and a force for good in the world. I want to take this opportunity to thank each of you for what you have done and are doing in this regard. Many of you've contributed much time, effort, and resources to this cause. I hesitate to mention any names, because there are so many here who've done so much. Those who suffer under Communist oppression may not know our names, just as we don't know the names of every American who attended that Springfield town hall meeting back in 1852. Nevertheless, those behind the barbed wire, those who are separated from us by the killing zones and watch towers, realize they have unnamed friends in distant lands, people who care deeply about them and people who are uncompromising in the fight against the tyranny that enslaves so much of mankind.

Today we're being told that there are historic changes taking place in the Soviet Union, that the leadership is now pushing for openness and democratization. Well, last month when I was in Berlin, I called on Soviet leader Gorbachev to prove to the world that his glasnost campaign is more than words. I challenged him to tear down the Berlin Wall and to open the Brandenburg Gate. I renew that challenge today and expand it to include opening up those countries that are now under the domination of the Soviet Union or its Leninist proteges, from the Baltic States through Bulgaria, from Vietnam to Ethiopia.

If the leadership of the Soviet Union desires a new relationship with the West, it can start by establishing a new relationship with its neighbors and allies. Let us hear that the so-called Brezhnev doctrine is no longer policy; it is null and void. Let the Kremlin announce -- or renounce the use of force as a means of imposing on any people a form of government they do not choose or of preventing the captive nations from freeing themselves. At home and throughout the Soviet bloc, open up the gates, tear down the walls, let the political prisoners go. We can have a peaceful world. We can spend less on weapons. We can have more cooperation. And make no mistake, the improvement of freedom and human rights is essential to progress between East and West.

Petro Ruban, for example, is a prisoner in special regimen labor camp number 36 - 1, one of the most notorious of the Soviet gulags. In 1976 he fashioned a wooden replica of the Statue of Liberty and for that was taken away. Later, he was arrested again for criticizing the invasion of Afghanistan. Well, free Petro and the others in the gulag and respect people's fundamental human rights.

The free people of the West are also looking closely at what the Soviet Union is doing in the Third World and in regional conflicts. In Afghanistan and Angola brutal puppet regimes are being propped up by Soviet and Cuban troops. For some time now, we've heard words about the movement toward peace, especially in Afghanistan. But if Moscow wants reconciliation, why do Soviet aircraft still bomb villages in Afghanistan? Ground your helicopter gunships, take your troops home, and let the people of Afghanistan solve their own problems.

Thank you. I predict the increased awareness of the American people, as you've shown here just now, will permit us to continue providing weapons and support to those brave individuals who are struggling for the right to choose freedom, and not to continue a Communist dictatorship in their native Nicaragua. Our own security and the cause of human freedom are inseparably linked in Central America. The threat is too close to home to ignore or to be deluded by wishful thinking. It's too close to home to tolerate an on-again-off-again, vacillating congressional policy toward that region.

Thank you. You just made my day! [Laughter] I'd just like to leave with you one thought: I think America is heading into one of the greatest periods in its history. Yes, we have our differences, and at times politics can get pretty rough. Democracy is not for weak spirits. Whatever problems we have, whatever differences we have, however, are minor compared to those of our adversaries. Freedom is now on the offensive. We turned a corner in 1981, and if we have courage and are realistic in our approach to world affairs, freedom will not only survive, it will triumph.

Furthermore, our economy is strong, and our young people are filled with energy, creativity, and optimism. I don't mind telling you that what we've got today in those young people are the best darn bunch of kids we've ever had. A general once said that about another generation. He used a word that I didn't feel in my position I could use. So, they are the best darn -- [laughter].

I see in America today is that same character and spirit, that same love of freedom, that was evident back in that town hall meeting in Springfield in 1852. The final resolution from that town hall meeting contained the following section: ``The sympathies of this country and the benefits of its position should be exerted in favor of the people of every nation struggling to be free.'' As I say, now it's up to us. Thank you. God bless you all.

The President. It's with great pleasure that I today announce my intention to nominate Judge William Steele Sessions to be Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. Judge Sessions is well recognized as a man of great personal integrity and honor, dedicated to the vigorous enforcement of the criminal laws of our country and to the evenhanded administration of justice. I'm happy to be able to draw upon the talents of a person with such extensive experience, both on the bench and as a prosecutor, to lead the FBI in our fight against crime.

Sessions has established himself as a fairminded, tough prosecutor and one of the finest Federal judges on the bench today. He's committed to protecting the rights of all Americans under the Constitution. He understands and has demonstrated unwavering dedication to constitutional principles in securing protection of the lives, the property, and the homes of our citizens, not only with respect to those who violate our laws but with respect to those who are charged with the responsibility of enforcing our laws.

Under Judge Sessions' leadership, I'm confident that the FBI will continue its impressive tradition as one of the finest law enforcement agencies in the world, unmatched in integrity, commitment, and skill.

Sessions. Mr. President, I thank you for reposing the confidence in me to become the Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation. I look forward to trying to maintain the high standards that Judge Webster has provided for leadership in the Bureau, to working with Attorney General Meese as Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and I'm grateful to you, sir. Thank you.

I issued further implementing instructions. The Executive Order is one aspect of my continuing commitment to improve educational opportunities for all Americans and particularly for the poor and minorities. The enrollment of minorities in postsecondary education is key to their personal economic success and to the growth of the American economy.

I direct the Secretary of Education to conduct a thorough study of the factors that affect minority postsecondary enrollment, both financial and nonfinancial, and provide the results to me and to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget no later than June 1, 1988.

Pending completion of the study, I direct the Secretary of Education to provide to me and to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget by September 30, 1987, his recommendations for more immediate activities that can help address minority postsecondary enrollment. These recommendations should be developed in consultation with other involved agencies.

We have made significant progress in implementing the Executive Order, and I look forward to significant further strides forward in this matter. Educational opportunities for qualified minority students are vital to our Nation's future.

Americans use well over 100 billion gallons of water every day; the water that sustains and nourishes us must be safe, and agriculture and industry alike require clean water. Because clean water is the basis of life for myriad species of animals, clean rivers, streams, lakes, estuaries, and oceans are essential.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-fourth day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Few tragedies hurt American families more than catastrophic illness among our elderly. First, there's the human and emotional cost of caring for a loved one who's severely ill; and then there's the financial cost, one that can frequently wipe out the hard work and savings of a lifetime. It was to do something about this tragedy that I proposed legislation earlier this year that would provide catastrophic health insurance for our elderly.

It's a responsible program that would limit annual personal expenses for Medicare acute care services to $2,000. Beyond that point, Medicare would pay for unlimited physician care and time in the hospital. The cost would be under $6 a month, or $70 next year, in Medicare premiums. Although the premiums, as the years go by, would rise to keep pace with program costs, they would remain affordable. Here then was a sound program that would take care of the national tragedy of catastrophic illness among the elderly. A program, too, that would be financially sound and not jeopardize the solvency of the basic Medicare system.

I submitted it to Congress. Unfortunately, this sound, reasonable program has been converted into a massive program that will impose a new tax on the elderly and soon threaten to bankrupt the Medicare trust fund. On Wednesday, the House of Representatives rejected a Republican-sponsored plan based on my proposal.

Put another way, a Medicare recipient with monthly income as low as $1,200 could have his or her income tax increased by $580 per year. But even this huge increase in taxes on the elderly isn't enough to finance the program. By 1995, the costs will be so great they will threaten the entire Medicare trust fund.

So, in summary, here's the situation: I promised Americans a plan that would protect you in your retirement years from financial devastation brought on by a catastrophic illness requiring prolonged hospitalization and medical care. I fulfilled that promise and in return the Democratic House more than tripled the costs, increased tax rates for virtually all elderly taxpayers, expanded the program so much that in about 15 years it will run a $20 billion deficit and threaten the solvency of the entire Medicare trust fund. And to top it off, Congress would have the elderly begin paying a year before starting the full plan.

I know all of this is upsetting, but let me stress that I don't think there's cause for pessimism. As perhaps most of you know, I've been out around the country lately, and everywhere I go I hear protests from people like you about the ways of Capitol Hill. I think the American people are doing a slow burn over Congress' failure to face up responsibly to the problems. And I think the public's temperature is going to rise even higher when it understands that Congress has been trifling with a plan to provide elderly Americans with insurance against catastrophic illness -- a plan that can work without taxing the elderly into servitude.

As we move along throughout the summer and the start of next year, these issues will come increasingly into focus. I think it's then that a lot of Representatives will start realizing that Americans like you are disturbed by Congress' ways. But the health plan is not just another pork-barrel project we're arguing over. This is a fight about protecting the health of our senior citizens -- come to think of it, citizens like me. And doing it in a way that doesn't bankrupt the elderly in the process.

So, be sure to tell your Representatives and Senators that you support the administration plan, not the high-taxing substitute for catastrophic health insurance. America's living conditions and health delivery systems have come a long way in the last half century. Let's keep that progress going, and let's do it in a fiscally sound way that protects our elderly citizens and their families from the tragedy of catastrophic illness.

Secretary Malcolm Baldrige. An experienced businessman and respected community leader, he was a talented and dedicated public servant who sought nothing more than to make a contribution to America. And indeed he did.

He was a loyal member of the Cabinet, whose common sense, wisdom, and counsel I relied on often and deeply valued. Mac and I shared a special affinity for the West, and I will greatly miss his friendship.

But actually, it's what each of you are doing to make Wisconsin famous that brought me here today. Broan Company is a success story: a growing business with quality products, a company with good management and with employees who care because they have a say in how things happen here. I've heard how your award-winning employee suggestion program has resulted in more than $1,200,000 in savings.

It's just one more reason that you're an example of what's known in Europe as America's economic miracle. You don't know what it means to go over there to those economic summits anymore and have those leaders of other countries use that term. I didn't invent it. They wanted to ask me and talk about the American miracle. Well, the miracle has brought down inflation, it's pushed up family income, and it's created over 13 million new jobs.

And all this is a credit to you. Nobody works as hard as the American worker. And forgive my pride, but when given half a chance American business and labor can outcompete any country or people in the world. But your success here is also a credit to the American electorate -- of which you're a part -- because they made it possible for your hard work to pay off when they said no to policies that led to double-digit inflation, growing unemployment, and booming interest rates. Yet even though the people spoke emphatically at the polls, it was tough to turn things around in Washington. Believe me, when it comes to spending your tax dollars, the Congress, like Oscar Wilde, can resist everything but temptation.

But turn it around we did: We cut taxes, we simplified taxes, we reformed taxes. And let me make sure that when I use the term, ``Congress,'' I'm talking about a part of the Congress because we have had the help in what we're trying to do of Senator Kasten and Congressman Sensenbrenner, and also now, your good Governor.

Now, some of you know I'm crisscrossing the country to fight these dangerous trends on Capitol Hill. I've been campaigning not only to hold on to the progress that we've made and keep our prosperity growing but to institute permanent reforms -- something called an Economic Bill of Rights -- that would protect you and your children from future encroachments of government. One of the most dangerous inclinations of human nature, Thomas Jefferson once said, is appropriating wealth produced by the labor of others rather than producing it by one's own labor. He said government was the usual vehicle for this abuse. And as he put it: The stronger the government, the weaker the producer. And he added: The natural progress of things is for liberty to yield and government to gain ground.

And that's why I'm out pushing our Economic Bill of Rights. We want to protect you -- the producers, the taxpayers -- by reforming the way future Congresses spend your money and raise your taxes. We want to put permanent checks and balances like a balanced budget amendment, line-item veto -- which your government has -- and truth-in-spending legislation on government's inevitable tendency to confiscate more and more of your take-home pay. [Applause] You are right; it's time to cut the Federal budget, not the family budget.

I've got to tell you, my decision to take our case to the people has gotten some of the seers and sayers back in Washington upset. They keep telling me that I'm just walking down a fruitless political path, that the people don't care, and that I'd better let Congress conduct our finances. But, you know, I have been all across the country lately, and I think an overwhelming number of Americans are against more taxes and spending. And all these warnings from the big spenders saying the people don't care just ring hollow to me.

I reject a potted-plant Presidency. I'm here to do a job, and when the Congress spends too much money or tries to raise taxes or passes trade legislation that will hurt American workers, you can bet I'm going to be out here asking you, the people, for your hands and your hearts and your help.

I also say it's a President's job to warn Americans and American workers about trade legislation that could lead to foreign retaliation -- retaliation that will cut off foreign markets, shut down plants, and as I said, destroy jobs here at home. We tried that once way back in the depths of the Great Depression, and we only spread depression around the world. Right now the House and the Senate have passed trade bills that are dangerous to economic growth.

And I'm here to tell you today: Under the guise of protectionism, those bills threaten the jobs and livelihood of American workers, and that's why I'm prepared to veto this legislation if it reaches my desk in its present form. I stand ready to work with Congress, but on a trade bill that promotes economic growth rather than stifles it.

Seven years ago, when I ran for this office, inflation was running wild, as you've been told, and interest rates, too. The economy was slowing to a crawl; paychecks were shrinking fast. And our leaders told us the roots of the problem: we Americans and something they called malaise. You remember that?

Farm aid is meant to help the family farmer, but the way it is now the Government gives little or nothing to most family farmers. The bulk of the money goes to the big, rich ones. Last year, for example, one cotton farmer got $12 million.

The pundits in Washington say the Economic Bill of Rights doesn't stand a chance. They say it's dead on arrival and we can't beat them. But I've got news for them: The special interests don't run our country, the American people do. Looking at the way Washington spends money, you would think that you were watching ``Lifestyles of the Rich and Famous'' on TV.

It's time for the folks back in Washington to fold away the circus tents, pack up the grandstands, and get down to the business of cutting Federal spending. I'm ready to work with Congress to do that, but I'm going to need your help. Two hundred years ago, our Founding Fathers gave us a government of, by, and for the people. They believed that the Constitution they drafted would be a new order for the ages, and they were right. The dream of America has been a shining beacon for all mankind ever since then. It's the light of freedom and the torch of democracy, and it's drawn millions to our shores from all over the world. We, the American people, hold that torch in our hands.

McCallum, Congressman Sensenbrenner, Congressman Petri, Mayor Lampert, distinguished guests, and ladies and gentlemen. I can't tell you how terrific it feels to get out of Washington and to be here with you. I grew up in a town with people like you, just across the border in Illinois.

And being here along the lake reminds me of the story -- when you're my age, everything reminds you of a story -- [laughter] -- about a young man who was selling fish to the local restaurant, a fellow named Elmer. Well, no one could figure out how Elmer was able to catch so many fish. And they asked the sheriff if he would investigate. Well, he asked Elmer if he could go fishing with him.

But unfortunately, I came to talk. One of the genuine pleasures of this job you've given me is being able to meet and talk with people like you all across this great land of ours. And you may not see it on the evening news, but let me tell you, today in America there is a spirit of confidence and enterprise, of can-do and let's go, as I have not seen in many years.

It's evident in these workers I met this morning up in Hartford and in the service club members I had lunch with in West Bend. From now on, if anyone tries to sell America short or tells me that Americans don't have the will to compete or the stamina to keep out in front, I'm going to tell them to come and see you, the people of Wisconsin.

The President. America is number one, and we're going to stay that way. Let me add that nowhere is the energy and vitality I am talking about more evident today than among our young people. And God bless them, they're the best darn bunch of kids this country's ever had. I know we must have a few of them here from Port Washington High, from Homestead High, from Cedarburgh High, from Grafton High, and from Ozaukee High. [Applause]. I hope I didn't miss any. But what we've been doing in these last 6\1/2\ years has been for them. It wasn't that long ago they were being told to lower their expectations. We were all being told that America's best days were behind her, that our problems were unsolvable.

It's no mere coincidence that this blanket of gloom and doom, this smothering pessimism, followed a great expansion of the Federal Government's power and authority. Our system of limited government, free enterprise, and individual freedom was bent out of shape. Federal spending and taxing were the order of the day. Our pockets were picked, and the coffers of State and local governments drained, as more and more of the country's financial resources were funneled for the bureaucracy in Washington. As a matter of fact, not too many years ago, before all this government buildup began in Washington, two-thirds of the total tax dollar in this country went to local and State governments, and less than a third to the Federal.

In recent years, it's been two-thirds to the Federal Government and only one-third to local and State government, where the services that you need so much are provided. Our pockets were picked, and the coffers of State and local governments, as I say, drained, and more of the country's financial resources funneled to the bureaucracy in Washington. Unfortunately, not only did the country's problems not magically disappear, as we were promised, but we ended up with empty pockets, near runaway double-digit inflation, economic stagnation, and as the Governor told you, interest rates that were the highest that we've had since the Civil War.

Now, there are those who think you really don't care about these kinds of economic statistics. So, before I go any further, I'd like to know how you feel about a few things. Now, perhaps after each question, you can just shout back yes or no. Clear your throats, though, and let's let them hear you all the way to Washington.

The President. Well, you know, there's a lot left to do. And to borrow a phrase I heard recently, I reject a potted-plant Presidency. Together, in these last 6\1/2\ years, we turned decline, inflation, and malaise into growth, stability, and pride. It wasn't government that did it; it was you, the people. And instead of putting more power and authority into the hands of bureaucrats and Federal officials in Washington, we chipped away at Federal regulations, eliminated much useless paperwork, and cut redtape. Our deregulation drive bolstered the efficiency and competitiveness of American industry and reduced the paperwork burden of government -- Federal, State, and local -- by -- get this -- we reduced the time spent on government-required paperwork by 600 million hours a year. Mayors Lampert, Miller, and Kirley can testify that the last thing America's towns and cities need is more Federal forms to fill out. Our philosophy since getting to Washington has been that the most effective thing the Government can do is get out of the way and let you, the most productive people in the world, do what you do best.

I talk about productive people, I'm referring to individuals like John Stollenwerk and those of you who work with him. Just 11 weeks ago in a White House ceremony, I named John the number 2 Small Businessman of the Year. I'm also talking about the folks I met today at the plant in Hartford and all of you who work hard and take care of your families and love your country. You know how to run your lives and spend what you earn. You are citizens of the freest country in the world.

That's not the way the advocates of big government, as I say, look at it. Far too often your property, your take-home pay, your profit from large or small investments, even the assets of your pension funds are spoken of in the corridors of power as if they are government resources, as if government officials are being generous by letting you keep as much as you do keep of what you earn. Well, they're wrong. In America, government is the servant, not the master, and we intend to keep it that way.

During the last decade, the Federal tax-take nearly tripled. Inflation pushed working people into higher and higher tax brackets, until many working Americans were paying at rates that had been formerly reserved for the more affluent. Well, in these last 6\1/2\ years, we've tried to correct that situation.

I'd like to take this opportunity to express my appreciation to two champions in the battle to protect your take-home pay, heroes in the cause of a strong and growing America: Senator Bob Kasten and Congressman Jim Sensenbrenner. And your Governor is out in front and doing that same thing. Bob's leadership on economic issues and those concerning environmental protection is something for which you can all take pride, and that goes for Jim, too. He's been a voice for fiscal responsibility and economic freedom, and he's also been working his heart out in the battle against drug abuse.

Jim's solid support, we've protected your paychecks, put in place an economic program that by Thanksgiving will have given this country the longest period of peacetime growth in the postwar era. And this year, more Americans are working and a higher percentage of our work force is employed than ever before in our history. The unemployment rate continues to move in the right direction -- down. I know in this area companies are humming with activity, and unemployment is below the national average.

I am here, I'd like to commend Governor Thompson for his aggressive campaign to get the hardcore unemployed off welfare and into jobs. I happen to believe that, instead of dependency and handouts, we should be offering the less fortunate jobs and opportunity, and that's what they want. At the national level, the best thing we can do for those who want to improve their lot is to make sure that America has a strong, growing economy, and that's exactly what we've been doing.

Our greatest challenge now is to keep America on an upward track and to protect the gains that we've made. And what is needed is fundamental reform that sees to it that our economic freedom is every bit as protected as our political freedom. On July 3d, I unveiled a reform package -- we call it the Economic Bill of Rights -- aimed at doing just that: protecting our economic freedom against the abuses of excessive and overbearing government.

First, the Economic Bill of Rights would add to the Constitution an amendment that would require the Federal Government to do what every family in America has to do, and that is balance its budget. Now, there are those who say the easy way to bring down deficit spending is by raising your taxes.

The President. But what they don't tell you is that these new taxes are to pay for more spending, which means that deficit spending might not come down at all. Those who are always calling for tax increases seem to think that you're undertaxed.

The President. I agree, your taxes are not too low. And if Congress raises them, it could well knock the legs out from under our economy and drag us back down to the bad times that we had back in those seventies. Raising taxes should be serious business and should not be done without the support of a broad consensus of Americans. That's why the Economic Bill of Rights requires that more than a just majority vote of the Members of each House of Congress for the passage of any tax increase. The bottom line is tax increases should be as difficult for Congress to pass as they are painful for the people to pay.

And as far as deficit spending, we don't have a deficit because you're not taxed enough; we have a deficit because the Federal Government spends too much. And to ensure that wasteful spending isn't maneuvered through the system by attaching it to needed legislation, we propose to give to the President a line-item veto, the tool that will permit him to cut the fat and keep the meat of legislation that comes to his desk. Forty-three Governors, including Governor Thompson, are armed with this taxpayers' protection device. The President of the United States should be no less equipped to protect your paycheck.

Economic Bill of Rights would also require a truth-in-spending provision for every piece of legislation. If the bill is going to cost you, the taxpayers, it should state clearly how much it is going to cost and who's going to pay for it. Our program is aimed at protecting our heritage as free Americans. It is aimed at protecting what you earn, what you own, what you'll live on when you retire, and what you will pass on to your children.

Economic Bill of Rights is about freedom, about limited government and unlimited opportunity. It represents all we've fought for and all that we need to continue to fight for. I'm going to work for this, not just for the remainder of this job but for the rest of my public life.

The President. I was going to say I hope I can count on your support. You've told me I can already. Now, some of you may know that I announced the Economic Bill of Rights on July 3d, standing on the steps of the Jefferson Memorial. And as I spoke, I could see symbols of our precious freedoms. In the distance was the White House, the Washington Monument, and the Lincoln Memorial. One building that can't be seen from the Jefferson Memorial, however, is the Capitol, where both Houses of Congress meet and do business. And that view is obstructed by government buildings. Well, by working together, and with our Economic Bill of Rights, we're going to make certain that Congress never loses sight of Jefferson, his ideals, and his vision for all Americans.

He is the man that just shortly after the Constitution was ratified said it has one glaring omission: It does not have a clause preventing the Federal Government from borrowing. Well, together, we'll keep this the land of the free and the home of the brave.

Thank you, John, and thank you all very much. It's a great pleasure to welcome you to Washington and an honor to address this assembly of some of the foremost members of our scientific and business community.

I'm pleased to announce, though -- I'm going to take a liberty here before getting on with the subject that brought us together, to pause for a moment for an announcement of something that I think is of interest to all of us -- that today our delegation to the Geneva discussions on intermediate-range nuclear missiles is putting forward a formal U.S. proposal that embodies two earlier suggestions made by the United States. In November of 1981 we promised elimination -- or eliminating the entire class of long-range intermediate missiles. On June 15th we then formally offered to eliminate the shorter range INF weapons, as well.

As perhaps some of you know, until last week the Soviet Union had insisted on what could have been a major stumbling block to our double-zero suggestion: the right to retain some of its missiles currently deployed in Asia. But last Wednesday General Secretary Gorbachev announced that he was preparing to drop this demand. As I say, the proposal put forward today would reduce to zero the number of both longer range and shorter range INF missiles, and we are pleased the Soviets have now expressed support for both concepts. It would make provisions for strict and effective verification and reject transfer of existing U.S. and Soviet INF missiles and launchers to any third party. Two vital new elements are also included: the destruction of missiles and launchers covered by the treaty and no conversion of these systems and launchers to other types of weapons.

There's still much to do in Geneva, but I'm heartened that the climate is now receptive to an historic proposal of this type. The United States is proud to be in a position to make this proposal. I can only add that there are other arms reduction negotiations going on, as well, and these concern strategic or longer range nuclear forces. We have tabled our proposal in the form of a proposed START treaty, and we hope the Soviet Union will do likewise and formalize their views in this area. Our goal, as you can see, is not arms control but arms reduction. And despite the skepticism when we first announced these plans, we are moving in this direction.

Now, before I begin our discussion of the vital subject that's brought us here today, there is one person I must mention, a moving force in getting this conference underway. He was a patriot, a fine Cabinet officer, and a champion of American enterprise, and we will truly miss Mac Baldrige.

But we're privileged to have here today with us many of those scientists whose pioneering work made this conference on superconductivity a possibility, and congratulations to you all. And it's a safe bet that this conference room also contains many of the minds and spirits who will carry this revolution forward, who will open up a whole new realm of heretofore unimagined possibilities and practical applications.

Well, to most of us laymen, superconductivity was a completely new term. But it wasn't long before we learned of the great promise it held out to alter our world for the better, a quantum leap in energy efficiency that would bring with it a host of benefits, not least among them a reduced dependence on foreign oil, a cleaner environment, and a stronger national economy. I've been accused of being an incurable optimist, but lately I've been playing catch-up ball with the usually more staid science profession.

There are predictions of high-speed trains levitated above their tracks, supercomputers on a single silicon chip, cheaper and more effective medical imaging devices, but I suspect that we haven't even begun to dream the possibilities or imagine the potential. Just as no one imagined 747's making transatlantic commercial flights when the Wright brothers first flew at Kitty Hawk, and no one dreamt of the computer or the communications satellite when Ben Franklin first captured electricity from a lightning bolt.

It was Ben Franklin who wrote: ``I have sometimes almost wished it had been my destiny to be born two or three centuries hence. For invention and improvement are prolific and beget more of their kind. The present progress is rapid. Many of great importance, now unthought of, will before that period be produced; and then I might not only enjoy their advantages but have my curiosity gratified in knowing what they are to be.'' Well, the present process is rapid and, it seems, constantly accelerating. One can imagine how gratified Ben Franklin would be if he were alive today. But you know, I bet he would join me, and I'm sure most others in this room, in wishing that we had a window to the future -- 10, 20, and 100 years hence -- so that we, too, could see the marvels of the coming age. There's something universal in that sentiment, I'm sure, but I can't help but feel that there's something especially American in the optimism, the certainty of hope and faith with which we look to the future.

Two hundred years ago, Thomas Jefferson said: ``I like the dreams of the future better than the history of the past.'' Well, since that time, we've built here something entirely new, a history in which Thomas Jefferson would have felt more at home. It is a history that is constructed of dreams dreamt in freedom and realized in a land of opportunity. Science tells us that the breakthroughs in superconductivity bring us to the threshold of a new age. It's our task at this conference to herald in that new age with a rush. If you will, it's our business to discover ways to turn our dreams into history as quickly as possible.

The laboratory breakthroughs into high-temperature superconductivity are a historic achievement. But for the promise of superconductivity to become real, it must bridge the gap from the laboratory to the marketplace; it must make the transition from a scientific phenomenon to an everyday reality, from a specialty item to a commodity. And that's why we're here in this conference, so that business and science can cross-fertilize, can begin at these early stages to dream and plan together, because this new age of superconductivity is a new arena for the spirit of enterprise, one that we can't even guess the limits of.

We also want to see how we in government can do our part in helping this process along. Now, I have to confess that I'm one of those people who, when the Government offers to help, gets very nervous. We've learned from experience that the helping hand of government too often has a crushing weight. I'm reminded of what Wernher von Braun once said about America's space program. He said, ``We can lick gravity, but sometimes the paperwork is overwhelming.'' [Laughter] Well, this is not to say that government doesn't have an important role, especially at the basic research level. We must continue to support our outstanding researchers in all disciplines, giving them the freedom of resources and flexibility they need to dream their dreams and make their experiments. One key for doing this is the National Science Foundation, and we have proposed, as you've been told, to double its budget over the next 5 years. As you may know, the National Science Foundation and NASA provided funding for Dr. Paul Chu's landmark experiments at the University of Houston.

Increasingly, in this last part of the 20th century, information is becoming the most valuable commodity. We have begun major initiatives at our national laboratories to improve communication, and last April I signed an Executive order ensuring that all Federal agencies and laboratories become partners with the private sector in moving research from the laboratories to the marketplace. The message of government is simple: We have an open door policy to the private sector; cooperation, wherever and whenever possible, is the order of the day. We must also move to protect intellectual property and write protections into the Freedom of Information Act for scientific and technical information generated by government laboratories. We need to strengthen patent laws to increase protection for manufacturing processes and speed up the patent process so that it can keep pace with the fast-paced world of high technology. And of critical importance, we must modernize our antiquated antitrust laws, laws designed for a previous century that only held America -- or hold America back and give our foreign competition an unfair advantage.

If we're serious about improving American competitiveness, the way to do it isn't through protectionist trade legislation that closes markets and throws people out of work. One good place to start is bringing antitrust laws up to speed with the modern world. This is no longer the era of the so-called robber barons; it's the age of high-tech and global competition. Let's stop penalizing American business and treating it like an enemy. Let's give ourselves a fair shake in the world marketplace. I will soon send a legislative initiative to Congress addressing these three issues -- antitrust, patents, and the Freedom of Information Act -- as they relate to the commercial application of superconductor technology. I hope you will lend your support to this legislation. Your opinions matter to your Senators and Representatives. Let them know how you feel, individually and through your various trade organizations. This package of reforms will go a long way toward preserving the competitive advantage of U.S. industries in this field.

These and other actions are part of an 11-point superconductivity initiative that will also include a ``wise men's'' advisory group on Federal policies and regulations that effect superconductivity research and commercialization, the ``quick start'' grants for good ideas on processing superconducting materials into useful forms, the establishment of a number of superconductivity research centers, and a nearly $150 million research and development effort by the Department of Defense over 3 years. Funding basic research, sharing information, removing the impediments to commercialization -- in this way government can be a catalyst to the future. But we have an even more important role that we must be sure to accomplish. It's a fundamental role that not only looks forward to the 21st century but harks back to the first principles enunciated in our Constitution 200 years ago.

First, we must recognize that just as recent breakthroughs in superconductivity have outrun existing theories and brought us to the threshold of a new world of opportunities, so too, the world around us is in the process of a radical transformation, a revolution of shattered paradigms and long-held certainties.

This transformation, too, is opening for us new horizons of possibility. In a recent article, ``The New American Challenge,'' the economist George Gilder describes this new reality and how we must respond to it. The information age has only just begun, he says. Increasingly, we are moving from the economy of the Industrial Revolution, an economy tied to the Earth's natural resources, to an economy based on information, where that old cliche, ``Knowledge is Power,'' is truer than ever.

It's estimated that raw materials account for 80 percent of the cost of pots and pans, 40 percent of automobiles, and less than 2 percent for an integrated circuit. The value of a silicon chip doesn't lie in the sand from which it comes, but in the microscopic architecture engraved upon it by ingenious human minds. The most promising superconductors are made from ceramics. Their value doesn't come from their material, but from the brilliant inspiration of a few scientists. It is the human imagination that is building the 21st century out of sand and clay.

We're increasingly moving from an age of things to an age of thoughts, an age of mind over matter. In this new age, it's the mind of man, free to invent, free to experiment, that is our most precious resource. Gold, steel, oil -- these were the treasures of the past that made people rich and nations strong. Today the premium is on the human heart and mind. They can't be locked in a vault, nationalized, or expropriated. They can only be let free, and then, really, the sky is the only limit. That is the American challenge: Will we continue the policies of economic freedom, of noninflationary growth, of low and flatter tax rates, and deregulation? Will we strengthen them with an Economic Bill of Rights so that they will never again be lost?

I signed our tax reform legislation into law, I noted that the last 20 years had witnessed an expansion of many of our civil liberties, but that our economic liberties had been too often neglected, even abused. We protect the freedom of expression of the author, as we should, but what of the freedom of expression of the entrepreneur, whose pen and paper are capital and profits, whose book may be a new invention or small business? What of the creators of our economic life, whose contributions may not only delight the mind but improve the condition of man by feeding the poor with new grains, bringing hope to the sick with new cures, vanquishing ignorance with wondrous new information technologies?

You here today will be among the pioneers carrying on that American dream into the future, a day when this 20th century of ours may seem no more than a rough prototype of the 21st. I wish you well with the rest of your conference. You have captured the imagination of the American people, and I'm sure I can speak for them all when I say our hearts and hopes and best wishes go with you. Thank you all very much, and God bless you all.

United States Representative to the Conference on Disarmament and nominated him for the rank of Ambassador while so serving. The accordance of the personal rank of Ambassador is an interim measure pending his confirmation by the Senate.

President today announced his intention to designate Fred F. Fielding to be a member of the Panel of Arbitrators of the International Centre for Settlement of Investment Disputes for a term of 6 years. He would succeed Soia Mentschikoff.

Day is one of our most beloved holidays, an occasion set aside by Americans from earliest times to thank our Maker prayerfully and humbly for the blessings and the care He bestows on us and on our beautiful, bountiful land. Through the decades, through the centuries, in log cabins, country churches, cathedrals, homes, and halls, the American people have paused to give thanks to God, in times of peace and plenty or of danger and distress.

This year, of course, our Thanksgiving Day celebration coincides with the Bicentennial of the Constitution. In 1789 the government established by that great charter of freedom, and ``the civil and religious liberty with which we are blessed,'' were cited by George Washington in the first Presidential Thanksgiving Proclamation as among ``the great and various favors'' conferred upon us by the Lord and Ruler of Nations. As we thank the God our first President called ``that great and glorious Being, who is the beneficent Author of all the good that was, that is, or that will be,'' we have even greater cause for gratitude than the fresh triumphs that inspired Washington's prose. We have seen the splendor of our natural resources spread across the tables of the world, and we have seen the splendor of freedom coursing with new vigor through the channels of history. The cause for which we give thanks, for which so many of our citizens through the years have given their lives, has endured 200 years -- a blessing to us and a light to all mankind.

Thanksgiving Day, 1987, let us, in this unbroken chain of observance, dedicate ourselves to honor anew the Author of Liberty and to publicly acknowledge our debt to all those who have sacrificed so much in our behalf. May our gratitude always be coupled with petitions for divine guidance and protection for our Nation and with ready help for our neighbors in time of need.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-eighth day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

It's a gift to be simple, we're told. If that means to hold simple, strong, and decent values, Mac had that gift. You could see it in the way he moved around the White House. He seemed to know everyone, not just those in the public eye but the secretaries and assistants, as well. And he treated everyone with the same measure of courtesy and respect, from his driver to the President. He never judged a man or woman by rank or trappings. Despite his many remarkable successes, worldly success was not the way he measured people. No, money was not, position was not, qualities of character were. Honesty, courage, industry, and humility -- these were his yardsticks. And if you had these simple qualities, you'd made it in his eyes, whether you were rich or poor, famous or unknown.

Language was one way he decided if you were his kind of person. It's well known now that he insisted on simple language in memos at the Commerce Department. He banned phrases that were vague or redundant. He once said that the thing he liked about cowboys was that they didn't talk unless they had something to say, and when they said something, they meant it. To him, simple language did not mark a simple mind, but a strong and fearless one. It was a sign of those who didn't hide their meaning behind a cloud of ambiguous words.

Mac, of course, never hid his opinions. Even if the tide was against him, he was forceful and clear and unflinching. I always knew where he stood, and so did the country. I could always count on him for the truth as he saw it, no matter how unpleasant or unpopular. There were times the Cabinet came down on an issue 12 to 1, and he was on the short end. But I knew that if he believed something that others didn't he wouldn't reign himself in and follow the herd. He would step forward and be clear.

I'm saying about Mac Baldrige adds up to a simple but extraordinary quality that I would call, more than anything else, American. In his directness, in his honesty, in his independence, in his disregard for rank, in his courage, he embodied the best of the American spirit. I suppose we think of that spirit as living most of all in cowboys. And that's why I've always suspected that it was more than just roping and his place here in Washington that got Mac voted into the Cowboy Hall of Fame. He belonged there. It was in his blood. It was in his heart and soul.

Let me say a word about his many contributions to his country. These were not simple, although they were built on simple principles, principles like his reverence for the independence of the American character, for the freedom that lets independence flourish, and for the opportunities of a free society. Mac was an architect of American international economic policy during years in which that policy moved to center stage. He also helped shape our policy towards East-West trade in a period in which that was a source of new questions and concerns. And perhaps the least recognized of his major achievements was the securing of trade ties with China. In just 4 years since his 1983 visit to China, trade has become a pillar of the Sino-American relationship.

To contribute so much required skill and persistence -- qualities Mac had in abundance. It also required vision, vision not only for dealing with immediate issues but for the future of the entire world and its economy, as well. I always prized the quality of Mac's vision. He had the capacity to look up from the dust of the plains to the distant mountains. He never forgot that all the skirmishes and battles over trade policy that we have here in Washington and around the world have one final goal: We're building a world in which our children and grandchildren will live. And we who love freedom and revere the dignity of humanity have a sacred duty to make that an open world of real hope and abundant opportunity, a world in which the spirit of freedom -- yes, what you might call that part of the American spirit that lives in all of mankind -- in which that spirit can ride across an open range towards the peaks beyond.

I'm told that Mac's staff had orders to interrupt him at whatever time of the day with calls from only two people. I was one, and any cowboy who rang up was the other. Well, I'm honored to have been in that company. Mac, as we know, left us while he was doing what he loved most. And now, whenever any of us wants to ring him up, we'll have to remind ourselves that he's out on a horse somewhere, and we'll just have to wait. Yet in his simplicity, he has entered the company of the men and women who have shaped our nation and its destiny, and he will live in that company forever.

Yes, there is sorrow, but the sorrow is with us and for us. We must believe that door is opened that God promised and he has just gone through that door into another life, where there is no more pain, no more sorrow. And we must believe that we, too, will one day go through that door and join him again. Thank you.

It's a pleasure welcoming you to the White House complex, you chiefs of police, state troopers, sheriffs, and other members of the National Law Enforcement Council. And it's quite a difference from my first experience with one of your kind, when I was about so high and had some fireworks in the wrong place.

Well, this year we celebrate the 200th anniversary of the framing of the Constitution. And in the history of nations, ours is a young nation. The nations of Western Europe are older, as are many of the nations of Asia. China is much older. And yet young as our nation is, we have, nevertheless, the oldest written Constitution in the world. For two centuries our Constitution has secured the blessings of liberty for people from every part of the Earth who left behind the lands of their ancestors and came here to live in freedom and to call themselves Americans. I say this to you because you, and members of the law enforcement community like you, have played a special role in our nation ever since its founding. The men who wrote the Constitution said that among their purposes was to ``establish Justice, and insure domestic Tranquility.'' They knew that for this to be a land of liberty it must also be a land of lawful order.

You know, a few years ago it seemed that some people who should have known better had forgotten the basic truth that law, order, and liberty go hand in hand. Too many courts appeared to regard the serious business of ensuring our domestic peace and protecting our nation's communities against crime as a kind of intricate game that pitted police officers against clever lawyers. And always we heard about the rights of criminals, rarely those of their victims.

In the last 7 years, a balance has begun once again to return to America's courtrooms. Both Federal and State Government have tightened their criminal codes. New judges have been appointed to the bench. The result has been longer sentences and a more realistic view by courts on all levels of what it's like for you to go to your duties each morning with the very real life-and-death warning, ``Be careful out there.'' I'm proud to report to you that the Federal Government has taken a lead in bringing about this change.

I first came into office, I promised a massive attack on organized crime, a social evil that had been tolerated too long in our nation. I said we were declaring war on the mob -- its drug peddling, yes, but also its influence in every form of racketeering and its capacity to corrupt business, unions, and public law enforcement officials. When I announced this attack on the mob in 1982, I also announced a wide-ranging series of steps from new preventive and investigative measures to the appointment of a Presidential commission on organized crime. Some, of course, were skeptical, but the evidence is now in from all around the country. We're winning, and these are no longer just tactical victories. We have a full-fledged strategic assault underway, and the mob is on the run. Around the country, Federal prosecutors are winning convictions against the working heads of organized crime, and the Mafia's national board of directors, the infamous ``commission,'' has been put behind bars. Meanwhile, drug seizures have reached record levels. Drug arrests have gone up and have included some of the most notorious figures in the drug underworld.

Three years ago, after long stalling, the Congress at last passed the Comprehensive Crime Control Act. The act eliminated parole and reduced the amount of time off for good behavior that could be granted a prisoner. The United States Sentencing Commission was also established, and it has drafted guidelines that make sentences more predictable. The Crime Control Act also included new provisions, like rules for confiscating drug assets. I can't tell you what a kick it was for me the first time, early on in my term, down in Florida -- stand in front of a table with $20 million piled up on it, all drug assets that had been confiscated. It's making life harder for drug traffickers and easier for the police, and you can see the results for yourselves.

Last year the average Federal prison sentence for a drug offense was almost 40-percent lower [longer] than it was in 1979. The average fraud and weapons possession sentences were more than 40-percent lower [longer]. Overall, Federal sentences have averaged more than 30-percent longer than they had 7 years before. Put another way, in 1979 the average Federal sentence for drug dealers was over 50 months. Since then it has climbed steadily to 70 months, and drug convictions have doubled. Some of you may have been involved in the National Narcotics Border Interdiction System that works under the direction of Vice President Bush.

Federal judges have also been getting tougher on criminals and the sentencing figures, as they suggest. And I'm told that I've appointed 4 of every 10 judges that are sitting on the bench today. Several weeks ago, I made another nomination to the Federal Bench, one I'm particularly proud of, and I know that you've heard about him already this morning: Robert Bork. I believe that Judge Bork will be an extraordinary addition to the United States Supreme Court. He has already had a remarkable legal career. As a partner in a leading law firm, he was recognized as among the best in his field. As a professor at Yale, he became one of the preeminent legal scholars of our time. And as a judge on the most important appeals court in the country, he has been widely acclaimed for his intellectual power and his fairness. No man in America, and few in history, have been as qualified to sit on the Supreme Court as Robert Bork.

Furthermore, in his 5 years on the bench, Judge Bork has demonstrated a clear understanding of the appropriate role of the judiciary in our constitutional system. Many years ago a great Justice, Felix Frankfurter, defined his role when he said: ``The highest exercise of judicial duty is to subordinate one's personal pulls and one's private views to the law.'' This is called the doctrine of judicial restraint. And as Lloyd Cutler, President Carter's White House Counsel, recently wrote, I quote: ``All justices subscribe at least nominally to this philosophy, but few rigorously observe it. Justices Oliver Wendell Holmes, Louis D. Brandeis, Felix Frankfurter, Potter Stewart, and Lewis F.

The Supreme Court has never reversed a single one of these more than 400 opinions. That's a vote of confidence any judge in America would envy. And what's more, 9 of the 10 times the Supreme Court reviewed a case that Judge Bork had ruled on, Justice Powell agreed with Bork. It's hard for a fairminded person to escape the conclusion that if you want someone with Justice Powell's detachment and statesmanship you can't do better than Judge Bork.

Bork deserves to be evaluated on his merits. He deserves to be considered promptly. Justice Powell has noted that when the Court is below full strength, it has an adverse effect on the Court's business. I hope the Senate will take note of this concern. One way or another, it should act on Judge Bork's nomination before the Court goes into session in October. Each Senator must decide which criteria is right for casting this critical vote: qualifications or politics. I hope you'll join me in urging the Senate to confirm Judge Bork. I feel the American people want criminals going to jail while constitutional rights are preserved. So, please tell your Senators that you'll stand by them if they support Judge Bork. I can't think of any better way of marking this 200th anniversary of the framing of our noble Constitution than by placing a Justice of Robert Bork's quality on the United States Supreme Court.

I was in Las Vegas some years ago to address the annual Farm Bureau meeting. And on my way to the hall, a fellow recognized me and asked what I was doing in Las Vegas. And I told him what I was there for. And he said what are a bunch of farmers doing in a place like Las Vegas? And I couldn't resist.

I'm afraid that we're never going to be able to fully come to grips with the problems weather creates for the farmer. We can, however, do our best to eliminate those problems that government creates for farmers. That's exactly what we've been trying to do in these last 6\1/2\ years. I hope when you get home that you'll relay my best wishes to your families and let them know that I'm aware of serious hardships still facing segments of America's farming community and that I care deeply about those who are still struggling.

What we face are maladies inherited from the last decade. The devastating inflation of the waning years of the 1970's damaged our country to a far greater degree than many realize. The price of land, because of inflation, was going up in those days, and as a result, many farmers overextended themselves buying new property. And I might add, certain government agencies may have encouraged that course of action. Then in the 3 years prior to 1980, farm costs shot right through the roof. It was the largest 3-year jump in the cost of farming in the history of America, a nearly 50-percent increase, which is about $44 billion in real terms. Is there any wonder that a large number of farmers ended up behind the eight ball?

Well, since getting to Washington, we've done our best to get this situation straightened out. We started by putting in place economic policies which brought inflation under control, gradually brought down the interest rates, and revitalized our economy. As is abundantly clear, most of the economy has adjusted and now is on an upward track. I'll be the first, however, to point out that the job is not done and that there are farm families still caught in bad times. We're working diligently to make certain that everyone in America benefits from the growing prosperity.

You know, there's a story about a pig and a chicken, and they got tired of farm life and decided to find jobs in town. They no sooner arrived in town when the chicken spotted a sign in the window of a restaurant. It said, ``Ham and Eggs, $1.25.'' And the chicken suggested they go in and apply. And the pig said, ``Wait a minute. For you, this job only requires a contribution; for me, it's a total commitment.'' [Laughter] I just want all of you to know that we're not going to be satisfied with just making a contribution to America's farmers; we are totally committed to a strong and vibrant American agricultural economy. We've set our sights on long range goals that will well serve you, the Future Farmers of America. In recent years, we've been pushing ever more aggressively to open markets for your goods. And that's part of an ongoing process, and it will continue.

However, we've also set forth a bold new initiative that may revolutionize American agriculture and that of the entire free world. It's the most ambitious proposal for world agricultural reform ever offered. We're calling for a total phaseout of all policies that distort trade in agriculture by the end of the century. And over a 10-year period, we want to see all of our major trading partners opening the borders, tearing down the barriers, and ending the export subsidies for agricultural goods. If we're successful, agriculture throughout the Western World will be set free from political controls and interference.

I happen to believe that, when it comes to farming, the decisionmaking shouldn't be in the hands of the politicians, academics, or bureaucrats. It should be in the hands of the farmers. Thomas Jefferson once said: ``State a moral case to a ploughman and a professor, and the former will decide it as well, and often better, than the latter, because he has not been led astray by artificial rules.'' Well, it's time to get the artificial rules out of the way and get back to fundamentals like freedom, private property, and supply and demand. We're looking forward with you to the day when you'll be the proud, free producers of our country's and the rest of the world's food and fiber.

I want to take this opportunity to thank you, the Future Farmers of America, for all it is doing to prepare young Americans for the challenge that lies ahead. If we're successful in putting our reforms in place, we're counting on you to beat the pants off the competition, and all America is confident that you will. A special congratulations to your national president, Kevin Eblen. I'm impressed with all the fine things this organization has accomplished and will continue to accomplish under his leadership.

And there are two other individuals I'd like to single out. First is Scott Sooy. He was born without a hand, and yet he has more than made up for that disability with good sense, hard work, and an indomitable spirit. He's vice president of Ohio's FFA and is helping run a 183-acre farm and will soon attend college. Scott, you're terrific. Then there's a former vice president of the Washington State FFA, a courageous young man who serves not only as an inspiration to future farmers but to all young Americans. Due to a diving accident, he lost the use of his legs and only has partial use of his arms and torso. Nevertheless, Don Hayden's can-do attitude and aggressive lifestyle is a tribute to American spirit. This year he climbed Mount Rainier and right into the hearts of everyone who heard about this effort. Don, you're not only demonstrating that no one should ever give up, you're encouraging people, through your example, to live life to its fullest. Your family and friends and your President are proud of you.

And let me just say I'm proud of all of you. I've met America's young people all over this great land. Your energy and enthusiasm for life have kept me going at times. And I can only say -- and I've never lost sight of this -- what we're doing here is for you. I know you'll never let us down, and I promise we'll never let you down.

Trotskyist and Communist at an early age, Mr. Burnham wrote of his rejection of communism in 1940: ``The basic reason for the break was my conclusion Marxism was false and Marxist politics in practice lead not to their alleged goal of democratic socialism, but to one or another form of totalitarian despotism.'' Mr. Burnham later dismissed socialism as impossible ``of achievement or even of approximation,'' and spent the remaining decades of his life as a skilled and fearless champion of human liberty.

For all the fierceness of his convictions, Mr. Burnham was a man both kind and gentle. He loved greatly his family, his friends, his country -- life itself. We extend our sympathy to the Burnham family and join them in mourning the death of a great American.

But I ask: What single issue could be of greater significance? What single issue could say more about a society's values than the degree of respect shown for human life at its most vulnerable: human life still unborn?

Many of the most compelling arguments against abortion are as old as our civilization. Indeed, I would submit that a reverence for all human life is one of the distinguishing marks of true civilization. In our own time, medical science has added to our knowledge of the processes of life that take place before birth, deepening our understanding of what abortion means to the mother and the unborn child. We know, in particular, that when an abortion is performed the unborn child often feels pain.

The law of the land -- that's a phrase with special resonance for Americans. After all, ours is not a nation founded upon centuries of shared history, like the nations of Europe or Asia. No, ours is a nation founded upon a shared and basic law, the Constitution. And because it is the Constitution that must reflect our most fundamental values -- freedom, equality before the law, and yes, the dignity of human life -- because of this, the duty of everyone here today is clear. We must not rest -- and I pledge to you that I will not rest -- until a human life amendment becomes a part of our Constitution.

At the same time, we must continue to search for practical steps that we can take now, even before the battle for the human life amendment is won. I've submitted a bill to Congress that I know interests each of you keenly, and I'd like to talk about that with you in just a moment. But first, permit me to mention four other important steps our administration has taken, steps that I believe represent powerful examples of what can be done now to protect the lives of unborn children.

Second, permit me to mention our recent actions concerning the District of Columbia. You'll recall that the Congress has the responsibility to oversee and appropriate all funds in the District of Columbia budget, but each year Congress has chosen to restrict only Federal funds in the DC budget from being used for abortions on demand. Yet in practice, the record is clear. There is no way to separate Federal from locally raised funds, and this has permitted the District to go right on financing abortions. And you know, I just felt that the great beauty of this capital city meant nothing if right here, in this city that belongs to all Americans, the dignity of human life was being neglected and even attacked. So, this year we took action. You'll be pleased to know that, in transmitting to Congress the District of Columbia budget for 1988, we made it clear that both Federal and local funds must comply with the Hyde amendment.

I want, third, to restate our firm opposition to the so-called, Grove City legislation sponsored by Senator Kennedy. This bill, S. 557, would mean that all hospitals and colleges receiving Federal funds, even those with religious affiliations, would be open to lawsuits if they failed to provide abortions. In other words, the legislation would virtually force these institutions to provide abortion on demand. I don't mind telling you this one really touches my temperature control. I don't want to get started, but let me just say this: As far as I'm concerned, every Member of Congress should oppose this proabortion Federal intrusion. [Applause] Thank you. You just made the day for some Legislators here. [Laughter] We support an amendment offered by Senator Danforth, an amendment that would eliminate the proabortion aspects of that legislation. As I said before, this administration will oppose any legislation that would require individuals or institutions, public or private, to finance or perform abortions.

Now, the fourth point is one that will come to you as especially good news, a set of initiatives that we will pursue immediately. The first of these is a revision of the title 10 Family Planning Program guidelines. Current guidelines require grant recipients to provide abortion counseling and referral. This policy has effectively barred family planning organizations that will not engage in abortion activity from participating in the title 10 program.

I'm directing the Secretary of Health and Human Services to publish regulations in the Federal Register removing this bias against groups that refuse to engage in abortion activities. In order to give effect to the statutory prohibition on the use of appropriated funds in programs where abortion is a method of family planning, I am also directing Secretary Bowen to make sure that the regulations specifically state that a program which does provide counseling and referral for abortion services as a method of family planning will not be eligible for title 10 funds.

Then there's an initiative that represents an important change in the title 10 regulations so that any organization that provides abortion-related services will be required to clearly separate these services from title 10 programs that the Federal Government is paying for. At present, the coexistence of abortion with federally supported family planning services fosters the view that abortion is an acceptable and government-sanctioned method of family planning.

In order to ensure that this will no longer occur, I'm directing the Secretary of Health and Human Services to publish in the Federal Register regulations that require grant recipients to separate, financially and physically, their eligible and noneligible programs.

Now, a third initiative is the development of a thorough and solid body of public health information on the effects of abortion on women. Growing numbers of women who've had abortions now say that they have been misled by inaccurate information. Making accurate data on maternal morbidity available to women before an abortion is performed is an essential element of informed consent. I am, therefore, directing the Surgeon General to issue a comprehensive medical report on the health effects, physical and emotional, of abortion on women.

The final initiative is a restriction on the use of Federal funds for activities that advocate abortion. It is inconsistent with title 10 for Federal funds to be used to provide speakers to debate in opposition to pro-life speakers, to lobby for proabortion legislation, to provide transportation to abortion clinics, or make reservations at abortion clinics, to bring lawsuits in support of abortion as a family planning method, or to provide or distribute materials that advocate abortion. And I am, therefore, directing Secretary Bowen to publish regulations in the Federal Register to ensure that no title 10 funds go to any program that encourages, promotes, or advocates abortion or which assists a woman in obtaining an abortion.

You'll be pleased to know that Secretary Bowen is fully supportive of my position on abortion and of these initiatives. Secretary Bowen has agreed that all necessary work will be completed in time to publish draft regulations in the Federal Register within 30 days. And I'm also pleased to say that the Secretary's newly appointed Deputy Assistant Secretary for Population Affairs is Nabers Cabaniss. Nabers will be among those charged with implementing these new initiatives at the Department of Health and Human Services.

And this brings me to the bill I mentioned earlier. To begin with, a word or two of background. In the past, we've been successful in restricting the use of Federal funds for abortions on a department-by-department basis, making use of the Hyde amendment. Yet each year there have been a few departments and agencies not covered by the Hyde amendment. The bill that we're submitting to Congress will change that. And listen, if you will, to the key provision: ``No funds appropriated by Congress shall be used to perform abortions, except where the life of the mother would be endangered if the fetus were carried to term.'' In other words, this one piece of legislation would permanently restrict the use of funds for abortions throughout the Federal Government, with absolutely no exceptions.

And introduced in the Senate by Senator Gordon Humphrey, this bill has 12 Senate cosponsors. And in the House, the bill was introduced by Congressman Henry Hyde and has garnered cosponsors numbering 124. Yes, opposition is stiff. But the very fact that this bill has been introduced has drawn attention to the importance of the debate and demonstrated the growing strength of the prolife movement throughout the country.

Will the bill pass? The pundits certainly don't think so, but I have to tell you, at this point in my career, I'm used to a little skepticism. [Laughter] ``The Impossible Became Inevitable'' -- that's what the Washington Post headline said when our tax reform was finally enacted. And I just have to believe that, given the fundamental goodness of the American people, given this great nation's reverence for life itself, prolife measures like this legislation will become inevitable, too. So, I intend to push for these prolife measures just as hard as I know how. Can I count on your support? [Applause] Thank you. I knew that was a foolish question when I asked it.

Many who turn to abortion do so in harrowing circumstances, and we must remind those who disagree with us, and sometimes even ourselves, that we do not seek to condemn, we do not seek to sit in judgment. Yes, we must take our stand without apology. Yet at the same time, it is our duty to rise above bitterness and reproach, to call upon all Americans to come together in a spirit of helping and understanding. For we know that in this great and good nation, positive solutions to the tragedy of abortion can be found.

The weakest of human vessels -- surely there is no human life more frail and vulnerable than that of an infant still in its mother's womb. And surely it is our task to appeal to the goodness we know we can find in every American and to call upon the power of His love.

I know that all the students here have been studying the language as well as technical skills, so you'll probably understand my English much better than my Spanish. But I'm going to have a try at it anyway: Buenos dias, y bienvenidos en la Casa Blanca. [Good day, and welcome to the White House.] It's a genuine pleasure to welcome all of you here -- Senators and Congressmen and the private citizens and government officials who've worked so hard throughout the years to further the cause of peace in Central America. And all of us are especially pleased to welcome these fine young men and women, our neighbors from the south, who've come to study in the United States. We see in you the hope and the future of Central America.

The room we're meeting in couldn't be more full of historical significance. We call it the Roosevelt Room, after two of our United States Presidents, Teddy and Franklin Roosevelt. They came from opposite political parties. One was a Republican, the other a Democrat. There were a lot of things they probably wouldn't have agreed on, but there was one subject on which they saw eye to eye: that from Tierra del Fuego to the upper reaches of Baffin Bay, we are all Americans, brothers and sisters with a shared history and a common birthright -- freedom.

Our efforts to protect that birthright, to make it real for every American, is what brings us here together today. In 1983 I appointed the National Bipartisan Commission on Central America -- what's become known as the Kissinger commission -- to help us come to a better understanding of that troubled region. Their report was blunt and compelling: The crisis in Central America is, to quote them, ``real and acute'' and ``the stakes are large, for the United States, for the hemisphere, and most poignantly, for the people of Central America.'' The roots of that crisis, the complex problems of the region -- economic, social, political, and military -- are all part of a ``seamless web,'' the report said, requiring a sustained response in all areas, from the United States and the free world.

We responded immediately with a multiyear, multibillion-dollar program of economic assistance, and one that we hope to extend and expand in the nineties. Based on the Kissinger commission recommendations, Congress and the executive branch have worked together to develop programs that have strengthened democratic institutions; helped stabilize economies; and improved health and nutrition; built better housing, water, sewage, and other infrastructures. The fact is, our military assistance has only been a modest fraction of our overall economic aid.

I know the students have learned much in their studies here, but sometimes I think an even greater benefit of these programs is the education it gives us in the United States, because seeing you here brings the reality of your homelands -- the great hope and the great peril -- so much closer to us all. Seeing you here, we realize that we cannot be agnostic in this struggle, that we cannot be aloof and uncaring; because in a very real sense, our fates and our futures are intertwined as one.

It was this face-to-face contact, this immersion in the problems of Central America, that forged the bipartisan consensus of the Kissinger commission -- representatives of both parties united on common ground. It's important to remember some of the men who did such fine work on that Commission: AFL - CIO president Lane Kirkland; Governor Bill Clements of Texas; Robert Strauss, then chairman of the Democratic party; the late Supreme Court Justice Potter Stewart; Dr. John Silber, of course; and Richard M. Scammon. That list isn't complete, but it gives a good idea of the stature and wide representation of the Commission. Democrat and Republican, representing government, academia, business, and labor -- they defined the bipartisan mainstream response to the crisis in Central America, one that this administration has been diligently following. There was no partisan disagreement on their assignment to the crisis. It had both indigenous and foreign roots. And with the exception of two members, there was no disagreement on the need for a sustained response that included both economic and military aid.

I just want to say to you students: Since you've been in places like Cedar Rapids, Iowa, and Pewaukee, Wisconsin, I know you've seen the heart of America. I come from that neighborhood myself, which is between those two States -- Illinois. But I know that Americans are so pleased that you've been able to be here so that they can get to know you better. This is just the kind of freedom that we as a country believe in: giving a helping hand so that you, in turn, can help those in your countries.

The official 1986 poverty and income statistics released today demonstrate, once again, that sustained, noninflationary growth is the Government's single best tool for fighting poverty and building a better life for our nation's families.

The poverty rate is down for the third year in a row. The 1.6 percentage point drop in poverty over the last 3 years is the largest sustained improvement since 1970. Low-income whites, blacks, and Hispanics, both children and adults, all have shared in these gains. Median family income, after adjustments for inflation, increased by 4.2 percent in 1986, the largest increase since 1972. This is the fourth straight year in a row that real median family income has increased. Since 1982 all racial and ethnic groups have made real gains.

The positive news that we received today stands in stark contrast to the news we heard not long ago when spiraling inflation and economic stagnation took a heavy toll on all Americans, and particularly the poor. Between 1979 and 1980, the increase in poverty was the most dramatic since we began keeping such records, and the drop in real median family income was near recordbreaking.

President today announced his intention to nominate R. James Woolsey to be a member of the Board of Trustees of the Barry Goldwater Scholarship and Excellence in Education Foundation for a term of 2 years. This is a new position.

It is submitted on behalf of the Interagency Arctic Research Policy Committee, which is chaired by the National Science Foundation. The Plan was developed in consultation with the Arctic Research Commission, the Governor of the State of Alaska, residents of the Arctic, the private sector, and public interest groups. It is a comprehensive statement of national needs and priorities in the areas of national security, rational resource development, and acquisition of new scientific knowledge in the Arctic. As noted in the report, the Plan is intended to serve as a guide to the Federal agencies as they plan and perform their Arctic programs and missions; it is not intended to be a commitment by the Administration.

I am taking this opportunity to reiterate my request that the Congress ensure that none of the funds appropriated for the District of Columbia be used for abortion unless the life of the mother would be endangered if the fetus were carried to term. Thus, I will support an amendment to the District of Columbia's appropriations bill that restricts the use of both the District's Federal and locally generated funds for abortion.

The President. You know I don't take questions at these photo opportunities, but when you ask a question like that, I haven't heard a single word that indicated in any of the testimony that laws were broken.

Reagan. President El Hadj Omar Bongo has been a very welcome guest at the White House. This has been a long-awaited visit that has given us a chance to return the generous hospitality President Bongo personally accorded to so many representatives of this and earlier administrations.

Bongo has been a champion of African development and has worked tirelessly for the welfare of his people and all Africans. The United States and Gabon have cooperated closely in the effort to achieve these noble goals. We have enjoyed a positive and friendly relationship for the past two decades, a relationship that has served both our countries well. I've greatly valued President Bongo's advice and counsel concerning America's role in Africa's political and economic development.

President Bongo and I found ourselves in harmony about many of the key issues that confront Africa. We agreed that economic reform, which is the best hope for growth, self-sufficiency, and full economic sovereignty, must proceed. The United States has encouraged reform through special aid funds and increased contributions to international financial institutions. Gabon is contributing, as well, by setting an example, taking positive steps toward reform on its own and in coordination with the IMF [International Monetary Fund]. We admire this commitment and wish President Bongo great success. For our own part, we will soon be signing a bilateral debt rescheduling agreement with Gabon. The U.S. investors have had a favorable experience in Gabon. President Bongo is working to make the investment climate even more attractive, and we're working with him to promote increased U.S. investment there.

Bongo and I also reviewed the situation in southern Africa. We share the conviction that negotiated, peaceful solutions to the disputes that afflict that region are urgently and clearly possible. The evil of apartheid is no exception. President Bongo and I are committed to working together, along with other African leaders of good will, to set the region on a peaceful course.

United States will continue to stand unequivocally by the side of Africa, with our counsel, our friendship, and our assistance. Constructive meetings, like the one I held today with President Bongo, bolster that commitment. I was very much heartened by our discussions and pleased to have President Bongo as our guest.

Bongo. Mr. President, I'm deeply touched by the attention lavished upon us and friendship and sympathy that my delegation and myself have received during this official visit, which is now beginning, which it is my privilege to carry out throughout your great and beautiful country. I'm also touched by your kind words towards me, and touched also by the confidence you displayed toward my country. May I thank you for this, Mr. President, and tell you, in turn, on behalf of the people of Gabon and in my own name, how much esteem and friendship we feel towards you personally and towards the American people.

In you, the American people finds its perfect embodiment, because beyond your great statesmanlike qualities, it has found the leader which has given back confidence and greatness and dignity back to the American nation. No country can stand idly by and watch what is going on in the United States, and Gabon watches with keen interest, the deep and rapid shifts taking place under your leadership within American society.

In this political world in which we live, the United States built its own nation, predicated upon the diversity of origins of your people. Thus, you have become an example for all countries which love liberty, solidarity, and peace.

Therefore, speaking as a leader of an African nation, may I state that we follow very carefully all your efforts to put an end not only to apartheid and regional conflicts but also to put an end to the steady deterioration of the economic situation of the African continent.

For our part, Mr. President, we have set up with the IMF an austerity program which imposes drastic constraints upon us if we want to preserve the future. The IMF and the Paris and London Clubs have been made aware of our determination and of our will to honor our commitments. In this connection, may I tell you how much I appreciate to the full extent of the impact the rescheduling measures taken, vis-a-vis our debt, that you were kind enough to undertake in this very difficult situation. We wish, Mr.

President, for the spirit of solidarity to prevail in the end and for our export commodities to gain access to world markets and their remunerative level. Solidarity, indeed, must become the reality in relationships among states.

In this connection, distance between our two countries, the difference in our levels of development, and in our respective economic impact must not be an obstacle to cooperation in many areas. Gabon is a peaceful and peace-loving country, stable, and a welcoming country; and there is security in Gabon. Gabon is the special preserve of no one. Gabon seeks to diversify its partners, and in this connection, we know that there is a place for your country. The United States, indeed, can bring us their know-how, their technology, and their capitals in order to contribute to our development.

President, the United States and Gabon have for some years now enjoyed a harmonious relationship. We have a few American companies in Gabon already. What I wish for in the future is to see our relations enjoy a new impetus, particularly after we sign the bilateral agreement on treaty protection and investments.

Twelve years ago, the United States, Canada, and 33 European countries signed the Helsinki Final Act of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe. These nations thereby committed themselves to observe important standards of international conduct and to respect basic human rights and fundamental freedoms at home. They also pledged themselves to pursue practical steps to reduce the barriers by which the Soviet Union has divided Europe into East and West, denying the nations of Eastern Europe the right of self-determination and limiting contact between peoples.

Helsinki Final Act embodies its signatories' agreement that freedom and human rights are the best guarantors of peace. It mandated that these freedoms, routinely enjoyed by the peoples of the West, be recognized and respected as well in the Soviet Union and Eastern Europe.

Union and the Soviet-dominated governments of Eastern Europe have systematically violated many of their most fundamental Helsinki pledges. Freedoms of thought, conscience, religion, and belief are constrained. Loved ones, families, and friends are kept apart. The flow of ideas and information is restricted. The right of the individual to depart from and return to his own country is denied. Helsinki monitors and other prisoners of conscience continue to languish in prisons, labor camps, psychiatric hospitals, and internal exile, merely for expressing their political and religious beliefs. In Perm Camp 36-1, the most brutal of the labor camps in the Gulag, ten political prisoners -- three of whom were Helsinki monitors -- have died in the last 3 years. Harsh treatment and lack of medical care threaten the lives of those remaining in the camp.

These and other violations have exacted a fearsome and tragic human cost, and they reflect a disregard for the fundamental principle that in order for any of a nation's international agreements to be respected, all must be observed. The continuing violations of Helsinki obligations by the Soviet Union and the Soviet-dominated countries of Eastern Europe place in doubt those nations' faithful observance of their international obligations in every sphere.

The primary aim of the United States and its NATO Allies in Vienna is to secure compliance by the East with the commitments made at Helsinki, so that citizens in all the signatory states can enjoy the fundamental freedoms agreed to in the Final Act.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirty-first day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-seven, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Non-Proliferation Treaty is one of the international community's most vital instruments for preventing the spread of nuclear weapons and strengthening international peace and stability. I firmly believe that nuclear war can never be won and must never be fought. If we are to succeed in halting the spread of nuclear weapons, the nations of the world must continue to work together.

I call on all countries that have not yet adhered to the Non-Proliferation Treaty to do so to demonstrate their commitment to preventing the spread of nuclear weapons and to strengthening the foundations of peace. I also urge all parties to the treaty to rededicate themselves to achieving its objective.

Twenty years ago today, 61 nations, including the United States, signed the Treaty on the Non-Proliferation of Nuclear Weapons. This treaty serves as a cornerstone of international efforts to prevent the further spread of nuclear weapons, which is one of the most direct and serious threats to regional and global stability. Nations from around the globe have committed themselves to the treaty and its objectives. Indeed, with 136 parties, the Non-Proliferation Treaty has the widest adherence of any arms control treaty in history. The important role of the treaty has been repeatedly reaffirmed.

The participants at the third Non-Proliferation Treaty Review Conference in 1985 concluded that universal adherence to the treaty is the best way to strengthen the barriers against proliferation. They urged all states not party to the treaty to accede to it. The nuclear-weapon states which are parties to the treaty have agreed not to assist non-nuclear-weapon states to acquire nuclear explosives. The non-nuclear-weapon states, in turn, pledge not to acquire nuclear explosives. These mutual pledges acknowledge that the technology of nuclear weapons and nuclear explosives cannot be distinguished and that their further spread threatens the security of all nations.

Non-Proliferation Treaty also calls for parties to cooperate in the development of the peaceful uses of nuclear energy, especially in non-nuclear-weapon states which are parties to the treaty. The peaceful uses of nuclear energy are important to the social and economic well-being of many peoples, and the United States has long been in the forefront of countries providing technical assistance and other cooperation in the nuclear field. We are committed to continuing such cooperation under effective international safeguards. The comprehensive safeguards applied by the International Atomic Energy Agency under the treaty provide essential assurance of the peaceful intent of the nuclear activities of the states involved, thus benefiting all mankind.

United States has taken the initiative in negotiations to substantially reduce nuclear arsenals as called for in article VI of the Non-Proliferation Treaty. The conclusion by the U.S. and the U.S.S.R. of the treaty on the elimination of intermediate-range and shorter range missiles (INF), which entered into force on June 1, is clear evidence of our deep commitment to nuclear arms reductions. This treaty, which contains the most stringent verification measures of any arms control agreement, will eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles.

United States also continues its negotiations with the U.S.S.R. to complete a treaty to reduce U.S. and Soviet strategic offensive arms by 50 percent. We are, in addition, committed to seeking effective and verifiable agreements with the Soviet Union on nuclear testing limitations that could strengthen security for all nations. When discussions of two existing treaties are completed and they are ratified, we are prepared to pursue negotiations on a step-by-step parallel program to limit and ultimately end nuclear testing, in association with a program to reduce and ultimately eliminate all nuclear weapons.

As the President has stated on a number of occasions, he believes that a nuclear war can never be won and must never be fought. In order to eliminate the threat of nuclear war, we have sought to achieve deep reductions in the level of nuclear weapons worldwide. The INF agreement is a concrete example of our success. However, in order to completely rid the world of the risk of nuclear war, particularly at the time when the United States and the U.S.S.R. have agreed to reduce their nuclear arsenals, it is equally vital to prevent any further spread of nuclear weapons. The Non-Proliferation Treaty is clearly the most important means we have for accomplishing this goal.

United States played a major role in the negotiation of the Non-Proliferation Treaty, and over its lifetime, all U.S. Presidents have strongly supported it. On this, the 20th anniversary of the opening for a signature of the treaty, the President calls upon all countries that have not yet adhered to it to do so in order to demonstrate their commitment to preventing the spread of nuclear weapons and to reducing the risk of nuclear war. Further, he urges all parties to the treaty to rededicate themselves to achieving its objectives and to ensuring its continued vitality. This is both our shared responsibility and our contribution to peace for this and future generations.

We know that America offers freedom and opportunity to every citizen; yet we know too that the burden of illiteracy keeps some of us from taking full advantage of all our country has to offer and from contributing all we can. Fortunately, dedicated citizens have been working hard to help their neighbors learn to read and write; and in recent years the Adult Literacy Initiative has encouraged many people to volunteer in this effort.

We can be proud of the volunteers and the public-private partners who are carrying America's promise to their fellow citizens. National Literacy Day gives us a special chance to let more people know of the help and hope that are available -- that they can truly learn to read and write. On this day and throughout the year, let us extend a helping hand to our fellow citizens and offer them the priceless opportunity of literacy and the world of potential it creates.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this first day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Well, that initiative has produced an historic piece of legislation, and in a moment, I will sign the Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act of 1988. This legislation will help remove a terrible threat from the lives of elderly and disabled Americans, the threat of an illness requiring acute care, one so devastating that it could wipe out the savings of an entire lifetime. The scene is only too easy to picture. An elderly couple, perhaps one has a very long stay in the hospital; the other forced to empty the savings account, to skimp on groceries.

And even for those never actually forced into this situation, there's the gnawing worry, the fear, that someday it might just happen. This legislation will change that, replacing worry and fear with peace of mind.

I'm proud to be able to note that the legislation follows the same premise as all sound insurance programs. It will be paid for by those who are covered by its services. Even so, I must add a word of caution. Every administration since the Medicare program was passed has worried about the seemingly uncontrollable cost increases in our government health care programs. Whoever the President in office, program costs have exceeded the best congressional budget estimates.

In particular, the legislation provides many new benefits, benefits like respite care and prescription drugs. Since these have never been covered by Medicare, we have no real way of knowing how much these services will cost. So, if future administrations and Congresses aren't diligent, these new benefits could contribute to a program we can't afford. This could be more than a budget problem; it could be a tragedy. The program, after all, is to be paid for by the elderly themselves. So, we must control the costs of these new benefits, or we'll harm the very people we're trying to help. And yet, if administered with prudence, this program can, as I said, provide countless Americans with peace of mind.

Pete Stark; and many others, some of whom are on the dais with me today, who toiled, compromised, and sacrificed. There were the elderly and their organizations who agreed to pay for this new benefit rather than have it placed on the backs of their children. And there was our Secretary of Health and Human Services, Dr. Otis Bowen, working tirelessly to bring this achievement about.

The enduring friendship between the American and Canadian peoples is based on our similar aspirations for liberty, justice, individual rights, and democratic values. Our governments differ in form but embody these same principles. Bound by a common vision of the future, the United States and Canada are working together to fulfill international responsibilities in the defense of freedom and lasting peace throughout the world.

Our friendship is reflected as well in our extensive trade with each other. Canada and the United States are each other's most important trading partners. We also have the world's largest bilateral trading relationship, and the recently signed Free Trade Agreement, when implemented, will increase prosperity in both our countries and further strengthen the close ties we enjoy.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 1st day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and twelfth.

Emergency Board No. 213 today submitted its report to the President concerning a dispute between the Chicago and North Western Transportation Company and certain of its employees represented by the United Transportation Union.

The central issue in dispute concerned the number of train service-employees that shall be used on each crew employed in road, freight, and yard service operations. The North Western had sought to revise agreements to permit it the unrestricted right to determine when and if any train-service employees shall be used on a train. The union rejected such a demand. It proposed that the standard crew consist of not less than one conductor and one foreman and two helpers in yard service. Further, the union contended that in no event should a minimum crew consist of less than one conductor/foreman and one brakeman/helper.

Fourth of July weekend, we Americans will, as we do each year at this time, raise Old Glory a little higher, cheer fireworks, and remember the blessing we share as citizens of this great and free land. And as we celebrate our independence and pause to give thanks for our liberty, let us also remember that the freedoms we cherish are never more than a generation away from extinction. It's up to each of us to preserve, protect, and defend America's precious heritage.

Some Americans have done just that on the battlefield; but all of us can do it each and every day. We can vote at election time. We can volunteer to help political campaigns for the candidates of our choice, as well as volunteer for work that's needed around our community. And we can simply raise our children well, do our jobs well, and live in God's light.

One man who has contributed more than his share to our country left government service this week. For a year and a half, Howard Baker has been my Chief of Staff here at the White House. He's served with great distinction, helping me guide important legislation through Congress, as well as helping me at the summits with Mr. Gorbachev in Washington and Moscow. Serving with distinction is nothing new for Howard Baker. He did it for almost two decades in the United States Senate, the last 4 years as majority leader. I know I'll miss him around the White House. So, Howard, good luck to you and your lovely wife, Joy.

In the months ahead I'll be helped by a new Chief of Staff, Kenneth Duberstein. It won't be a big change for Ken. He's moving from his old office, where he's worked as the number two man on my staff and as Howard's partner since early last year, to the one next door. And that's good, because we won't have time just to settle in.

Yes, we have a lot of work to do and a big agenda that we got down to business on this week. On Friday, with Members of Congress looking on, I signed the Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act into law. At the ceremony, I noted that almost a year and a half ago I had said we should remove a financial specter facing our older Americans: the fear of an illness requiring acute care so expensive that it can result in having to choose between bankruptcy and death. Shortly after that, our administration submitted a bill to Congress to help free the elderly from the fear of catastrophic illness. Now a version of that bill is law. As I said Friday, we still must face challenges if this law, as Congress finally enacted it, is to work; but we can all be grateful that a burden has been lifted from the shoulders and minds of the elderly all over America.

By the way, as I signed the Catastrophic Coverage Act into law, I couldn't help thinking how much we Americans have done in the last few years. Today our economy is strong and growing. Our belief in peace through strength, which we kept despite many protests in Congress and elsewhere, is paying off. The first treaty ever to eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles has been signed. And there is, all the way around, a new realism in our relations with the Soviet bloc.

But despite these accomplishments, I believe our eyes should be on the future and the accomplishments we have still to achieve. For example, congressional approval of the free trade agreement that we negotiated with Canada will help the entire North American economy grow and create vast numbers of new jobs well into the next century. Throughout our history, whenever trade barriers have been lowered in North America, we've had a blooming of economic growth. We owe it to our children to cultivate for another time of flowering and approve this agreement.

That's why when I visited Toronto recently for the economic summit of the major industrial nations, I was particularly pleased by one action the summit nations took. It's called the Bush initiative. For it, thank Vice President Bush and Canada's Prime Minister Brian Mulroney. Not long ago, these two leaders decided that the best new place to hit the drug trade was in its most vulnerable spot: money laundering. Now that's what all the major industrial nations are going to do.

Yes, our nation's agenda is full, whether it's keeping our defenses strong or cutting unnecessary spending; getting Congress to pass a welfare reform bill that requires work; and trade legislation that will open, not close, markets; or helping freedom fighters around the world. But that's what democracy is all about -- a big agenda, America's agenda, for all of us to work on together, to build a bright tomorrow for our blessed land. Here at the White House, our sleeves are rolled up, and we're hard at work on our agenda for the future.

I am saddened to report that it appears that in a proper defensive action by the U.S.S. Vincennes this morning in the Persian Gulf an Iranian airliner was shot down over the Strait of Hormuz. This is a terrible human tragedy. Our sympathy and condolences go out to the passengers, crew, and their families. The Defense Department will conduct a full investigation.

We deeply regret any loss of life. The course of the Iranian civilian airliner was such that it was headed directly for the U.S.S. Vincennes, which was at the time engaged with five Iranian Boghammar boats that had attacked our forces. When the aircraft failed to heed repeated warnings, the Vincennes followed standing orders and widely publicized procedures, firing to protect itself against possible attack.

As the VINCENNES and MONTGOMERY were approaching the group of Iranian small boats at approximately 1042 local time, at least four of the small boats turned toward and began closing in on the American warships. At this time, both American ships opened fire on the small craft, sinking two and damaging a third. Regrettably, in the course of the U.S. response to the Iranian attack, an Iranian civilian airliner was shot down by the VINCENNES, which was firing in self defense at what it believed to be a hostile Iranian military aircraft. We deeply regret the tragic loss of life that occurred. The Defense Department will conduct a full investigation.

The actions of U.S. forces in response to being attacked by Iranian small boats were taken in accordance with our inherent right of self-defense, as recognized in Article 51 of the United Nations Charter, and pursuant to my constitutional authority with respect to the conduct of foreign relations and as Commander in Chief. There has been no further hostile action by Iranian forces, and, although U.S. forces will remain prepared to take additional defensive action to protect our units and military personnel, we regard this incident as closed. U.S. forces suffered no casualties or damage.

We remember how the liberals used the sign of failure to tell us that America needed more of their old, bitter medicine. Imagine, less than a decade ago, some in this town were saying seriously that the way to make America grow and the way to get people back to work harder was to raise taxes. And we remember that somehow our leaders had lost sight of a faith, a basic fundamental faith, that has guided Americans since that day more than 200 years ago when a small group of men, meeting in Philadelphia, signed their names to a document that began, ``We, the people.'' Yes, it was a faith in the people they had lost, a faith in the basic goodness, decency, and wisdom of the American people and what our founders called the American experiment.

We conservatives brought that faith back to Washington. And today America's in the longest economic peacetime expansion on record. More people have been at work this year than ever before on record. We are in an entrepreneurial boom unlike any the world has ever seen. That boom has produced a technological flowering that is unmatched not only in the world but in world history.

Conservative writer George Gilder has pointed out that in the entire Industrial Revolution productivity increased by a factor of 100. Already microelectronics have skyrocketed the productivity of information-based industries by more than a million. No wonder America is exporting more than ever this year, and no wonder that when you look at the potential employment pool in the United States -- and that's everyone, male and female, 16 years of age and up -- think of it, everybody in the United States over the age of 16, including retirees and everything else, that pool, the proportion of it that is at work is higher than ever before in our history -- 63.6 percent of them are employed.

Well, it's meant an administration that is fighting for the rights of families, for the rights of parents to protect their children from the evils of drugs and pornography, and for the rights of the unborn. It's meant waging still other unfinished battles to put work into our welfare system, to make choice a part of our system of education, and to allow God back into our classrooms. He never should have been expelled in the first place.

And it's meant, around the world, an America that once again stands up for its principles, that has embraced a forward strategy for freedom, that will proclaim the gospel of democracy and liberty from every mountaintop, and that in this world, this dangerous place, knows that the one road, the only road, to peace is through American strength.

We've come so far. Who would have believed when I took the oath of office 7\1/2\ years ago that, almost for the first time since the end of the Second World War, the Soviet Union would today be pulling out of a nation, Afghanistan, and not clothed in victory?

Yet how other than liberal would you characterize a Governor who, in the last 5 years, increased his State's spending twice as fast as the Federal Government's and more than a third faster than the average for all the other States? You know it's bad when a State legislative leader in his own party says, ``There hasn't been any will to control spending'' in the Governor's administration.

Yes, all that the American people need to do is a little comparison shopping to see the truth. Our opponents' candidate has fought for weekend furloughs for dangerous convicts, including drug dealers. Our candidate has led the fight against drug smugglers. Their candidate favors abortion on demand; our candidate is prolife. Their candidate has opposed requiring the Pledge of Allegiance and allowing prayer in schools. Our candidate -- well, he and I both find it hard to believe that anyone could take these positions.

Yes, this is the kind of man I want to follow me, someone who'll take our battle forward, who will speak our gospel truly, and will do the work that is yet to be done. When the Chief Justice asks the next President to solemnly swear to preserve, protect, and defend the Constitution of the United States, the man I want taking that oath is President George Bush.

My friends, we have -- you and I -- given America a new era of hope, a new age of promise, and a new dawn of opportunity. Around the world people look to our nation and what it stands for today. Dare we turn back? Dare we sit on our hands? And how do we tell the freedom fighters that America will no longer care? How do we tell all those who pray for peace that the policies that brought the first agreement to reduce and eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles are policies of the past? And at home, how do we tell the millions who have escaped poverty in record numbers that our nation will return to the policies of the seventies, policies that sent the poverty rate soaring? And how much attention has been given to the fact that for the first time in all these years the number of people living under the poverty line is going down instead of every year going up? How do we tell families that those who sat in the Nation's driver's seat in the late seventies are back behind the wheel?

Several years ago, I said to you that we could spark a great prairie fire that would sweep across this nation and the world. Well, by golly, we have! Others would like to extinguish the flame of hope, but if we stand together, it won't happen. America will know a new morning of growth, and the world will know a new birth of freedom.

So, it's up to us. In reality, it's up to you. We've got to send our man there to the White House, yes, but also let's send him what you sent me when I first came here. It's gone now, after 6 years, but that was a Senate, one House of the Congress. The House of Representatives has been in the Democrats' hands for all but 4 of 56 years. And one Democratic President had a Republican Congress for 2 years -- Harry Truman. One Republican President had a Republican Congress for 2 years -- Dwight Eisenhower. Then I did have, fortunately, those 6 years with one House at least. And without it we never could have attained all that we did in our economic recovery or in our buildup of strength, and that's very evident in what is going on now in these 2 years where they're back in control in both Houses.

So, let's send a President who's saying the things we believe, and then let's see if we can't send a lot of people up here with him that will not be working against his doing those things that he told us he wanted to do. Well, I know I can depend on you, and thank you all very much. God bless you all.

President is very pleased by the selection of the United States as the host country for the 1994 World Cup Soccer matches. The United States stands ready to support the 1994 World Cup tournament and to help make it a great success, one which advances the sport not only here but around the world. The President welcomes the tournament to the United States and on behalf of all Americans extends his appreciation to the Federation Internationale de Football Association (FIFA) for bestowing the United States with the honor of hosting this special event.

I accept with regret Attorney General Meese's determination to step down. As the Attorney General said in his press conference today, he can look back with great satisfaction on the contribution he has made to the Department and to the administration of justice in general.

For more than two decades now, Ed has been a good friend and a close adviser. His gift for developing and succinctly summarizing policy options is one of the most unique I have encountered in my experience in government. Ed Meese has served the American people loyally and well. He has led the Department of Justice with courage and vigor, and his work on public policy has resulted in many outstanding accomplishments. Nancy and I wish him and Ursula all the best in their return to private life.

They have been good friends and associates for many years. President Reagan feels he has been an outstanding Attorney General, who has led the Department with courage and vigor during his tenure. The President wishes him all the best in private life.

President Bush visited with President Duarte of El Salvador, his wife and son from approximately 4:20 to 4:35 p.m. President Reagan offered President Duarte a U.S. Government plane for his return home to El Salvador. President Duarte accepted. President Reagan also invited President Duarte to the White House for a visit before departing Washington. President Duarte said he would like to if it's possible. There is no word on when President Duarte may leave the hospital.

Hospital, who is a patient. President Reagan and Vice President Bush were notified by Chief of Staff Ken Duberstein of the Attorney General's public resignation announcement as they were leaving the general's hospital room.

Vice President Bush and discussed what's right about America. And the answer is: a lot. You'll be hearing a lot more from us in the coming months. Today we have another piece of good news: Employment is at an all-time high, and unemployment is the lowest since 1974.

During the past 7\1/2\ years, over 17 million new jobs have been created, and the economy remains strong. More Americans are working today than ever before in our history. As they sit around their kitchen tables, more Americans are planning for their future, not desperately searching the want ads for a job.

We continue the longest peacetime expansion in this country's history. The American model of low tax rates, deregulation, and privatization are the policies being emulated around the world. Today's news is more solid evidence that the policies of this administration work, that our philosophy works. I predict that 1988 will be a banner year for Republicans because it's a banner year for peace and prosperity in America.

I am called away by a previously scheduled meeting, but Secretary McLaughlin is here with me and is kindly going to take the questions, and probably she'll answer them better with regard to the labor situation than I could.

While my Administration and Members of the Congress may not agree with every recommendation of the Council, the report provides a constructive review of activities and issues related to adult education.

Office of Foreign Assets Control of the Department of the Treasury have been amended twice (attached). The first set of amendments to the Regulations, published in the Federal Register at 53 FR 5571 (February 25, 1988), affect sections 550.304 and 550.406. Section 550.304 was modified to correct an inadvertent deletion from the definition section. It now states that the Secretary of the Treasury may designate any person or organization to be included in the definition of ``Government of Libya,'' and that a juridical person will not be included within the definition solely because it is located or organized or has its principal place of business in Libya. Section 550.406 was modified to conform to the interpretation of the Office of Foreign Assets Control that the prohibition on dealing in property in which the Government of Libya has an interest applies to any transaction by U.S. persons worldwide.

Licensing actions occurring during the past 6 months included reinstituting reporting requirements for U.S. oil companies holding suspense agreements with Libya. In addition, two immediate family members of Libyan nationals registered their eligibility to enter into transactions related to residence within Libya. Two licenses were extended that authorize U.S. persons to obtain services in connection with Libyan patent, trademark, copyright, and other intellectual property protection.

Litigation is pending in an English court, involving claims by Libya seeking the release of funds blocked in the London branches of Bankers Trust Company and Manufacturers Hanover Trust Company. The United States Government is not a party to the three cases, but is closely monitoring the proceedings. Hearings on a Libyan request for summary judgment in the first of these cases are scheduled to take place on July 12, 1988.

Columbia Circuit entered a per curiam order affirming the opinion of the District Court finding in favor of the United States in the case of Louis Farrakhan, et al. v. Reagan, et al. In that action, plaintiffs unsuccessfully challenged aspects of the Libyan Sanctions Regulations on grounds that they impermissibly infringed First Amendment rights of the plaintiffs.

President is dismayed at the precipitate action taken by the Senate yesterday evening banning the sale of Maverick D&G missiles to Kuwait. These missiles are an integral part of the pending $2 billion sale of F - 18 aircraft to Kuwait. The Senate action, taken in a matter of minutes without the benefit of committee hearings or deliberation, is unfortunate and damaging to U.S. foreign policy interests.

Kuwait is a moderate state that has stood fast in the face of threats and intimidation to its security and survival. It has actively supported our efforts, diplomatic and military, in the Gulf region. A stable, secure Kuwait serves the national security interest of the United States. Kuwait has come to the United States and asked, as a friend, for the legitimate and necessary tools to provide for its own defense and to share with us the defense of the vital Persian Gulf. Congress has repeatedly asked what the Gulf States are doing for their own defense. Kuwait has answered that they wish to do more and have indicated their preference to work with us in doing so, yet some in the Senate apparently wish to reject this request and have Kuwait turn elsewhere.

Kuwaiti request for F - 18's and the weapons that normally go with them deserves serious consideration by the Senate. The administration stands ready to work with Congress during the remaining weeks of the formal notification period in its examination of this sale. We would welcome Senate hearings to explore the implications and justification for the sale and to consult fully with the Congress on this critical issue.

I approved policy guidance on illegal drug use and drug trafficking to be used by my negotiators in the bipartisan executive-legislative task force. I am directing them to focus on the illegal drug user, tougher laws, enhanced treatment, increased international cooperation, helping us track demand and supply-reduction activities, and heightening awareness and prevention.

Much has already been done, but there is much more to do. The task force offers us the rare opportunity to lift the battle above politics, to make broad progress with bipartisan policy. Now is the time for the Democratic leadership in the Congress to appoint their representatives to the task force -- no more excuses, no more delays.

I want to tell you about some new antidrug initiatives. But first, with the announcement by Ed Meese -- now that his name has been cleared -- that he'll be returning to private life this summer, I'd like to take a minute to recognize a public servant of dedication and integrity, who's been a close friend for over 20 years.

General, Ed Meese worked for stricter sentencing to put dangerous criminals behind bars and also for greater resources for drug enforcement and to fight organized crime. And in a system usually focused on the criminal, he never forgot the victims of crime or their rights.

Attorney General, Ed Meese led our effort to appoint highly qualified Federal judges who would crack down on crime and also faithfully interpret the Constitution. He led our Justice Department as it aggressively defended civil rights. In fact, this administration has achieved more convictions for civil rights violations than any previous administration.

In fighting terrorism, Attorney General Meese worked closely with our allies to detect, apprehend, and prosecute those who wage war on innocent members of free societies. And in our campaign against the menace of illegal drugs, Ed Meese has been a central figure, serving as Chairman of the National Drug Policy Board.

Now let me turn to our antidrug efforts. I believe that drug testing is a key tool to help promote public safety and a drug-free work force. In fact, to set a good example, White House employees were informed yesterday that random drug testing would begin in 60 days. I hope the White House program will encourage increased testing programs in the private sector.

In addition, as I mentioned earlier, I have just approved a new set of drug abuse policy recommendations. These proposals send a strong message to drug traffickers and illegal drug users that we have zero tolerance for those who sell or use illegal drugs. For example, we would require businesses and colleges that receive Federal funds to adopt effective antidrug programs. For pregnant women who use illegal drugs, there should be priority treatment to help them and their unborn children. We would give the military a greater role in coordination with our drug enforcement agencies. Criminals on probation or parole would be drug tested, and testing positive might send them right back to jail. And yes, for those who commit drug-related murders or kill law officers, we favor a Federal death penalty.

In May I proposed that both Houses of Congress, both sides of the aisle, join together with our administration in a bipartisan executive-legislative task force to advance America's unified antidrug policy. I proposed this task force for a simple reason: If we're going to get the drugs out of our schools, we need to get the politics out of drugs. And fortunately, on the drug issue there is near-unanimous agreement. I can tell you that was not the case 7 years ago, but it is today.

This is my final year in office, and I believe that partisan bickering or seeking political advantage can only delay our progress in working to achieve a drug free America. Yesterday I gave a set of policy proposals to my representatives to the executive-legislative task force. I hope that the Democratic leaders in Congress will now join in this united effort. The time for excuses and delays is long past. I hope that through this task force we all can come together and work in good faith for the good of this country.

Conditions. As provided by Section 9A(c) of the Act, from the date of the creation of the board and for 120 days thereafter, no change, except by agreement of the parties, shall be made by the carrier or the employees in the conditions out of which the dispute arose.

The President. I think that they have tied that to our feelings about the Government and what it did with regard to our people in the Embassy there when the Ayatollah came in. And I want to make it plain that there's certainly going to be no compensation for the Government of Iran or anything of that kind, because we don't feel that any such thing is called for. But as I've said, I think we all can have compassion for the innocent people who were the victims.

President has reviewed U.S. policy in the Persian Gulf, where our military forces are protecting vital interests of the free world. He has expressed his complete satisfaction with the policy and reiterated his belief that the actions of the U.S.S. Vincennes on July 3 in the case of the Iranian airliner were justifiable defensive actions. At the same time, he remains personally saddened at the tragic death of the innocent victims of this accident and has already expressed his deep regret to their families.

Prompted by the humanitarian traditions of our nation, the President has decided that the United States will offer compensation on an ex gratia basis to the families of the victims who died in the Iranian airliner incident. Details concerning amounts, timing, and other matters remain to be worked out. It should be clearly understood that payment will go to the families, not governments, and will be subject to the normal U.S. legal requirements, including, if necessary, appropriate action by Congress. In the case of Iran, arrangements will be made through appropriate third parties. This offer of ex gratia compensation is consistent with international practice and is a humanitarian effort to ease the hardship of the families. It is offered on a voluntary basis, not on the basis of any legal liability or obligation.

The responsibility for this tragic incident, and for the deaths of hundreds of thousands of other innocent victims as a result of the Iran-Iraq war, lies with those who refuse to end the conflict. A particularly heavy burden of responsibility rests with the Government of Iran, which has refused for almost a year to accept and implement Security Council Resolution 598 while it continues unprovoked attacks on innocent neutral shipping and crews in the international waters of the Gulf.

In fact, at the time of the Iran Air incident, U.S. forces were militarily engaged with Iranian forces as a result of the latter's unprovoked attacks upon neutral ships and a U.S. Navy helicopter. The urgent necessity to end this conflict is reinforced by the dangers it poses to neighboring countries and the deplorable precedent of the increasingly frequent use of chemical weapons by both sides, causing still more casualties.

Only an end to the war, an objective we desire, can halt the immense suffering in the region and put an end to innocent loss of life. Our goal is peace in the Gulf and on land. We urge Iran and Iraq to work with the Security Council for an urgent comprehensive settlement of the war pursuant to Resolution 598. Meanwhile, United States forces will continue their mission in the area, keenly aware of the risks involved and ready to face them.

Ladies and gentlemen, the first order of business tonight is for me to express my deep gratitude to each of you for coming here to help make possible a matter of national importance: the election of Dave Karnes to the United States Senate.

But greetings to the members of the Nebraska congressional delegation with us tonight -- Congressman Doug Bereuter of the First District, Congressman Hal Daub of the Second District, and Congresswoman Virginia Smith of the Third District -- and to Governor Kay Orr, who will view this wonderful event on television back in Nebraska. Kay, I just have the feeling that, come election day, the people of Nebraska are going to confirm your wisdom in appointing Dave Karnes to the Senate. And special greetings, of course, to Dave's wonderful wife, Liz, and to their daughters -- I see the four of them right here -- Korey, Kalen, Kara, and Laurel. I don't know whether a romance between a man in his seventies and a little girl of four has much of a future -- [laughter] -- but when I said hello to Laurel just a few moments ago, well, I took one look into those big brown eyes and just plain lost my heart.

But we came here this evening to talk business, and that's just what we'll do. Back in 1980 America faced a crisis. We had all the usual trappings of government, but no real leadership. It was sort of like one of my favorite stories. This had to do with a fellow that applied to the zoo for a job. And they interviewed him and all and finally told him, yes, he could have the job. And when he came in in the morning, they said, ``But I tell you, we lost our ape, and you'll have to take his place in this ape suit just until the next one arrives that we've sent for.

And then you'll be at your regular job here in the zoo.'' Well, he got into the suit, and they said, ``You just get in the cage and just kind of move around. There's a rope in there you can swing on and stuff and entertain the children.'' [Laughter] So, he did.

Well, he kind of got carried away with it after a while, with the children all looking at him and so forth. And finally he was swinging on that rope, and he swung too far -- up over the top of the cage and dropped into the lion's cage.

Well, as I said, America faced a crisis. The month when George Bush and I took our oath of office, inflation stood in double digits. The prime interest rate hit the highest point since the Civil War. And economic growth was disappearing. It didn't matter where you came from, whether you were a man or a woman or black or white, if you'd scrimped and struggled and saved to send your children to college, the 12.4 percent inflation rate was slamming shut the doors of opportunity. If you had a dream of owning your own home, inflation and interest rates were closing those doors of opportunity. And for working men and women who needed loans to start their own business and for farmers who needed loans to plant their crops, 21\1/2\ percent prime interest rates were closing the doors on their dreams too.

Perhaps many of you didn't realize, paying your income tax in those inflationary days, that your purchasing power was going down; your money was worth less. But because the numbers of dollars were increasing -- if you were getting adjusted somehow that way, your tax was based on the number of dollars, not on their value. And so, the Government profited, and you were worse off than you were before you got, say, a cost of living increase.

Well, today our nation has one big program to help every American man, woman, and child; and it's called economic recovery. In foreign policy, we've let the world know once again that America stands for political, religious, and economic freedom of mankind. And by restoring both our military strength and a firm sense of national purpose, we've achieved an historic agreement with the Soviet Union: the INF treaty. This treaty eliminates an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles for the first time ever.

Back to higher taxes. Now, I know that other fellow claims he won't raise taxes. The truth is he just did. And not only has he hiked taxes as Governor of Massachusetts but in the last 5 years he's increased Massachusetts State spending at double the rate of Federal spending. He spent every dime and more of the revenue generated in his State by the Reagan-Bush recovery.

Back to weaker defenses -- the likely Democratic nominee has proposed cut after cut in the Pentagon budget, cuts that would undermine or eliminate crucial systems and lower morale among our men and women in uniform. Of course, that other fellow is trying to make it look as though he's for a strong defense, but when it comes to defense, the Democratic nominee is a sheep in wolf's clothing.

The way forward is the way of low taxes. And believe it or not, with our tax cuts, the total revenues the Government obtained from those lower rates began to go up and is still doing that. The way forward is, as I say, low taxes, high growth. And it's the way of a strong America, dedicated to the expansion of human freedom. It's the way of Republicans like George Bush and Dave Karnes. We need to have a Republican Senate so that our accomplishments of the last 7\1/2\ years will not be undone. You know that many of our achievements came when we had our fellows in control of the Senate -- just that one House. Well, I want to help George Bush have a Senate that he can work with.

Karnes has already proven that he's a winner. He was 1 of 15 Americans selected from more than 18,000 who sought application to serve as a White House fellow in 1981. Impressed with Dave Karnes' performance, the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development asked him to stay on as Executive Assistant to the Under Secretary. He's been a member of this administration, and I must say we were proud to have him. And now, during his time in the Senate, he's stood with us on vote after vote, working to keep America strong and our economy growing.

Given his background -- Dave manages the family farm and continues to do so even to this day -- it's no surprise that Dave has taken the lead on crucial farm legislation. He's promoted farm legislation that's fiscally responsible, market-oriented, and fair. And he's worked tirelessly to help our rural communities. And Dave is absolutely determined to see to it that America's family farms -- and, yes, the values they represent -- will be there for future generations.

Family farms and the values they represent -- this brings me to the subject that's perhaps most distinguished Dave Karnes in the United States Senate: his unshakable commitment to family values. Dave has pressed for innovative measures in education. As the father of four daughters, and with Liz's interest in education -- she's on the school board in Omaha and worked for Barbara Bush on literacy projects -- education is high on Dave's list of priorities.

I know this is going to be a tough campaign, and so does Dave Karnes. And that's why we need your help. But I do want to let you know that the momentum is on Dave's side. He was down in the polls when this campaign first began -- down by some 40 percent. But the people of Nebraska have gotten to know Dave Karnes, and they've grown to like him. And the latest poll, taken by Dave's opponent, shows that he is closing fast.

That's the kind of spirit I like. You know, it reminds me of reading about a poll about another candidate in January 1980. [Laughter] It was taken at the National Press Club luncheon here in Washington on the eve of the primary season. Jimmy Carter got a large number of votes, and so did Teddy Kennedy. But there was one candidate on the Republican side who got so few votes from the wise men of Washington that it wasn't even reported in the lineup. I'm not going to tell you who that was -- [laughter] -- his initials happen to be RR. So, I have a hunch that being underestimated could turn out to be Dave's secret weapon. What it comes down to is this: The people of Nebraska can count on Senator Dave Karnes to defend freedom, to defend America, to defend the American taxpayer, and to defend the American family.

It's like I said at the beginning: When it comes to the next Senator from the great State of Nebraska, the best man, Dave Karnes, is already on the job. He's exactly the opposite of a Democratic State senator in California when I was Governor. We came to a year in which we had a surplus of $850 million, and the question was what to do with it. And I said, let's give it back. And we did. We worked out a system to give it all back to the people. And one day, that Democratic senator stormed into my office, and he expressed the philosophy of his party. He said, ``Giving that money back -- that's an unnecessary expenditure of public funds.'' [Laughter] So, that's the way they think about it. When I said earlier, tax and tax, and spend and spend, that isn't something we invented.

Thornburgh's extensive law enforcement experience and proven integrity, along with his familiarity with the Department of Justice, clearly meet my criteria for filling this important post. Dick Thornburgh was a prosecutor's prosecutor for 6 years as the United States Attorney for Western Pennsylvania, a tough-minded crime buster winning an unprecedented number of convictions for corruption and against members of organized crime. While at the Department of Justice, he founded the public integrity section, which investigates and prosecutes corrupt Federal, State, and local officials. He served 2 years as the head of the criminal division and briefly as Acting Deputy Attorney General.

Dick proved himself an able manager while serving as Governor of Pennsylvania, our fourth largest State. And there he reinstituted the death penalty and won tough, mandatory jail terms for violent and repeat criminals. He was in the forefront of the war against drugs, cracking down on drug traffickers and creating preventive education programs for Pennsylvania's school children. At the end of his term, the State's serious crime rate had dropped 17 percent.

I could count on him then, and I'm turning to him now, an intelligent and knowledgeable man, an experienced prosecutor, alumnus of the Justice Department, and former Governor. He said once that ``The first civil right of all Americans is the right to be free from fear in our homes, on our streets, and in our communities.'' Nothing could be more true, and that cause could have no greater champion than Dick Thornburgh.

He is the ideal choice for Attorney General, and I urge the Senate to move quickly to confirm him as well as our other Justice Department nominees so that they can roll up their sleeves and get back to work -- or get to work enforcing the laws of the land.

Thornburgh. Thank you, Mr. President. I want to extend my appreciation to you for extending to me the great honor and privilege of your appointment as Attorney General of the United States. It's a challenge that I accept. I look forward to returning to the Department of Justice, where I served a very fulfilling and fruitful 8 years of my career as a United States attorney and as Assistant Attorney General in charge of the Criminal Division.

I look forward as well to helping to implement the priorities of the Reagan-Bush administration, especially in the field of law enforcement and administration of criminal justice. I'm confident that the experience I had as Governor for 8 years of one of our major States will serve me and you and the people of this country well in accepting this challenge, and I appreciate it very much.

Thornburgh. I think the major challenge of the Attorney General at any period of time is to provide the leadership to the law enforcement community nationwide that is necessary to keep up a relentless war on problems such as organized crime, drug trafficking, official corruption -- the major priorities that the Federal law enforcement establishment is involved in.

Thornburgh. Oh, I think it's important to look forward rather than back, and that will certainly be my viewpoint if I'm confirmed. And I think what we will try to do is to carry out a full-bore effort in the law enforcement area.

In looking forward, just exactly how much do you expect to accomplish in advancing the priorities over the next 6 months? Or do you expect to remain in the post if the Vice President wins in November?

Governor, do you feel that you will have to look into the Meese affair because there are still unanswered questions about his ethical conduct -- about whether or not there was something involved with the Israeli pipeline?

Thornburgh. I'm not going to express any opinion today on the basis of the information I have. I think in due course I'll have the obligation. And the Senate, through its Judiciary Committee, will have the responsibility to question me at length, as they should, on my views on any substantive matters that affect them.

But wait a minute. The Attorney General played an important role in this administration in suggesting that this President veto a number of civil rights bills. There is an important housing -- the fair housing bill that's going to come to the President's desk. Do you expect to play a role similar to Mr. Meese's as a counselor to the President on recommending issues? And do you think your views will differ with Mr. Meese at all?

The President. Your Highness, it's been an honor to meet with you today and discuss the many important issues that concern our two countries. I value the opportunity to exchange views and ideas with a leader of your wisdom and experience.

Our two great countries share a long history of friendship and cooperation. Never have our relations been stronger than they are today. During the past year, we've worked together successfully to help defend the safe passage of neutral shipping through the vital waters of the Gulf. Together we've taken steps to preserve the crucial principle of free navigation that we both believe in. Your support for our naval forces engaged in this mission has been crucial to their success.

Kuwait is respected throughout the world for its moderation, skillful diplomacy, strong and principled stance against terrorism, and commitment to seeking negotiated solutions to international disputes. Despite your preference for diplomacy, you've known how to stand firm against intimidation and prevent the Iran-Iraq war from compromising your independence. All Americans salute your steadfastness and resolve. We've been glad to assist you, including cooperation in Kuwait's program for upgrading its defenses against increasing threats. In this connection, I strongly support your request for F - 18 aircraft and accompanying weapons now pending before the Congress.

We've also been pleased to join you in a broad international campaign to bring Iran and Iraq to the bargaining table. The horror of this terrible, tragic war and its hundreds of thousands of innocent victims seems to have no end. It's a continuing threat to your region and an object of revulsion for the international community. The time has come to act. Today, in our talks, we have rededicated ourselves to seeking a prompt negotiated end to this human catastrophe based upon urgent acceptance and full implementation of United Nations Security Council Resolution 598.

In our discussions today, we also reaffirmed the urgent need for a just and lasting resolution of the Palestinian problem. The United States will continue to work actively in the pursuit of a comprehensive peace that would realize the legitimate political aspirations of Palestinians while safeguarding the legitimate security concerns of Israel. None of us can afford diplomatic stalemate, from which only extremists on all sides will benefit.

Highness, the peoples of Kuwait and the United States have developed common interests and lasting ties. The bonds that join us have never been closer. The social, economic, political, and security interests we share have never been greater. Our meeting today has sent a powerful signal to the world of the value the United States places on Kuwait's friendship. I wish you well during the remainder of your stay in the United States, and I sincerely hope your contacts with my countrymen will broaden and deepen the mutually beneficial relationship between us.

The Prime Minister. Mr. President, it gives me great pleasure to express to you my most sincere thanks for the gracious invitation which you have extended to me to visit your great country, a visit during which I had the pleasure of meeting and discussing with you a number of topics of mutual concern to both our friendly nations. The visit has also provided me with a good opportunity to meet with officials in your administration and the Congress, as well as the friendly American people. While expressing my warm appreciation for your kind words about my country, Kuwait, it gives me great pleasure to convey to you and to the American people the warmest sentiments of cordial friendship from His Highness, the Amir; the Government; and people of Kuwait.

President, the comprehensive, far-reaching, and positive nature that has marked our talks today reflects the advanced and ever-developing level which has been achieved in our mutual relationship. Our talks have also revealed identical views in addressing the great potential for the continued development of cooperation and friendship between the United States and Kuwait. This gives us yet greater confidence in the future of our relationship. Our common and solid belief in spiritual values, human principles, and norms controlling relations between nations and peoples constitute, in our opinion, the proper framework for the development of our relations.

We in Kuwait have high admiration for the values and principles upon which, and for which, your great country was founded; and we also appreciate the remarkable achievements of the American people in various fields of human endeavor and progress. Furthermore, we appreciate the effective role of the United States as a superpower in resolving issues of world peace and security, as well as its keen interest in seeking suitable solutions to international problems.

Regarding our region, we especially value all that the United States has done and is doing towards bringing an end to the Iraq-Iran war, and for safeguarding international navigation in the Arabian Gulf. Your support has won the gratitude of the Government and people of Kuwait. Your stance reflects the depth of the ties of friendship between us.

We hope that such efforts will continue and will lead to a just and lasting peace. And as the Palestinian question is the core of the conflict in the Middle East, we are confident that the recognition of the national legitimate rights of the Palestinian people and the necessity of their participation, represented by the Palestine Liberation Organization, in any future efforts to attain this noble goal are essential requirements for peace in this region.

Mr. President, I should like to reemphasize that we in Kuwait highly value the friendly backing of your nation in our firm stand against all acts of terrorism, which have been repeatedly directed at our country and people in the last few years. Such support by you and your friendly people has strengthened our resolve and determination to stand firm against these atrocious acts.

Both sides have agreed that there will be a 50-percent reduction in throwweight for Soviet missiles. There is also agreement on a counting rule for heavy bomber armaments and on elements of a verification regime that will include several kinds of on-site inspection, data exchange, and measures to reduce the possibility of cheating. The negotiators have worked out a joint draft treaty text that records extensive and significant areas of agreement, as well as remaining areas of disagreement.

In the defense and space forum, we seek agreement on how the United States and Soviet Union can jointly manage a stable transition to increasing reliance on effective defenses, should they prove feasible, which threaten no one. Our negotiators will work on a joint draft text of a separate agreement on defense and space issues, reflecting the principles General Secretary Gorbachev and I outlined at the Washington summit in December 1987.

At the outset of the defense and space talks, few expected that we could have come as far as we have. Our SDI program has provided an important incentive for the Soviets to negotiate seriously. It is also our best hope for a safer world. We have made clear to the Soviets that we will not bargain SDI away nor accept any provisions that would cripple our research, development, and testing program, which is in full compliance with the ABM treaty.

Soviets identified some common ground with respect to concepts for verification of mobile missiles -- should they be permitted in a START treaty -- and on dealing with air-launched cruise missiles (ALCM's). It remains the U.S. position to seek a ban on mobile missiles unless effective verification provisions can be found for limitations on them.

The discussions in Moscow were a sound beginning, but much remains to be done, including translating areas of common ground into precise treaty language. Many other tough issues remain, however, including issues which affect the fundamental security interests of each side. A major one for the United States is the illegal Soviet radar at Krasnoyarsk.

Kampelman, Cooper, and Hanmer and their negotiating teams are returning to Geneva prepared to engage in the discussion and hard bargaining necessary to make headway and to achieve an agreement that meets the criteria we have set: deep reductions, greater strategic stability, and effective verification. Our goal is a good agreement in each area, not a quick one, and we will not take any shortcuts. We have already come a long way toward agreements that will strengthen our security and that of our allies. If the Soviets return to Geneva prepared to make further progress, much more can be achieved.

Well, honored guests and fellow Americans, today we mark the 30th commemoration of Captive Nations Week. Just 9 days ago, as America celebrated Independence Day, we reaffirmed the universal ideal on which this country is founded: a vision of liberty not just for one nation but for all nations. As Americans we speak out; we work for the freedom of others. And in doing so we remember who we are, what we have, and what America stands for in the world. For we know that to stop striving for the freedom of other nations could soon bring our own freedom into question.

But the tide has been turned. Despite decades of suffering, the will to freedom is alive. It has survived its tormentors. It will outlast the Communists. And truly, I can think of no time in my adult life when the prospects for freedom were brighter than they are today. The free world is strong and confident. The Communist idea is discredited and around the world new progressive forces are emerging as political change and liberation sweep the globe. America will continue to encourage the movement toward freedom, democracy, and reform by holding firm to our principles and speaking openly and truthfully about human rights and the fundamental moral difference between freedom and communism. And America shall light the path as the whole world climbs out of the dark abyss of tyranny to freedom.

And within the Soviet bloc there are hopeful signs. Just last week, a Soviet official speaking here at a conference on Eastern Europe said that ``The Brezhnev doctrine is completely unacceptable and unthinkable,'' citing ``the principles of sovereignty, noninterference, and mutual respect.'' Well, these are encouraging words that we hope will be proved true through deeds. There are few developments that would be more compelling than true self-determination for central Europe. I've spoken previously of how the Soviets can send that message very easily: Let them tear down the Berlin wall! And while America applauds the changes we are witnessing, the standards remain unchanged. And these are not standards arbitrarily applied from outside but what the Soviets themselves have formally agreed to. We continue to insist on full implementation of the Helsinki accords and the Universal Declaration of Human Rights.

Well, yes, true history is written in the hearts of people, and today, around the world, anti-Communist freedom fighters are making history and defining the direction of change for the entire world. The Afghan freedom fighters are authors of one of the great moments in human history, a symbol and an inspiration to freedom fighters everywhere. By standing with the Mujahidin as they fight for an independent and undivided Afghanistan, we're reaffirming our own belief in liberty and the indivisibility of freedom in this world.

Now, as you may recall, on this occasion last year, I spoke of Petro Ruban, a prisoner in one of the most notorious of the Soviet gulags. In 1976 the Ukrainian Helsinki monitor fashioned a wooden replica of our Statue of Liberty to be a gift to America on our Bicentennial, and for that he was taken away. Later he was arrested again for criticizing the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan and for demanding that his young son, who was crippled in an accident, be permitted to come to America for medical treatment.

When Marko got off the plane, his first words in his new country were, ``I want to be able to stand on my own two feet.'' In his hands he held something that he had labored on during the long plane trip from the Soviet Union. The boy whose father had been imprisoned for making a Statue of Liberty had embroidered Lady Liberty onto a towel. And I'm happy to be able to tell you that Petro Ruban was released from prison and just last night arrived in this country to be reunited with his family. Petro and Marko are with us here.

I have been told by Natan Scharanskiy, Armando Valladares, and others, that the words we speak in America and the words we broadcast around the world can be heard in the closed societies and remote dungeons of the Communist world. I want to say to the men and women within the captive nations who labor for truth and freedom that the American people hear you as well. We follow your struggle. We see your writings. We remember you in our prayers. We watch what happens to you. And whether it's Poland's Solidarity or Czechoslovakia's Charter 77, the Jazz Section, or Association of Friends with the United States, or Hungary's Free Democratic Union of Scientific Workers, or the Helsinki monitors, or many others, I can tell you, you're not forgotten.

When we look around the world, to Europe, Africa, Asia, and Latin America, we find that the bonds of language, faith, and kinship have not been replaced by a new order built on class struggle. The yearning for national independence has not been extinguished by the totalitarian state, and the tide of history has been revealed to all mankind to be a rising tide of freedom and national liberation.

On behalf of Vice President Bush and myself, this pledge we make to you, to all the peoples of the captive nations around the world: America will never forget your plight, and we will never cease to speak the truth. Your struggle is our struggle; your dream is our dream. And one day you will be free.

Captive Nations Week, we honor the courage, faith, and aspirations of the millions of people the world over who suffer under Soviet domination. They desire, seek, and deserve, as the common heritage of humanity, the liberty, justice, self-determination, and independence we Americans and all free peoples cherish. The citizens of the captive nations daily hear the mighty call of freedom and answer it boldly, sending an echo around the globe to remind totalitarians and all mankind that their voices cannot be quelled -- because they are the voices of the human spirit.

Last year's Captive Nations Week Proclamation mentioned four people in the Soviet Union imprisoned for their struggle for national rights. Now, 1 year later, two of them, both Helsinki human rights monitors, remain in internal exile -- Viktoras Petkus, a Lithuanian, and Lev Lukyanenko, a Ukrainian. Another, Helsinki monitor Mart Niklus, an Estonian, is still in a labor camp. The last, Gunars Astra, Latvia's highly respected national rights activist, was released in poor health earlier this year after 19 years in Soviet labor camps. He died several months ago at 56 years of age.

America is keenly aware of, and will continue to encourage, the great tide of democratic ideas that now sweeps the globe. We cannot forget decades of tragedy, the tens of millions of lives lost, or the enormity of the suffering inflicted on the innocent. We applaud the courage and faith that have sustained countless people and kept alive the dream of freedom against unthinkable odds. Despite starvation, torture, and murder, the indomitable human spirit will outlast all oppression. We continue to stand ready to cooperate in meeting the just aspirations of the oppressed and needy of the world. We will remain forever steadfast in our commitment to speak out for those who cannot, to seek justice for those to whom it is denied, and to assist freedom-seeking peoples everywhere.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this thirteenth day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

President today announced the creation of Presidential Emergency Board No. 215 to investigate and make recommendations for settlement of a current dispute between the Port Authority Trans-Hudson Corporation and employees represented by the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers.

President, by Executive order, created the emergency board pursuant to an appropriate request as mandated by the Railway Labor Act. The emergency board procedures of the Railway Labor Act applicable to commuter railroads provide that the board will report its findings and recommendations for settlement to the President within 30 days of its creation. The parties must then consider the recommendations of the emergency board and endeavor to resolve their differences without engaging in self-help during a subsequent 90-day period.

Monday I met with the congressional leadership to discuss the drought that has afflicted so many thousands of acres of our farmland and that has already touched so many Americans' lives. Tomorrow I'll be flying out to Illinois and Iowa to see the effects of the drought for myself. But when I heard that you were going to be here in Washington, I decided to take this day to meet with you, you who are in so many ways the leaders of American agriculture.

First, let me say our administration is committed to taking whatever actions are necessary to protect America's farmers from excessive losses during this drought. Already we've taken a number of actions.

We've formed an interagency drought policy committee to coordinate Federal action. The Army Corps of Engineers is working hard to keep traffic moving on the Mississippi River and elsewhere in spite of some of the lowest water levels in history. And in order to help livestock owners, Secretary Lyng has permitted grazing on set-aside lands. But needless to say, much more needs to be done.

And now is the time to start work on legislation to help the many crop farmers who will suffer substantial losses. At my direction, Secretary Lyng has been working closely with the leadership of the House and Senate Agriculture Committees in an effort to draft timely legislation. We've sought to make this a bipartisan effort, and so far I'm pleased by the cooperation that we've received.

Permit me to outline the five points we're seeking in this drought legislation. First, relief should go to those who need it most. Creating windfalls for some will mean less for the truly deserving. Second, many of our farmers purchased Federal crop insurance, a sound business decision. They should not be penalized relative to farmers who did not act with such prudence. Third, this legislation should not force farmers to do unreasonable things. No program should, for example, include any incentive for a farmer to plow under his crops. Fourth, drought relief spending has to be considered in the context of our efforts to reduce the Federal deficit; and according to the November 1987 bipartisan budget agreement that we reached with Congress, to put it very simply, we mustn't bust the budget. The automatic budget sequestration cuts that overspending triggers would take back from farmers with one hand what we're providing in drought relief with the other. And finally, this humanitarian assistance should not be used as a means to other ends. Extraneous matters, such as rewriting the existing farm bill, will only deter our efforts to provide this much-needed aid.

Now permit me to tell you just where our efforts stand. Yesterday, after long consultations with Secretary Lyng, bipartisan legislation that meets these goals was introduced in both the House and Senate.

And yet, even as the drought continues, we would do well to look beyond it to the long-range future of American agriculture. We all know that American farmers are more than competitive in world markets -- if only those world markets give our farmers the chance to compete fairly. And this is why, under Secretary Lyng and Ambassador Clayton Yeutter's guidance, we're working to increase our agricultural exports by making world trade freer and much more fair.

Our proposal calls for nothing less than a total phaseout by the year 2000 of all policies that distort trade in agriculture. This proposal reflects one of my abiding beliefs; I think it's a belief that you share: The solution to the world agricultural problem is to get government out of the way and let farmers compete.

It's true, of course, that getting rid of all export subsidies, import barriers, and the like -- all the things that make it harder for our farmers to compete in world markets -- is a very tall order; but we're not backing down. At the economic summit in Toronto last month, we were able to persuade the heads of state that, at the Montreal mid-term review meeting, their trade ministers must reach agreement on a goal and a timetable for completing the Uruguay round. And I can tell you after nearly 8 years of working with these heads of state, setting a deadline, a time when the talking has to stop and the action has to begin, is a very powerful instrument for getting things done.

I know that you support our agricultural proposal for freer and fairer world markets. And I thank you for that support, just as I give you my heartfelt thanks for your support on a host of other things, including the textile bill and the U.S.-Canada free trade agreement. And I ask you to continue to work to help the farmers who're suffering as a result of the drought.

The productivity of American agriculture is one of the great success stories of our time, indeed, of all time. As recently as 1940, a single American farmer could feed 19 people for a year. Today a single American farmer feeds about 120 people for a year, and American products are shipped around the world. Through all these decades, despite drought and misfortune, the American farmer has continued to succeed.

When the Governor was telling you about Christmas trees, that might be an expression -- a little unusual for some of you. What he was talking about was a question I was just asked when we were with the press down here before we came up here, and that was about -- right now in the Congress a number of amendments are being proposed on the agricultural bill. I have to tell you that agriculture -- I have to tell you that there is bipartisanship as I haven't seen it too often in Washington there about this particular program. And there may be some fine amendments that belong on the bill, and so forth. But also every once in a while it does become a Christmas tree, with people trying to attach things that really have no bearing on the main purpose to a bill they know is going to pass, in order to get those in effect where they couldn't get them on their own.

And I shouldn't make it that blanket because there are very possibly some worthwhile amendments. But we have more bipartisanship, as I said, than we've had in a long time there with regard to your problem.

I've just inspected the corn and soybean crops of Herman Krone's farm, and before that, we came in surveying the area by helicopter. And the situation on the ground, I'm sorry to say, is as bad as I expected. Secretary Lyng has been giving me regular briefings on the drought conditions in each State and the farm crisis that it's caused. But I wanted to see it for myself, and I thank all of you for showing it to me. What I saw was not a pretty sight -- stunted corn, sparse bean fields, withered plants starved for water, struggling to push their way up.

Having been born and raised in this part of the country, the State of Illinois -- I think, if they had Lake Michigan on there, I would know for sure -- I think that my home is in the blue part, but I went to college in the orange part. There was a -- I know how these fields would usually be at this time of year. There was a marker in the cornfield back there showing how tall the corn should be and that was getting up around 8 feet, and instead, it sort of came up to about here with the top tip of any one of the leaves on me.

I know this farm and other areas of the country were blessed with rain this week, and we're grateful for it. It was enough to wet the surface and turn the dust into mud. And it may have helped buy some time, but it hasn't solved the problem. And for many farmers, time has run out. From Montana to Texas, from California to Georgia, and right here in Illinois, farmers face the worst natural disaster since the Dust Bowl of the 1930's. The heartland of America desperately needs more rain. Now, we can't make it rain, but we can help to ease the pain, and that's what the Federal Government will do. Currently 1,973 counties in 38 States are eligible for Federal emergency agricultural programs. And our administration is developing further measures, working with farm State Governors and the Congress on a bipartisan basis. And with water levels on the Mississippi River at historic lows, the Army Corps of Engineers is hard at work to keep the river open and keep the barge traffic moving.

I think we can say the same thing about the drought. Will it end? It always has in the past. But the question is: When will it end, and how much of the crop can be saved? Whoever talked about putting something aside for a rainy day was not a farmer or a river pilot or a grain elevator operator. We're all praying for a lot more rain and for the end of this drought. I want to let you know that we will do everything that we can.

I'm calling today for Congress to act quickly on comprehensive drought relief, disaster relief for all farmers for all crops, including appropriate forgiveness of advance deficiency payments and relief for all nonprogram crops. I'm also directing Secretary Lyng to lead a fact-finding team which will visit places around the country that are suffering from the drought. They'll see and hear firsthand what the drought is doing to crops and livestock, and report back to me.

Vickie, first let me say I'm delighted to be back here with all of you. Perhaps some of you know about a huge favor that I owe a lady from Chicago. It was back in 1932. I had just gotten out of college. And this was in the depths of the Depression, and you didn't think about career right then or what you might want to do in the long haul. You just thought about is there any way to get a job -- with 26 percent unemployment rate.

Montgomery Ward had just moved into Dixon, Illinois. And they were going to have a sports department, and they thought they'd get someone who had a background of high school sports there. So I went down. I didn't get the job.

Well, it was a long hitchhike back to Dixon, Illinois, that night. By the way, for the last 30-mile stretch, I got a ride with a fellow who told me quite unnecessarily that he'd been out trapping skunks. [Laughter] But the following Monday, I took her advice, and my first stop was here in Davenport, where, as we used to say in those days, the West begins and where the tall corn grows. And I went in for an interview with the program director, Peter MacArthur.

He had come to this country with Harry Lauder, a great vaudevillian in a vaudeville act and wound up as the program director. And, no, there was nothing here. As a matter of fact, the day before they'd hired an announcer.

He took me into a studio, it was the original studio, stood me up in front of a microphone, pointed to a red bulb up on the wall, and he said, ``I won't be in here with you, you'll be alone. When that red light goes on, you start broadcasting an imaginary football game.'' Well, there I stood, and I was all alone. And I thought, what am I going to do for names?

I'm even prouder to have been a part of a tremendous broadcasting tradition, one that is 65 years old this year. And I think all of you can be proud not just of this new building but of all that it represents. WOC has been serving the people of the Quad-Cities for more than six decades. When I first came here, it was only the Tri-Cities, and we were in the midst of the Depression. And today we're in the middle of an economic boom, but we must get some help to the farmers who have been hurt by the drought. But through good times and bad, WOC has been there for the people of Iowa and Illinois. You've established high standards of service to the community, and it's my hope that those standards will remain as much a part of your tradition as they have been in the past.

Things have changed a bit since 1932. But in a funny way, the business stays the same: news, sports, weather, information. It's a good way to make a living and a good way of serving others. So, my congratulations to all of you, and my warmest wishes for your future success.

Some things haven't changed. There were long velvet curtains when you were in the studios above Palmer College, and we have curtains here today. These studios -- when you first got here, a freshly scrubbed young man out of Eureka College, did it take you very long to get a job? I know you had to audition that football game. I'm not going to make you do that, for sure.

The President. Oh, well, I have to tell you that, no, this was very lucky. I graduated in June of that year, 1932, and went back in order to get some money in those dark Depression days. It was the very depth of the Depression -- and went back to the job that I had been doing for 6 previous years for the summer and that was lifeguarding in the Rock River over at Dixon, Illinois. And then at the end of the summer, I'd made up my mind that this was what I wanted to do, and sports announcing particularly.

The President. Well, yes. Then, after several football games that I broadcast were over, there was no place regularly for me, but they said they thought there would be. And so, I went home, and I waited until around February before I got a call that there was an opening. And then I became a staff announcer, who, on the side would handle sporting events.

The President. Yes, yes. And then he left the actual broadcasting business to become a vice president of McCann-Erickson Advertising Agency. But yes, he'd graduated from college a year after me. He's my older brother. But in the Roaring Twenties, when he got out of high school, that was before the crash. Everybody seemed -- the job seemed to be so good that, never mind college. But when I made it for 1 year, working my way through, he decided that, well, maybe he'd like to do that, too. And so, having played on a championship high school team between myself and the coach, we managed to find a job for him on the campus, and he came to college. So, I became the older brother, and I was the sophomore, and he was the freshman. But then when he got out of school, he came over to see me, and I ended up getting him some things to do.

Well, we finished a program with a conversation between us, and then, Peter MacArthur, very generously knowing that he was out of school and out of work, gave him a fee for -- and we turned over the football predictions to him, and the scores.

And Secretary Lyng, who's with me here, our Secretary of Agriculture, has been working on this and been working with the people on the Hill. And it's a program that is not going to invade and try to rewrite the farm legislation as it is, but is to provide for help, emergency help to these farmers who are so beset by this drought all over the United States. The figures are astonishing.

And what I saw down there in Illinois just shows that it is disaster. And so, I think we're coming up with a program that will have bipartisan support. Right now, I'm a little edgy, as I told some of our press on this trip, that you know there are always some legislators that will have a favorite thing that they know they can't get passed by itself, and they will try to attach it to a sure-thing bill like this as an amendment.

The President. Well, I think it's a very limited time. They know that there's a time pressure on it, and I think it's ready to go through. And, of course, I'll sign it the minute it's delivered to me.

Okay. Well, speaking of time, the clock on the wall says we've just about run out of time. On behalf of the staff and management of WOC Kick Stations, we really are delighted that you could be here with us. We appreciate it.

I have to warn you that while I intend to speak about serious issues of the present and the future today -- the kinds of things people come to hear Presidents speak about -- well, you're going to have to pay admission to hear it. And that's by listening politely while I tell you an old story or two about this wonderful town and the days when it was the center of the world to me. Of course, that goes back to when it wasn't the Quad-Cities, it was the Tri-Cities.

I had just graduated from college, and the Depression was on. And I decided that the way I wanted to start working was as a radio announcer, a decision my Dad accepted with skepticism but support. So, he lent me the family car, and we mapped out a 1-day tour of the nearest stations to Dixon, Illinois. And Davenport was just 75 miles from home, so it was my first stop. And the station here was WOC, you may know that the call letters stood for ``World of Chiropractic.'' And it was founded by Mrs. Miller's -- I should say, grandfather, a great and gracious gentleman, Colonel B.J. Palmer, who also owned the Palmer School of Chiropractic. And WOC was located on the top floor of the school, and shared time with WHO in Des Moines.

I had a trial run as a $10 a game play-by-play announcer covering the Iowa Hawkeyes. And then when the season ended with a couple of months of waiting to see if a permanent job would open up, and finally the program director, a Scotsman I'll always have a soft spot in my heart for, Pete MacArthur, gave me my break. I got $100 a month, which to me was big money and some good lessons.

Well, the first time that I was scheduled for the period when that program was on, no one informed me of that business arrangement. And my dramatic instincts rebelled against mentioning the mortuary in connection with such favorites as ``Drink to Me Only With Thine Eyes.'' [Laughter] So, that night we got the music, and the mortuary got left out.

I was fired. [Laughter] I was also assigned to show the ropes to my replacement, which led to one of my first brushes with miracles. My replacement thought I was only temporary, and he'd been hired knowing he was coming on, that he was going to come to work at a certain time. And when he learned it wasn't true, he demanded a contract as a guarantee of his security. Well, in those days, that was unheard of. And so, miracle of miracles, just when I thought I was all washed up, the station decided to give me a new lease on life because I hadn't asked for a contract.

I said there was a lesson in this. I complained at the time to a friend about what had happened, and about how I hadn't been told things. And this friend didn't commiserate. He said exactly the right thing. He reminded me that I was nothing but ahead. He said, ``You now have experience which you never had before. You can walk into another radio station and even introduce yourself as a sports announcer.'' I had broadcast four football games already. I took his advice to heart and started doing my work a whole lot better. And pretty soon, all talk of finding another job had faded.

Of course, Davenport and the Quad-Cities area have changed a lot during the years since then. Generations of young men and women have come here to get their start, and grown, as I did for a time, with the city. I know you've just been hearing about how the city has grown recently, and about how you've brought your unemployment rate down to less than half of what it was, how thousands of new jobs have blossomed in the area, how whole new industries like tourism have grown, and how you've transformed the riverfront. There's been a dream here in the Quad-Cities area, a determination, and a hope. And from it, from what was born in your hearts, you have rebuilt these communities.

But in a way, that's what's been happening all over America. Last week we learned that the Nation's unemployment rate has dropped to the lowest it's been in almost a decade and a half. In the month of June alone, America created 100,000 new jobs in manufacturing and construction and more than 200,000 jobs in services.

And by the way, what I'm told you've just heard about the Quad-Cities is true for the Nation as well. The great majority of the new service jobs are well-paying and in places like stores and doctors' offices, hospitals and banks, and insurance companies, and real estate brokers and developers.

Washington too often doesn't understand, but I know you do, is that the source of our recordbreaking expansion will not be found poring over the computer models and equations of high-priced consulting firms, but by peering into the American heart. And there you'll find optimism about the future, trust in the strength of ordinary people, and faith in the power of freedom. I learned about these in Iowa and Illinois. And, like belief in God, love of family, and hope in the human soul, they have a power no instrument can measure and no computer model can predict. But I promise you, as long as I'm President, they're a force that Washington will not forget.

Now, let me turn to an area where, on farms and ranches across the Nation, our optimism is being tested. I remember that when I worked here in Davenport, Peter MacArthur would roll out the station's slogan in his rich Highland Scottish burr: ``WOC, Davenport, where the West begins, in the State where the tall corn grows.'' But I saw earlier today that the corn isn't growing so tall this year. I visited the farm of Herman and Rick Krone, father and son, both of them farmers all their lives. Their farm is in southern Illinois, but it could as easily be in Iowa or Ohio, or Indiana, the Dakotas or Alabama, in Texas or Tennessee. They had a pole set up in the cornfield. On the pole, they'd marked where the corn should be by now.

Lyng first brought the drought to my attention before most of the Nation knew it was developing. Since then he's briefed me five times, and today for a sixth. He's told me how hard the drought is hitting corn, soybeans, and other crops, about endangered herds, and about rivers, including the Mississippi.

I said at the Krone farm this morning, we can't bring the rain, but we can ease the pain. And that's what we've been doing. We've pulled together a governmentwide drought command team. And we've swung into action.

In nearly 2,000 counties in 37 States, we've allowed grazing and haymaking on land set aside in government crop reduction programs. In 181 counties in 11 States, we've also opened to grazing water bank land that is part of the Federal Water Bank Program. In over 700 counties in 25 States, we're selling government feedgrain stockpiles to farmers at less than their cost to the Government; or if farmers prefer, we're sharing the cost of purchasing feed from private sources to preserve breeding herds.

Working with the States, we have set up a national hay hotline, and it's called Haynet, to put together those who have hay and those who need it. We've also set up a National Drought Hotline. And as of yesterday, that hotline had fielded over 5,000 calls.

To boost meat prices as herds are being thinned, we've announced a $50-million purchase of hamburger and other meat for our food assistance program and a $40-million credit line to Mexico for U.S. meat purchases.

Many grain farmers don't know the full impact of the drought until close to harvest time. But in 80 counties in 15 States, things were so bad so early that some farmers couldn't plant at all. We've made those farmers eligible to receive 92 percent of the projected deficiency payments on land that would have been planted. And for farmers who have crop insurance, we're making sure the claims will be handled quickly.

Along our waterways, the Army Corps of Engineers has stepped up dredging. As of yesterday, they had 12 dredges at work on the most severely shoaled area of our inland navigation system. They have other dredges ready in case things get worse. The Corps and the Coast Guard are working with barge operators to keep traffic on our rivers running smoothly and to spot problems in the channels.

In the West we've opened the way for some interdistrict water sales, and we've pulled together teams to move along water sales, water transfers, and water banking. Across the Nation, we're keeping a close eye on how much water Federal power, which is to say that we're making sure the Federal tap doesn't drip.

We've done all this without special congressional action. The steps we've taken are the right steps. They fall within my authority as President, and I've gone ahead. But there are two big things we should be doing that we can't do until Congress gives the okay. I'm calling today for Congress to act quickly on comprehensive drought relief, disaster relief for all farmers, for all crops.

Two steps are essential. The first is to help farmers who've received what are called advanced deficiency payments, advances on what the farmer expects to receive from the Government after harvest. Well, as things stand today, many drought-ravaged farms will have to refund this money. I endorse forgiveness of these payments in the appropriate circumstances. We also want to help farmers whose crops are not covered by that Federal program but who feel this disaster as well. I endorse comprehensive disaster relief for nonprogram crops.

And there may be other things we should do. I'm also announcing today that I have directed Secretary Lyng to lead a factfinding team next week which will visit places around the country that are suffering from the drought. The team will include people from the Department of Agriculture and other agencies that have been part of my Interagency Drought Policy Committee. Just as I have today, they'll see and hear firsthand what the drought is doing to crops and livestock.

I'm determined to get relief to drought-stricken farms. Our administration has been working with Governor Branstad, Governor Thompson, the other farm-State Governors, as well as the leaders of both Houses of Congress. And let me give you a few commonsense rules that I believe should guide us as we hammer out details of how we help.

Relief should go to those who have been hurt most. It should be structured so that farmers who've had the foresight to take out crop insurance don't end up asking why they bothered. We should keep an eye out for unintended consequences, boobytraps in what we do; for example, we should make sure that the way we give relief doesn't give anyone an incentive to plow under crops that could have been harvested.

We should also keep in mind that we have a deficit and a budget agreement with Congress, which means the Government has to find money before it spends it. We should keep our eye on the ball. Drought relief should be just that -- drought relief. No one in Washington should try to divert it to other ends, such as rewriting farm legislation already on the books. To try such a ploy would only delay the train that should be carrying help to farmers.

And there's one other thing. Even in an election year, the drought is too big for partisanship. Politics must stop at the parched field's edge. As I said, our administration has been working with the leaders of both Houses of Congress. We've all joined together to do what's best for the Nation. And we should all pledge to keep it that way.

We should be guided by the strength and straightforward decency of the people we're helping. But if I had my way, that would always be the guiding light in Washington. You know, I like to point out sometimes when people get to flattering me about the economic expansion, the longest in the history of our nation, that we're having -- you know, really what we did that made that come about: We just got out of your way. You did it; we didn't.

This blessed nation has a strength, a vitality, and a wisdom that flows like the immense and powerful Mississippi. I remember when I first saw that river, as a boy many years ago. It seemed like a great arm reaching from the heart of America to touch the world.

Nothing was beyond the reach of its dreams. And today, many years later, I know that nothing is. For even when it's low, that Old Man River keeps flowing, and so, too, do the love and strength that comes from deep in the heart of its country. That love and that strength have given the world a new birth, a freedom, a new light unto the nations, a new hope for humanity. They flow in all seasons in such abundance and nowhere with so strong a current as here.

And as one who's lived here and left, and seen every part of the world, may I tell you that nowhere can you feel more strongly the force of Him who can go with me and stay with you and be everywhere for the good. Nowhere is the force of His love closer to the good Earth and its people than here.

I have to conclude with one little story I've waited a long time to tell because I figured it had to be told in Iowa. In 1949, for the first time in my life, I found myself in England. I was making a movie over there. And on weekends, never having been there, I would hire a driver and car and go out and see the countryside. And I made it plain to the driver, too, that I wanted to see -- and don't think I have bad habits when I say this -- but I wanted to see some of those 700-year-old pubs that you hear about.

Middle East Joint Task Force, responding to the ship's distress call, dispatched five U.S. helicopters to an area approximately 23 nautical miles west north west of Farsi Island in the Northern Persian Gulf. Two of the helicopters, while on their way to provide assitance, observed two small boats heading towards Farsi Island. As they closed to identify visually the boats, the boats fired at the U.S. helicopters. This hostile action posed an immediate and direct threat to the safety of the helicopters. Accordingly, acting in self-defense, the helicopters returned fire, firing rockets and machine gun rounds at the small boats, which then left the scene. At this time it is believed that one of the boats may have been hit with a rocket. The extent of damage to the boat is unknown. There were no casualties or damage to U.S. forces; the tanker caught fire as a result of the attack.

The actions of U.S. forces in response to being attacked by the Iranian small boats were taken in accordance with our inherent right of self-defense, as recognized in Article 51 of the United Nations Charter, and pursuant to my constitutional authority with respect to the conduct of foreign relations and as Commander in Chief. There has been no further hostile action by Iranian forces, and, although U.S. forces remain prepared to take additional defensive action to protect our units and military personnel, we regard this incident as closed.

Thank you very much, and Secretary Verity and Dr. Graham. And thank you all, and welcome to the White House. Please be seated. The awards we'll be presenting in just a few moments stand for our nation's scientific and technological progress.

But it's true that I have a special belief in American science and technology, because I've lived long enough to have witnessed breakthrough after breakthrough. I've seen the rise of the automobile. Indeed, I can remember my first ride in an automobile -- before that it was horse and buggy. And the development of the modern media -- radio, movies, and television -- the advent of space travel -- and now the computer and the microchip.

I often reflect that it was not too long ago when sand was just the stuff beaches were made of. In fact, one of the lines in my old speeches said if we put the government in charge of sand, there'd be a shortage. [Laughter] And now the mind of man has given the silicon in sand virtually limitless value in the form of the microchip, a tiny invention that's transforming the world economy more dramatically than any event since the Industrial Revolution. And I haven't even mentioned the newest breakthrough: high-temperature superconductivity.

It's important to remember, too, that it's not just economic productivity that science and technology have improved, but the whole quality of human life. New fertilizers have been coupled with new types of grains, providing greater crop yields here at home and around the world. Medical science has produced advance after advance, combating disease, improving our overall health and extending the lifespan. Technology is adding a new dimension to education. Consider, for example, that it's now possible to put an entire encyclopedia on a disk that can be used on a home computer. Technology is even having a profound effect on my former field of entertainment, making available music and movies of all kinds in home entertainment centers. You are the men and women who are leading us into this new era of information and technology. You are the builders, the dreamers, the heroes.

Our administration has supported basic scientific research from the start. We're going forward with the funding of a superconducting supercollider. We're moving ahead on a permanently manned space station and a commercially developed space facility. We're funding crucial new research as part of our Strategic Defense Initiative, research that holds out the hope of putting peace on a firmer footing throughout the world. And our budget requests to Congress have contained billions of dollars each year for research and development -- although I'm sorry to say that too often Congress has trimmed back those requests.

I'm convinced that perhaps the most important action we've taken has involved knocking down the barriers to progress that government itself had erected. Our tax cuts, for example, have revitalized the entrepreneurial economy. Indeed, in recent years we've seen tens of billions of dollars devoted to venture capital, and tens of billions more in new public stock offerings. And during this economic expansion, hundreds of thousands of new businesses have been formed, many of them linked to specific new technologies. All of this represents the application of knowledge to human needs on a massive scale -- not by government, but by committed individuals, acting in freedom.

You see, America's greatest resource is not the land, vast and beautiful though it is. It's not our climate, nor even our abundant natural resources. America's greatest resource is the genius of her people. And so to express our gratitude to you, but also to set an example for all the world and an example of what free men and women can accomplish, we honor you.

I can't help but tell you another little item out of my past. More than 20 years ago when I was Governor of California, and you will remember those, the rioting days on the campuses and all of that trouble, and one day I received a very arrogant demand from the student body presidents of the nine State universities of California demanding a meeting with me.

Affairs at the National Security Council. Prior to that Mr. Cobb was a permanent professor of international politics at the United States Military Academy at West Point. He currently holds the position of adjunct professor of international security affairs at Georgetown University. A Vietnam veteran, Mr. Cobb served initially with a combat unit and later was named as a member of the American delegation implementing the 1973 Paris peace accords.

President is pleased with the overwhelming, bipartisan votes of the Senate and the House of Representatives condemning the outrageous actions of the Sandinista Government of Nicaragua. These votes send the message to the Sandinistas that the United States is firmly committed to the achievement of freedom and democracy in Nicaragua.

Just this week, the Sandinistas have shut down the two media outlets for free expression in Nicaragua, the newspaper La Prensa and Catholic Radio. And they have brutally suppressed a peaceful demonstration for human rights, arrested leaders of the democratic opposition, and expelled the U.S. Ambassador and much of his staff.

Sandinistas continue to snuff out any hope for democratic reform in Nicaragua, despite the solemn promises to establish democracy that they have made and broken repeatedly in the decade since they seized power. They continue to oppress the Nicaraguan people and receive substantial Soviet-bloc military shipments. The Sandinistas' conduct makes clear that they will not institute democratic reform and cease their threats to the security of Central America unless effectively pressured and persuaded to do so. To achieve democracy in Nicaragua and security for all of Central America clearly requires a viable and effective Nicaraguan democratic resistance.

Next week the Democrats will hold their national convention in Atlanta, and as they do so, you're going to be hearing a lot of rhetoric about the economy. Indeed, our economic future is likely to prove the central issue of the coming campaign.

When it comes to the economy, there are two big facts to keep in mind. Before we came to Washington, our economy was in a mess: inflation in double digits, men and women being thrown out of jobs, the prime interest rate soaring at the highest level since the Civil War. And the second big fact -- well, the second big fact is that when our administration had put its economic program in place, the economy stopped shrinking and started to grow, and it's been growing ever since.

Permit me to share with you just a few figures, figures I truly hope the Democrats keep in mind as they meet in Atlanta. Today's economic expansion has become the longest peacetime expansion in our entire history.

Among black teenagers, unemployment has fallen to the lowest level since recordkeeping began back in 1972, showing that minorities are among those benefiting the most from economic growth. Since the expansion began 67 months ago, the American economy has created more than 17 million jobs, far more than the number created by the economies of Western Europe and Japan combined. Business investment in plant and equipment is up. Our trade balance is improving. And more Americans have jobs today than at any time in our history.

What does all this mean? It means that getting the Government off your backs and out of your pockets has worked. You see, for years now there have been two basic approaches, two basic philosophies, regarding our economy. The liberal view is suspicious of free markets and private enterprise. It holds that it's the job of government to intervene in the economy, and to intervene constantly -- taxing, regulating -- spending more and more of your dollars. And, yes, it's this liberal view that nearly wrecked our economy the last time the Democrats were in charge.

Our administration ushered in a new philosophy, one that trusted you, the people, and not big government. We cut tax rates, pared back regulations, limited the growth of government spending. And we did all this to get government out of the way so that individuals and enterprises had incentives to grow, to invest, to innovate, to create jobs. Professional economists would describe our philosophy as one that believes there's a bias for growth in the private sector. To put that same idea in plain language, we believe it's only natural for individual men and women to want to build a better life for themselves and their families and that it's up to the Government to get out of the way and let them do just that.

By now, it's clear that our approach works, that trusting the people leads to prosperity. Economists have even begun to realize that the old boom-and-bust cycles of the past probably had more to do with the volatility of government policy than with underlying economic causes and that if we remain true to low-tax, high-growth policies, today's expansion, already at 67 months and still counting, can go on and on.

This brings me back to the convention that's taking place in Atlanta next week. You see, today we face an historic opportunity. It's the chance to remove the fear of the boom-and-bust cycle once and for all, replacing it with consistent low-tax, limited-government policies -- in other words, to achieve a bipartisan, national consensus for economic growth.

I firmly believe that there will be some right-minded Democrats at the convention next week, just as there are many rank and file Democratic voters across the country who agree. But sadly, the leaders in charge of the convention will want to take America back to the failed policies of the past. It's ironic, isn't it, that just as countries around the world are adopting the same progrowth policies our administration put in place, so many in the Democratic Party want to go in the opposite direction.

So, as you watch the convention in Atlanta next week, I urge you to ask yourself this question: Is the Democratic Party and its nominee for President going to keep taxes low and government growth under control, or are they going to go back to the very policies that could wreck our economy yet again?

President today announced that the permanently manned space station being developed by the United States, Canada, Europe, and Japan will carry the name Freedom. The name Freedom was recommended by a team of NASA representatives and international partners. The yearning for freedom is a basic human emotion, and freedom of the individual is a value shared by all the nations that will work together to build and use the space station.

In a literal sense, the space station will provide freedom from the confines of Earth's gravity, enabling scientific and technological research, new commercial uses of space, and opening the way for continued human exploration of space.

Space station Freedom will consist of three laboratory modules -- one each from the United States, Europe, and Japan -- and a habitat module that will accommodate a full-time crew of eight. Canada will provide a mobile servicing center to help assemble and maintain the manned base. Earth-observing unmanned polar-orbiting platforms provided by the United States and Europe are also part of the Freedom program.

Freedom is planned to be launched aboard the space shuttle and assembled in orbit beginning in 1995. It will provide a versatile research laboratory for conducting science, developing new technologies, exploring the solar system, and stimulating private sector investment in space.

Today is the 70th birthday of Nelson Mandela. For the last 26 years, Mr. Mandela, a preeminent figure in the struggle against apartheid, has been imprisoned in South Africa. He is widely recognized as the embodiment of black aspirations in South Africa, and while he and other political leaders remain in prison, South African Government plans for political reform are not likely to gain any significant support from the black community.

On the occasion of his 70th birthday, we renew our appeal to the Government of South Africa to release Nelson Mandela and the other political prisoners. Their release would contribute greatly to creating an environment that could foster serious broad-based negotiations for the abolition of apartheid and the establishment of a nonracial democracy in South Africa.

Appropriations Act for Fiscal Year 1989. I want to take this opportunity to commend the Congress for two reasons: first, the responsible speed with which they produced this bill; and second, for keeping funding contained in this Act at acceptable levels.

Energy and Water bill was presented to me earlier than any other appropriations bill during my two terms in office. During the past several years appropriations bills have been enacted as part of omnibus continuing resolutions. As I noted in my State of the Union address earlier this year, the use of such patched-together, multi-purpose spending bills does not permit the Legislative and Executive branches to exercise proper scrutiny of government spending. In contrast, this bill has been submitted in a manner to allow thorough review by all participants in the budget process. The public interest is best served when budget laws are enacted individually, after careful deliberation over the spending measures by members of Congress and the President, and well before the crisis atmosphere sets in at the end of the fiscal year in September. I therefore strongly urge the Congress to complete consideration of the remaining 12 appropriations bills and to transmit them to me in a timely manner as well.

The funding provided by this Act totals $18.0 billion in budget authority and $17.8 billion in outlays. These funding levels do not exceed the amounts I requested in my budget while fully funding the essential requests for atomic energy defense activities. This action by the Congress is consistent with the plan for 2-year budget reductions, the Bipartisan Budget Agreement, that members of my Administration developed with the leaders of the Congress. I encourage the Congress to work with me to ensure that all remaining spending legislation complies with this agreement.

Reagan has found Brazil's refusal to provide adequate patent protection for U.S. pharmaceuticals and fine chemicals to be unfair under section 301 of the Trade Act of 1974. In response, the President has decided to impose sanctions on certain Brazilian imports. The products upon which sanctions are to be imposed will be drawn from a list of potential items that will soon be published in the Federal Register.

Adequate patent protection is the cornerstone of a healthy pharmaceutical industry. By denying this basic commercial right, Brazil permits unauthorized copying of pharmaceutical products and processes that were invented by U.S. firms. This not only deprives American companies of sales, it discourages investment in the research and development of new drugs.

U.S. pharmaceutical industry and the U.S. Government have attempted for several years to persuade Brazil to enact adequate patent protection. Despite these efforts on the part of the United States, Brazil has yet to provide adequate intellectual property protection for pharmaceutical products. We regret that it is necessary to impose trade sanctions in this matter, but the United States cannot tolerate the piracy of its intellectual property. Over the past 3 years, we have challenged the infringement of U.S. intellectual property rights and denial of rights throughout the world.

This progress stands in stark contrast to Brazil's lack of action in this area. The President calls upon the Government of Brazil to join the United States and other nations in establishing comprehensive intellectual property protection for pharmaceuticals and other products.

At first a mystery, the cause of Lyme disease was discovered in 1982 by a scientist at the National Institute of Allergy and Infectious Diseases. It is now known that the bite of the tiny deer tick transmits the disease to humans by transferring the causative bacterium to the bloodstream.

Early symptoms of the disease often include a slowly expanding red rash, fatigue, mild headache, pain and stiffness in muscles and joints, a slight fever, or swollen glands. The disease can be easily treated in its early stages with antibiotics, but if the initial symptoms go unnoticed or untreated, more serious manifestations can develop later, including complications affecting the heart, nervous system, and joints.

The best treatment for Lyme disease is prevention. People must know the dangers associated with ticks and take necessary precautions when hiking. They should check regularly for the presence of ticks, know how to remove them, and be alert for the symptoms of Lyme disease.

National Institutes of Health conducts and supports research to help find better ways to prevent and treat Lyme disease and other tick-borne illnesses. We can be grateful for these and all efforts in the fight against these afflictions.

For all our history, we Americans have debated our differences vigorously. But like two of the earliest political adversaries in our history, Thomas Jefferson and John Adams, while we've always fought hard for our differing opinions, we've honored each other for taking part in the democratic process. This week's convention speakers seemed to forget this American tradition.

But beyond that, there was something amazing about what we heard. Our liberal opposition seems to think so much is bad in America. To hear them talk you would never have guessed that we're in the longest peacetime economic expansion on record, that America has created over 17 million jobs in the last 5 years, or that a greater proportion of Americans in the work force has jobs today than ever before in our history. You would never have guessed that, after dropping by 3 percent when their party was last in the White House, the real income of the typical American family has grown by more than 10 percent since the current expansion began.

No, listening to the rhetoric, you'd never have guessed America's economy is the strongest in decades. To them, it's midnight in America. It's the same sad song they sang 4 years ago. They say they want to turn America around. When their party left the White House 8 years ago, inflation was at one of the highest levels in American history. Now it's under control. Do they want to turn that around? When they left office, America's industrial productivity was stalled. Our competitiveness was slipping, and technological research, key to our industrial future, appeared to be on hold. Today manufacturing productivity is rising strongly -- some rate us as the most competitive nation for manufacturing costs in the industrial world -- and we're again the world's leader in developing new technology. Do they want to turn that around?

And when their party turned over the keys to the White House, the Soviet Union was going forward with the biggest arms buildup in history; we were cutting back. And the Soviets had invaded Afghanistan. Today we have the first treaty in world history to eliminate an entire class of U.S. and Soviet nuclear missiles. The Soviets have pulled troops out of Afghanistan. And American-Soviet relations are better than they've been for a good long while. Do they want to turn that around, too?

They said America can do better -- with that I wholeheartedly agree. But the people also know that the last time our opponents were in charge America did a heck of a lot worse. What do our opponents really want to do? Well, again and again, we've heard from the press that our opposition just won't say. We've heard that they don't want to level with the country because when they've done that in the past the country hasn't liked what it's heard.

So, this year they've learned one lesson: They're covering their tracks. You'll never hear that ``L'' word -- liberal -- from them. They've put on political trenchcoats and dark glasses and slipped their platform into a plain brown wrapper. But while they're saying that government needs to do more of this or more of that, will they also pledge not to raise taxes?

While they're talking about reducing the danger of nuclear weapons, will they also pledge to go forward full speed with our Strategic Defense Initiative, the one practical way of reducing the threat of those weapons once and for all? And while they're talking about the war on drugs, will they also support the death penalty for drug kingpins? The American people expect straight talk about real issues. That's what they deserve, and that's what they ought to get.

And in America, I've always believed that each of us has a special responsibility because we have the freedom to use our talents to the fullest. So, as you pursue your studies and begin your life's work, remember your rich gifts and your high calling.

To those of you who go into business, do everything you can to help meet the needs of your fellow men. Use your intelligence to keep American business efficient, your imaginations to keep it innovative and expanding, and your hearts to keep it ethical and fair. To those who go into the arts, work hard to create beauty and joy. If you choose education, put your whole heart into the training of young minds. And if you go into government, put every ounce of your energy into the service for the people.

You're all interested in government to some extent, of course, or you wouldn't be here as a part of Boys Nation. And in thinking about what I might tell you regarding politics, I decided the most important message would be about the importance of ideals. Political life is taxing: long hours, a great many pressures, the need to be flexible in order to accomplish your goals. And one way to get a feel for it all will be to put yourself in the places right now of George Bush and his opponent in the coming months. And imagine all that travel, the speeches, the interviews that both those candidates will go through.

If a candidate is in politics just for the power of excitement -- or excitement, I should say -- he's bound to be disappointed. The power never lasts forever. And as for excitement, well, there's a lot less of excitement in government than there is in just plain work. But if someone enters politics in the name of ideals and principles, then it's all worthwhile. Every campaign, every interview takes on meaning as part of a larger plan, as part of a vision for America's future. Yes, it's even worth putting up with the questions I get from Sam Donaldson [ABC News].

To quote the novelist John Buchan: ``Public life is the crown of a career, and politics is still the greatest and most honorable adventure.'' A wise man once said: ``Life begins when you begin to serve.'' But whatever your calling in life, just remember America. In all the long history of mankind, no nation has ever afforded its people greater liberty or depended more for its very survival upon their diligence and faithful loyalty.

It's just so great to see and have you here and to know what you all represent. And it makes somebody feel good who's kind of coming to the end of the job to see a lineup of the kind of people that will be taking over as these years go by. And I can assure you, I have a great faith from what I've seen in how our country is going to do in the years to come.

It's particularly appropriate that we're meeting for this ceremony in the Roosevelt Room -- two Presidents who believed in opportunity, growth, and confidence in the future. I am sending to the Congress what will be one of the most historic pieces of legislation during my Presidency: implementing legislation for the U.S.-Canada free trade agreement. I asked the Congress to put this on a fast track, which it did and then some. Rick Mears [Indianapolis 500 winner] couldn't have driven it any faster, which shows what we can do when Democrats and Republicans work together.

This agreement is moving quickly because it's good for the United States, it's good for Canada, it's good for our continent. It's moving quickly because we recognize that we're truly the people of the New World, with a common bond distinct on the globe. North Americans are bound in our vision, in our optimism, and in our commitment to moving forward together. We settled this continent to change the world, and this agreement proves we mean to keep on changing it for the better.

Prime Minister Mulroney said not long ago, in going forward or not with this agreement: ``The choice couldn't be more clear cut -- the voices of the past against a vision of the future.'' Well, 8 years ago, when I put myself before the American people as a candidate for this office, I said that I wanted to lead the United States into a new relationship of cooperation and contact among the peoples of this continent. This free trade agreement is the cornerstone for that North American accord, that new era of growth, opportunity, and friendship on our continent.

The reason for the free trade agreement is simple: Throughout North American history, whenever and wherever trade barriers have been lowered, we've seen our economies bloom like mountain meadows after a spring rain. And this agreement is a sun rising on a new morning of economic vitality for the United States and Canada. It'll produce vast numbers of new jobs and new opportunities on both sides of the border. It'll save U.S. consumers up to $3 billion a year. It'll help keep the North American economy growing for a generation to come.

And one sign of that is that North Americans cross it about 75 million times a year. There's one more -- or, there's more trade, I should say, between the United States and Canada than any other two countries in the world. Why, there's more U.S. trade with Ontario alone than between most nations.

Canadians and Americans take pride in having the longest unguarded border, which stands as a model for the free world. When this agreement enters into force, we will have yet another model for the future of this country and the world.

Now, let me recognize a few people who helped make today possible. First, Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter and Treasury Secretary Jim Baker, who helped guide our talks with Canada and then worked with the Congress. They worked with America's business community, which organized a broadly based coalition of more than 500 companies, big and small, representing every sector of our economy. Two coalitions helped push negotiations forward. And some of its representatives are with us today.

With this agreement and its implementing legislation, we set a new standard of the two branches of government working together for the good of the Nation. And let me say thank you to those in Congress who've been part of this process, who've helped shape the agreement and legislation, and who have moved it along quickly and smoothly. Together, we've shown how ``fast track'' legislative procedures for trade agreements were intended to work. There's one lap on the track left to go, so let's put on the goggles, step on the gas, and have this baby crossing the White House for my final signature in no time.

With this Agreement and its implementing bill, we set a new standard for exemplary teamwork between the Congress and the Executive branch. The Administration and many congressional committees have cooperated closely in drafting the bill I am submitting today. No one branch of our government has dictated the terms of this bill; rather, we have all cooperated for the greater good of the Agreement, which so manifestly serves our national economic interests. I compliment and thank the Congress for its substantial contributions to this process, and particularly for the timeliness of its efforts in this regard. I believe this cooperation fully reflects the responsible way in which ``fast track'' legislative procedures for trade agreements were intended to be used.

I have highlighted here major benefits for the United States, the Agreement of course provides reciprocal benefits for Canada. Thus, the Agreement is a win-win situation for both countries. It will create more jobs and lower prices for consumers on both sides of the border. The overall result will be increased competitiveness and a higher standard of living in both countries.

Moreover, the Agreement looks to the future by providing a concrete example of the kind of market-opening steps the entire world should be pursuing. It thus supports U.S. efforts at trade liberalization in the Uruguay Round of multilateral trade negotiations.

With this Agreement and the free-trade area it establishes, we are poised to make a great leap of progress. Already Canada and the United States generate the world's largest volume of trade. Canada is by far our largest trading partner. The United States exports more to the Province of Ontario alone than to the entire country of Japan. United States citizens are by far the principal foreign investors in Canada, and Canadians, on a per capita basis, are even greater investors in this country. This two-way traffic in trade and investment has helped to create more than a million jobs, expand opportunity for both our peoples, and augment the prosperity of both nations.

With this Agreement, we are tearing down the tariff walls that block the flow of trade and generally eliminating the tangle of restrictions and regulations that inhibit our commerce and economic cooperation. As this Agreement takes effect, Americans and Canadians will be more able to conduct business, invest, and trade where they like. Two proud, independent, and sovereign nations -- Canada and the United States -- will pull together, as partners, toward a future of economic growth and prosperity.

With this Agreement, we reject ``beggar-thy-neighbor'' policies in order to build with our neighbors; we put aside special interests in favor of the common interest; we break free from limitations of the past not only to enhance our prosperity today, but also to build a better tomorrow for the generations to come in the 21st century.

With this Agreement, both the United States and Canada will be better prepared to compete in the global marketplace of the 21st century. Therefore, in the interest of strengthening our economy, creating jobs, reducing consumer burdens, and advancing U.S. efforts in multilateral trade negotiations, I urge prompt approval and implementation of the United States-Canada Free-Trade Agreement by the Congress.

Congress. The Secretary said he is still working on a bipartisan basis to develop acceptable legislation. The administration is fighting Christmas tree amendments that have been added to the bill. But he was optimistic that bipartisan agreement would be reached. The President urged congressional action as soon as possible. He recalled his visit to Illinois cornfields 2 weeks ago and asked if there had been any improvement. The Secretary indicated that even the best corn was still far inferior to normal crops.

To the Republican leaders of Congress, good morning, and welcome. I've asked you here to the White House today to discuss the congressional agenda in the next 6 months, and we'll get to that in just a moment. But first, though, I'd like to say a few words.

You see, last week the Democratic National Convention took place, and my Irish is a little up. [Laughter] To hear the opposition talk, you'd think growth in our economy had come to a dead halt the way it actually had back in 1980, when the American people decided to throw the opposition out. The American people remember 1980, I think: soaring inflation, growing unemployment, and the highest interest rates since the Civil War.

When we took office 8 years ago, we made it our simple aim to get big government off the backs and out of the pockets of the American people. And we cut the tax rates. We reduced regulations. And we controlled the growth of government spending. And the result -- well, the truth is -- and I want to stress that I'm providing facts, not opinions, not rhetoric -- the truth is that under this administration we've witnessed the longest peacetime economic expansion in the history of our nation. The opposition talks about growth. We've delivered.

I listened to those speeches, and I couldn't help thinking that this is what the difference between us comes down to: They talk, and we deliver. George Bush will cut taxes again. What would their nominee do? I mean, what would he really do? [Laughter] Yes, they've come out with their platform, but it's a platform that in effect hides their real policies in a brown paper wrapper.

Well, today we're honoring the people who honor America by keeping her beautiful. And believe me, you can travel around the world, but there's no country on Earth that can surpass the physical beauty of the United States. Our national parks, forests, waterways, monuments, and other public lands are national treasures that we hold in common. They are America's crown jewels, and we're the custodians who must preserve them, enjoy them, and pass them on to the next generation.

Now what this means is that people who mistreat these lands are really stealing from others, from their fellow citizens and from future generations. And there's no reason for us to tolerate that. Ask Lou Gossett, Clint Eastwood, or Charles Bronson if they get angry when people abuse our public lands. As these Take Pride spokesmen symbolize, there's a code of conduct, a code of honor, that separates right from wrong; and part of that code guides how we care for our national parks and public lands. As Lou, Clint, and Charlie have put it: That's the difference between the good guys and the bad guys.

Well, the truth is every citizen, school, civic group, business, and community that takes pride in America by taking care of this great and beautiful land of ours helps to make my day. And to all of you, the 94 winners of the Take Pride in America National Awards and everyone who participated, I can tell you that I and your fellow citizens are proud of you and grateful to you. You've helped clean litter out of the Grand Canyon, given medical care to Alaskan wildlife, planted gardens in Philadelphia, and helped preserve the wetlands of California -- and much, much more.

Theodore Roosevelt, who began our system of national parks and forests, said that ``A grove of giant redwoods or sequoias should be kept just as we keep a great and beautiful cathedral.'' And by respecting the land that we share, we respect one another. To preserve America's beauty, we have to work together. Private sector activities, as we recognize today, are irreplaceable, but the role of government is also vital. In fact, nearly one-third of our country's land is owned by the Federal Government.

We've kept America's commitment to land and wildlife management, clean air, clean water, and a healthier environment for us all. The EPA is working with the States to deal with the natural hazard posed by radon gas, and emissions of manmade pollutants into the air have been significantly reduced. Using Superfund, we have completed work at more than 1,000 emergency hazardous waste sites. Work is currently underway at 700 sites on the national priority list.

Cleaner air, cleaner water, increased protection of American wildlife -- this progrowth administration has also been staunchly proenvironment. The same spirit of creativity and innovation that's created 17 million jobs has also benefited the land itself, making America the beautiful more beautiful still.

Perhaps best of all, there are people like you throughout the country, taking pride in America and protecting the abundant majesty of our nation. This concern and dedication is also part of our heritage. Throughout our history, caring individuals have bequeathed great parks, forests, wildlife preserves, and historic sites to a nation that they love and cherish. And the award winners we recognize today are their moral heirs and successors -- individuals working together and accomplishing great things. That's something America can truly be proud of.

Amendment one deletes that requirement from the rule and thus allows for alternative compliance without showing interference with the special function of the vessel. However, such alternative compliance must still be approved by the Government concerned, and such a vessel must still be in ``closest possible compliance'' with the rules. Amendment one will allow the Government concerned more flexibility in approving alternative compliance in cases where safety needs are met but full compliance would be economically unreasonable.

The other eight amendments amend language contained in the general definitions and in the section treating actions to avoid collisions as well as modify the text of the existing rules on matters such as traffic separation schemes and lanes and positioning and technical details relating to lights and distress signals.

President today announced his intention to nominate Sam E. Keith, Jr., to be a member of the Board of Trustees of the Barry Goldwater Scholarship and Excellence in Education Foundation for a term of 4 years. This is a new position.

June 1950, when the Communist North Korean army invaded the Republic of Korea in a brazen attempt to extinguish the light of freedom there, American forces joined with those of many other nations to repel this unprovoked assault. Weary of war ourselves and ready to lead an era of peaceful recovery, we nonetheless came to Korea's defense because instinct and experience have taught us that freedom can have no borders, that an attack on free men anywhere is an attack on free men everywhere.

Americans died, more than 100,000 suffered wounds, and over 8,000 remain missing in action. Theirs has been called the ``Forgotten War,'' but, as President Eisenhower told the Nation 35 years ago on the signing of the Korean Armistice, they proved ``once again that only courage and sacrifice can keep freedom alive upon the earth.'' This is a message that must forever live on in the memories and in the hearts of all who cherish liberty.

Recognition and Remembrance for Those Who Served in the Korean War. I call upon the people of the United States to observe such week with appropriate ceremonies and activities and call upon and authorize all departments and agencies of the United States and interested organizations, groups, and individuals to fly United States flags at half-staff on July 27, 1988, as a symbol of our gratitude to those who died as a result of their service in Korea and of our steadfast commitment to preserving the values for which they fought.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-sixth day of July, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-eight, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and thirteenth.

Stephen 10 years ago. In your meetings with American Government leaders, with leaders of both parties, and with businessmen, journalists, and others, you've exchanged views on a broad range of topics; and we've been impressed with your openness to new ideas. We're encouraged by your recognition that economic reforms cannot succeed unless they are accompanied by political reforms as well. And this lesson has been demonstrated many times in the recent history of Eastern and Central Europe.

We know that Hungary faces difficult economic and political choices. The decisions that you and your government will have to make and implement in the coming months will set the direction of Hungary's development over the next decade.

Americans regard Hungarians as a people of great talent, a people who have contributed significantly to America's own development. We know that in Hungary itself the Hungarian people can better their society and their economy if the greater freedoms and reforms now being discussed are steadfastly implemented.

From our talks, Mr. General Secretary, I believe that you're intent on providing the kind of leadership that will give scope to the energy, ingenuity, and vision that Hungarians possess in such abundance. I hope you'll take with you some new ideas about America. I hope you'll remember what you've seen here about the strength to be found in a society that is free, in a society committed to upholding fundamental human rights and open to diverse opinion and talent.

You take with you our best wishes for success. We will be watching developments in Hungary closely and hope to continue working together for the further development of good relations between our two countries. Know that you return to the people of Hungary with the best wishes of the people of America.

President, I thank you for your kind words honoring me and for the meaningful discussions we have just concluded. I wish to express my thanks for the invitation of the U.S. Government and the program which has provided with it richness in both work and impressions. I had great expectations as I had set foot on U.S. soil more than 40 years after the last Hungarian Prime Minister in office. Now as I approach the end of the trip, I can tell you that I consider it to be useful and successful and promising for the expansion of the relations between our countries and our nations.

I was pleased to take this opportunity offered by a personal meeting to convey the high regard of the Hungarian people to you, Mr. President, for the results of historical proportions which you and General Secretary Gorbachev have achieved together in the area of disarmament. The improvement of Soviet-American relations and the international climates helps the small countries in these areas. The Government of the Hungarian People's Republic will do everything in its power to become part of the effort which the two of you, Mr. President, represent.

Hungary has to face enormous tasks today. It will reorganize its economy. This can only be done, we are aware, if the citizens will enjoy more rights, more freedoms. Therefore, we are modernizing our political system and our political practice. In this effort, we are counting on all our partners -- the leaders, the statesmen, in fact, the people, who wish us well.

I was very pleased to have had the opportunity to meet in your beautiful country Americans who have once come from Hungary. It was so pleasing to see the close contacts and feelings towards Hungary while they are very useful and able citizens of yours. We will continue to make these relationships even more free, even more happy.

I wish the people of the United States much success, happiness, and good health to your President; and I am very grateful for making possible the marvelous experience of my visit in this country. I am confident that we have all become richer through it. Thank you.

She's put her heart into the battle against drug abuse, and, well, it just plain did her good to see so many young people who are joining her in that crucial fight. And by the way, while having Nancy here yesterday was good news for you, it was bad news for me. You see, she's a tough act to follow.

But to all of you participating in this 1988 Student Congress on Evangelism, it's an honor to be with you. I know you come from all over America -- some even from as far away as Alaska -- and from a number of foreign countries as well. So, let me say welcome to Washington, and I hope you don't mind the heat.

I'm not going to preach a sermon. I thought instead I'd simply share a few thoughts with you on a subject I've had the opportunity to think about quite a bit during the years I've held this office: the subject of moral and religious values in our public life. And first I'd like to spend a moment or two looking at the history of religion in our public life, and then I'd like to speak about the challenge before us today.

I consider the history of this nation, I'm struck by how deeply imbued with faith the American people were, even from the very first. Many of the first settlers came for the express purpose of worshiping in freedom. Historian Samuel Morison wrote of one such group: ``Doubting nothing and fearing no man, they undertook all to set all crooked ways straight and create a new Heaven and a new Earth. If they were not permitted to do that in England, they would find some other place to establish their city of God.'' Well, that place was this broad and open land we call America.

This brings me to the challenges of the present day. For we must admit that in recent years America did seem to lose some of her religious and moral bearings. We saw the signs all around us. Years ago, pornography, while available, was mostly sold under the counter. By the midseventies it was available virtually on every magazine rack in every drug store or shop in the land. Drug abuse used to be confined to limited numbers of adults. During the sixties and seventies, it spread through the nation like a fever, affecting children as well as adults and involving drugs that were once unheard of, drugs like LSD and PCP.

But perhaps most important, the American family used to be the unquestioned basic building block of our society. And then families too often found themselves under pressure from government taxation, welfare policies that were spinning out of control, and social mores that were being undermined. Liberal attitudes viewed promiscuity as acceptable, even stylish.

These problems are still with us. But I believe there's been a change -- a change that you young people here today are part of. The Bible says: ``If my people who are called by my name humble themselves and pray and seek my face and turn from their wicked ways, then I will hear from Heaven and forgive their sins and heal their land.'' Many, many years ago, my mother had underlined that particular passage in the Bible. And I had her Bible that I could place my hand on when I took the oath of office in 1980. And I had it opened to that passage that she had underlined. Today more and more Americans are seeking His face.

Well, if I might interject a personal thought here, there's something I've always wanted to say to a group of young people like all of you. Yes, you get a lot of advice from those of us who are older. But I feel so deeply about what I'm about to say that, well, I'm going to go right ahead and give you one more piece of advice.

I'm sure that each of you believes that someday you'll find someone to fall in love with, and you will. And sometimes you may get frustrated, and, yes, finding the right one may take longer than you thought. But don't worry, it will happen.

For each of you, out there someplace is that -- to be a man or woman. And it's important for you not to pay any attention at all to all those who say that promiscuity is somehow stylish or rewarding. You know that when you meet that person, and meet them in marriage, that you will be true to each other. Well, did you ever stop to think you can start being true to that one special person beginning now?

But as I was saying, our administration has worked hard to reflect the return to basic values that you and so many others across the country have helped to bring about. Our administration has worked hard to reflect this return to basic values. In the courts, our administration has fought to defend America's cherished religious liberties, always opposing those who would promote government hostility to religion. To this day, it astonishes me that some would so misread the Constitution as to claim that it forbids us from displaying in public symbols of God's promise to mankind or prevents us from mentioning His name in the Pledge of Allegiance in our schools.

We won a major victory in the Supreme Court this year that you might not have heard about: the Kendrick decision. In this case, Congress had included religious groups in its program of counseling young people in order to prevent teen pregnancies. This only makes sense, since in so many other ways, churches are better at reaching young people than government could ever be. Some challenged this program. But I'm happy to say the Supreme Court rejected that challenge.

On another front, our administration has enacted laws making it tougher, much tougher, for criminals to do business in what is perhaps the lowest form of human exploitation: child pornography. And we're working to do still more.

Indeed, last year we submitted to Congress a major piece of antipornography legislation: the Child Protection and Obscenity Enforcement Act of 1987. We submitted that legislation to Congress for its immediate consideration and enactment, but today this legislation is still being held up. If the House and Senate leadership really care about family values, isn't it time they brought this antipornography legislation to a vote?

We enacted the Equal Access Act of 1984, giving voluntary religious groups the right to meet after school on the same basis as other groups. More legislation may prove necessary, but the basic principle is clear. I just have to believe, and I'm sure you agree, that if a math group or a chess club can meet after school, then so can a prayer group.

Now, although we Americans have done much to put our national life back on the firm foundation of traditional values, there is still a great deal to be done. And so, today I want to challenge you young people to see that our nation does still more to return to the life-giving values of faith and family. I want to challenge you in particular to work and pray with regard to four crucial issues.

By the way, I was impressed and moved to learn that one young woman here today has done just that. Carolyn Deming, who became involved with Campus Life as a young person, has begun a home for unwed mothers. Who knows how many unborn children's lives Carolyn and others like her have saved? Using love and imagination to save lives, my friends -- [applause]. It's clear that you agree that that is the answer.

Then there's an issue you're not too young to begin thinking about, even now: a restoration of the American family. When we obey the commandment, ``Honor thy father and mother,'' we're recognizing all the sacrifices our parents made to raise us. But we're also honoring the institution our parents entered into and carried on: the institution of marriage and the family itself. The family provides children with a haven of love and concern. For parents, it provides a sense of purpose and meaning in life. When the family is strong, the Nation is strong. When the family is weak, the Nation itself is at risk.

There's one specific issue that's important to mention here, an issue being discussed in the current Presidential campaign: child care. Vice President Bush has proposed an innovative plan, one that would strengthen the family for poor and working families. The Vice President's plan would provide a refundable tax credit of $1,000 per child. Now, the basic idea here is that the Government would simply let families keep up to $1,000 more of their own money. That's money the family itself can decide on how to spend. Working mothers could put the money toward child care. But by giving each family this tax credit, the Vice President's plan would also permit thousands of mothers to choose to stay home with their children.

Many of you also are already of voting age. And so, in the name of the family itself, I urge you to join me in doing your part in local, State, and national politics. And with regard to voting, I like to paraphrase Will Rogers. He pointed out that people holding public office are no better or worse than the people who voted for them to send them there. But he said they're all better than those who don't vote at all. So, if this democracy of ours is to be preserved, we must all exercise our precious right to vote.

Finally, in this age when electronics beam messages around the globe in a few seconds, we must work to separate half-truths from the whole truth, including the truth about the difference between free and totalitarian societies. Today there are profound changes underway in the Communist world. My trip to Moscow convinced me of that.

And of all the changes underway, perhaps none holds more hope for the future than Mr. Gorbachev's statements that the Soviet Union would soon grant its believers certain new freedoms. But while we pray for those inside the Communist world, we must cherish the freedoms that we already enjoy, cherish a nation founded in freedom. Just think of those words we recited a few moments ago. The Pledge of Allegiance asserts that our nation is under God -- an unthinkable statement in too many countries around the world today. And it proclaims the ideals of liberty and justice, ideals that we may not have completely achieved but that as a free people we're constantly striving toward.

If I could interject here something. You know, I know in our land of freedom everyone -- if they want to choose atheism instead of a belief in God, that's their right to do so. But I have always felt that I would like someday to entertain an atheist at dinner and serve the most gourmet, perfect dinner that has ever been served and then, at the end of the meal, ask that atheist if he believes there's a cook. We must cherish our nation, work to make her better still, and never stop saying this simple prayer: God bless America.

Permit me to close now on a personal note with a few thoughts from my heart. You know, hardly a day goes by that I'm not told -- sometimes in letters, sometimes by people I meet -- that they're praying for me. It's a warm but humbling feeling. I know that many of you pray probably for me and for all our government leaders. Well, I appreciate your prayers more deeply than I can say. I grew up in a home where I was taught to believe in intercessory prayer. I know it's those prayers and millions like them that are building high and strong the cathedral of freedom that we call America, those prayers and millions like them that will always keep our country secure and make her a force for good in this too troubled world. And that's why as a nation we must embrace our faith, for as long as we endeavor to do good -- and we must believe that will be always -- we will find our strength, our hope, and our true happiness in prayer and in the Lord's will.

The President. I'm delighted to have all of you here this afternoon, and I want to assure you all that this is a nonpartisan event. [Laughter] Though I hope I can tell one little story that has to do with both farming and politics.

Seriously though, just a few weeks ago, I was out in Illinois and Iowa, and I saw some of the devastation that's been caused by the drought there. What I saw wasn't a pretty sight -- stunted corn, sparse bean fields, withered plants starved for water, struggling to push their way up. Secretary Lyng has just returned from an extensive tour of the entire Midwest, and he tells me that, despite some rain, the damage to our crops is extensive and, in some cases, irreversible. We're determined to get aid just as quickly as we can to those farmers who need help, and I'm calling on Congress to act on comprehensive drought relief so I can sign some legislation to that end very soon.

But you know, in going back to Iowa and talking to many of the farmers there and businessmen and government leaders, I heard a great deal said about changes in American agriculture during the last few years. In many ways, these changes are reflected in your own organization's emphasis on broadening the public perception of what FFA is all about, because you're not only an organization for farmers but an organization for all those looking for opportunities in agricultural marketing, management, production, engineering, research, communications, government, and other areas. And this emphasis on the diversity of the agricultural field and broadening the economic base of our farming regions reflects the power, might, and maturity of American agriculture. Your 400,000 members in 7,800 chapters are testimony to a number of young lives that FFA influences in all these wide areas. And believe me, having traveled the world as I have during these past 8 years, I can tell you how important this work is to the hopes of so many millions for a better world and a better future.

You know, ``amazement'' is the word for how most of the rest of the world views American agriculture. We grow more grain, we plant more soybeans, we raise more cattle and export more produce than any combination of countries in the world.

Through all these decades, despite drought and misfortune, American agriculture continues to succeed. And there's a secret to it. It's one that's been emphasized to all of you because it's part of FFA philosophy. It's the secret of letting the consumer or the marketplace, not government planners, make the ultimate decision about what is on the shelves of our grocery stores or in the ships that carry American products across the seas.

I first started traveling abroad as President, especially to our annual economic summits, I suggested that the best foreign aid or development program the United States could give the world was a crash study in free enterprise.

America's economic miracle took over and as we created during the past 67 months 17 million new jobs, I noticed that the idea of fostering growth through encouraging the entrepreneur began to take hold -- even to the point where the emphasis on agricultural subsidies, once so sacrosanct in other nations, is giving way at these summits to ideas on how to develop more free enterprise.

Well, of course, sometimes government can help and should help -- natural disasters like the drought, for example -- but we need to look to a future where there's less, not more, government in our daily lives. It's that philosophy that brought us the prosperity and growth that we see today. That's why we've proposed nothing less than a total phaseout by the year 2000 of all policies that distort trade in agriculture, and I'm speaking of worldwide. This proposal reflects one of my abiding beliefs -- I think it's a belief that you share: The solution to the world agricultural problem is to get government out of the way and let farmers compete.

And you know, I'd like to point out something, as I did the week before last in Iowa. When people get to flattering me about this economic expansion, the longest in the peacetime history of our nation, I sometimes ask: What is it we really did to make all this happen for Americans? And the truth is, we just got out of your way. You did it; we didn't. That's why the work you're doing now, and will do as adults, is essential to what we as Americans can do for the rest of the world. We need to help so many in the underdeveloped world, especially in the agricultural area, and your example and your assistance and your commitment to the concept of economic freedom can be crucial to that endeavor.

Daniel Webster once said, ``other arts follow. The farmers therefore are the founders of human civilization.'' The work of FFA, its broadening horizons, are testimony just to that point. So, I want to congratulate each of you on your achievements with FFA. Your family and friends and your President are all very proud of you. Have a wonderful stay here while you're in the Nation's Capital.

Our country has an old tradition. The oldest tradition supposedly is that of its youth, and we as young people who represent over 416,000 other FFA members want to thank you and salute you for your unselfish service these past 8 years to our country. In fact, on a more personal note, we wanted you to know that those qualities, those special and unique ones that you possess -- that of communication ability; that of your gentleness; and also of your love mostly for your God, for your country, and for your mankind -- are those same qualities that we try to instill in our FFA members.

There is a riddle that asks about the American dream. What is the difference between the American dream and everyone else's dream? Well, Mr. President, you know what the difference is. Everyone else's dream is to be an American.

Thank you for your service to our country and to our young people, for your commitment and for your ability to change and to touch our lives. We would like to present you with this plaque which says: ``In tribute to President Ronald Reagan, in sincere appreciation for your outstanding leadership to our world and belief in over 416,000 FFA members as the future leaders of this great nation. July 28, 1988, The White House.'' Thank you.

Proposed by President Reagan, the National Medal of Arts was approved by Congress and enacted into law in 1984. It specifically authorizes the President to award no more than 12 medals each year ``to individuals or groups who in the President's judgment are deserving of special recognition by reason of their outstanding contributions to the excellence, growth, support, and availability of the arts in the United States.'' Sculptor Robert Graham designed the National Medal of Arts. The 4-inch sterling silver medal depicts six dancing figures and the words ``National Medal of Arts'' in bas-relief on the obverse. The reverse of the medal bears the cast words ``United States of America'' and the engraved name of the individual recipient.

Nominations for the National Medal of Arts are sought annually by the National Endowment for the Arts. Recommendations for recipients of the medal are made by the National Council on the Arts, the Endowment's Presidentially appointed advisory body, of the most highly qualified candidates. These recommendations are then forwarded to the White House for final selection by the President.

Brooks, Ann Griffiths, and members of the board, and family members: For me there's no group more special than the National League of Families, and I'm glad to be here to speak to you at your annual meeting. You are a remarkable group that has bonded together into an extended family that is both effective and compassionate. Some of your beloved family members are missing. We want to know their fate, and we yearn for them to come home. And we will continue to work for their return.

It's a wound that does not close with the passing of time. In 1961 the first American was listed as missing in action in Vietnam. After Operation Homecoming in 1973, there remained over 2,500 Americans unaccounted for, and your anguish since that time has been immense. And for long years the Government did far too little to learn the facts, to convey the truth, and to try to bring our men home.

But the National League of Families changed that. You pulled together. You spoke with a unified and unflagging voice. And you were heard. When we began together, there was an unresponsive bureaucracy without clear direction. There are now over 100 people in Defense, State, and the intelligence agencies working full-time to find your loved ones and bring you answers. That's a change that we made together, and that's how it must stay until your questions are answered. You stood alone far too long. That must never happen again.

Your cause has aroused a nation. Your responsible leadership has resisted simplistic solutions, sought facts, and moved this issue forward. For this you deserve great credit. And I particularly want to recognize your dedicated board chairman, George Brooks, and your hard-working and very talented executive director, Ann Griffiths.

The devotion of each family member and your long-term commitment have sent a message that has become embedded in the consciousness of our country. A bipartisan group in Congress now supports our efforts. The POW - MIA flag flies over State capitals, over veterans' posts, in parades in every city and town across America. And each year now it flies over the White House as well. The international community speaks directly about the Americans still missing in action. And, yes, we can find encouragement in the knowledge that through these efforts over 100 of you have received answers.

A decade ago we were told that after so much time had passed there was little chance any remains could be recovered. And there have always been those rushing to say that it was time to forget. Well, to those in a hurry to forget, your love for your fathers, brothers, husbands, and sons stands in the way. Those who want to close the door on the true history of the Vietnam war, to escape accountability and leave important questions unanswered -- they would close the book on those Americans still missing. Well, this is more than a betrayal of the men. It's more than a breach of faith with their families and their loved ones. It's a denial of the truth. And to them I say: America cannot move forward by leaving her missing sons behind.

For you, the families of MIA's and POW's unaccounted for, the Vietnam war is not over and will not end. For you, the only way we can ``give peace a chance'' is to give you the truth, the fullest possible accounting of the fate of your loved ones. Who can still question that America's youth fought a noble battle for freedom? And how can we not keep faith with those who served that cause? If there are living Americans being held against their will, we must bring them home. I implore the Governments concerned to respond to our previous proposals. Should there be anyone remaining voluntarily, their family deserves to know. And every American who has perished deserves to rest on United States soil. And until our questions are fully answered, we will assume that some of our countrymen are alive.

There are two things that your country must do for you. First, it must obtain the fullest possible accounting. And second, it must draw the true lessons of Vietnam so that we are a wiser, stronger, and prouder nation, and the ordeal under which you suffer can be prevented from ever happening again.

Well, as you gather for your 19th annual meeting, the Vietnamese Government has once again raised our hopes for a breakthrough. I welcome their pledge to my special emissary, General Vessey, to accelerate their work on those cases that he has discussed with them. We look forward to its fulfillment. We've witnessed promises made in the past by Vietnam that were not carried out, but we're following this offer up aggressively. I would also like to thank those charitable organizations that have been supporting the efforts of George [John] Vessey.

Governments of Indochina know that resolution of this issue is critical to any future relationship, that we will not tire of this quest, and that the longer this wound persists, the more likely that it will be permanent. And we will not weaken in our resolve to resist attempts to use this humanitarian issue for political gain.

Normalization of relations with Hanoi can come only in the context of a political settlement in Cambodia. Vietnam has recently stated its intention to withdraw its forces from Cambodia, and we would welcome a genuine settlement. If they're serious, then it's time to move rapidly to resolve the POW - MIA issue, for the deep pain that this issue brings to the American people will turn against Hanoi if it lingers past a Cambodian settement. It's in the interests of Hanoi to position itself for a new era and to help bring this to pass.

With the Lao Government, our joint search activities have been marked by a sincere effort to provide answers. We hope this can be sustained and expanded, for many unanswered questions remain. The Government in Phnom Penh has announced that they're holding the remains of Americans, but have yet to agree to our proposals to receive them. Well, I call upon them today to do so.

During the remainder of our administration these efforts will continue on a priority basis. We must call upon the next administration to do the same. In preparation for transition, I'm directing a comprehensive study on the POW - MIA issue, detailing our efforts, accomplishments, and what remains to be done. We must achieve the fullest possible accounting. The study will be given to you, the families, the Congress, and the American people.

I was Governor of California, a number of families gave me their POW - MIA bracelets. I brought those bracelets with me when I came to Washington, and they're in the study adjoining the Oval Office. They represent an unbreakable bond of trust between you and your country; forged with your courage, your tears, your prayers, and your pain; forged in the hearth of your steadfastness and resolve.

Whoever may occupy this office, it is a bond that cannot be broken. We've walked a long road together, and we'll continue to walk together. My concern for this issue began long before I took this office, and it will continue after I leave. I've previously noted Calvin Coolidge's remark that ``The nation which forgets its defenders will be itself forgotten.'' But thanks to your efforts, I know that America will never forget. And I believe that each of your families, and with them this nation, shall one day be healed.

I have mentioned some of the experiences back when I was Governor, and it was the period then when the POW's, who had known long years of imprisonment, were finally released and came home. And I appealed to Washington to let us at least meet and entertain and welcome home those whose home was California. Well, some 250 on 4 different occasions were in our home for dinner, and we heard their stories, and the evening went on, hearing the stories. And you just couldn't believe it.

Two men met in front of us in our living room, heard each other's names, and threw their arms around each other. They were the best and closest of friends. They knew every detail of each other's family. They were seeing each other face-to-face for the first time in their lives. All that friendship in those terrible days of imprisonment had been built on their tapping in the code, the prisoner's code, on the walls. They had never seen each other until they met in our living room.

It was so inspiring. And they told the stories without bitterness, just as you would relate any adventure. And I think maybe this is where Nancy and I fell in love with all of them and with all of those who remain, yet to return to their homeland.

In recent months, the U.N. Secretary General intensified his efforts to restart negotiations between the parties to the dispute. I am pleased to inform you that the Secretary General announced that he has received agreement in principle from both Cypriot President George Vassiliou and Turkish Cypriot community leader Rauf Denktash to begin talks. Details, however, remain to be worked out regarding the exact timing, basis, and nature of the discussions. We believe that this is an important opportunity and have noted to all interested parties that it should not be missed; maximum effort should be made to cooperate with the Secretary General. I offer my best wishes to both leaders as they strive for a lasting, mutually acceptable peace.

As publicly announced on July 7, President Vassiliou has accepted my invitation for a private visit to the United States on August 1. I look forward to meeting with him at that time to discuss efforts to negotiate a Cyprus solution and the continuing improvement of our already excellent bilateral relations. During President Vassiliou's recent visit to New York for the U.N. Special Session on Disarmament, I sent a message to the President through Special Cyprus Coordinator Wilkinson who had a lengthy conversation with him. Under Secretary of State for Coordinating Security Assistance Programs Derwinski also met with President Vassiliou.

Special Cyprus Coordinator Wilkinson also recently met with President Vassiliou and Turkish Cypriot leader Denktash during a recent trip to Cyprus to discuss continuing efforts toward negotiations and a settlement.

U.N. Secretary General issued his semiannual report, dated May 31, 1988, a copy of which is attached, to the Security Council on the U.N. operation in Cyprus. The Secretary General noted that his report was coming out at ``a time of tension . . . but also of hope,'' referring to concerns about serious incidents in the buffer zone that he hoped would not sidetrack efforts to resume active negotiations toward an overall settlement. Among other subjects in the report, the Secretary General reiterated his concern about the accumulated deficit in the UNFICYP special account.

Kenan Evren of Turkey visited the United States in late June and, during the course of his stay, responded to questions on Cyprus. President Evren stated that Turkey's main interest in Cyprus remains the security of the Turkish Cypriot community. He reaffirmed past Turkish statements that Turkish troops would be withdrawn from Cyprus in the context of a settlement that adequately addresses Turkish Cypriot concerns and interests. I view the timing and content of this message as very positive in relation to the U.N. Secretary General's effort to restart serious intercommunal negotiations in Cyprus.

Nicaraguan freedom fighters opposed to their oppression, agreed to a series of sweeping democratic reforms. If carried out, those reforms would have ended the killing and brought peace to Nicaragua and Central America. It would also have meant that Nicaragua would at last join the family of free, democratic nations.

At first, there were a few hopeful signs. To much media fanfare, the opposition newspaper in Nicaragua, La Prensa, was reopened. Independent radio stations were allowed to broadcast again. A few political prisoners were released, and political groups were allowed more latitude. Most important, Sandinistas finally agreed to the freedom fighters' request for direct negotiations for a peaceful, democratic settlement.

Now the main reason the Sandinistas agreed to those steps a year ago was the steady progress of the freedom fighters, including important battlefield victories like the one at Los Minas. But tragically, at the very moment when continued strength and determination by the United States might have meant the continued success of the peace plan, the United States House of Representatives decided, and by only a very narrow margin, to refuse my request for further effective aid to the freedom fighters. This, of course, removed the principal prod -- the military victories and popular success of the freedom fighters -- to Sandinista participation in the peace plan and sent an immediate signal of American weakness to the Communists.

Nicaraguans. Opposition leaders were jailed or beaten and now sentenced to prison. Political, religious liberties have again been curtailed. The Communists ordered the Catholic archbishop to shut down the Catholic radio station, and for almost 2 weeks the independent newspaper, La Prensa, was refused permission to publish. And the American ambassador was expelled.

And yet, while the cutoff of aid to the freedom fighters was a dreadful mistake, getting the cause of peace and freedom back on track -- not recrimination -- must now be our goal. There is a chance for real bipartisan consensus in support of renewed contra aid. Indeed, one of its strong supporters has recently been named to be the Vice Presidential candidate of the Democratic Party. Senator Bob Dole intends soon to offer legislation to renew effective assistance to the freedom fighters. The final details are being worked out. And I urge the Members of the Senate to support the aid package, and I also ask the House of Representatives to move speedily and favorably on the Senate legislation. Meanwhile, we continue to pursue aggressively our diplomatic efforts with the Central American democracies.

So much is at stake. A few years ago, there were those who said the cause of freedom and democracy was lost in El Salvador. Well, perhaps some of you remember that incredible scene when the people of that country defied Communist threats and bullets to march to the polls and vote for democracy. The American aid package that helped make democracy victorious in El Salvador passed by only two votes in the House -- but pass it did, and democracy did come.

A few weeks ago, both Vice President Bush and I visited the bedside of one of the heroes of that struggle, President Duarte of El Salvador. President Duarte has had no easy life. He has been continually threatened by extremists of both left and right. His daughter was kidnaped by Communist guerrillas. And now, while in a desperate struggle with cancer, he continues to lead his nation on the high road to democracy. I cannot tell you how deeply moved Vice President Bush and I were by our visit to this brave and remarkable man and how determined we both were that his dream for his people and all the peoples of Central America should be made a reality -- the dream of peace and freedom for every man, woman, and child.

The President. Ladies and gentlemen, back in the beginning of our administration, I talked a great deal about eliminating waste in government. And right now, I would like to introduce to you our Administrator for the Agency for International Development -- AID -- who has a statement to make and a presentation to make.

Mr. McPherson. Thank you, Mr. President. It's certainly very nice to be here. In keeping with your commitment to the American people to reduce waste and inefficiency, I'm happy to announce today our initial results at the Agency for International Development. These results will save millions of dollars for the American taxpayer. We've identified $28 million that we do not need to spend. These cuts come from projects from around the world. Some are from money which is being returned because local conditions have changed, some because of management problems, and some because of insufficient local government support.

Returning this money demonstrates that we will not hesitate to make changes in AID programs whenever they fall short of our expectations. Our reviews are not yet finished, but already we know there'll be millions of dollars additionally that we will return to the Treasury.

President Reagan. It's an honor and a very great pleasure to welcome President and Mrs. Sadat, those who've accompanied them here from their country, and for their family. Egypt and the United States enjoy a warm and a strong relationship, testmony to the honest good will of the people of both nations and recognition of President Sadat's foresight and leadership.

We are today friends and partners. We've come to trust each other so much that the bonds of unity grow stronger each day. We are a young country; Egypt a nation mature and rich with the blessings of time, a nation which cradled Western civilization in its arms. History will record that in the last half of the twentieth century, Egypt re-emerged as a significant force among the nations -- not by conquest, but because one man with the courage that it took set out to lead mankind toward peace.

In 1799 the Rosetta Stone was discovered, a tablet that served as a key to the understanding of Egypt's history. Well, like that famous stone, President Sadat serves as a key to understanding the depth and character of the Egyptian people, opening the eyes of the world to new opportunities for peace.

Those words exemplify the values that speak well of your roots, roots planted deeply in the great and ancient culture of Egypt, roots planted deeply in the village culture of which you have spoken so often and so eloquently. We know, President Sadat, what you have done was not intended to bring the blessing of peace just to your own nation, itself a laudatory goal, but to all the people of the Middle East, something smaller minds had discarded as impossible.

There are those who claim the ingrained hatred can never be overcome. To them I assert, President Sadat has shown the way. There are those who think that distrust will always submerge and suffocate faith. To them I assert, President Sadat has shown the way. And there those who say that peace is impossible and are afraid to reach out. And again I assert, President Sadat has shown the way.

Mr. President, you were a soldier, but your greatest victory came in preventing bloodshed and thereby capturing the hearts of peace-loving people everywhere. Your courage in taking the first step, your good faith in pursuing a tangible agreement with a former enemy, your maturity and moderation in the face of frustration since Camp David -- all of these are worthy of a man whom history will undoubtedly label one of the twentieth century's most courageous peacemakers.

I welcome this opportunity to get to know you personally and to discuss ways to strengthen our bilateral relations. We want you to know that although the Americans have changed Presidents, we have not altered our commitment to peace or our desire to continue building upon the achievements of Camp David.

Our mutual concern for the regional stability of the Middle East is a timely matter for discussion. External threats and foreign-inspired subversion menace independence. As we both know, the only beneficiary of violence, chaos, and blind hatred will be our adversaries.

But, good men, with the help of God, cooperating with one another, can and will prevail over evil. We're anxious to explore with you the road ahead and to see that the Egyptian people enjoy the fruits of peace and security from aggression. You have taken the first steps on a long, arduous journey with many obstacles to overcome. But today I assure you and the Egyptian people that we will walk that road together and that we will not be deterred from reaching our destination.

President Sadat. Mr. President, thank you for your very kind words. It is with pleasure and happiness that I met with you, and I'm going to hold a dialog which is certain to strengthen the structure of peace and enrich our perception of the world today. We look upon you with admiration and esteem. You are a man of faith and determination. Your leadership is inspiring, and your commitment is unwavering. Since you assumed your awesome responsibility as the leader of this great Nation, you set an admirable record of achievement and fulfillment.

You vowed to work for a stronger America, capable of confronting the challenges of our age. You pledged to exert tireless efforts in order to make the world more secure and just. You promised to introduce a better international equilibrium for the benefit of free nations. Within a few months, much has been achieved through your vigor and determination. We remain hopeful that much more will be attained in the months and years ahead.

Mr. President, we are holding our talks at a crucial moment. It is crucial for our region, for the Middle East, for the United States, and for the world at large. The rising tension and violence which we witnessed during the past few weeks in our area is a living evidence of the urgent need for a comprehensive peace in the Middle East.

No other goal is more pressing or crucial. At the same time, no other nation is more qualified to serve and safeguard the noble cause than your great nation. I'm confident that you will assume this responsibility with a sense of purpose and history, and I'm sure also that you will continue to play the role of the full partner willingly and vigorously.

Mr. President, we are equally committed to the cause of peace. No event or development can shake our belief that peace is the word of God and the only road to a happy future. It is a sacred mission that doesn't belong to a few persons or to one nation; rather, it belongs to mankind.

While I look forward to our talks today and in the days ahead with optimism and confidence, I'm sure much will depend on our common strategy for peace and stability. Much needs to be done to strengthen peace in the Arab world, in Africa, and in the Third World. New steps have to be taken to introduce a global balance that does not leave small nations under the mercy of those who possess the means of pressure and intervention.

Mr. President, I would like to address a word of appreciation and gratitude to the gallant American people. We are proud of our friendship and cooperation. You are a great companion and a most reliable friend and, like us in Egypt, you are a nation of believers. We shall do all that we can to bolster this friendship and intensify our cooperation in all fields. May God Almighty illuminate our way and guide our steps.

One of the essential elements of the Administration's Southwest Asia strategy will come before Congress for review in the near future. It is to provide Saudi Arabia with a package of equipment and training to improve its air defense capabilities. The package will include five E3A AWACS aircraft as well as enhancements for the F - 15 aircraft which we have agreed to provide.

I am convinced that providing Saudi Arabia with this equipment will improve the security of our friends, strengthen our own posture in the region, and make it clear both to local governments and to the Soviet leadership that the United States is determined to assist in preserving security and stability in Southwest Asia.

We have not previously submitted this package to the Congress, although it was decided upon in principle some time ago, for two reasons: the priority we needed to place on securing passage of our economic program, and the necessity of working out a set of understandings with the Saudi leadership which will ensure that the equipment provided will be employed to our mutual benefit and that the U.S. technology and systems involved will be fully protected.

I am aware that information from a variety of sources has been circulating on Capitol Hill regarding this sale and that many Members have been under some pressure to take an early position against it. I hope that no one will prejudge our proposal before it is presented. We will make a strong case to the Congress that it is in the interest of our country, the Western Alliance and stability in the Middle East. Meanwhile, as the Congress prepares for its August recess, I would appreciate your support and assistance in urging that Members do not prejudge this important issue until they have had the opportunity to hear the Administration's views.

The President today announced his intention to nominate George Southall Vest to be Representative of the United States of America to the European Communities, with the rank and status of Ambassador. He will succeed Thomas O. Enders, who has resigned.

Dr. Bishirjian is a trustee of the Philadelphia Society and a member of the International Seminar for Philosophy and Political Science. Recently, he served as team leader of the National Endowment for the Humanities transition team.

The President. In the past several days, the Congress has acted with great wisdom and foresight in passing two bills that will help put us on the road to economic recovery. These bills -- the reconciliation bill and the tax bill -- are not yet here for signing, so we'll save that occasion for later. But before many of us leave Washington, I just wanted to ask all of these gentlemen down here for a few brief moments together.

In my view, the passage of this legislation marks the single most important achievement of the past 200 days. It represents the first serious step taken in decades to stop the growth of government, to end government's unwarranted intrusion into our lives, and to rebuild the foundations of our economy.

Now, those of you who are here now are among the chief architects and the builders of these bills. And your political skills, your legislative talents, your insights, your hard work are responsible for their success. And I don't think I have to elaborate on the remarkable role that each one of you has played in this. This can be safely left to history. But I would be remiss if I didn't say a few simple or totally inadequate but heartfelt words to each of you, and the words are ``thank you, thank you all.'' And they came not just from me but from the American people.

During the last 200 days, you've provided your countrymen with an example of representative democracy at its best. Those of you in the Republican leadership in the face of extraordinary pressures have forged a political unity that has rarely been equaled in Washington, and you did it first and foremost because you believed you were acting in the best interests of the country. And those of you here today who are members of the Democratic Party had the personal strength to put principle above partisan or special interests, and yours has been a special courage.

I think we can all agree that today our bipartisan coalition is becoming a strong and vibrant one. But I think we can also agree that we'll need this strength and vibrancy, because the challenges we must face together are by no means over. The struggle against government's irresistible urge to grow and grow is a continuing one. The fight to control the Federal budget is just beginning. But on this front, I think we can be very clear: There will be no falling back, no call for retreat.

We've stood together. We've fought together for what we believed was right. I know that we'll do so again. But today I wanted you to know how grateful I am to you and how grateful the American people are for your selflessness and your statesmanship.

The President. Well, we're up to about 75 percent of the normal air traffic. And there is still room for more to come back, because the 48 hours included until their shifts. So, there is an afternoon shift due in, there's a night shift and so forth, and we'll see what the total is in. As I understand, it's up to about 38 percent now are back in.

The President. Well, I was sorry, and I am sorry for them. I think that these are fine people out there who have been misled and who don't quite understand that our position has to be irreversible. There is a law and an oath that they signed, and I don't think any of them would hold still if any of us here took an oath, decided that we didn't mean to keep that oath.

The President. Well, you bet. Anyone who went through the Great Depression thinks that's the worst thing in the world that can happen to anyone. And I do feel badly; I certainly take no joy out of this. And I was hoping that more of them would recognize the obligation they have. But there just is no other choice.

The President. Well, you've got to wait till October 1st before the tax cut begins -- [laughter] -- and so we have to wait till that money begins showing up in the private sector and being returned to investment. And you have to wait until the end of the next fiscal year -- or during the fiscal year for the effect of the lower government spending. But I think that those things together -- no one promised this is instant. I think that we're going to have to wait till we actually feel the effect of those things that have been adopted, going into action.

The President. Well, as I say, if we're up already to 75 percent of normal air traffic, under the present situation, I think this is an indication that we're not faced with disaster. But I still think that if those people would recognize that their responsibility, not only in their personal oath but in obeying the law, there's still some time today for more of them to come back to work.

President Reagan. Ladies and gentlemen, tonight we welcome a man who leads a nation recognized for its magnificent contributions to mankind. His depth of character and hard-won accomplishments suggest that Egypt's contributions will not be limited to those of antiquity. In the recent past, there have been few foreign leaders who have truly captured the hearts of the American people. And Anwar Sadat is one of those rare exceptions.

Historians often argue about whether events are shaped by people or people by events. There's little doubt that the man we honor this evening is an individual who shaped history. President Sadat, Mrs. Sadat, it's truly an honor to have you with us.

But seriously, those charged with enormous responsibility are, after all, people and must have a very human quality of flowing with events. Nevertheless, some, like the man we honor tonight, do more than live through history; they make it. You, Mr. President, could have let the flow of events continue unchecked. Instead, with brilliant insight, you recognized an opportunity and seized the moment.

During your historic journey to Jerusalem you explained, ``There come moments when it becomes imperative for those endowed with wisdom and lucidity of vision to penetrate beyond the past with all its complications and vestiges to usher in an undaunted move toward new horizons.'' Well, more than wisdom, it takes courage to make fundamental decisions -- the kind that you, Mr. President, talked about.

Time and time again, he has demonstrated that vital courage as well as a majestic sense of decency and dedication to universal human principles. Instead of pounding on podiums and romanticizing the illusionary glory of conflict, President Sadat set goals for his people of peace, prosperity, and freedom. As your people have strived for these ends, Americans and Egyptians have unavoidably been drawn together -- unavoidably, because we share the same goals. And as many who have visited both nations point out, we, the Egyptians and the Americans, are similar people. Certainly our love of freedom and independence unites us.

The sentiments President Reagan expressed toward me and the Egyptian people clearly reflect the bonds of friendship and amity which exist today between our nations. For years we worked hand in hand to set our relations on the course which is compatible with the long history of mutual respect and admiration between our peoples. We are determined to cement this friendship even further.

Our meeting today was a historic one by any measure. Let me state first that I was delighted to meet you, Mr. President, and strike an everlasting friendship with you. You are a statesman of conviction and compassion. You have a clear vision of the world and our duty to make if safer and happier for the living generations and those to come. Your priorities are rightly set. I was pleased that we are in full agreement over the issues we discussed.

Your nation, Mr. President, has played a pivotal role to bring about peace in the Middle East. No progress, as I told you in the morning, Mr. President, would have been made without such an active and dynamic role; no result would have been achieved. But with your help we have taken gigantic steps on the road to peace.

When we launched our peace initiative, we had in mind the support of the American people. And as we prepare for the second stage, we count on your continued interest and backing. Together we shall continue to work vigorously until the sacred mission is fulfilled. What I heard from you today, Mr. President, was very encouraging indeed.

We believe that the time is right for the resumption of the peace process. Recent events in the area demonstrated beyond any doubt that we cannot wait long if we are to spare the region further destruction and devastation. We must take additional steps promptly and without delay in order to maintain the momentum for peace. We are determined to complete our mission. We will not be deterred or discouraged by any development.

A new initiative, Mr. President, a bright side of this event was the willingness of the Palestinians to accept a cease-fire in Lebanon and uphold it. This is a turning point that should not escape our notice. In effect, it means that for the first time the Palestinians have come close to endorsing the peaceful solution. Those who are genuinely interested in peace in the Middle East should recognize this positive development and build upon it for the good of all nations.

At the same time, this is an added ammunition for our goal for mutual and simultaneous recognition between the Israelis and the Palestinians. As I have repeatedly said, the answer to persisting fears and suspicions is a real willingness to coexist and live together as good neighbors. We have set a good example with the establishment of peace between Egypt and Israel within the context of a comprehensive settlement. That model applies to the relations between Israel and the other parties.

You can help this process of reconciliation, Mr. President, by holding a dialog with the Palestinians through their representatives. This is certain to strengthen the forces of moderation among them. It would also undermine the designs of those who exploit the present state of affairs for their own selfish ends. It would be an act of statesmanship and vision.

If we succeed to achieve tangible progress with respect to the Palestinian problem, a whole new situation will emerge. We will be able to confront the real challenges we face. They are challenges which involve the survival of many nations and the protection of the vital interests of the West. I am confident that we will meet these challenges decisively and without hesitation.

I came here hopeful and optimistic, Mr. President. After our first session, I have become most confident and certain, under your upright and under your inspiring leadership, this great country can realize its dreams and reach its goals.

On behalf of the Egyptian people, I invite you, Mr. President, and your family to visit Egypt. This will give our people an opportunity to express to you directly their feelings of gratitude and respect. Such a visit will also serve the cause of peace and stability in the Middle East. It will enable us to pursue this stimulating dialog and bolster the bonds of friendship and mutual understanding.

My meetings with President Sadat have now ended, and I want to say how valuable our exchanges have been and how encouraged I am with the progress that has been made and how much I personally have learned from President Sadat about the complexities of the problems that we all face in seeking a just and lasting peace in the Middle East. I'm greatly impressed with his intimate knowledge and his passionate concern.

Our talks covered three general areas: first, the growing strategic threat to the region posed by the growth of Soviet military power and the activities of Soviet surrogates in the Near East, Southwest Asia, and Africa. The second issue, discussed in great detail, was the peace process -- and here, to be completely candid, I was a willing listener. We're both anxious to ensure the the negotiating process stemming from that Camp David agreements will resume and succeed.

President Sadat has urged that the United States continue to play an important role in this process, and this we will do. I'll be meeting with other Middle East leaders in the coming months to continue the process of sharing views with our friends about our common goals of peace, stability, and security in the area.

The third area we discussed -- Congress isn't in session, is it?  [The President was momentarily distracted by the sound of nearby fire engine sirens.]  The third area we discussed had to do with the growing bilateral relations between the United States and Egypt. We covered issues of mutual security, military cooperation, and economic matters. President Sadat shares our belief that a strong defense and a strong economy go hand in hand. We will work closely with Egypt as full partners in our search for peace and stability in the Middle East.

And finally, let me add another personal note. I had, of course, heard a great deal about President Sadat and was optimistic that we would establish a close rapport. My optimism was justified. I respected him for all that he has done, and getting to know him has vastly increased that respect. I share his belief that with courage, determination, and foresight, and a bold vision of the future, we can succeed in our common endeavors.

I quite agree -- full agreement with what President Reagan said. If I am to add anything, it is expressing my deep gratitude to President Reagan for this kind invitation to meet with him and to survey all the problems that we are facing together and then to meet again with the American people with whom I cherish really the full pride to be friends, to be understanding. And I'm happy to tell the American people, as always as I told them, I'm very happy, because after this visit I can say that I enjoy the friendship of President Reagan as a great leader of a great nation.

The President today announced the selection of the following individuals to serve as members of the President's Export Council. In addition, the President announced the selection of J. Paul Lyet as Chairman.

By the President of the United States of America A Proclamation Among those Americans who have answered their country's call to service in defense of its freedoms, there are thousands who, as a result of service in our Nation's military forces, have suffered the catastrophic disability of blindness. Despite the extreme severity of this disability, these veterans have succeeded in leading useful and productive lives, in part through Federal programs for their readjustment but, more significantly, by drawing upon a special brand of heroism.

Our country now enjoys the blessing of peace, and it is appropriate that all Americans recognize the special debt owed to those who have been blinded in the defense of our freedoms during the wars of this century.

We must acknowledge also the example they have provided to those blinded veterans whose equally catastrophic disability occurred after their separations from military service, and to other blinded Americans. Few are more worthy of national recognition than the disabled American veterans who have honored their commitments to their country and serve as a source of pride for us all.

I would also like to single out for praise those employers who have provided blinded veterans with the opportunity to develop rewarding private-sector careers. This promise of a future with challenge and fulfillment is particularly meaningful.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this sixth day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Ray Bliss, the son of German immigrants, was an American who believed in the political process on which this Nation's freedom rests. As chairman of the Republican National Committee from 1965 to 1969, he helped to rejuvenate and unify the party during a critical period of its development.

He understood that the strength of our democracy and the responsiveness of our government were dependent upon the vitality of the party system. He respected his party and those in his party respected him. Nancy and I convey our deepest sympathy to his family.

On several occasions during my campaign for the Presidency, I expressed my support for a strong merchant marine and maritime industry. We must have a strong merchant marine capable of meeting both our peacetime need for transportation of resources and products and our need for logistical support in time of national emergency.

The merchant marine and the maritime industry of our country need effective leadership and direction. I have promised that my administration will provide the leadership and direction for a strong merchant marine. The process of correcting the problems of the maritime industry, however, will be difficult and will take time. There are no quick fixes. Vision and innovation accompanied by a spirit of cooperation, sacrifice, and compromise by all segments of the industry, labor, and government are essential if we are to succeed.

I am pleased to sign H.R. 4074, a bill which transfers the Maritime Administration to the Department of Transportation. This organizational change is a signficant achievement and will be of assistance in considering the maritime industry as part of a comprehensive national transportation system. This is of particular importance in view of the recent innovations in marine transportation that have resulted in greater integration of land and water transportation modes.

Associated with this transfer of the Maritime Administration, I have designated the Secretary of Transportation, Drew Lewis, as my administration's spokesman on maritime matters. Not only do I consider this designation essential to addressing effectively the problems of the industry but also to resolving a frequently expressed desire of both the Congress and the industry for a single focal point for maritime matters within the executive branch.

I extend my thanks to all those who cooperated to develop and enact this legislation in less than two months. I would particularly like to recognize the efforts of Senator Packwood, chairman of the Senate Commerce Committee, and Congressman Jones, chairman of the Merchant Marine and Fisheries Committee, for their invaluable assistance and cooperation, and would like to acknowledge as well the significant contributions of Senator Slade Gorton, Senator Daniel Inouye, Congressman Gene Snyder, Congressman Mario Biaggi, and Congressman Paul McCloskey, whose work on this legislation was an outstanding example of bipartisan cooperation. I thank those members of the industry who expressed their strong support for this legislation and hope that we can continue to build on this cooperative spirit to resolve the pressing problems of the industry.

One of my responsibilities under that act is to assure that the information needed is collected with a minimum of burden on business and other respondents. To fulfill this responsibility, I am asking the Congress to make a technical amendment to the act as amended by this bill. Specifically, I request the Congress to remove the reference to calendar year data, because many business firms would find it much less burdensome to report on the basis of their fiscal accounting year. I believe that a determination of the specific reporting period should be left to the technical experts who manage the program and have been charged with the responsibility for balancing the need for collecting accurate data with that of minimizing the burden on respondents.

The President. Yes, since this is the first day of this kind of weather, of fog, since we've been here, I shall refrain from saying that you're all responsible -- [laughter] -- for bringing it up with you. The Sun has been shining brightly here.

These bills that I'm about to sign -- not every page -- this is the budget bill, and this is the tax program -- but I think they represent a turnaround of almost a half a century of a course this country's been on and mark an end to the excessive growth in government bureaucracy, government spending, government taxing.

And we're indebted for all of this -- I can't speak too highly of the leadership, Republican leadership in the Congress and of those Democrats who so courageously joined in and made both of these truly bipartisan programs. But I think in reality, the real credit goes to the people of the United States who finally made it plain that they wanted a change and made it clear in Congress and spoke with a more authoritative voice than some of the special interest groups that they wanted these changes in government.

This represents $130 billion in savings over the next 3 years. This represents $750 billion in tax cuts over the next 5 years. And this is only the beginning, because from here on now we are going to have to implement all of these, and it's going to be a job to make this whole turnaround work. It's going to be the number one priority -- or continue to be the number one priority of our administration.

Q. Yeah, I do. Mr. President, the Wall Street Journal carried a story yesterday that the revenue projections which you will be getting are going to be lower than your administration previously thought, and that means we're headed for a more severe economic downturn with higher interest rates. Are you ready to revise your own projections about the economy downward? Are we headed for a recession?

The President. I don't know whether you'd call it a recession or not, but they're not saying anything that we haven't said over and over again. Our own projections have been that for the next several months this soft and soggy economy is going to continue and that we shouldn't be fooled by these last couple of months of seeming upturn, that this means a continued climb. We think that we are in a soggy economy and it's going to go on.

Remember that it won't be until October that any of this will begin to be implemented. This is the budget that begins for the year in October. The tax programs, of course, won't be into effect until then either. And what we're counting on is when these , and these begin to take effect, that we will see the results when people begin to have the more money in their pockets from their earnings and when the lowered expenditures of government begin taking effect.

Q. Mr. President, on the air controllers strike, the International Association of Air Controllers has called on you to negotiate with PATCO. Why do you continue to believe that you should not negotiate with them?

On that, there is no strike. There is a law that Federal unions cannot strike against their employers, their employers being the people of the United States. There was in addition to that an oath that is taken by each employee that he or she will not strike, and we warned in advance in the negotiations -- there were 7 months of negotiations. They resulted on June 22d in a settlement that was deemed satisfactory to the union negotiators. Then they came back several weeks later with demands that were -- said that this was not suitable and with demands that increased by 17 times what had been agreed to in June. It would have amounted to a $40,000 increase per year per controller. But we warned, under the threat of a strike, that there could not be a strike against the law, that this would be breaking the law, and that there, therefore, could be no negotiations.

Q. Wouldn't it be worth it, Mr. President, to go ahead and rehire these 12,000 people rather than have the American people suffer the inconvenience and the damage to the economy this is going to cause?

So, we feel that we are rebuilding the system now in view of the action of those controllers who decided to violate their oath and to violate the law. And I just don't see any way that it could be expected that we could now just go back and pretend that they weren't breaking the law or breaking their oath.

The President. Our obligation is to those several thousand that are in there working. And I must say they have my utmost gratitude and admiration, and I think they should have of all the people for what they're doing.

The President. Yes, although we have said that those -- and some have already -- those who come back and can show that they were, you might say, coerced or harassed, pressured into doing what they did and it was not their will, we have taken some of those back.

Q. Mr. President, let me ask you about the Soviet Union's commentary today that your policy is one of sheer insanity and that relations between Moscow and Washington are now at the lowest ebb that they've been in modern times, since the cold war ended. Are we now in a new cold war, and do you fear that it may lead to an actual shooting war?

The President. No, I don't fear the actual shooting war. And whatever they may want to term it, ``cold war'' or not, what we are in is a situation where we're being realistic about their military buildup, which has gone on unchecked in spite of all of the meetings having to do with arms control and so forth. And I can understand their anguish. They are squealing like they're sitting on a sharp nail simply because we now are showing the will that we're not going to let them get to the point of dominance, where they can someday issue to the free world an ultimatum of ``surrender or die,'' and they don't like that.

But, no, I have made it plain -- and it isn't just language -- we are going to meet with them with regard to the theater nuclear weapons in Europe, but we are also going to meet, and I have asked that we meet to legitimately discuss the reduction of armaments on both sides, particularly in strategic weapons.

The President. No, not really. The neutron weapon -- incidentally, we have information that the Soviet Union spent about a hundred million dollars in Western Europe alone a few years ago when the announcement was first made of the invention of the neutron warhead, and I don't know how much they're spending now, but they're starting the same kind of propaganda drive.

The neutron warhead is a defensive weapon. It is a deterrent to a conflict. But we didn't start manufacturing it. The previous administration had authorized its manufacture quite some time ago, and what we have been doing -- they, however, did not put the actual neutron part of the warhead in the 8-inch shell of the Lance missile. And so you stored here, warehoused that and the casing that in time of need and necessity would be then put together. Well, this doesn't make very much sense.

Q. There is a report that you are considering offering controllers a Presidential pardon or an amnesty, giving them back their jobs if they admit that they were wrong. Is there any such consideration, and would you consider amnesty if they did?

Q. Mr. President, there's been a report today that the Soviet Union will begin wargames next month in the Baltic States and the Baltic Sea under the direct direction of the Soviet Defense Minister. Do you consider that a reaction to your neutron bomb announcement, and is that something that surprises the administration, that we didn't know about?

The President. No, because they -- we're not surprised -- they were preparing long before this news leaked out about the assembly of the neutron warhead. It leaked out that -- or we had the information that they were preparing for these wargames, so they couldn't have been dependent on the neutron warhead at all.

The President. They might be directed against that, but I would have no way of knowing what's in their mind. But apparently they're going to include amphibious landings, coastal landings, and so forth.

The President. No. Our intention is to simply stockpile it, warehouse it, you might say, as we do with other weapons, in the event that, heaven forbid, there ever is a necessity, a war that brings them about.

This weapon was particularly designed to offset the great superiority that the Soviet Union has on the western front against the NATO nations, a tank advantage of better than four to one, and it is purely, as I say, a defensive weapon. And maybe this is why it's so painful to the Soviet Union, to realize that this could offset their great advantage there.

The President. Well, the decision is going to be made very soon, and it is just some last details in the review that has been going on that started with the incident in the Middle East. And then I will be announcing a decision, probably next week.

Q. Back on the budget, many Governors, particularly Democratic Governors, say it's a shell game, that you've got to help them on the so-called safety net more, or they're not going to be able to take up the slack.

Now, it is true, we were not able to get all that we wanted in the line of real block grants and autonomy for local and State government. You know, one level of government -- they even have that conflict between local and State government, that each level is a little reluctant to give up autonomy and authority. We're going to continue to work with the Congress and work with the States and local government representatives to give them the autonomy they can have to make these programs work.

The President. Well, the difference is -- and what our reductions were based on is that the block grant, giving them the flexibility at that level to use this as they saw fit, setting the priorities, really would result in a savings, and our reductions were based on those estimated savings in unnecessary administrative overhead, direction, and restrictions that caused unnecessary spending at the local level. And as a Governor I can testify that that was true, that in many of the categorical grant programs we could see how much more efficiently they could have been run without the redtape imposed by the Federal Government.

Q. Secretary Haig recently called on the Russians to show restraint and reciprocity if they wanted better relations with the United States. In your communications with Brezhnev, what suggestions have you made to the Soviets of ways they can improve their behavior, or how would you suggest now the Soviets could improve so that you could get back to detente and reduce this war of words?

The President. Well, I made a suggestion at one time in correspondence with Mr. Brezhnev that sometimes it seems that the governments sometimes get in the way of the people and that I think that the people of all countries have a great many things in common -- a desire to raise their families, a desire to choose the occupation or profession they want to work at, to have some control over their lives. And I suggested that maybe we might sit down sometime and see what it was the people really wanted.

The President. Well, when we are ready to come forward with a program of proposals for the -- and that will take some preliminary meetings at the ministerial level before we're ready to come in and actually negotiate, as I've said, legitimate arms reductions to remove this nightmare that hangs over the world today of the strategic weapons.

Q. Mr. President, I wonder about the neutron bomb perhaps changing nuclear doctrine. If the Soviets attacked with tanks, might we become the first to use -- would we engage in first strike with that weapon?

The President. Well, this is something that seems to be overlooked in all the propaganda that's now being uttered about this weapon, and that is that the present tactical battlefield weapons stationed in Europe are nuclear weapons, far more destructive, far longer in rendering areas uninhabitable because of radioactivity, than the neutron weapon. So, those tactical nuclear weapons are there on both sides already, and this, we think, is a more moderate but more effective version.

You also have to remember that those who are crying the loudest, the Soviet Union, and many of those who under the name of pacifism in Western Europe, who are opposing things like this and opposing the theater nuclear forces and so forth, maybe some are sincere -- I'm sure they are -- but I think others are really carrying the progaganda ball for the Soviet Union, because there's no mention made of 200 SS - 20's, strategic nuclear weapons of medium range, that are aimed at the cities of all of Europe today, and that are not being considered in any of the talk of reduction of theater forces, East and West -- just as in SALT II the Soviet Union called our aging B - 52 a strategic weapon but did not call their Backfire, modern bomber, a strategic weapon.

So, let's remember the SS - 20's before we start worrying too much about what we're thinking about. But remember also that our present 8-inch guns and our present Lance missiles over there are tactical nuclear weapons.

The President. Well, this has always been our goal and will continue to be our goal. But remember that we always said that there were further budget cuts for the coming years, for '83 and '84. These are the ones that go into effect in '82.

The President. Well, we know, of course, that we will have a sizable deficit for '81. There was nothing we could do about that. And, as you know, the Government has been operating in '81 without a budget, just on appropriations, and we have tried to limit once we got into management what we could, but the die was already cast as to the amount of this deficit.

Now, the possibility of increased deficits in the coming years over our previous figures are due in part to not getting totally what we had asked for in the budget cuts, but also that the tax package finally came out with additional reductions. As I say, those have possibly called for some reductions simply to recognize the realities of these two packages now, but we are going to continue to work on this and work for more budget cuts. And it just means that we're going to have to try to get more additional cuts than we might have had to get before.

I'm not sure that we might not have been, however, too conservative in our estimates on the tax program, because, remember, our tax proposals were based on the belief that the cut in tax rates would not mean a comparable cut in tax revenues, that the stimulant to the economy would be such that the Government might find itself getting additional revenues, as it did last year in the cut of the capital gains tax.

The President. Yes. I noticed this morning's report in the paper, about a headline that said, ``Interest Rates Up.'' But then when you read the story, you found that that was simply in the bond market in New York and was reflecting bond buyers' competition for the limited amount of capital that was there for investment. That's part of what's in that tax program, is to make less limited that amount of money that's available for capital investment.

The President. No. As a matter of fact, not before I return to Washington, but the MX and the B - 1 programs are -- we've still been discussing these and the various options, and very possibly we may wait for the return of Congress.

The President. That would depend on the negotiating table and how willing they were to actually discuss arms reductions. You will recall that the previous President tried to introduce that once, and our Secretary of State was on his way home in 24 hours from Moscow, because they wouldn't even hear of a reduction. But they are the ones, with all of the talk that's going on, the Soviet Union has been engaged in the greatest military buildup in the history of man, and it cannot be described as necessary for their defense. It is plainly a buildup that is offensive in nature.

The President. Well, no, not if they could achieve such a superiority by conning everyone else into being quiescent, that they could then say, ``Look at the difference in our relative strengths. Now, here's what we want.'' This is what I mean by an ultimatum, ``Surrender or die.'' And I think maybe they see that plan losing some of its potency now with our own plans.

Jim Watt has been doing what I think is a common sense job in the face of some environmental extremism that we've suffered from. And I can assure you Jim Watt does not want to destroy the beauty of America. He just wants to recognize that people are ecology, too. We have some needs, and there has to be provision for us to live.

The President. No, we've been out there in the woods working very hard at cleaning up, as I say, some of that brush. I wish the fog would lift so you could see some of the brush piles around here. Lee Clearwater, who was here the night that the snowfall came, said it sounded like an artillery barrage, hearing the limbs snapping off all over in the woods. And we had it pretty park-like around here until then.

Q. Can I ask you one more question? There have been specific reports that your Secretary of State and Secretary of Defense are not getting along and that they argue in front of you. Can you comment on those reports?

The President. The whole Cabinet argues in front of me. [Laughter] That was the system that I wanted installed. Instead of the traditional Cabinet meeting with each Cabinet member making a brief report on how things were going in his agency, I wanted this operation where I have the benefit of the thinking of all of them, because most problems do overlap. There's hardly a problem that doesn't touch other Cabinet agencies and other departments of government.

And so, what we do is we have an agenda, and it goes out on the table and there have been numerous differences. And the thing is, when there's been enough discussion and enough argument and I've joined in and I've heard enough, I make the decision.

But no ill will and no feuds or turf battles of any kind have been going on. I've made it plain that I want each department to explain from that department's standpoint, such as State and Defense, what is their thinking and their reasoning as to why they take a certain position. And then I have to decide and weigh which way to go and which way is best for the national interest.

Twenty years ago the city of Berlin was divided by barriers erected to seal off East Berlin from the rest of the city. Those barriers were soon replaced by a massive concrete wall -- a wall that today symbolizes the imprisonment of millions of Germans under Communist rule.

Although this wall stopped the flow of more than 3,000 persons a day who were escaping just before it was built, it could not completely stifle the human longing for freedom -- tragically, more than 70 people have lost their lives trying to climb across the Berlin Wall to safety and freedom.

The Berlin Wall is a dramatic example of the desperate and cruel extremes to which totalitarian regimes will go to deny their subjects contact with other Europeans. From the Baltic Sea to Southeastern Europe, a murderous barrier of minefields and barbed wire, manned by guards who shoot to kill, stands as a monument to the inhumanity of those who would make the individual the servant of the state.

The regimes responsible for the barrier must be constantly reminded that their elaborate efforts to stifle human freedom with walls, mines, gunfire, and barbed wire are a colossal admission of failure.

What can the world think of rulers who must build prison walls around their own nation? What can the world think of leaders who fear that their own people will flee their homeland at the first opportunity?

Today throughout the world men and women who cherish freedom pray for the day when the Berlin Wall and other such monuments to tyranny are only a bitter memory -- a day when the people of East Europe can once again enjoy free contact with their neighbors in the West.

Dr. Cole-Alexander has been involved in many community activities, including serving as a member of the steering committee of the National Council of Negro Women; member of the board of directors, Washington Opportunities for Women; and member, board of trustees, Legal Aid Society of Washington.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 14th day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Sec. 8. General Provisions. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Order, any representation pursuant to or under this Order in any judicial or quasijudicial proceedings shall be by or through the Attorney General. The conduct and control of all litigation arising under the Act shall be the responsibility of the Attorney General.

Well, I thank all of you for being here. I know the cause that brings you together, and I think it is doubly important, more important than it has ever been. Next year, '82, that's an election year for all of our assemblymen, the administration, for the Senate. And if I have my figures correct, we would only have to hold our own in the assembly, where all are up for election, and win 10 of their seats, and we'd have a majority there. And in the Senate, there are 14 of them up for reelection, and only 6 Republicans -- we'd only have to hold our own and win 4, and we would control that house.

Then, of course, we want the administration also. And the reason it's doubly important is because of some of the things that have been going on in Washington. I am determined that we're going to do everything we can to restore federalism to this land, to make this once again a federation of sovereign States, in which State governments, local governments would have more autonomy than they've had for 50 years. And while we didn't get all we wanted in the block grant process -- to take off the backs of State and local government the redtape and the regulations, the strings that go with categorical grants -- we'll keep on trying and fighting, because my dream is that the block grants are only a means to an end. And the end would be when the Federal Government turns back to the States and local governments sources, actual tax sources, of revenue, allowing the States and the local governments to perform those functions which are theirs by the Constitution and that they would have the tax resources with which to support those functions.

The other day up in the fog -- [laughter] -- on the hill, [Rancho del Cielo] we signed those two bills. And I got so mad, because I kept looking and looking -- they wouldn't show enough of the size of them. The budget cuts alone were a stack of paper that high. I've read every page. [Laughter] And the tax cuts were only that high. [Laughter] But even so, in those tax cuts, it's going to amount to hundreds of billions of dollars over the next few years. It's going to reverse a tax increase built into the system that was going to take $92 billion more out of your pockets next year and $300-and-some billion out of your pockets over the next 3 years.

But the budget cuts, I think, have reversed a trend of the last half century -- the idea that government can voluntarily reduce itself in size. And what we have actually done with those budget cuts is reduce the growth of government, reduce it by more than half, from more than 14 percent, almost 16 percent, some say, depending on who's doing the figuring, down to 6\1/2\-percent increase in the annual spending. And we still have a job to do. That's only the beginning.

This fall, when we start in on the 1983 budget, we have to find tens of billions of dollars of additional cuts. And in 1984 we're going to find more tens of billions of dollars of additional cuts. And then we're going to depend on those tax reductions that we've made to do what we've always said they would and that is to stimulate the economy, to create employment, and to make everyone, even including the government, more prosperous because of the increase -- [applause].

Well, God bless you all for being here and make sure that we have the kind of a government in California in 1982 that'll be ready and willing to accept the responsibilities that heretofore have been usurped by the Federal Government. And we'll try to see that they've got the resources to make them work without all that administrative overhead.

Captain Brooks and crew of the Constellation, thank you for extending me this opportunity. This ship represents a powerful force in an uncertain world, and we all sleep a little better at night knowing that you're on duty. Everything we as Americans hold dear is safer because of what all of you are doing. I'd like to especially greet those who will be in the air department, the combat direction center, in engineering and communication later on. Although you won't be with us later, you're certainly not forgotten.

The engineering unit, I understand, faces a major recertification examination tomorrow, and a September readiness evaluation is also rapidly approaching. These are two of the major challenges for which you've been preparing, so can I just express my confidence that you're going to come through with flying colors?

Officers and men of the Fletcher, it's my privilege and I'm greatly honored to have this opportunity to say hello to you but also to tell you how grateful all of us are for all that you're doing. We are truly grateful. I have just finished telling the crew here of the Constellation that this is really kind of an earth-shattering experience for me, since my military experience was as a horse cavalryman. This is somewhat different.

But, we are proud of all of you, and while there may be some people who think that the uniform is associated with violence, you are the peacemakers. It's because of what you're doing that we can be sure of peace.

The President. It is an area in which we have conducted training exercises rather regularly -- not only us but others. And Libya has created an artificial line, claiming waters that are actually international waters. And we just felt that we gave the routine notice that is always given for such maneuvers, and we conducted those maneuvers on the basis of what are international waters and not that artificial line that had been created. This foray by the Libyans was nothing new. Over the last couple of years, they have frequently harassed our aircraft out beyond that line in the Mediterranean; French aircraft. There have even been incidents of threats of fire, and we decided it was time to recognize what are the international waters and behave accordingly.

The President. We didn't challenge them. This was the scheduled time for the maneuvers. We've been holding them every year and in that area. And this time we didn't restrict ourselves on the basis of what, as I say, is an artificial line. We utilized the international waters there for the training exercise.

The President. Well, no, there was no -- everything was going forward and everything that had to be done -- and there was no decision to be made or they would have. They would have awakened me if there had been a decision. But it was -- the incident had taken place; there was no other reason, so they waited to call me when they had all the full information.

The President. The message to the Libyans was brought on by the Libyans. We didn't go there to shoot down a couple of Libyan planes. They came out and fired on ours when we were holding maneuvers, and which everyone had been notified, all of our allies. All of the countries there in the area had been notified that we were going to hold those maneuvers, which we do every year in that same place.

The President. No. We were, as I say, faced with the knowledge that you could not go on recognizing this violation of international waters and that we were going to plan our maneuvers as we would have planned them without that rule, without his artificial line.

Now, if I could call to you attention that periodically we send some ships into the Black Sea just for the same reason, just as the Soviet Union sends ships into the Caribbean, to assure that everyone is observing international waters and the rules pertaining to them.

Following lunch, the President proceeded to the hanger deck for a reenlistment ceremony. Adm. James D. Watkins, Chief of Staff, Pacific Fleet, administered the oath, and the President congratulated the reenlisted men individually as they crossed the dais.

You know, Presidents are permitted to experience a great many things, but I can assure you, this day will be long remembered as a most special experience that I have had. It is my first time to ever be on a carrier. As I told many of you on the horn this morning when I arrived, I'm an old ex-horse cavalryman. But then I'll remind you that there was an admiral of the Navy that rode a horse into Tokyo at the end of World War II, so maybe we have something in common.

But this ship, what I've seen today and the officers and crew, you all make me very proud to be able to say I'm the Commander in Chief of all of you. The demonstration of firepower and efficiency by the air wing was impressive, but what's most important, it is also impressive to the enemies of freedom in the world. And we had an example of that just night before last on the carrier Nimitz.

But this carrier and its air wing represent the cutting edge of our naval power. It takes an extra bit of dedication to do this job. I know it's rough. It's rough on you, rough on your families, but it's never been more necessary at any time in our history than it is right now. Without someone willing to put in the long hours, willing to suffer the frustrations, willing to risk the dangers, our country wouldn't be sure of continued peace and freedom. There's no greater gift that you can give to your family, your community, or your country than the protection that you afford all of them by this job that you're doing.

I know there've been times when the military has been taken for granted. It won't happen under this administration. We're going to make sure to the best of our ability that your pay is fair and that you have the equipment that is needed to do the job right, from spare parts to new ships.

Today, military adventurism and subversion threaten in faraway areas of the world. Providing security for the United States is the greatest challenge and a greater challenge than ever, but we'll meet that challenge. We're committed to a 600-ship Navy, a Navy that is big enough to deter aggression wherever it might occur. Let friend and foe alike know that America has the muscle to back up its words, and ships like this and men like you are that muscle.

Of course, more than equipment is needed. You deserve compensation worthy of the sacrifices you're making, and you'll get it. We're taking the steps necessary to encourage you to stick with the service, because you're needed. And I am so proud and so thrilled by the evidence of that that we've seen here today.

But you know that it takes more than money to keep you out here. The word ``patriotism'' is defined as love for or devotion to one's country, and that can't be bought. But it's present on this great ship, on the destroyer Fletcher and the cruiser Jouett, the frigate Wadsworth as well.

Your country won't forget that while those people were held hostage, you were nearby, ready to help, setting a new record for the number of continuous days any conventional ship has been at sea. And your countrymen knew what that meant -- long hours, strenuous effort, the pain of being away from loved ones. And yet, there were many out here that were a part of that long stretch who reenlisted and are still here with the Constellation.

I don't know whether you've read the book. There's a book by the novelist, James Michener, ``The Bridges at Toko-Ri.'' He wrote very movingly of the men who had fought in that Korean conflict. But in the final scene of the book, Michener writes of the admiral, standing on the darkened bridge of his carrier, waiting for the pilots who had flown off the carrier's deck that day to bomb the Toko-Ri bridges and who now must try to find that deck, big as it is when you're on it, but a postage stamp when it's out there in an ocean in the dark for men trying to find it.

There was a Commodore John Barry in the United States Navy back in the days of the Revolution, and he has been called by many the Father of the United States Navy. So, I'm going to go over here and tell you a little bit of what it is that I'm signing, and then I'll finish telling you something, a story that I think you might like to hear.

Following the Revolution, when the sovereignty of this new nation was threatened by pirates, Commodore Barry was placed in command of the first ships authorized under the new Constitution and was named Senior Captain of the United States Navy in 1794. As I said, he's considered by many as the father of the United States Navy. He was honored in 1906 when the Congress had a statue of him erected in Lafayette Square in Washington, D.C., and since then a statue has also been erected by our Government in County Wexford, Ireland.

If I could take another moment of your time, there's a little story maybe known to some of you about the United States Navy. Back in about 1840, around there, when this Nation of ours was so little that the great powers of Europe still were planning to come -- they didn't think the experiment would work and they would eventually take us over and colonize various parts of this country -- there was a revolution in the Austro-Hungarian Empire. And a Hungarian by the name of Kostia, one of the lieutenants of that revolution, fled to the United States, and he took out his first papers to become a citizen here.

Then he became an importer by trade, and he was in a port on the Mediterranean when someone tipped off the admiral in command of an Austrian warship in the harbor that he was there. And he was in the night and taken aboard that ship to be returned to Austria -- because the revolution had failed -- where he would be hung.

The man who he had had working for him there -- he had told him about his new country and about that flag, described the flag. And that man was down on the waterfront the next morning, knowing what had happened, and he saw an American flag. It was on a tiny warsloop, an American warsloop. And he went aboard and told Captain Ingraham of the United States Navy what had happened.

For many, many years, indeed for more than a century, there has been a U.S.S. Ingraham in the United States Navy. I have just learned that with the reduction of forces that has taken place in recent years, there is not one now. I promise you there soon will be.

Now, speaking for all your fellow citizens, I want to say how proud you have made all of us. In the weeks ahead when the ``Connie'' sails into the Western Pacific, remember wherever you are, there also is America and there goes the pride and the good wishes of all your fellow citizens.

Commodore Barry was honored by the United States Congress in 1906, when a statue was commissioned and later placed in Lafayette Park, Washington, District of Columbia, and honored again some fifty years later when President Eisenhower caused a statue of Commodore Barry to be presented on behalf of the people of the United States to the people of Ireland, at County Wexford, Ireland.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twentieth day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

Well, I am delighted to be back here, and I've had a day in which it's just fitting that I should be here in the place that I've often described as ``where the Republicans go before they die.'' [Laughter] And the victory that Stu spoke of in those two pieces of legislation, the budget cuts and the tax program -- I think I have to confess now, you all know that I once was a Democrat and that all these years, you see, I've been a subversive agent in the Republican Party -- [laughter] -- because I remember my first vote as a Democrat. And I voted for a Democratic platform that called for reducing the size and cost of the Federal Government, eliminating useless bureaus and agencies, turning authority and autonomy back to local and State government, and reducing the cost of government. And finally, after all these years since 1932, we're making good on that Democratic promise.

But, no, I'm delighted with the victory. But I have to be honest and say, you did that. You've no idea what it was like in Washington -- not that I'm that familiar with the place, even after 8 months -- but there was such a flood of phone calls, there was such a response from the people. That's what silenced the voices of the special interest groups and got the bipartisan victory that we had. And it was bipartisan, and it was a wonderful thing to see. And now, of course, that's only the beginning. Now we've got to make it work. And we still have more budget cuts to go in the off years, the years yet to come, to bring government down to the proper share of the gross national product that it should be. I think if we all stay together, we're going to do it.

And now, I'd like to talk a little bit about the purpose of this meeting and thank you all for being here. I've talked a lot about restoring federalism, putting us back to where we are a federation of sovereign States and not 50 administrative districts of the Federal Government. And to do that, you have to have governments at the State level that are willing to accept those responsibilities, as well as the sources of revenue to help pay for them. And this meeting is gathered to start raising what must be the campaign fund for the legislative and the administrative races, but this is particularly for the legislative races here in State government.

When you stop to count, 80 assemblymen, assembly persons, will be up for election, and we have 31. If we hold our own, we only need to get 10 of theirs to have a majority. And in the Senate, there will be, out of the 40 senators, there will be 20 up for reelection. Six will be Republican and 14 will be Democrat. We have 17 now. If we hold our own, all we have to do is get four and we will control the Senate.

Now, how important is that? Let me just tell you something. Only one year while I was Governor did we have a majority in both houses of the legislature, and it was barely a one-vote majority. But in that one year where we could create the majority in the committees by being the majority party, in the criminal justice committee of the Assembly, 41 crime-fighting bills came out of that committee to the floor where they were successfully voted into action in California.

Just recently you saw where that same criminal justice committee, now in the hands of the other party, killed in committee several crime-fighting bills. We found, if they ever get to the floor, then Democrat and Republican, out there in the open, they have to vote for them. But they can be killed in that committee, and they were.

Now, those same crime-fighting bills, just like the 41 in our time, those same crime-fighting bills can come back again if in '82 we get the majority. And then it'll be a Republican majority in the committee and those bills will reach the floor and they'll become tools that we need to restore law and order here in our neighborhoods and in our cities and our homes. So, I hope that you will all do everything you can to get that legislative majority and then, of course, to get the administration that goes with it.

Now, there is another little thing that I'd like to mention. You'd be interested to know that a former Supreme Court Justice of California, who's now Deputy Assistant Secretary of State, is the fellow that talked the Japanese into lifting their boycott on California fruits -- Bill Clark. And he's doing a great job. But while that was going on, Carol Hallett and her colleagues there on the Republican side in the Assembly have been doing, I think, the greatest amount of work in getting some common sense into the program to aid the farmers who've been beset by this pest and who should not be in the position that they're in now. And they are the ones that are getting some practical work done, and I think that that's another reason why Carol and all those colleagues of hers deserve your support.

But I'm not going to go on talking more now about this, because this is the first time back here. This morning I started the day by helicoptering out to the Constellation. And there on that great carrier -- and it is great, the crew of several thousand -- I saw a display of planes being catapulted off into the air, and planes coming back and landing, and bombing and firing practice off the ship, and finally met with most of the ship's crew. And I have to tell you it was one of the most thrilling experiences. All of this talk that there isn't morale there -- the sentiment among those young fellows out there on that is, ``Okay, so we're not the biggest navy in the world anymore, but we're the best.'' And that's the way they feel.

Now, that was enough to start the day. I tell you, it was a really yankee-doodle day so far. But now to come to Orange County and here, and I want to do something we used to do when I was Governor now and then when we got together. I know I haven't got very much time because there's still another place to go yet, but rather than me going on with a monolog here, you must have wondered about a few things that happened in Washington, and now you've got a chance to hear it from the horse's mouth. [Laughter] Why don't we have a little dialog, and if you've got some questions, at least for a few minutes that remain, why don't you fire away?

The President. Yes, we can run with the White House. Is there one that you'd want back? I mean is there one that you'd want me to send back to you when I'm finished? Will somebody get that? I'd be happy to run it.

And so he has said that is the line. Now, in the last couple of years, for whatever reason, I don't know, our Navy has been ordered to hold its maneuvers, but to stay on the other side of that line and not challenge that. And I was given the briefing on the maneuvers before they were held, quite some time ago. And these are international waters. And I approved the idea that, while we don't want to be provocative or anything else, good Lord, we send our ships into the Black Sea, just as the Russians send theirs into the Caribbean to establish the fact that they are international waters. So, the exercises properly required crossing, to a certain extent, that line. And as I say, it's still international waters, and I approved that -- that we would do that.

Now, we were aware that there might be some harassment, because for the last couple of years, Libyan planes have come out and harassed not only our planes out in international waters but French planes, and in one instance or two have even fired. Whether they were firing directly at the plane or not, we don't know, but this was the kind of harassment tactics they were following. And in the briefing the question came up with regard to if they actually became hostile and fired on our forces' ships or planes, what would our response be in these maneuvers? We notified everyone in advance that we were going to hold the maneuvers, and there was only one answer to that question. If our men are fired on, our men are going to shoot back.

The President. Next most important program? Well, of course, we go back to the implementing of what has been passed, this economic recovery program. I would think, however, it has to be now, and this goes with another campaign promise, the restoring of the integrity of social security. And in contrast to what some people have tried to say, I promised, and this still holds, we have to restore that integrity. In 1977 they passed the biggest single tax increase in our nation's history in the payroll tax for social security. And the President told us then that that had made social security safe and sound financially until the year 2030. And as it now stands, the social security fund will be out of money before 1982 is over. So, something obviously has to be done.

But again, I will repeat the promise I made during the campaign that is in contrast to all the things that have been said about our proposals for social security. We will restore the integrity, but we are not going to endanger the checks that are going to those people dependent on social security. They're going to continue to get their checks, and there's no intention on our part to stop that.

The President. Well, as I've said before, you've done it already with that program. But just keep on supporting what I think is a 180-degree turnaround in government to bring it back to the proper size and to give back to the people a bigger share of their own earnings with the tax reductions. And we believe that this program will stimulate prosperity, create jobs. That's what it's designed to do. It isn't a step backward at all. It's a step forward toward ending this round that we've had of the excessive interest, of the excessive inflation.

And already there are evidences -- I don't know whether you saw this, but the other day Bethlehem Steel took out a full-page ad, kind of addressed to us, that on the basis of this plan which is yet to be implemented -- they're going forward with three-quarters of a billion dollars in modernization and expansion of plant to get back their place in the world steel market.

Sec. 5. The records, property, personnel, and unexpended balances of appropriations, available or to be made available, which relate to the functions transferred or reassigned from the Secretary of Commerce to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget by the delegations made in this Order, are hereby transferred to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget.

Sec. 6. The Director of the Office of Management and Budget shall make such determinations, issue such orders, and take all steps necessary or appropriate to ensure or effectuate the transfers or reassignments provided by this Order, including the transfer of funds, records, property, and personnel.

Sec. 7. Any rules, regulations, orders, directives, circulars, or other actions taken pursuant to the functions transferred or reassigned from the Secretary of Commerce to the Director of the Office of Management and Budget by the delegations made in this Order, shall remain in effect until amended, modified, or revoked pursuant to the delegations made in this Order.

Since ratification of the 19th Amendment, women have played increasingly important roles in guiding the Nation's basic institutions. While women continue to fulfill the irreplaceable and vitally important roles of wife and mother, increasing numbers of them have entered the professions and the work place as well, making steady, significant progress over the years.

Today, women faithfully shoulder responsibilities at all levels of government and in every area of employment and education and are opening up new opportunities every day. On this occasion, it is fitting that we honor the contributions women have made to every aspect of our development as a Nation and rededicate ourselves to maintaining a society in which the rights of all citizens are protected.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-fourth day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-one, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and sixth.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Cameron M. Batjer to be a Commissioner on the United States Parole Commission, Department of Justice, for a term of 6 years. Upon confirmation, the President intends to designate Mr. Batjer Chairman.

The year I'm thinking about is 1982, because of those fine members of the legislature who are here with us tonight. And the purpose of this -- and it ties in so much with what we've been trying to do in Washington, because behind everything that Holmes was talking about, behind all the changes in the budget and the taxing, is the desire I've had for so long -- to reverse course in this country and return us to a system that is so responsible for our freedom, and that is that we are a federation of sovereign States.

We want to return authority and autonomy that has been seized by the Federal Government to the levels of government closer to the people. And to do that, we're going to have to have people in charge in State and local government who believe in that, who will accept the responsibilities of those functions that have been taken over by the Federal Government that should be returned, can be better run at the State and local level. And it is my hope that through the system of block grants -- we didn't get nearly all that we asked for in that. We're not going to stop trying, because I think of block grants as only a stepping stone to returning sources of taxation to the State and local governments that have been seized by the Federal Government.

Now, we didn't get all that we asked for in our budget cuts either, so in the appropriation process that will now go on we're going to keep trying for that also, because it is a world in which there are certain compromises. And so we didn't get all that we wanted, but I think we sure got a big chunk.

Well, listen, I'd like to do something, and I know that I can only take a few, because I know the time is very limited and very pressing here. But it's been -- we have so little opportunity to visit or to have a dialog, and I just have been hungry to do this, and that is instead of me going on up here and talking about what we've done or tried to do in Washington, I would like that maybe a few of you and, as I say, it would have to be just a few, if you have some questions that I might not think of to touch on -- there's a young lady already.

Let me point out one thing. The Fed, Federal Reserve System, is independent, and they're hurting us in what we're trying to do as much as they're hurting everyone else. But, I have to point out also that this is something inherited by the situation we've had and is created somewhat by the market. Now, this year, 1981, when it ends in October, the fiscal year, we're going to have a tremendous deficit. That was built in. That was there before we arrived. And so when I say ``the market,'' the market for capital, private capital out there is strained by the fact that the Federal Government is going into that market and competing for this investment capital. And when you have industry doing it, when you have people who want to have mortgages doing it, when you have the government going in there for a chunk that's going to be bigger than $60 billion for 1981, just the plain law of supply and demand pushes those interest rates up, because there isn't that much private capital.

This is one of the reasons why we wanted the tax cut and think it will be beneficial. We think that more people, with more of their own money in their own hands, will have it available to put in a bank or an insurance policy, to invest, to make more capital available for our needs. And then as we cut the government spending and reduce the need for government to go into that market, those interest rates, we think they will be coming down before the first of the year. But remember, nothing in our program starts until October 1st, and most of it doesn't start until January 1st.

Well, I'm old enough to remember when they were, and we were on a gold standard. But I don't think I have the answer to that, although we have a commission that is studying that very subject of gold and its place in our economy.

The President. Have I had any word from President Qadhafi? No, but I notice he hasn't gone home yet. [Laughter] He's still traveling. Incidentally, lest someone think that I'm being macabre about any loss of life or anything, as far as we have been able to learn, both of their pilots were picked up from the sea and there was no loss of life in that incident. But it wasn't the first time that they have done things of this kind. We just feel that a principle was involved.

I have so much -- I can't really call it fun -- but interest every day in reading about what decisions I've made about the MX. [Laughter] The only answer I have for you is that I don't know where we're going to put it, but we're going to have it. Let me make plain. Seriously, I have had presented to me a number of options with regard to our strategic policy, and those options -- I have to choose between those options and make a decision, and that decision has not been made yet.

The President. What surprises me the most? I think the biggest surprise are the leaks. [Laughter] I tell you, I've gotten so that I address some things in the Cabinet meetings to the chandelier. I'm sure it must have a microphone in it. [Laughter] But there just isn't anything -- it's not only the leaks of certain information but, then, suppositions are made or conclusions are drawn and printed as being what's going to be the result of this. And as I say, just like this last question about the MX, we haven't even made a decision, and we're reading in the paper what the decision is supposed to be.

Mr. Tuttle. Mr. President and Nancy, I'd like for you to know that just a little over 3 weeks ago when your office called and said that you'd like to help here, that these great, wonderful workers that you have here went to work. And tonight, in the baseball jargon, we have over 1,200 but we have over 1,100 paid. [Laughter] So, they've come from all the counties, and here they are to say hello to you and thank you for the great job that you're doing for our great country.

The President. On behalf of Nancy and myself, Holmes, let me -- they tell me that we've got to get down from here, and I wish we didn't have to. Well, we do. And I just want to, again, thank all of you. And again, if I can say, 1982, here in this State, we only have to get about four, I think it is, in the Senate. Isn't it? And that will give us a majority there. And 10 in the assembly will give us a majority in that house. Let me just give you a little comparison of what that difference can be.

The other day just coming out here, I picked up the paper and read where in the assembly criminal justice committee, five crime-fighting bills were buried and killed in committee, never got to the floor for a vote. Well, the party that is in the majority names the majority and the chairmen of the committees. And just 1 year, while I was Governor, we had a majority. It was a bare majority. In that 1 year, 41 anticrime bills came out of that committee to the floor, and even the opponents didn't dare vote against them once they were on the floor. That's what can happen.

This young lady was just -- I can't take any questions. This young lady was just speaking about the ``up'' feeling that has been prevalent in the land for the last few months. Let me tell you where I had the greatest thrill of that, and then we will leave.

Several days ago, before we came back up to the ranch, we were just out there on the other side of the big island, on the other side of Santa Cruz, on the Constellation -- a crew of 5,000 on that aircraft carrier. We saw a demonstration of all that they can do. But something else, to those who have lost faith and don't believe that our volunteer military can do it. I want to tell you that was the biggest morale booster that I've ever had in my life, was to see those young men, probably average age of 19, and to hear a sailor say to me, ``We may not be the biggest navy in the world; we're the best.'' That's the way they feel. It was great.

The President. The question was from the young man, ``Are we going to spend government money on the Medfly? I think it is government that is funding the spraying, finally, of that. And it is a very real problem, and maybe the problem was we didn't start spending the money soon enough on the part of government.

I've got to tell you, you ought to see how wonderful that public housing we live in looks now, thanks to what she has done with the help of so many of you that helped and sent money in. You'd really be very proud.

The final report augments the preliminary report by including further analysis of the ability of communities to absorb growth; analyzing an additional budgeting and organizational alternative; and updating information on existing Federal assistance programs to reflect the Administration's budgetary revisions.

The report examines various organizational and budgeting mechanisms for providing assistance to communities impacted by the nearby construction of major, new military bases. The report concludes that, with rare exceptions, local and State resources and normal Federal domestic agency assistance should be used to provide public facilities and services supporting military bases. Special Federal assistance should only be warranted in highly unusual circumstances where a sudden population influx and the resulting demand for public services from a major, new military base could overwhelm State-local fiscal capacities and impede achievement of critical national security objectives. As the reports states, the need for any special Federal assistance must be evaluated on a case-by-case basis.

In those rare circumstances where special Federal assistance would be warranted, we will want to attain a high degree of responsiveness to State and local concerns together with sufficient accountability and control of Federal funds associated with critical national security projects. In this regard, the Special Impact Assistance alternative appears to be a promising approach. However, the selection of the preferred organizational and budgetary mechanism will depend upon the particular circumstances in each case. I will look to the Secretary of Defense and the Director of the Office of Management and Budget, in consultation with affected States and communities, to advise me in this regard. I will request additional statutory authority when it is required.

I have been gratified by the excellent cooperation among all levels of Government in the preparation of this study. We intend to continue working closely with affected States and communities to reach satisfactory outcomes on national security projects which affect their interests.

Mr. Lovell has been president of the Rubber Shippers Association and chairman of the Tire Industry Safety Council. Before entering the rubber industry, he was Manpower Administrator and Assistant Secretary of Labor for Manpower in 1969 - 73. Prior to that he held a number of executive positions under Governor Romney, including director of the Michigan Employment Security Commission, director of the Michigan Economic Opportunity Office, and chairman of the Michigan State Labor Mediation Board. Earlier he served both the Ford Motor Co. and American Motors in a variety of executive capacities in industrial relations.

Jim Brady is a talented and dedicated public servant. He is my friend, and I am proud to have him as my Press Secretary. Nancy and I salute ``The Bear'' and Sarah today, and we look forward to celebrating his next birthday in his office at the White House.

Note: Deputy Press Secretary Larry M. Speakes read the statement to Mr. Brady during a birthday celebration in the Press Secretary's honor at the press center in Santa Barbara, Calif. Members of the White House press corps delivered birthday messages to Mr. Brady through a communication hook-up with the George Washington University Hospital. The White House also announced that the President telephoned Mr. Brady from Rancho del Cielo to wish him a happy birthday.

That Act requires that calculations be made annually of the adjustments that would be required in Federal statutory pay systems to achieve comparability with private sector pay for the same levels of work. My pay advisers have made those calculations and indicated that an average 15.1 percent increase would be required to achieve comparability as the concept and process were defined in the Pay Comparability Act of 1970.

While I fully support the comparability principle as the best basis for determining Federal pay, I believe that significant changes are required in the way that principle is currently defined and implemented. Therefore, last March we transmitted to the Congress proposed legislation to revise and strengthen the comparability process. At that time, we estimated that the revised process would result in an average increase in Federal pay of 4.8 percent in October, 1981.

The reform proposal has not yet been acted upon in Congress, but in accordance with our economic recovery program, the Congress included in the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981 (P.L. 97 - 35) a provision which limits this October's Federal white collar pay adjustment to the same 4.8 percent. Accordingly, I am submitting to the Congress an alternative plan which would implement that limitation on Federal white collar increases.

Current law provides that the annual increase for the military be the same as the average Federal white collar increase. This year, however, the Congress is expected to provide for a larger military pay increase as a part of the Defense Authorization Act for FY 82. The larger increases proposed under that legislation will supersede the increases that military personnel would otherwise receive under the alternative plan.

And a resolution, as you know, has been adopted in the United Nations, which we supported, calling for a cease-fire that will stay. And I think it is absolutely imperative that this cease-fire, at this stage of the negotiations, must not be violated by anyone.

The President. I said before that there have been times when there has been reason for optimism, and I almost feel as if I might jinx things if I gave any expression of that. But there has been progress made.

The President met with Israeli Foreign Minister Shamir this morning. The focus of the discussion was Lebanon. The President reaffirmed his support for Ambassador Habib and his mission, which is based on the policies, expectations, and hopes of the Government of Lebanon. The President emphasized that an early diplomatic settlement of the current problem of west Beirut is the essential first step in ending the trauma of Lebanon, beginning the process for a better future for this ravaged country, and moving on to the broader peace process. The President stressed the need for a complete end by all parties to the hostilities in and around Beirut as a prerequisite to allow Ambassador Habib to pursue his urgent work. The world can no longer accept a situation of constantly escalating violence. The President highlighted the humanitarian needs of the large civilian population of west Beirut, with emphasis on the need to maintain essential services and to assure adequate supplies of food and medicines.

I sign this bill with reluctance because the United States Marshals Service needs prompt relief from the burden of serving process for private parties in civil actions, relief these amendments would provide. I understand, however, that time demands affecting Congress this year simply have not allowed it to complete timely review of these amendments. I am confident that Congress will promptly review these rule 4 amendments, as well as amendments to 28 U.S.C. 569(b) and 1921 proposed by this administration, thereby providing a comprehensive solution to the problems associated with service of private process by the U.S. Marshals Service.

Presidential campaign. After the election, she worked with Mr. E. Pendleton James during the transition as Associate Director of Personnel and then joined the White House as Personal Secretary and Special Assistant to the President for the first 9 months.

You know, I was glad that Governor Ray told you about Nancy coming here. In the old days of vaudeville, the real feature act was always preceded by a lesser act -- usually it was a trained animal act. So, here I am. [Laughter] But I do thank you very much.

It is a real pleasure to be here today. A little earlier I was talking with Senator Jepsen about the plight of the American farmer. Roger Jepsen knows and understands the needs and the problems of the farmer, and I can assure you that when Senator Jepsen hears something from the farm community, I hear about it. His counsel has been most helpful to me.

It does my spirit good to be among thousands of Americans from our heartland, people with faith in God, the United States, and themselves. And despite the doom-criers that are abroad in the land, I believe that most of America shares your faith. But there hasn't been enough recognition of the part that you play in the lives of all of us. Not too long ago a new, young Congressman from the heart of our biggest city was placed on the agricultural committee of the House -- not exactly a case of a round peg in a round hole. And his first contribution to the committee was a pronouncement that government should confiscate all food and divide it equally among all the people, because food was a natural resource belonging to everyone.

There was an old fellow that had taken over some land down in a creek bottom. It was covered with rocks and brush and was just pretty scrabbly, but he went to work on it. And he worked and he worked, and he cleared away the rocks and the scrub. And he cultivated, and he fertilized, and finally he had a garden that was his pride and joy. And one morning after Sunday services he asked the minister if he wouldn't like to come out that afternoon and see what he had done -- this garden.

With all the miracles of modern-day electronics, there is still no greater technological revolution than modern-day American farming. Today, in the United States, one farmer produces enough food to feed himself and 77 other people -- 52 Americans and 26 people abroad. Our food and agricultural system is the most productive in the world and accounts for the foundation of 24 million American jobs -- almost one-fifth of our nation's total work force.

I've come to tell you that there is a gratitude throughout this country for the work you do, and a sensitivity to the burdens you bear. It was Thomas Jefferson who once said that ``farmers were God's chosen people.'' Right now, you must be asking, well, chosen for what?

Because of your efficiency and the abundance produced on America's farms, we need world markets. The harvest from 2 out of every 5 acres of cropland is sold abroad. You depend on international markets for the sale of more than 60 percent of your wheat and rice, half of your soybeans and cotton, and a third of your corn and feed grains. In 1970 we exported $7 billion worth of agricultural products. Last year we shipped abroad more than $43 billion worth of products. These exports account for about a quarter of all farm income.

While essential to our U.S. balance of trade, offsetting big trade deficits in other goods, the future of farming has become dependent on maintaining and expanding foreign markets for U.S. food and fiber products. During the 1980 campaign, in a speech I made not too far from here, I promised my personal support for expanding our agricultural exports. And that pledge remains a priority commitment today.

Commerce, and the U.S. Trade Representative have spoken with one voice against unfair trade practices. We will continue to speak with this united voice as we pursue every legitimate means of protecting our farmers from unfair competition.

We have moved up by 6 months the scheduled negotiations with Japan on citrus and beef. So far, we have dispatched trade teams to 23 nations in Europe, Africa and Latin America, the Middle East and the Far East. Partly because of these teams, we expect to ship more grain to Brazil and Morocco and to maintain near record grain exports to the People's Republic of China.

In these efforts we do not challenge the right of any country to exploit its agricultural assets and to provide a decent life for its farmers and rural communities. We only ask for fair competition and for adequate rules to govern trade in agricultural products.

At the GATT Ministerial Conference this fall, we will propose bringing agriculture under its liberalizing influence, an influence that has transformed trade in manufactured goods and unleashed an unparalleled period of growth and prosperity in the postwar world. I am committed to more open agricultural markets in all countries. I challenge other countries, particularly our friends in Europe and Japan, to match this commitment.

The lingering effects of that grain embargo are still hanging over the markets, and our nation's farmers are still suffering from those low prices. We had 70 percent of the Soviet market when the embargo was imposed. That fell to 25 percent during the embargo. At the same time, our competitors took advantage of this market that the last administration threw away. Well, we've restored to the American farmer a fair opportunity to export grain to the U.S.S.R. on a cash basis.

After lifting the embargo, we offered the Soviets an additional 15 million metric tons of grain beyond the original 8 million metric tons. Our efforts on behalf of the farmers suffered a setback, however, with the iron repression of the proud people of Poland. When martial law was declared in that country, U.S. officials were developing a negotiating position on a new long-term grain agreement with the U.S.S.R. After the Soviet Union ignored our calls to aid restoration of basic human rights in Poland, we had no choice but to impose a number of sanctions against both countries, including postponement of negotiations on a long-term trade agreement with the Soviet Union.

There is still no cause to celebrate in Poland. I am, however, somewhat encouraged by indications martial law may be relaxing. We'll continue to watch developments there in the hope that life will improve for the Poles and sanctions can be removed. In the meantime we will explore a 1-year extension of the current long-term grain agreement with the Soviet Union. I have also authorized the Secretary of Agriculture to consult with the Soviets on the subject of additional grain sales beyond the minimum purchase requirements of the current agreement.

The extension would have the sanctity of a contract, ensuring U.S. farmers access to the Soviet market. Just last week, the importance of this was brought home to me by the Governor of a great agricultural State, your neighbor Governor Charles Thone of Nebraska. As Governor Thone said --  -- [applause]. Somebody's here from Nebraska. As Governor Thone said, there must be no question about our respect for contracts. We must restore confidence in U.S. reliability as a supplier. An agreement would, also, protect Americans from possible Soviet disruption of our domestic market.

Indications are that we'll sell a record volume of grain to the Soviet Union this year. With the extension that we're now exploring, we'll be able to sell large quantities during the next year. In other words, the granary door is open, and the exchange will be cash on the barrelhead.

Last March, I outlined this administration's agricultural trade doctrine Jack Block mentioned to you. There will be no restrictions on farm products proposed because of rising farm prices. Farm exports will not be singled out as an instrument of foreign policy and can be used only as a part of a trade embargo if it is broad and supported by other nations across the board in a situation that would be so serious as to cause this action.

We believe world markets must be freed of trade barriers and unfair trade practices. At home and abroad, we're committed to assuring the American farmer a market that will reward his investment and work, and not punish him for his incomparable success.

That cornmeal on the grocery shelves, those soybean products, the steak, milk, bacon, and a myriad of other goods do not mysteriously show up in supermarkets. They were produced at the cost of your sweat and the ache in your back. Most are grown or raised right here in this rich, Midwestern soil. You are among the most industrious people anywhere. And you've been carrying an extraordinary burden for the Nation and the world.

You're in charge now. It's your money that is being taxed. It's your property being assessed, your resources that have been raided by Washington. You have demanded a reduction in the size of government. Well, we have cut its rate of growth nearly in half. And we're just beginning. You've demanded that government live within its means. We're pushing hard for an amendment to the Constitution to balance the budget.

You've called for a reduction in repressive tax rates. We passed and are fighting to keep the largest tax cut in American history, but a tax cut that only barely offsets the tax increases already built into the system.

A great American philosopher has written that ``a timid man listening to alarmists in Congress and in the newspapers might easily believe that he and his country have seen their best days. And he hardens himself the best he can against the coming ruin. But after this has been foretold,'' he said, ``with equal confidence 50 times, he discovers enormous elements of strength which are here in play.'' He said, ``We think our civilization near its meridian, but we are yet only at the cock-crowing and the morning star.'' Well, those words by that philosopher, those were words by Ralph Waldo Emerson, and they're as true today as when he wrote them more than a hundred years ago.

You know, shortly after World War II, I found myself in England. It was during the Christmas season, but I was there to make a picture. It was my first time abroad, and on weekends, wanting to see something of the land, I'd hire a car and driver, and I'd go sightseeing out in the English countryside. And I told the driver I wanted to see some of the old historic places that I'd heard about and been told about -- pubs and inns that were centuries old, just the same as they had been for all those centuries.

Maybe some of those big strappin' lads she remembered are in this room. Well, neither those big strappin' lads nor their children nor their children's children ever needed government to tell them how to bring food for a hungry world from the blue-black soil of this heartland. Here in the land where the West begins and the State where the tall corn grows are the seeds of our national renewal. Within our people is the strength, the vision, and the faith that will return prosperity to America. We need only to believe in our own ability to make it happen.

Very quickly, I'm going to -- I'm not going to spend a lot of time talking. It's my great pleasure to make the introduction that I'm going to make. I'm going to introduce to you your featured guest here today.

I just want to tell you just very quickly that you're going to be hearing from and talking with someone that I've found in a year and a half to be a -- he really thinks he's a farmer-rancher. And I'm not going to quarrel with that. The President has a very warm spot for agriculture, and he has an open mind and promotes and supports the industry. Then the occasions we have talked about the problems we face are unlimited.

Well, I appreciate that and what Jack said, and it is true that in a way, in a sense at least I'm in the countryside. Some years ago, while I was still in the picture business, I started ranching and running grazer cattle. But the main purpose was, I was raising horses for the market and selling.

Now, remember -- you wouldn't think that in that kind of part-time farming while I was doing the other that you could learn anything about the problems of the farm, but I did learn some, because I got all carried away one day and thought, ``Wouldn't it be wonderful if we could put in some chickens and have our own eggs and be able to -- the morning at breakfast, be eating our own eggs.'' And I did. And I figured out that it only cost me about $1.65 an egg -- [laughter] -- to do that.

But I don't know whether -- oh, thank you -- whether any of you heard any of the speech. I've just finished making a speech down there at the -- well, then you know something of the main issues that we spoke about, so I won't make you listen twice to any of those things.

We have been -- there are certain rules and regulations under the law that prevent us from -- even though we -- the government has had to store them, had to buy them and store them to keep the government from going out into competition in the market, because then you'd just increase the same problem that made you buy the surplus in the first place. So, we have to be very selective as to how we do it.

Secretary Block. We run into a problem if we take them and put them right into the market, because if it disrupts the world market, these dairy products have to be sold at below the cost to the government, because world prices are below the price that we paid for them. And we would be charged by -- under the GATT rules of trade -- with disrupting the world market and could get into -- get all kinds of trouble for doing it. And we're complaining at the European Community for doing some of those very things, and it just kind of cuts the legs out from under us. So, we'll have to be selective as we dispose of these products.

And what we have said if we can get legislation which will bring this mounting surplus under control, then I think we'll have the credibility by working with other dairy-producing countries to go into the world market and selectively move this product wherever it might be.

So, we're going to try and work it out. The dairy problem is a very serious problem for us and, I know, for the dairy industry. Government got you into the trouble. You know, it wasn't the dairy farmer. It was the government that did it.

The President. What I had in mind mainly was that the embargo that was put on with regard to the Afghanistan conflict has shaken faith in our neighbors throughout the world as to whether we're reliable or not as a supplier. And so, we feel very definitely that this is a problem that we must meet now in these negotiations that are going on, that we restore that faith in us that if we've made a deal or a contract, it'll be a contract, and we'll keep it.

Q. Mr. President, in the interest of national security, and the farm economy, has your administration given more thought to development of the ethanol alcohol industry as a means of helping -- not only help the farm economy but also in the interest of national security?

The President. There are several things that are problems with that. One is the fact that it now develops that as the prices have leveled off, ethanol cannot be produced at a cost that is competitive with gasoline itself. That is one.

The second issue is, counting the very fact of raising the grain and so forth, unless you switch to such things as using garbage and waste to produce the same product, you actually use more energy than you get back in the ethanol that you produce. And both of these have slowed that down quite considerably.

Secretary Block. Let me add, Bob, though, to answer your question, this administration is not going to interfere with the development of ethanol. We have a four-step, gas tax exemption, and that stays in place. That is in place. And if it can economically be produced, the free enterprise system will see it happen. And that's the way it should be.

Q. Just to follow up it, Mr. President. You know the rationale, it takes more energy to produce a gallon of alcohol than you get out of it. It certainly would apply, also, to diesel fuel and to every other refined fuel, if you were to judge it on that basis. So, we often hear that as a criticism of the ethanol alcohol industry. But I think it should also be remembered that the price of refining a gallon of diesel fuel, even kerosene and lower refined products -- the amount of energy used in that refinery system is a great deal more than the energy you get out of that gallon.

Q. Mr. President, one thing you didn't mention in your speech was interest rates. And John Deere just unveiled their new line of tractors down there. And I don't know how, at present interest rates, we're going to be able to afford to buy -- at present prices and interest rates.

The President. Well, let's not forget or fail to realize -- I think the thing that brought on the recession were interest rates. I think they are the things that are holding it up. We had thought that -- well, let me go back and give you just a little history on this.

In 1980, in the usual way that we've treated recessions before, and then every recession was followed by another one, the money supply was increased at the highest rate it had ever been increased in our history -- 13 percent. And, if you look at it on a chart, it zoomed up there in a peak during that last 6 months of 1980. But with it went 21\1/2\-percent interest rates. And with it also went the second year of double-digit inflation to, when we took office, about 12.4. And we know that the other great problem of a recession had been going on, really, since 1977 -- the decline in employment, increase in unemployment.

Now, when they tried to pull down from that peak -- and this is what we came into -- they had pulled the money supply down way below even their own path that they have, that kind of a track that they have that the money supply should travel on to keep up with the economy. And, for the first 6 or 7 months that we were there, the money supply was way down here. And the result was the recession.

And the other day -- I like to get the papers like the Washington Post and turn to the real estate section on the weekend, when they have all the big real estate ads. And I am counting a little bit on competition, also helping with this, because I saw where some of the great housing developments and the condominium developments are trying to sell off. The mortgage rates -- some were boasting they were down to 13 percent. You turned the page, and there were some down there at 10.7 percent, and some of them at 11 percent. Well, pretty soon, they've got to come down and match that competition. I think that we are going to -- not as fast as we'd like -- but we are going to see a decline.

No question but that the business that you're in has been caught worse in the cost-price squeeze than virtually any other business. What happened in the two other major industries -- housing and automobiles -- was, of course, their product is sold on a mortgage basis. People buy their cars paying over a period of time and paying interest. And both of those suffered.

I don't know whether you've learned that, around the country in a number of places, there have been local banks, and they've gotten together, and they have put up sums of money. It started with a bank in Indiana. They put up a sum of money, a set sum. And they advertised that as long as that money lasts, it can be borrowed, in that instance, for automobile purchases only at an interest rate several points below the going rate. And the rush was so immediate -- then a whole group of banks did it in Ohio and around the country. And now it has spread to where there are banks doing the same thing with regard to home mortgages. And I think the signs are all there, that there is that thing that we've been waiting for out there. It isn't going to happen the day after tomorrow. But it is there.

Inflation -- we had thought inflation alone -- because that's one of the things that brings up interest rates. If you've got to loan money and there's a high inflation rate, you have to get back enough in interest to make up for the value your dollar's losing, and then make your interest on top of it. Well, that 12.4-percent interest rate is running, for the last 6 months, at less than half that. And we think that we've got a handle on it, and it's going to keep going down.

I know I've been talking too long on this question, and there's others that want to ask. But I just have to tell you one thing. When I told you that I understood some of your problems -- I've got a Ford tractor on my ranch that I bought secondhand way back in the fifties. It was a 1953 tractor.

Q. Mr. President, I am tenant farmer. And I was wondering if you couldn't do something now -- we want to seal corn and put it in the reserve. But, now, being a tenant farmer, we are kind of screwed-up there on getting some kind of loan for facilities. And I wonder if there couldn't be something done along that line to help us.

Secretary Block. In the first place, you don't own the land that you're on, right? So, you can't get money to build grain storage on it. And what you want is a guaranteed loan or a direct loan from ASC -- CCC loan of some kind. I don't know if there's anything we could do on that that I know of.

I'll check into it, but I would say that you might have to look at private lenders if you can't -- if you could get one of them to go with you. You might have to have some kind of an agreement, but putting your own storage on somebody else's land, or maybe there's some kind of temporary storage, I think you might be able to get that done some way.

Q. Mr. President, in view of the very fine facilities and practices that the Dee's have here in this operation -- I am a pork producer myself and operate similar practices like this and facilities -- what would your thoughts be in regard to legislation that would restrict this type of facilities and operations like this, such as the animal welfare that we are seeing in existence now?

Q. I don't think there's any regulations as such, but there is interest for legislation to be adopted sometime in the future. And we're just trying to warn off those types of things that might happen to us as producers. We think we're treating the livestock in a very good, humane -- giving them all the comforts and everything. But there's other people that think that they need the more natural habitats, I guess, and that would be more natural to them. So, this is one of our concerns as a producer, not only as a pork producer but as veal and poultry and other types of operations that have confinement or this sort of thing.

Secretary Block. I'd just say that -- I really -- I'm convinced and I know the President -- you know, if this is really a big issue, I mean, if it was a huge issue, we would have really been talking about it. But I just don't see it that way. For producers to make money raising livestock, the livestock must be healthy; they must be well cared for; they must be content; they need to be happy, or they're not going to do well. And, after all, that's all you can ask in terms of humane treatment to livestock. And the good producers all have to do that anyway. It's just -- it's part of the economics of raising livestock. So, in the long run I just don't see it as a big issue.

I know that there may be cases somewhere where animals aren't treated properly. There are. We all know that. But none of us condone that, I mean, as producers. But I think having heavy government regulations or restrictions would not be appropriate. You know, the normal economics are going to make us do a good job.

The President. I want you to know this, just one thing. The reason I asked about regulations is we've set up a task force with George Bush heading it up. I came with one promise to government, among others, and one was to start getting rid of the regulations that were imposing a blizzard of paperwork on everyone in this country. And I'm happy to tell you right now that while it's a long, slow job -- you can't just say, do away with that regulation; got them pretty well entrenched -- but George's task force has done enough that right now we have eliminated 200 million man-hours of labor filling out paperwork, with what he's been able to get rid of so far.

Q. Mr. President, this isn't a question. It's a statement on animal rights. There's no regulations as such now, but it's something that's working in the background. We have many, many people in the big cities that are putting money in it by the millions of dollars and are going to start lobbying.

Now, it isn't true that I was present at the first anniversary. [Laughter] But a few years back, when I was a Governor, I was privileged to be a Chubb Fellow at Yale University, and I was staying just around the corner in those few days from a sturdy-looking stone church where the events that bring us here today first began. It was there in the basement of St. Mary's Church on Hillhouse Avenue that Father McGivney and a few dedicated parishioners started an organization that would grow beyond any of their imaginings.

Today, the spires of a great university can still be seen on the New Haven skyline, but there is another dominant presence: four huge towers of the national headquarters of the Knights of Columbus, a group that has grown to over 1.3 million members and comprises the largest Catholic fraternal society in the world.

Much has happened to Father McGivney's dream since 1882, and much good has flowed from that church basement on Hillhouse Avenue. The Knights of Columbus is unrivaled in its dedication to family, community, country, and church. And your corporal and spiritual works of mercy for those in need are both a legend and an example to your countrymen. In the single year of 1981, you made in charitable contributions more than $41 million and, even more important, devoted more than 10 million hours in community service.

As important as your works of charity are, however, you have also maintained individually and corporately your stalwart faith in religious and family values. Through activities such as the Catholic Information Service, you've stood unhesitatingly for these values. And that's why, for example, in the 1920's, long before the cause was taken up by others, you were earnestly working for an end to racial and ethnic prejudice in America, fighting for justice for blacks and for Jews as well as for Catholics. And today you bring this same fervor to your work on behalf of the American family and your religious values. In doing so you provide inspiration to a world seeking desperately to find men who can make the message of the Gospel a reality in their lives and times.

Well, that picture came to our town -- I was just a boy -- but my father, who was a Knight, said it was a picture about the Ku Klux Klan, and we would not see it. Well, to this day, and after more than a quarter of a century in that motion picture industry, I still have never seen it and have no intention of seeing it.

During the last campaign I spoke frequently of these crucial values of family, work, neighborhood, religion, and personal freedom. Now, some pundits claim that this was an attempt to appeal to various ethnic or religious voting blocs. I saw it as a simple recognition of the values that most Americans, whatever their ethnic, racial, or religious heritage, hold dear.

Now, in pointing out this tendency of some commentators to focus on only the immediate or the political, I don't mean to sound too critical. Actually the American press does a remarkable job of piecing together quite clearly, and sometimes in a matter of hours or minutes, the dizzying events of this modern world. Yet I think the very speed of this process can oftentimes cloud the understanding and serve as an obstacle to good judgment and historical perspective.

McGivney and his small band of Catholic laymen. But as the history of the Knights of Columbus has proven, discussions of our basic values are a vital part of our national political dialog, for it's only in these values, only in the faith that sees beyond the here and now, that we find the rationale for our own daring notions about the inalienable rights of free men and women.

This faith in the dignity of the individual under God is the foundation for the whole American political experiment. It is central to our national politics. Our first President put it very well. He said, ``Of all the dispositions and habits which lead to political prosperity,'' Washington said, ``religion and morality are indispensable supports.'' And, incidentally, to those who suggest that the two could be separated, he further pointed out that morality could not really be sustained or widely observed without religion.

There can be no freedom without order, and there is no order without virtue. Now, that's a simple enough formulation, but it's an insight found not only in the writings of Founding Fathers like Washington or great political thinkers like Edmund Burke; it is also found in a great part of our Judeo-Christian tradition -- notably in the modern encyclicals of Popes Leo XIII and John Paul II.

These things that are publicly discussed still remain the foundation for our concepts of social justice, our political system, our very way of life. They are the values that ennoble man, making him something more than just the plaything of hedonism or the vassal of dictatorship; they entitle him to personal dignity and to the individual liberty and representative government that dignity enjoins.

Now, perhaps some of you remember that just a few years ago these basic values were being forgotten in the highest levels of our government. Indeed, the machinery of government at times actively opposed them. Government intrusion into the life of the family and the local neighborhood -- federally financed abortions, forced busing, HEW regulations and rules on many matters that government had no business dealing with -- had reached unparalleled heights.

In a similar vein, the prerogatives of local communities and State governments were slowly being eroded as more and more decisions were made in Washington, and government grew ever more distant and beyond control of the people. Federal spending sent inflation skyrocketing and the tax burden increasing to the point where rewards for honest work and extra initiative were evaporating.

It is this latter problem that we had to confront when we came to Washington 18 months ago. In the last 10 years, Federal spending had tripled. In the last 5 years, Federal taxes had doubled. The philosophy of government seemed to be tax and tax, spend and spend. Now, no one can quarrel with the motive behind all this. It was well-intentioned and done in the name of humanity. The budget for the Department of Health and Human Services became the third largest budget in the world, right after the entire national budgets of the United States and the Soviet Union. The Federal debt reached $1 trillion, and our interest payments on that debt, in the range of a hundred billion dollars, are more than the entire Federal budget of about 20 years ago.

You know, I have to stop and interject here that, as I said before, this was all done with the best of intentions, all of this was designed to help. But when you set out to help, you'd better have a pretty good idea of what you're doing.

Federal spending nearly in half. And it has already cut away billions in taxes for individuals and businesses. And, for the first time in history, taxes are going to be indexed to the rate of inflation, a reform that takes away government's hidden profit from inflation.

We have cut through the growing thicket of Federal regulations that was stifling business and industrial growth. Vice President Bush heads up a task force that deals with this. And already we've made savings of nearly $6 billion annually, just in changing regulations. And this year alone, there will be 200 million fewer man-hours of paperwork imposed on American citizens.

Our economic recovery program has been in effect for only 10 months, but its impact has already been felt. Last quarter's rise in the gross national product is an encouraging sign. Our dollar is stronger than it's been in 10 years. Inflation, which a little more than a year ago was the number one economic concern of most Americans, has taken an impressive turn for the better and, in the last 6 months, has run at less than half of what it was in 1980. And we're going to keep it going down.

We said we were going to cut spending, reduce the tax burden, rebuild our national defenses, strive for legitimate arms reductions, and be firm with totalitarian powers. And I believe the record shows we have kept those promises. But our promises about working to clean up the Federal fiscal mess and cut the size of government were not made just in order to get the economy moving again, as important as that is. Government can't interfere with economic freedom without restricting the political and personal freedom of individual Americans. That's what we mean to restore.

John Stuart Mill put it very well: ``A state which dwarfs its men, in order that they may be more docile instruments in its hands even for beneficent purposes, will find that with small men no great thing can really be accomplished.'' The instrusive hand of government can only hinder creativity, stultify growth, and suffocate enterprise, initiative, and diversity. Our goal is to take government out of areas where it does not belong so that it can properly perform its traditional and legitimate functions.

That's why we support and endorse a program of tuition tax credits, so that our independent schools and our country as a whole will prosper. We need diversity and excellence. As economist Thomas Sowell has suggested, these tuition tax credits are especially important ``to those who are mentioned the least: the poor and the working class.'' As the cost of education has skyrocketed, it is these groups that have been particularly hard hit by the double burden of supporting private and public schools.

I, also, strongly believe, as you have been told, that the protection of innocent life is and has always been a legitimate, indeed, the first duty of government. And, believing that, I favor human life. And I believe in the human life legislation. The Senate now has three proposals on this matter from Senators Hatch, Helms, and Hatfield. The national tragedy of abortion on demand must end.

And there was exhaustive testimony of experts presenting both views, and finally the result was declared inconclusive. They couldn't arrive at an answer. Well, in my view alone, they did arrive at an answer, an answer that justifies the proposed legislation. If it's true we don't know when the unborn becomes a human life, then we have to opt in favor that it is a human life until someone proves it isn't.

I wonder, though, how many of you, how many citizens know how far the courts have gone with regard to this subject. Do they know, for example, that in one case where children in a school cafeteria simply on their own wanted to say grace before lunch, the court ruled they were prohibited from doing that? Children who sought -- again, on their own initiative and with their parents' approval -- to begin the school day with a 1-minute prayer meditation were forbidden to do so. And some students who wanted to join in prayer or religious study on school property even outside of regular class hours were also forbidden to do so.

The Congress also has before it now an omnibus crime bill whose provisions on bail reform, sentencing procedure, and criminal forfeiture are critical to our attempt to fight the growing problem of crime. We need that bill. It's critical to our efforts to control organized crime and the trade in illegal drugs and the street-corner criminals who promote that trade.

Let me also say, I'm very aware of your concern about the enforcement of obscenity statutes. A representative of the K of C met last week in Washington with members of my staff on this matter, and let me assure you, when I get back to the Capital, I'll be taking this up with Attorney General Smith.

I think this kind of change has been duplicated in the foreign area as well. We've rejected the view that the world is faced with the impossible dilemma of either fighting a nuclear war or caving in to totalitarian rule. Contrary to what followers of Marx and Lenin would have us believe, we're not hopelessly buffeted by the tides and currents of history, for history is not the stuff of impersonal forces or unalterable laws. Free men and women, inspired by their deeply held beliefs and values, are capable of turning those tides of history and setting them running again in the cause of freedom.

And that is why this administration takes second place to none in the quest for peace through arms control and agreements. Now, many of the proposals we hear today for a nuclear freeze are obsolete. In our proposal for the elimination of ground-based, intermediate-range missiles and in a recent one-third reduction proposal for strategic nuclear ballistic warheads, we've gone far beyond the sterile idea of a freeze. A freeze might be fine after we've had a complete removal of the most threatening intermediate-based missiles and deep reductions in the number of strategic weapons, verifiable reductions.

The House of Representatives has before it now two resolutions on the nuclear freeze matter. One resolution, I regret to say, would, if passed, send a signal to the Soviet Union that we're willing to accept something less than these reductions that I spoke about. Indeed, this resolution would leave in place dangerous inequalities in the nuclear balance and would attempt to return us to the flawed SALT II agreement.

On the other hand, a resolution proposed by Congressmen Broomfield, Carney, and Stratton would avoid these dangers and, if it is passed, would act as an incentive to persuade the Soviet Union to agree to mutual reductions. I strongly support the Broomfield, Carney, and Stratton resolution.

Soviet Union. But let me say this to you: The fact that the largest Catholic fraternal organization has spoken out strongly through your magazine Columbia on the morality of maintaining our strategic deterrence has been a great asset to our efforts for peace, and I thank you.

Let me also add that I'm very grateful for the support you've given us on the matter of our attempts to bring stability, peace, and freedom to Latin America, especially in El Salvador. Only a few months ago, more than a million peasants and workers faced threats and bullets to vote in a free election there. They offered eloquent testimony to the appeal of democracy, to the rightness of our support of their desire to resist that tiny cadre of revolutionaries who want to plunge the Salvadoran people into the darkness of godless Communist rule.

Our foreign policy has changed in one other important way. For many years, American foreign policy has suffered from a defensive posture, a shyness about the values and beliefs that form the heart of our political consensus and our civilization. Well, we're on the defensive no longer. The Soviet Union has challenged us to open competition in the realm of ideas and values, and we intend to take up that challenge. That is why when I recently spoke to the British Parliament, I called for a worldwide crusade for freedom and a global campaign for democracy.

As part of this forward strategy for freedom, I recently had the pleasure of signing in a public ceremony for the first time in history the Captive Nations Week proclamation. I did so as a reminder of the suffering of those who live under totalitarian rule and as an expression of our hope that someday all the people of the world will live in freedom.

I would suggest to you today that nowhere in the world is there a more splendid affirmation of this connection between religious values and political freedom than in the ideals, the faith, and the heroism of the Polish people and the leaders of Solidarity.

We hope and we pray today for a time when the people of Poland and all of the peoples on Earth will join the people of America in celebrating the joys of freedom -- and speak together in pride and dignity of the wheat that grows on stones.

Earlier in the day, the President met at the Hartford Hotel with the members of the board of directors of the Knights of Columbus. He then held a working luncheon with Agostino Cardinal Casaroli, Secretary of State of Vatican City.

Hughes has also been the president of the American Society of Newspaper Editors and was a former Nieman Fellow at Harvard University. In 1971 he was awarded the Overseas Press Club's award for the best daily newspaper or wire service reporting from abroad.

I want to commend you for your leadership during the recent House of Representatives consideration of the Department of Defense authorization bill. I greatly appreciate your efforts to restore and maintain this Nation's defense capabilities.

START talks, by placing the United States in a dangerous position of disadvantage and removing the incentive for serious negotiation by the Soviets. I hope you will urge your colleagues to reject this proposal and pass instead the Broomfield-Carney-Stratton resolution, which will show the Soviet Union that the Congress supports our effort to accomplish meaningful arms reductions.

Restoring America's energy security has been a top priority since I assumed office. We have changed regulations and laws, held discussions with our neighbors concerning a North American accord, and increased cooperation with our friends and allies to enhance our energy security. The United States has made dramatic gains in augmenting production and enhancing efficient consumption of energy. As a result of the policies of this administration, the vulnerability of the United States and our allies to possible shocks from oil supply interruptions is significantly lessened.

Our energy cooperation with other countries through the International Energy Agency, which one portion of this bill will facilitate, is a clear example of our coordinated approach to energy security. The administration initially proposed and strongly supported the provisions of this legislation extending section 252 of the Energy Policy and Conservation Act, demonstrating our commitment to the IEA.

Reserve at an impressive rate. During the 4 years of the previous administration, oil was added to the Reserve at a rate of only 75,000 bbl/day. Thus far during my administration, oil has been added at a rate of about 300,000 bbl/day, and we continue a firm policy of filling the Reserve as fast as permanent storage can be made available.

Very shortly after taking office, I totally removed remaining regulations on the price, production, and distribution of crude oil and petroleum products. I did this in the sure confidence that the American people, acting through the market system, would move toward optimal means of production and consumption, and I have not been disappointed. Oil production has begun to increase after years of decline. Our efficiency of use of all energy, and especially oil, has increased significantly. In the first half of 1982, we produced more goods and services than in the first half of 1978, but used almost 20 percent less oil. Our imports of foreign oil have fallen by almost 2 million bbl/day since 1980, bringing our dependence on foreign oil to less than 30 percent.

Our initiatives in increasing the opportunities for oil production from offshore lands will also aid both the United States and our allies by providing additional supply and restraining upward pressure on prices. In addition, United States actions in increasing coal exports and allowing increased exports of petroleum products have contributed to an improvement in the international energy situation.

These movements were accompanied by heavy Israeli shelling and came only a day after I had made clear to the Israeli Government, in my meeting with Foreign Minister Shamir, that the United States placed great importance on the sustained maintenance of a cease-fire in place -- to avoid further civilian casualties and to secure the prompt withdrawal of the PLO forces in Beirut.

Through governments which have direct contact with the PLO, I have expressed my strong conviction that the PLO must not delay further its withdrawal from Lebanon. At the same time I have expressed to the Government of Israel the absolute necessity of reestablishing and maintaining a strict cease-fire in place so that this matter can be promptly resolved.

Today I happily join millions of Americans in saluting the Senate for bringing the United States one step closer to a constitutional amendment requiring balanced Federal budgets. Forty-seven Republicans and 22 Democrats stood shoulder to shoulder to pass the amendment and resist intense special interest pressure for still more red-ink spending.

The legacy of 21 unbalanced budgets in 22 years saddled us with severe problems that brought our economy to its knees. Making government live within its means again will not be easy; it will be very difficult. It will require a strong, sustained commitment from everyone, on both sides of the aisle. The time for partisan politics is long gone. Let us work together, honoring the trust of the people, so we can put this country back on track.

Over the past half century a great change has been taking place in the social and economic structure of the United States: mothers are joining the labor force in ever-increasing numbers. At the present time, over half of all the children in America have mothers who work outside the home.

Over forty-three million women are now employed in every area of public and private employment and are continuing to develop new opportunities. They have made, and continue to make, increasingly important contributions to the Nation.

These women make substantial contributions both to the Nation's economic growth and to the increasing strength of the American family, often at great personal sacrifice. They deserve our recognition and gratitude.

Most other mothers are working full time in the home. Their work is no less important. The guidance they give their children and the maintenance of a strong and cohesive family unit also contribute to the Nation's economic growth.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 4th day of Aug, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty- two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Theodore George Kronmiller to have the rank of Ambassador while serving as Deputy Assistant Secretary of State for Oceans and Fisheries Affairs.

I could think if it hadn't happened in just 18 months, well, that wasn't so -- but when someone that's been here a great many years said it hadn't happened before in all those years, I began to wonder whether I might not become a permanent fixture of the structure here.

Well, I thank you very much. And, at last, welcome to the White House. It does my spirit good to be among so many people who have the faith and the good will to move mountains. And, believe me, you're doing that.

I understand that last March, after Secretary Schweiker and Congressman Gore kicked off this campaign, over 500,000 people received free health-care education and screening services. Now, this is the type of private sector initiative that Bill Verity and members of the Task Force on Private Sector Initiatives have been bringing to my attention all year.

We want to congratulate the National Health Screening Council for Voluntary Organizations for serving as a catalyst. Our administration deeply appreciates organizations like yours trailblazing new private sector initiatives.

Now, please don't think that I'm not grateful, but after that fine start, we just want to challenge you to do even more. I'm here to tell you all that we like your style. We like the way you've put together groups of people at the grassroots to offer free preventive and health promotion services at no cost to the taxpayer. It's estimated that every business dollar of support that you raise generates an average of $40 in services to communities. And that's not bad -- $1 for 40.

Secretary Bell and Secretary Schweiker have assured me today that they're going to join in the health fair effort, working with you as partners, providing health promotion services wherever possible. And, of course, they were supposed to have already spoken to you before I said that, but now they will be speaking to you. This is the type of program that Secretary Schweiker's been emphasizing in his health promotion initiative that you are supposed to have heard about, but will hear about.

When the people of this country are encouraged to use their own initiative, they accomplish great things. I think we'll see the proof of this in the 1984 Summer Olympic Games. I've felt for a long time that the work of the Los Angeles Olympic Organizing Committee isn't good work, it's great work because of the dedication and selflessness of the people on that committee and the generosity of millions of Americans.

You know, these are the first Olympic games in all the thousands of years history of those games that will be put on totally by the private sector. And the Los Angeles Olympic Organizing Committee tells me that they'll be depending on volunteers and community groups. In fact, they have over 1,200 volunteers working right now on citizen committees. And that number is expected to go to 10,000 by 1984. It's not government dollars but voluntary efforts that keep America participating in a tradition that goes back thousands of years.

This is our American spirit, and with help from the media, from business, from volunteer organizations and the government, I know that this year your health fairs will serve many more people than in the past. And hopefully we can even save some lives.

I congratulate the House of Representatives for today endorsing a resolution on arms control that signals to the Soviet Union the American people's determination to seek peace through arms control agreements that will effectively reduce the nuclear arsenals of both sides. The United States arms reduction proposals are now a part of serious negotiations with the Soviets in Geneva. Today's vote provides strong support for our negotiators, led by Ambassador Edward Rowny and Ambassador Paul Nitze.

In particular, I salute the efforts of Congressmen Bill Broomfield, Bill Carney, and Sam Stratton in authoring the resolution that passed tonight and in gaining its passage. Our negotiators join me in expressing appreciation for the statesmanlike position taken by those who supported this resolution, and I ask all Members of Congress to join in our continued efforts to maintain the security of our country while seeking meaningful arms reductions.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Dr. Martin Feldstein to be a member of the Council of Economic Advisers. Upon his confirmation, the President intends to designate him Chairman of the Council. He will succeed Dr. Murray Weidenbaum.

Dr. Feldstein will be taking a 2-year leave of absence from Harvard University, where he has been a professor of economics since 1967. He is president of the National Bureau of Economic Research. This organization has been known among economists for its impeccable scholarship and rigid nonpartisanship for more than six decades. Dr. Feldstein was a research fellow and lecturer at Nuffield College, Oxford University, from 1964 to 1967.

In 1977 the American Economic Association awarded Dr. Feldstein the John Bates Clark Medal, an honor bestowed every 2 years on the economist under the age of 40 who is deemed to have made the most significant contribution to economic science. He is presently a member of the National Productivity Advisory Committee and the President's Private Sector Survey on Cost Control in the Federal Government.

Wilhelm Haferkamp have reached agreement on an arrangement which he believes could lead to a resolution of our steel trade problems. These negotiations have been very difficult and complex, and only the determination of both parties to succeed, and a spirit of understanding and cooperation, made agreement possible.

The Convention is the first of its kind to be negotiated between the United States and Austria. It will apply, in the United States, to the Federal estate tax, the Federal gift tax and the Federal tax on generation-skipping transfers and, in Austria, to the inheritance and gift tax.

A principal feature of the Convention is that the country of the transferor's domicile may tax transfers of estates and gifts and generation-skipping transfers on a worldwide basis, provided that it relieves the tax on specified types of property taxable on a situs basis.

We remain cautiously optimistic that the outstanding issues can be worked out. We are hopeful that there can be rapid movement toward the implementation of the full peace plan. It is our belief that negotiations can best move forward when a cease-fire is carefully observed by all parties.

The President. I just finished having a meeting with Senator Roth, and he made a very cogent statement about the subject that brings us together, this tax and spending cut program that we're seeking to get.

It's been dishonestly portrayed and tagged as the largest tax increase in history. It's nothing of the kind. But he said and characterized it as maybe the greatest tax reform, because only 17 percent of this bill represents actual tax increase. And 31 percent of it represents simply better compliance and collecting money from people who, under the existing laws, owe taxes to the government, and they're not paying them. And the rest of it happens to be actual reforms that we think are correcting unintended benefits or advantages that have come into being through legislation that here and there permitted an opening for a -- technically to gain something.

But the main purpose of what's going on here in this whole combination is that this combination represents a $380 billion reduction in deficits over 3 years. And 280 of that is in spending outlays not in this tax package.

Incidentally, this tax package wouldn't be the greatest single tax increase if it was all tax increase instead of just 17 percent. But the thing is, what we're really talking about is the necessity to reduce the deficits and thus get interest rates to continue coming down to get the economy moving again. And this will do it. And those who are opposing it cannot hide from the fact that they are supporting increased deficits and higher interest rates.

Montana that I like what you stand for and, more important, what you won't stand for. You know who you are, and I wish I could bottle some of your confidence and send it to points east, especially a place I know along the Potomac.

In a way you are already sending some of that Montana confidence to Washington. You are sending it in the form of your Congressman, Ron Marlenee. Ron has been very helpful to me during the consideration of our agricultural, defense, and economic policies. He's a darn good Congressman.

We're committed to preserving that freedom that John Owen loved to celebrate. And that means a strong America, secure and at peace. I don't need to tell the commonsense citizens of Montana about the importance of a prepared military. Just let me say that, with the help of the Congress, we're making solid headway in strengthening America's defenses.

Now, you know, when you do that, there are those that suggest that, somehow, this means you're warlike, that you can't wait to go to war. Well, there have been four wars in my lifetime. That's enough. And I don't know of any of those wars that we got into because we were too strong.

Before I came out to Billings, I read through some of the recent letters that I've received, and, particularly, from citizens of this State, knowing that I was coming. They concern a number of global problems. But let me read to you what one woman who lives a few miles down Route 212 wrote. ``Dear Mr. President, I recently had the great, good fortune to be blessed with twin sons.

Every day they become so much more precious to me. Your word means so much. Please help make this world safe for my sons. Please, please help stop the bomb. Please work for nuclear disarmament and safety. As a father who loves his children, I know you want them to live, too.

Well, I haven't had the chance to reach this concerned mother, so I won't reveal her name. But I want her to know I will work hard and unceasingly to protect her sons from nuclear war or any kind of war just as surely as I will work to ensure that her sons will grow up in freedom. Peace and freedom are our goals. And, at this very minute, we're proceeding in a number of areas to reduce nuclear risks. And just last week, the House adopted a bipartisan nuclear arms control resolution that strengthens our hand at the bargaining table. That Montana mother has my word we intend to make this world safe for her twins and for all our children.

There are other issues, as well, on the minds of Montanans. You know, in one of Montana's early settlements, there were two fellows who owned a general store. And one of them was a Spaniard, and the other one was a Frenchman. And neither one of them could understand the language of the other. Now, I don't know how they made out, but it, sort of, reminds you of Congress and me, doesn't it? [Laughter] Well, language barrier or no, using some Montana common sense, I'd like to explain to you what's been going on back there in Washington.

Americans, has run at less than half the 1980 rate for the last 6 months, and we're going to keep it that way or less. What is more, individual Americans have the first comprehensive tax cut they've had in 20 years. And starting in 1985 their taxes will be indexed. And to some of you who might not know what that expression means, it means that they will be indexed to whatever the rate of inflation is so that when you get a cost-of-living pay raise, it doesn't push you up into a higher tax bracket. You stay in the bracket you're in.

Last quarter's rise in the gross national product is an encouraging sign. Our dollar is stronger than it's been in 10 years, and we've already saved $6 billion annually by eliminating unnecessary and useless regulations. And we've saved or avoided, believe it or not, over $11 billion in waste and fraud because of a task force that we have working on that that's found some pretty astonishing things going on with thousands of audits that they've made, hundreds and hundreds of indictments and convictions. They found one shop one place where the government was buying something -- a brace -- for $132, and they were being sold at the local hardware store for $4.

You know, the actress Clara Bow once said of that famous Montana movie star, Gary Cooper -- she said, ``When he puts his arms around me I feel like a horse.'' [Laughter] Well, for a conservative President like me to have to put his arms around a multibillion-dollar deficit, it's like holding your nose and embracing a pig. [Laughter] And believe me that budget deficit is as slippery as a greased pig.

Government one penny more than necessary, but I have endorsed the Senate tax bill now before the Congress, because it's essential to our economic recovery program. It's essential to saving next July's 10-percent tax cut and the indexing I mentioned of the tax rates that will follow. For all the commotion surrounding the bill, it will have very little if any effect on the majority of individual taxpayers.

Now some of my friends in the press continue to refer to the tax measure I've mentioned -- the one that's now in the conference committee -- as the biggest single tax increase in history. It is nothing of the kind. It totals about $99 billion over the next 3 years -- '83 through '85 -- but $31 billion of that isn't a new or added tax in any way. It is the collection of tax now legitimately owed by some citizens under our present laws and which they have not been paying.

Now, about half the total in the bill is correcting unintended tax advantages which have resulted from sloppiness in some legislation. One example is a technical flaw in a bill passed several years ago which resulted in some corporations getting a 60-percent tax reduction simply because of that technicality which had never been intended in the passing of the bill. It was totally uncalled for that they should continue to get that.

Now, this tax program is part of the entire budget process, and it was essential in getting support for further reductions in spending. In order to get $280 billion in reduced outlays over the next 3 years against those deficits, we had to agree to the added revenues of 99 billion. The ratio of reduced spending outlays to revenues is 3 to 1.

The bottom line is this: Would you rather reduce deficits and interest rates by raising revenue from those who are not now paying their fair share, or would you rather accept larger budget deficits, higher interest rates, and higher unemployment? And I think I know your answer.

I believe this bill will help bring interest rates down. And interest rates, while still much, much too painful, have dropped already from 21 percent when we got to Washington last year to 15 percent today. Now, certainly, 15 per cent still hurts all kinds of people in all walks of life. But it's evident that interest rates can and are coming down. And if the Congress acts responsibly on the budget cuts, we expect the downtrend to continue.

Now, as you know, unemployment nationwide rose to 9.8 percent last month. And you don't know how much I wish I could stand up here today and say that the pain of the unemployed would be over by Labor Day, the day we honor the American working man and woman. How easy it would be to pour your tax money and money government would have to borrow into temporary make-work projects. But from past experiences, as we know, that's not the answer.

To the people of our land who are without jobs, let me speak directly. You are not forgotten. I understand your anguish. I saw it at firsthand in my own father's experience in the Great Depression. I know how important a job is to a person's self-confidence and self-image. The citizens who've been laid off from their jobs want results -- not platitudes from politicians. And that's what we're working for. We're building the base for an economy that will provide solid, secure jobs and economic growth on which people can plan their lives and their futures.

Last week, on the anniversary of last year's tax-cut vote, there were the predictable partisan cries that the program that we put into effect last year had failed. Well, it's only been in operation 10 months, with a major part of the tax cut starting only last month and the other installment, as I've said, due next year. Now, we warned you in the beginning that there would be no instant miracles.

If I could correct 40 years of fiscal irresponsibility in 1 year, I'd go back to show business as a magician. You know, that might be more fun pulling rabbits out of a hat than jackasses out of the way in Washington.

Economic recovery is long, hard work, but surely and slowly, we're going to make this economy great again. The question that I have for our critics is, what's their alternative? They've had a lot to say about our economic recovery program -- without mentioning that inflation has been cut in half, real earnings are up for the first time in quite awhile, and the rate of increase in government spending is a little more than half what it was in 1980. So far they haven't said anything about what they would do differently. So, we can only assume they'd go back to the same old tax-and-borrow-and-spend policy that gave us a trillion-dollar debt and deficits for 19 of the last 20 years, plus double-digit inflation and the highest interest rates in a hundred years. This country didn't become great by simply repeating our mistakes, but by recognizing and correcting them and moving ahead like the pioneers of Billings.

I began these remarks by speaking of the ideals that you hold dear. Well, let me close on that same theme. What we're trying to do in Washington is reawaken the government to the very values that you here in Billings represent -- determination, responsibility, confidence, and common sense -- the kind of common sense that says if it ain't broke, don't fix it. We are reintroducing the idea that progress is still an American word and that optimism is still an American trait. I believe if we cling to our hopes and dreams, I believe the future will flower just as it did for the founders of Billings, Montana.

I'm told that Montana was known to the Indians as the Land of Shining Mountains. Well, let us keep the mountains of Montana shining in hope and optimism. Let us keep the mountains of California and Tennessee and New Hampshire shining with the same confidence in the future, for if we can make the values of our people shine again, their glow will light America's path for generation after generation to come. And we can be, as one of those pilgrims said before landing on the Massachusetts shore all those hundreds of years ago, that what we could have here is a shining city on a hill.

Montana, captured by your native son, Charles Russell. And one could argue whether your treasure is in your shining mountains, your forests, your farms, cattle ranges, or in the metal under the ground. I know you have these riches and more, but in the State of Montana you nurture an American treasure that's even more priceless: the frontier spirit of your people.

State share a strength that was born of self-reliance, the kind of ``can-do'' attitude that tamed this continent. This harvest season, as your fields of green wheat ripen, America needs to reap more than your abundant grain -- to export your spirit, to help with the renewal of America. Send Larry Williams to Washington to work with us as a United States Senator. We have a Congressman that's here -- Marlenee -- there already, so we have an expectation of what another Montanan can do to help in Washington.

Republicans have been a majority in the Senate now for a year and a half -- an important reason why we have been able to achieve such historic reversals of the big spending, big taxing policies that got us into this recession. With their help we not only slowed the growth of government, we cut it nearly in half -- the annual rate of spending increasing far greater than the annual rate of increase in revenues from our taxing system.

We have much more to do if we're to sustain the recovery that has just begun. We can't afford to yield to the budgetbusting currents of the past. And those Republican Senators are an important bulwark against the riptide of big government that had been dragging us under.

Because of the importance of building our margin in the Senate and Larry's commitment to our program, it's a special pleasure for me to speak on his behalf. As I've said before, no matter how tough my job gets, sometimes I wake up at night in a cold sweat thinking how much worse it could be if we didn't have a Republican majority in the Senate. As I said to a little group just a short time ago, imagine having two Tip O'Neills. [Laughter] But with your help we're going to make it an even bigger margin this November.

Government. Now the battle is being waged over a tax bill passed by the Senate and being considered by the House. But the larger issue is whether or not the Federal Government can be made to live within its means.

Past Congresses and past administrations racked up huge deficits during the last 20 years as year after year the budget went unbalanced 19 times in those 20 years and our national debt grew larger. Today interest payments alone on that debt are more than the entire budget was in 1962, just 20 years ago. As a matter of fact, those who can remember back will remember for a while there, when it was getting close to a hundred billion, how Lyndon Johnson worked to try and not be the first one to hit a hundred billion dollars. And today that's the interest we pay on the debt that they were piling up.

The Federal Government has usurped more and more of our natural and national resources, driving interest rates skyward, our people out of work, and our country into recession. Now, I don't think the people of Montana will accept much more of that, and you shouldn't. And I'm determined to set this government on a course of fiscal sanity, eventually balancing the budget, but not on the back of the American taxpayer.

Now, I know that lately you've heard something different. You've heard that we're now backing the biggest single tax increase in our nation's history, and supposedly I have turned around and have given up on the original philosophy of cutting spending and so forth, and going in a different direction. Well, the tax bill that is now before the House will not raise income taxes on the average American. Three-quarters of the bill won't even have much of an effect on that middle-income taxpayer who faithfully and honestly fills out his forms every year. The bill is actually designed to better collect taxes that are owed but are not now being paid, to close unintended tax advantages for the few, and cut off unintended benefits. And this bill will help ensure that all businesses, no matter what their size, and all Americans, no matter how great their wealth, pay their fair share of taxes along with everyone else.

But, if I may, I welcome this opportunity to try and explain, because it hasn't been properly explained, and it hasn't been reported this way. Last year, we were successful in getting our tax-cut program phased in over a 3-year period. The next phase is coming in in July of 1983 -- another 10-percent cut in the income tax, some other things -- and then indexing. And as you know what that means, that for all these years of inflation, every time a worker got a cost-of-living pay raise, that didn't make him any better off, just had him try to keep up with the cost of living. It, however, pushed him into a higher bracket of the income tax. And by the time he paid that, he was worse off than he'd been the year before. So, the standard of living in this country has been going down steadily.

When we finish getting that last installment of the income tax, then the last thing that is done is we index the brackets so they are indexed to inflation, if there's any left by then. And you won't move up into another bracket just from getting a cost-of-living increase.

But it became evident that we could not get the spending cuts that were needed without. So, we had known and had spoken the year before of some areas that we knew where taxes were not being paid that were owed under the present tax laws. And we started volunteering a program of better administration of the tax program, better collection of those revenues. It wasn't enough of a compromise. So, the compromise has led to what is the $99 billion package over 3 years. And this is what they're calling the biggest tax increase in history. The tax increase they passed a couple of years ago -- before we got here -- in social security payroll tax will take $112 billion more in those same 3 years, which is a little bigger than 99.

But the 99 is not entirely a tax increase -- $31 billion of it is the collection of money presently owed, and not being paid; $17 billion of it represents some tax increases. And the other, roughly, 50 percent of the 99 billion represents correcting some legislation from the past that has led to unintended tax benefits. A piece of legislation, for example, that was passed several years ago, and that one particular industry in this country found an obscure paragraph, and it was interpreted by the courts in such way that they were able to get a 60-percent tax cut for themselves. That had not been intended in the legislation.

So, the actual tax increase is 17 percent. The containment of these others that are escaping is 31 percent. And the rest of it is, as I say, a tax reform closing some of these things that we think were giving advantages to some, but weren't available to all.

But that is the price we have had to pay for getting the reductions in spending. And what it amounts to over the next 3 years is -- we will reduce -- if this bill is passed -- we will reduce the deficits by $380 billion, and 280 of that will be in reduction in spending outlays, and 99 -- call it a hundred -- will be this present tax program. I figure that, yes, it's a compromise, but we're getting $3 reduction in outlays for $1 in the increased revenues. And you're still getting that $406 [$402] billion in tax cuts that we passed last year. And I figure the compromise is worth it, because the most important thing is, we must curtail those deficits, eliminate those deficits as soon as we can, and get the interest rates down so that prosperity will come back to this country.

You know, here in Montana it's easy to understand why Thomas Jefferson believed that America had room enough for our descendants to the thousandth and thousandth generation. And our task today is to reaffirm the principles that shaped on this land a way of life that is unique in history.

Washington. And you know sometime -- and I know that the people that have said this are well-intentioned. I know that many of the programs that have been proposed over the past had the best of intention -- and set out and only wanted to help people. But when you set out to help people, you'd better be sure of what you're doing. And they weren't all that sure.

I've talked and stretched this tax thing, but I want you to know that we haven't neglected a lot of other things. We're asking for some constitutional amendments -- and I'm very amused when I stop to think that 40 States or more have in their State constitutions that the budget must be balanced. The Federal Government's never had that, so it's got a trillion-dollar debt. And we have asked for a budget-balancing amendment to the United States Constitution that the Federal budget has to be balanced. And some people are calling it a hoax and saying that it'll never work.

The President made it clear that it is imperative that the cease-fire in place be observed absolutely in order for negotiations to proceed. We understand the Israeli Cabinet has approved a new cease-fire, which is in effect. It must hold.

In releasing the statement, Mr. Speakes announced that the President had two telephone conversations with Prime Minister Menachem Begin of Israel. Prime Minister Begin placed the latter call to tell the President that a complete cease-fire had been ordered by the Israeli Government. The President also received a telephone call from King Fahd ibn `abd al-`Aziz Al Sa'ud of Saudi Arabia, who expressed his concern over the situation in west Beirut. Secretary of State George P. Shultz was with the President during the conversations.

United States of America and New Zealand for the avoidance of double taxation and the prevention of fiscal evasion with respect to taxes on income, together with a related Protocol, signed at Wellington on July 23, 1982. I also transmit the report of the Department of State on the Convention.

The Convention, based on the OECD and draft United States model income tax conventions, takes into account changes in the income tax laws and tax treaty policies of the two countries. It provides limits on the tax at source with respect to taxes on investment income and provides rules for the taxation of capital gains, business profits, personal service income and other income. It also specifies the method used to avoid double taxation and provides for administrative cooperation between the tax officials of the two countries to avoid double taxation and prevent fiscal evasion.

The President today announced his intention to nominate Fernando E. Rondon, presently serving as Ambassador to the Democratic Republic of Madagascar, to serve concurrently as Ambassador to the Federal and Islamic Republic of the Comoros. He would be the first American Ambassador accredited to the Comoros.

I suppose it's unavoidable that debates over controversial issues like the tax bill should give rise to more heat than light. Still, I think it's important that the American people get the facts behind the sound and fury.

To begin with, this tax bill is not, as it has so often been mislabeled, the biggest tax increase in history. That's plain hogwash. The tax bill would raise $99 billion in revenue over 3 years. The social security payroll tax hike that was passed by the Congress in 1977 will increase the cost of the taxpayers $112 billion over that same period. But more importantly, new personal taxes are only 17 percent of that $99 billion figure.

About 80 percent of the money raised by the tax bill will come from plugging loopholes and from better compliance -- collecting money that is already owed to the government, but is not being reported. The goal is simple and just: to see to it that everyone pays his fair share -- no more, no less. In other words, this bill is 80 percent tax reform, not tax increase. And it's designed with one crucial goal in mind -- to raise revenue that, along with spending reductions, will help cut the whopping Federal deficits that are keeping interest rates up and too many Americans out of work.

It's part of a larger process implementing the budget resolution. Doing so will reduce outlays by about $3 for every $1 that is raised in tax -- reducing deficits by $380 billion over 3 years and continuing our progress toward less government and more economic growth.

On taxes, the proof is in the bottom line. The typical American family this year is paying $400 less in taxes, and next year that will amount to $788 -- almost twice as much even after passage of the new tax bill. That still adds up to what we promised in the first place -- the biggest tax cut ever for the American people.

Q. Mr. President, when you passed that big tax cut last year and signed the legislation, you thought that was going to cure the economy and get the job done. Why didn't it work? Why do we need a tax increase now?

The President. Yes, I will. May I call to your attention that that program -- the first installment of it and the smallest installment went into effect only about 10 months ago. And the second installment went in a month and a half ago, July 1st. And there is a remaining installment to go in on July 1st of 1983. But the very fact that something just simply goes into effect -- the program and the incentive of the program is built on and based on the people and the businesses who are benefiting from these tax cuts, acquiring and accumulating that money, and then having it for use.

But now I can also add, however, it is working. Granted, you don't suddenly see a bonanza, but beginning with the first minor tax cut, that first 5-percent installment, there has been an increase in personal savings that has not been true over the last decade. There has also been an increase now in real earnings -- not just inflated dollars, but there's been running about a 4-percent increase in the actual real money that people have. The drop in inflation that has -- I think we can take some credit for with all of our program -- that drop in inflation has made a family with a $15,000 income, a family of four, have a thousand dollars more purchasing power now than they had in 1980. That's a thousand-dollar raise just through inflation alone, not counting the tax figure.

The fact that interest rates have come down, the fact that retail sales on an annualized basis have been rising since January at about 12 percent -- all of these things, I think are the evidences that we have bottomed out in the recession. And I think that we're entitled to take some credit for that with the program.

Q. Mr. President, why didn't you take the kind of highly publicized, public action to stop the bombing in Beirut before you did yesterday? Perhaps hundreds of thousands could -- or thousands anyway -- could have been saved. Why not be -- why not go public, no matter what you may have said in private, sir?

Habib [Ambassador Philip C. Habib, the President's emissary in consultations in the Middle East.] has been working -- but the sensitivity of the negotiations were such that I avoided, as you know, anything that might interfere with those negotiations or in some way injure what Ambassador Habib was trying to accomplish.

However, yesterday the situation was that the negotiations were down -- we had general agreement by all parties finally to the arrangement, and the negotiations were down to the logistics, the technicalities of getting the people -- well, getting the PLO moving and so forth.

And those negotiations, literally, were broken off by the extent of that bombing and shelling. The delegates couldn't even get to the negotiation meetings. And I have to be fair and say that, in my first call, I was informed then by Prime Minister Begin that he had ordered a cessation of the aerial bombing, and so, we discussed the artillery shelling from then on.

Q. Mr. President, why don't you tell us a little bit of how you felt in these 9 weeks with people being bombarded and your continuing to send weapons to inflict this horror on them? I mean, what has been your personal feeling?

On the other hand, I think that perhaps the image has been rather one-sided, because of the Israeli capability at replying, but in many instances -- in fact, most of them -- the cease-fire was broken by PLO attacking those Israeli forces.

The President.  --  -- but, on the other hand, if we look now at the stories that are beginning to come out and that some have been public, the PLO was literally a goverment and an armed force in another nation and beholden in no way to that other nation, which was one of the reasons why you didn't hear more protest from the Lebanese Government about the Israeli presence.

Q. Mr. President, you said that yesterday you did have a general agreement, and then there was this firing. Are we back on track today? Do we still have a general agreement? And would you go along with some forecasts that say the PLO evacuation will begin sometime next week?

The President. I'm reasonably optimistic. Now, see, I didn't say ``cautiously.'' I'm reasonably optimistic about this, because I believe that this time the cease-fire is going to hold, and, as I say, the negotiations now are not the case of trying to persuade agreement on the part of the various parties. The negotiations are on the technicalities, the logistical move that must be made in getting them out. And so, I think there's reason for, great reason for hope.

Q. Mr. President, what is your personal view on Japan's revision of history and the rationale regarding Japan's invasion of China and occupation of Korea, and, also, attack on Pearl Harbor -- to justify the Imperial Japanese military actions elsewhere?

The President. Well, I think we'd be going into past history there. And, of course, those were tragic times. And we think there was a different philosophy than is governing Japan today. And I think the fact that we have been able to forget or forgive -- whichever you want to use -- that period, and become the good friends that we are today, I think, is what we should be more interested in. I would rather not rehash the war feelings that I'm sure were felt on both sides and that led to that tragedy.

Q. Mr. President, in view of the fact that until recently, you had resisted any effort to raise revenues in the way that you're endorsing in this bill now, how concerned are you that, regardless of the merits of the matter, the perception among the public will be that you have done what the Republicans always accused Jimmy Carter of doing -- flip-flopped on the tax issue?

The President. I think that the answer's very simple -- and thank you for asking it. There isn't any flip-flop on this at all. I would prefer to reduce our budget deficits by continuing to reduce government spending. And I still think that there is more to be done in that regard. But let me point out that when we submitted our budget this year, the Congress refused to even consider it.

And it was based purely on spending cuts. And finally, after long negotiations and the Gang of 17, as it was named -- the bipartisan group that met trying to reconcile this problem -- it became clear that we could not get the spending cuts we were asking for unless we would agree to some increases in revenue.

Now, our first effort to meet that was something that we had said a year ago when we were getting the tax cuts. We said that we were aware that there were areas where unintended tax advantages were being taken by some that were never intended in the legislation. We said, also, that we were aware that there were moneys owed to the government that were not now being collected, and that we were ready at any time to come forth with a package to try and propose that. So, we started in the negotiations with saying, let's implement those things that we've already found.

Q. Just to follow up briefly, the one thing that is included in this package is taxation -- is withholding on taxation and dividends and interest. This is something that you, yourself, denounced during the campaign when President Carter proposed it.

Here, once having the information available that you have when you're in this job, we discovered in our studies that one of the areas where there is escape from paying taxes due is in the matter of reporting earnings from income and dividends. And that is one of the large areas where taxes that are due are just not being paid. So, with that in mind, we looked at that very situation.

But we have exempted fully 80 percent or more of the people over 65. They would have to have an income of -- there's a couple of $14,400 before they would be eligible for withholding. For other people not over 65, you would have to have an income -- average family would have to have an income of about 24,200-and-some dollars before theirs would be withheld.

So, what we found is that the withholding is going to apply basically to those people who are in an income bracket where they pay quarterly installments on their estimated income. And, thus, all that happens is the bank or the company paying the dividends will submit that to the government, and they will send their checks for the balance of what they owe.

Q. Mr. President, has the Israeli action in Lebanon, often against U.S. wishes -- the massive retaliation for violations of the cease-fire by the PLO, has that changed in any way the special relationship between Israel and the United States? And has it changed your own personal views toward Israel?

The President. No, I think -- and I was concerned also that -- the reason for the call, that it could endanger that -- the manner in which it's being portrayed, there's been less emphasis on the provocation and more emphasis on the response. And, yes, I did and have voiced the opinion that the response many times was out of proportion to the provocation. But we can't deny that the Israelis have been taking casualties from those cease-fire violations themselves. I think the figure now is 326 dead of their own military from being attacked in the breaking of the cease-fire.

The President. I still believe that this country has an obligation to pursue the peace process that was started in Camp David and that this country has an obligation to ensure Israel's survival as a nation.

On August 26, 1920, the 19th Amendment to the Constitution became law, granting women the right to vote. On this, the 62nd Anniversary of that historic day, we Americans can pause and take pride in the progress we have made toward the goal of equal opportunity.

We celebrate today not only the achievements of the past, but, also, our continued commitment to build an America in which all our citizens will share equally in the rights and responsibilities of our Nation.

In the intervening years since 1920, women have faithfully carried out responsibilities at all levels of government, in every area of employment and education, and in the nurturing of families and children.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 13th day of Aug., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-two, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

So, let me put it to you this way. The conservative revolt that Jack Kemp is leading appears to be a challenge to your leadership of the party. And I wonder if you think this is a decisive battle with the far right -- between the main body of the party?

The President. I don't know whether it's a decisive battle. But, very frankly, I am surprised, because I think the issue is so clear cut that when the facts are explained, how they can continue resistance to this when we have protected entirely the tax cuts passed last year and when, in fact, this is less a tax increase than it is a tax reform. Only about 17 percent of this represents new taxes on the people, and 31 percent represents collecting money that we're duty bound to collect, because it's owed and presently not being paid.

The President. I don't bear grudges or anything, no. He's been here to the leadership meetings, and he's heard my side. I realize how strongly he -- well, is almost, you might say, a purist to the extent that he just can't see the difference between reform and increase. And if it were a case of this present tax reform -- which, incidentally, was not of our choosing. This was made necessary in order to get the spending cuts we're still trying to get. If it had resulted in altering the incentive tax cuts that we put in place, I could understand. I am just hard put to understand how he can continue to believe that this in some way represents a turn in my direction or philosophy, because it doesn't.

The President. Now, this is awfully -- I have been meeting with individuals and with groups from the Congress steadily for the last several days, and I have to tell you that this seems to me a more mixed situation, that there is division within these various groups, and I couldn't pin down exactly, rather than that one group that you just mentioned, Jack and that coterie that is a united group. I think there's a division in all the ranks -- Gypsy Moths, Boll Weevils, Republicans, Democrats -- on support of this. And what I've been doing in the meetings is simply trying to correct the misperception they have of it, and, in many cases, that's been successful, that they have come in with a misunderstanding of what we're trying to do.

The President. Well, we were talking about this early in the week, because, again, much of the press coverage, I think, has contributed to a misconception about this. And I, in these couple of trips that I've made out in the last few weeks into the country, I discovered that this constant drumbeat of biggest tax increase in history when it's nothing of the kind has -- well, the people are uninformed. And when I have had an opportunity, as I did in Billings, Montana, the other day, to explain what it is we're doing, I found then the people were in support.

Is it because it taxes people who haven't been paying and should have been, or because it reduces tax benefits on things like construction or things like cigarettes, dividend interest, or is this just an election-year reaction?

The President. I think it is, pretty much, an election-year reaction, and the idea that they may be portrayed as, now, supporting tax increases when we have been the party going the other way. Of course, I must say that some of those conservative voices -- I have to be frank and say they cannot be described as people who were followers and have abandoned me. Some of them never were for me.

The President. Well, of course, you have got to recognize that in the depth of this recession, there had been a bigger dip in the -- percentagewise, also -- in the gross national product. What I am counting on -- we are going to get that percentage down. We think that the percentage has been too high for a number of years of gross national product. But we are talking about a normal gross national product also.

We have had a long period in which the GNP has been going down, and only just recently, in this last quarter, did it show any increase at all. The percentage that we are aiming at is to reduce the percentage of increase in government spending each year. And, when we took office, it was running at 17 percent a year, increasing.

Now, remember, on the other hand, we have an obligation that I accepted during the campaign of one area where there would be increased spending. And that was to rectify the damage that has been done to our national security and national defense. And, many times in the campaign, I was asked by people in question-and-answer sessions, and sometimes by the press, if I found that I came down to choice of balancing the budget or doing what needed to be done for national defense, which side would I come down on? And I said every time, ``On the side of national defense.'' And, incidentally, to audiences, when that was asked, that answer always received applause, which indicated to me that the American people have been well aware that our defenses had been allowed to deteriorate.

Mr. O'Leary. Were you aware that Ed Meese [Counsellor to the President.] said yesterday in a speech here that the conservatives' way has not worked, and that now, quote, ``We have to try something else.'' Does that mean that the administration or yourself was reconsidering supply-side economics?

The President. No. And I think maybe he was talking about those same dissidents that you've been talking about there, and I'd like to see the whole framework or the manner in which it was asked or something. The -- no, I still believe in the combination: first of all, continued reduction in spending; at the same time, that -- for the economy's sake and to get it rolling again -- that we must also, as we can, reduce the percentage that government is taking in taxes from the people.

The President. But, again, as I say, the answer to that I can give him is: You couldn't add the other, which is all-important. It was made plain to us this year. We did not come in with the proposal to raise revenues. We came in with the proposal for more cutting of spending. And found out this time -- and crossing the aisle, Democrat and Republican -- we could not put together a coalition for the continued spending cuts unless we would agree to some added revenues.

Mr. O'Leary. What is your opinion of the reported threat -- I don't know if it's a real threat or a reported threat -- that Republican National Committee campaign funds might be withheld from House candidates in November if they don't vote for this bill?

The President. Because, here again, people automatically transfer that into a reduction of care for those who really need it. What we see these as, these cuts, are based on our estimates of how we can continue to give the necessary care but eliminate the fat that has grown in the program.

Congress I am going to veto budget-busting bills, if I have to do that in order to make them match this tax increase with the cuts in spending that are supposed to be attached to it. But I do refrain from announcing a veto of any specific bill until it arrives on my desk and I see it.

The President. I don't know. I'll tell you this: I wish that the President of the United States had the power that most Governors have in their own States, which is the right of line-item veto. It would sure make the job simpler.

I was going to talk only about taxes, but I hope you let me -- allow me as I terminate here one question about the Middle East. Sometime ago you said out on the lawn that you were out of patience a long time ago, presumably with Israel's constant assaults on Beirut. And yesterday you spoke in terms that can only be called stern or harsh to Mr. Begin. But what can you do to curb Israeli military action if the current effort by Habib [Ambassador Philip C. Habib, the President's emissary in consultations in the Middle East.] fails -- that's a hypothetical question -- but if they begin bombarding again today: recall Habib, cut off military assistance?

Message to Compatriots in Taiwan issued by China on January 1, 1979, promulgated a fundamental policy of striving for peaceful reunification of the Motherland. The Nine-Point Proposal put forward by China on September 30, 1981, represented a further major effort under this fundamental policy to strive for a peaceful solution to the Taiwan question.

States arms sales to Taiwan, which is an issue rooted in history, the two governments will make every effort to adopt measures and create conditions conducive to the thorough settlement of this issue.

The U.S.-China joint communique issued today embodies a mutually satisfactory means of dealing with the historical question of U.S. arms sales to Taiwan. This document preserves principles on both sides and will promote the further development of friendly relations between the governments and peoples of the United States and China. It will also contribute to the further reduction of tensions and to lasting peace in the Asia/Pacific region.

Building a strong and lasting relationship with China has been an important foreign policy goal of four consecutive American administrations. Such a relationship is vital to our long-term national security interests and contributes to stability in East Asia. It is in the national interest of the United States that this important strategic relationship be advanced. This communique will make that possible, consistent with our obligations to the people of Taiwan.

In working toward this successful outcome we have paid particular attention to the needs and interests of the people of Taiwan. My longstanding personal friendship and deep concern for their well-being is steadfast and unchanged. I am committed to maintaining the full range of contacts between the people of the United States and the people of Taiwan -- cultural, commercial, and people-to-people contacts -- which are compatible with our unofficial relationship. Such contacts will continue to grow and prosper and will be conducted with the dignity and honor befitting old friends.

Regarding future U.S. arms sales to Taiwan, our policy, set forth clearly in the communique, is fully consistent with the Taiwan Relations Act. Arms sales will continue in accordance with the act and with the full expectation that the approach of the Chinese Government to the resolution of the Taiwan issue will continue to be peaceful. We attach great significance to the Chinese statement in the communique regarding China's ``fundamental'' policy, and it is clear from our statements that our future actions will be conducted with this peaceful policy fully in mind. The position of the United States Government has always been clear and consistent in this regard. The Taiwan question is a matter for the Chinese people, on both sides of the Taiwan Strait, to resolve.

We will not interfere in this matter or prejudice the free choice of, or put pressure on, the people of Taiwan in this matter. At the same time, we have an abiding interest and concern that any resolution be peaceful. I shall never waver from this fundamental position.

I am proud, as an American, at the great progress that has been made by the people on Taiwan over the past three decades, and of the American contribution to that process. I have full faith in the continuation of that process. My administration, acting through appropriate channels, will continue strongly to foster that development and to contribute to a strong and healthy investment climate, thereby enhancing the well-being of the people of Taiwan.

Clearly a firm bond unites Liberians and Americans who have come together professionally and socially throughout the years. Our two governments have a long history of cooperation on bilateral and international issues.

Chairman Doe told me of his government's ambitious goals, including the return to democratic institutions and economic stabilization. We welcome his emphasis on bringing the benefits of development to every corner of Liberia. And today we discussed how the United States can assist Liberia in achieving these goals.

As I stated clearly in our discussion, the United States stands by its commitments to Liberia, and looks forward to continued, mutual cooperation. My meeting with Chairman Doe marks the beginning of his 2-week visit to the United States. And he made me a little envious when he told me that his next stop after Washington is going to be -- well, not exactly the next stop, but the next one after -- is going to be Los Angeles, California. But in addition to meeting with a wide range of administration officials and Members of the Congress, he will have an opportunity to meet many Americans outside the government and Liberians who live in the United States as well.

The personal ties among our private citizens play an important role in the special relationship between our two countries. I hope the longstanding ties between our two people and between our governments will be further strengthened in the years ahead.

States of America, long considered the land of the free and the home of the brave. My visit here today is in response to the kind invitation extended me by President Ronald Reagan, a man of abiding courage, strong will, and foresight.

As you know, Liberia and the United States have a long and historic friendship -- we span more than 150 years. However, as Liberia's first leader to visit the United States, my presence here is significant in two principle respects: firstly, to first reaffirm our traditional friendship with the United States; secondly, the portrayal to the world the United States continuing identification with and support for Liberia.

In discussions with President Reagan, I have explained the causes of the Liberian revolution and the economic problems which presently confront the country. I also voiced my country's hopes and aspirations for the maintenance of the free enterprise system and our adhering to democratic ideals. Together President Reagan and I discussed matters of international concern, particularly the war in Lebanon and independence for Namibia. I also outlined the economic measures being taken by our government to achieve economic recovery and promote private sector investment.

America's understanding and support for the fulfillment of the objectives of our revolution. This is a most welcome assurance. It demonstrates the Reagan administration's commitment to maintaining the United States economic and strategic interests in Liberia.

Our country serves as a mirror through which African nations can assess America's support and commitment to developing countries. It is our belief that with the kind of mutual interests we share, the United States should recognize that Liberia could serve as a mirror through which its support to developing countries could be assured.

I recognize that there is some uncertainty about the ability to assure that future spending reductions will be achieved. But I am encouraged by the Congress' work on the pending reconciliation measures, which come very close to meeting their spending reduction targets.

I will, of course, resist any budget-busting spending measures that may come to my desk. And, lest there be any doubt on this point, I would ask you to remind your colleagues that as Governor of California I exercised the veto power successfully 993 times. I hope I will not have to use the veto so frequently here in Washington. But, for my part, I will -- without reservation -- do what has to be done to control spending.

Your support has been invaluable in the implementation of our program to date. With your continued strong leadership and support, we can continue to restrain government, as we restore America's strength and vitality.

We are of course extremely gratified by the Israeli Cabinet's approval of the plan, which is a tribute to the remarkable diplomatic achievement of the President's personal emissary, Ambassador Philip Habib. It sets the stage for implementation of the plan, which we expect to start as early as this weekend. We urge the parties to make every effort to clear up the remaining matters so that implementation can go forward as soon as possible.

The President. On behalf of the American people, I want to thank the Members of both parties in the House of Representatives for today's -- who made today's victory possible. This was a hard choice for many of them, especially in an election year. But when it came to the test, a bipartisan majority bit the bullet and voted for the revenue increases and spending cuts we so urgently needed to get deficits and interest rates down and Americans back to work.

This vote does not mark the end of the crusade to get our country's economy moving again, but it is an important milestone. Over the last 18 months, we've cut inflation in half. The interest rates are coming down. The latest economic indicators are pointing in the right direction. It hasn't been easy, and I fully appreciate what it's been like for millions of Americans who have borne the brunt of this recession and resisted the political calls for quick fixes. We must keep our faith with their patience, their courage, and their resolve.

Our duty is clear. We have to keep government spending and deficits moving downwards so that prosperity and economic growth can move up. And I pledge my cooperation with the Congress in the days ahead to work tirelessly for these vital objectives.

Let me also add a word to those who voted against this measure. Honorable men and women can honestly disagree. They can also leave their disagreements behind them and work together once the issue has been settled by free and open voting. It'll take the best efforts of us all to keep the American economy on the road to recovery. Let's leave our differences behind us and all of us get on with the Nation's business; an economic recovery that will mean more jobs and more opportunity for all of our people.

The President. Well, I have to tell you that right down to the wire there was no one predicting anything but that it would be that close. There were -- I know in my own calls and meetings with Congressmen of both parties on this, there were a great many who very frankly stated that they were still in the process of making up their minds. So, you didn't have a definite commitment on them. And that's why there were conflicting reports coming as to which side might be ahead on this.

The President. No, not at all, because I think there's been a wrong perception. It was made evident the other night after I went on the air and explained this program. And immediately afterward, in certain surveys that were made and telephone checks that were made, it was amazing how many people had totally misunderstood the program or the bill and, once they understood it, that they said this now made them able to support it.

The first thing was, we have to think of the economic recovery program as not only just a separate bill that was passed last year; it is this entire, ongoing package. Just as our tax cuts are spread over several years, so are the spending cuts, with the idea that each year we would come back in with more that we had to do. And, therefore, to even have referred to this as a tax increase, I think, was wrong, because it was an adjustment of the tax cut that was passed last year and which still continues on into the coming years. And the truth of the matter is that even with this passed, the tax cut over the next 3 years will amount to $335 billion for the people. Next year they will double the gain that they have already made in their personal fortunes because of the tax cut.

So, I think that there was a perception on the part of some and an alarm that this represented some kind of change in philosophy. It does not. I still believe in the combination of incentive tax cuts that will increase productivity in this country and cuts, reductions in spending. And so I -- no, I don't think it will hurt the movement at all.

Q. Mr. President, some of the polls that have come out indicate that the majority of Americans oppose this tax increase bill. Are you concerned that by the time election day rolls around and some of these explanations have blown away that all people will remember are things like the 8-cent cigarette tax increase?

The President. I think what they're going to see and what is going to happen, that they are going to be thinking about, is I think the economy is going to continue to improve. I think that a failure to have passed this would have been a setback to the improvement of the economy. I think we would have seen, probably, interest rates going back up and a stagnation of -- and yet all the indices that we have now are supportive of the idea that things are getting better.

The President. Oh -- [knocking on his desk] -- don't talk like that. You know, as an old sports announcer, I have to tell you that if a no-hitter is being pitched, you never mention it during the game or you'll jinx the pitcher. [Laughing] So, no, I think this is -- there have been a lot of people working on this, and there was a great team effort on both sides.

Special Assistant to the President. Previously, Mr. Hopkins had, since the beginning of the administration, served as Special Assistant to the President for Policy Development. He worked as senior policy analyst in both the Reagan primary and general election Presidential transition team. Prior to that, he was a research analyst for Citizens for the Republic in Los Angeles and an instructor in economics at the University of Missouri.

Ambassador Habib has informed me that a plan to resolve the west Beirut crisis has been agreed upon by all the parties involved. As part of this plan the Government of Lebanon has requested and I have approved the deployment of United States forces to Beirut as part of a multinational force.

The negotiations to develop this plan have been extremely complex and have been conducted in the most arduous circumstances. At times it was difficult to imagine how agreement could be reached, and yet it has been reached. The statesmanship and the courage of President Sarkis and his colleagues in the Lebanese Government deserve special recognition, as does the magnificent work of Ambassador Habib. Phil never lost hope, and in the end his spirit and determination carried the day, and we all owe him a debt of gratitude.

The parties who made this plan possible have a special responsibility for ensuring its successful completion, or implementation. I expect its terms to be carried out in good faith and in accordance with the agreed timetable. This will require meticulous adherence to the cease-fire.

As you know, my agreement to include United States forces in a multinational force was essential for our success. In the days ahead, they and forces from France and Italy will be playing an important but carefully limited, noncombatant role. The parties to the plan have agreed to this role and have provided assurances on the safety of our forces.

Our purpose will be to assist the Lebanese Armed Forces in carrying out their responsibility for ensuring the departure of PLO leaders, officers, and combatants in Beirut from Lebanese territory under safe and orderly conditions. The presence of United States forces also will facilitate the restoration of the sovereignty and authority of the Lebanese Government over the Beirut area. In no case will our troops stay longer than 30 days.

The participation of France and Italy in this effort is further evidence of the sense of responsibility of these good friends of the United States. Successful resolution of the west Beirut crisis by responsible implementation of the plan now agreed will set the stage for the urgent international action required to restore Lebanon's full sovereignty, unity, and territorial integrity; obtain the rapid withdrawal of all foreign forces from that country; and help ensure the security of northern Israel.

We must also move quickly in the context of Camp David to resolve the Palestinian issue in all its aspects, as well as the other unresolved problems in the Arab-Israeli conflict. Only when all these steps are accomplished can true and lasting peace and security be achieved in the Middle East.

The President. I said no questions because of the press conference that's coming up later, and that will be covered. And I assure you that every precaution is taken and that your questions will be answered fully by the Secretary with regard to that -- and to their withdrawal, if there is any violation of any of the provisions that have been agreed upon.

The President. No, they said the Senate had to run because they were due in at 9 o'clock in their session that began, so they broke up and decided to go back on the Hill. And I think they all want to go home. So do I.

Yours is truly a sterling achievement. You have succeeded against staggering odds. It is America's blessing to have men of your caliber and patriotism in its service. Your skill, courage and determination have been an inspiration to us all. It was a performance which was in the best tradition of the tireless professionalism we expect of our Foreign Service. You have your country's gratitude for a great and difficult job well done.

I have witnessed many stirring events, but none more inspiring than the successful completion of the fourth and final test flight of the space shuttle in the California desert on July 4, 1982, as we celebrated the 206th anniversary of our nation's independence.

The space shuttle is an engineering and technological triumph. As the world's first reusable spaceship it represents the culmination of a decade-long effort, not only of thousands in government but tens of thousands in industry and the university community who worked so hard to make it a reality.

The shuttle program has given a lift to our national spirit. It has sparked a resurgence of pride among all Americans -- pride in our ability to do great things when we set out to do them. But it has also been a productive and useful program that has built new technology, created new industries and new jobs, thus helping to strengthen our national economy.

The President has noted this morning the election of a new President in Lebanon, and he has sent a message of congratulations to the new President. We also congratulate the Lebanese Parliament in electing the new President through the traditional, constitutional processes during this difficult and trying time.

Lebanon's new leadership has a difficult task ahead. That task is to bring the country back together again. The promotion of genuine national reconciliation and reconstruction are crucial to the success of the new President.

The United States will continue to work closely with the Government of Lebanon on the complex and difficult task ahead. We believe that the election holds out the possibility to continue the process of strengthening the central government of Lebanon, and we are pleased that the process has moved forward.

I'm sure that you know how important this election is or you wouldn't be here tonight. The Senate has been called the most exclusive club in the world. The hundred men and women there represent the 50 States. And you know, sometimes we forget or sometimes we're young enough that we just didn't know or weren't aware that that's exactly what the Senators do represent -- that not too many years ago it was changed to popular election -- and that Sentors were actually chosen by State governments. They are there to represent the interests in this federation of sovereign States of their particular sovereign State as well as the national interests of the federation.

In about 10 weeks, Californians are going to choose which of two men is best able to represent the State. One of them has held the highest elective office in this State, that of Governor. He took office 8 years ago, in the middle of the fiscal year, with a $500 million surplus in the State cash box. Previous to that, the State of California had returned the last surplus before that $500 million -- we couldn't return it because the administration had to leave in the middle of the fiscal year -- but the one previous to that we turned back $850 million in the form of a rebate. And I have often thought nothing ever delineated so clearly the difference between the two parties as the statement of a Senator in the opposing party who stormed into my office one day when we were giving back that $850 million and said he considered that giving that money back was a misuse of public funds. [Laughter] Well, the new Governor did not give back the $500 million. And now he seeks to move on to greener fields, leaving the State a few million dollars in the hole, which is against the constitution of the State of California. And it's a little frightening when you stop to think that if he were in Washington, he wouldn't be dealing in millions, he'd be dealing in billions.

Now, as an alternative, we can choose a man who was a part of the California State Legislature when California was climbing out of that fiscal swamp, turning back to the people surpluses every time we got one as rebates to the people. He then became mayor of one of our great cities. And that city is recognized nationwide as one of the best run communities in the United States.

But let me try and tell you how important it is that we hold this slim lead that we have, that slim majority in the United States Senate. It's the first time that we have had a majority in one of the Houses of Congress in decades. And without that, we couldn't achieve what has been achieved in the last year and a half.

We were not quite to the middle of the fiscal year when we took office so the '81 budget was in place, and there wasn't much we could do about that. But we had to proceed immediately with the fiscal budget for '82, which would go into effect on October of 1981. That budget -- as you know, under the pattern in Washington budgets are proposed for a few years in advance.

But we proposed an economic recovery program almost the instant that we were there, and it was a long and hard struggle, if you'll remember. And then just about this time of year a year ago, we passed and I signed here in California our economic recovery program which reduced proposed government spending over the next 3 years by $130 billion and contained also the greatest tax cut -- single tax cut in the history of the United States.

Some failure -- 21\1/2\-percent interest rate is now 13\1/2\. The 12.4-percent inflation rate has been running at less than 6 percent for the last 6 months. And after a decade of decline, after a time when incomes went up some 120-odd percent but the actual real earnings of the American people kept going down and the standard of living kept going down, personal income for July -- that single month, up 1 percent. And if you wanted to annualize that instead of keep on doing that every month, that's a 12-percent increase. Disposable personal income after payment of income tax went up 2.1 percent in July.

The savings rate -- and in this country of ours, for the last several years personal savings, the very essential to having a capital pool for investment that industry can borrow from -- that savings has been less than that of our counterparts in the other industrial nations in the world. But in June, before the tax cut, it had gone up to 7.3 percent. It had been 6.9 percent in May. It has been steadily down for the months and a long time before, as I've said. I am interested to see what it will be. You don't get the figures as early on that one, so we'll wait a few weeks before we know what it is for July.

Fraud and waste -- and we have a task force that's been in that and reporting to me every 6 months, and the last report on their 6 months they had saved $5.8 billion for us -- thousand of audits, thousands of indictments, and hundreds and hundreds of convictions. And last year's tax cut, which as I say was to be phased in over a 3-year period, is still the largest tax cut in history in spite of what happened last week, because over the 3 years, the coming 3 years, even with the bill that has just been passed, the American people will get a tax cut in these 3 years of $335 billion.

There's one other thing that I want to mention: federalism. There is a program that we have been working with Governors -- well, some Governors. [Laughter] We've been working with mayors, we've been working with city council members, county officials, State legislatures, to work out a return to the tenth amendment; to give back to the States and the cities and the counties of this country the programs, the powers, the authority that were unjustly seized by the Federal Government in denial of the tenth amendment of the Constitution; to put government, as much as possible, those functions that are proper, back in those levels of government that are closest to the people.

Now, who would you like to have in California helping administer that switch back to that kind of federalism? Someone whose first great battle of history-making proportions was against the medfly? [Laughter] Or someone who has served in the State legislature for years, someone who has now served as the mayor of one of our major cities for years, who knows the local problems and knows what the Federal Government should do if we're to have the kind of honest government, efficient government that we should have for all of us throughout the Nation?

What is the sanctuary? Well, when we were in Sacramento, as Pete knows, we'd laid out some of the great scenic areas of California and drew lines out to the 3-mile limit and said, ``No matter what, there will be no drilling inside these beautiful scenic areas.'' And a Republican administration in Washington continued the line on out beyond the 3-mile limit and said, ``We will observe your sanctuaries.'' But there are going to be 20 more. They may not be in the sanctuary, but you can throw a rock from any one of them into the sanctuary from where they're going to be drilled. So, as I say, he talked a great war; he hasn't exactly been fighting that war.

This -- I can't tell you -- and, you know, I'm a little -- [inaudible] -- here. This is the first time I've ever been a before-dinner speaker. [Laughter] But nothing of what we've achieved, nothing of what we have accomplished could have been done if we did not, for one of these rare moments in history, have that majority in the United States Senate. I'd like to have a majority in the other House, but in off-year elections history says that you don't usually gain in that off-year election.

But I can tell you this. The Senator who's coming out to campaign for Pete's opponent is a member of a very exclusive little group of a half a dozen Senators who have set an all-time record in the history of the Senate for spending; in fact, more spending than any other Senators that have ever been there. We know some of the things advocated by Pete's opponent and what he would stand for.

I haven't touched on another area, but one of which I'm very proud. When we took office, the supposed voluntary military was a failure. People were talking that we could not exist or have a good defense without the draft. Now, even though we have a registration -- and I am convinced that that is worth keeping -- I am opposed to a peacetime draft and I'm even more so now, because we don't need it.

We found that half our airplanes couldn't fly on any given day for lack of spare parts. We found that on any given day there were Navy vessels that couldn't leave port either because they didn't have enough crew or they didn't have enough parts. And we set out to do something about that.

Now, we've been accused of spending too much on military and cutting social reform programs too much, and I know which side Pete's opponent would come down on on that, and I know where Pete would come down from his experience as a legislator.

I think it should be recognized that when John F. Kennedy was President, only 27 percent of his budget went for the social reforms to help the needy and the helpless in this country, and 46 percent went for defense. In our budget for 1983, about 53 percent of our budget is going for the needy and the helpless, and only 29 percent is going for defense. And yet, the morale, the esprit de corps, the reenlistments of men in the service -- men and women in the service today, the level, the educational level of the people going into the service making it a career, is something we haven't seen in a great many years. And I just have to tell you one of my favorite little stories about that.

I just thought you'd like to know about the attitude of those who are guarding our shores, because they are the real freedom fighters. It is by doing their job and doing it right that they can be a deterrent to war. And our goal is peace. And you've never gone into a war because you were too strong; you go into them when the other fellow thinks you aren't strong. And we're going to continue.

And we're going to keep the country turned around on this new course until we have reduced the percentage of gross national product that is being taken by the Government and being spent by the Government until once again Government is back spending within its means. And then my dream is that day we make the first payment, I don't care what size it is, on the national debt to prove to our kids that we're not going to dump it all on them.

In 1981, U.S. commercial and government-owned spacecraft brought important rewards from space. Particularly notable were Voyager 2, which sent closeup photographs of the Saturn planetary system, and new Explorer satellites that studied the sun's interactions with Earth's environment. Communications and weather satellites, both civil and military, furnished improved, ever-expanding daily service.

The reusable Space Shuttle Columbia made its maiden spaceflight in 1981, opening a new era that will enable the nation to take full advantage of the ultimate frontier of space. With the fourth and final orbital test flight now completed, the next flights of Columbia and its sister ships will provide routine operational access to space for scientific exploration, commercial use for economic benefits, national security tasks, and the welfare of mankind.

Congress has supported our request to send a strong signal to organizations such as UNESCO that our government will not accept efforts, whether by international organizations or otherwise, to restrict and weaken democracy in this world by restraining freedom of expression and free speech.

S. 1193 also enacts into law the Foreign Missions Act, which provides authority to regulate the activities of foreign missions in our country in order to promote reciprocity in our diplomatic relationships and to protect our national security.

I am particularly concerned, however, about the provision that would require obligations for exchanges of persons programs of the United States Information Agency to be doubled in terms of constant dollars between 1982 and 1986, regardless of the amount of total appropriations available to the Agency in those years. While I share the Congress' view that exchanges contribute importantly to our national security, I believe such earmarking of future funds, especially in a period of budgetary restraint, is inappropriate. This requirement could have the detrimental effect of significantly reducing other activities of the Agency such as the Voice of America, publications, and information centers, thereby weakening the Agency's other important activities that further our national security. I must note, therefore, that given the overall availability of resources, the administration will most likely have to seek adjustments to this unduly restrictive provision.

United States consulates abroad. Following a lengthy review, the Department of State closed the seven consulates in question because the services they provided were disproportionately small in relation to the costs of maintaining them. The enrolled bill, however, would require the State Department to operate and maintain these consulates and preclude the opening of any new U.S. consulates until the seven are reopened.

Under the Constitution, the President has the power to appoint consuls as well as ambassadors and other public ministers. Implicit in this authority is the right to decide when and where an ambassador or consul should be appointed. Accordingly, I believe that Congress cannot mandate the establishment of consular relations at a time and place unacceptable to the President. In recognition of this constitutional prerogative of the President, I shall therefore regard section 103 as a recommendation and not a requirement.

The President. Well, I'm delighted to be here. And I was waiting kind of anxiously to hear -- I know that I'm here for all of you who've done the work of making that September 9th event successful -- and I was beginning to wonder who he was going to get for the September 9th event. [Laughter] And he got the right person.

You know, if I could, let me just say a few words. You can't have held that job in Sacramento for this great State, so unique in all of the country and all of the world, without having a lifetime feeling of proprietorship for it. And I've looked in the years since and seen some of the things that have happened in Sacramento. The rhetoric was never matched by deeds on the part of the one who had taken that office -- and couldn't help but have a great feeling of concern. And now with this election, my heart is filled with the greatest hope, because I know this man -- served when he was in the legislature and then when he was attorney general.

He knows the problems of the State. He has proven his capacity for dealing with them. And now from the vantage point that I look from, it is doubly important with regard to California, because I went to Washington with a dream, and the dream -- and we're going to make it come true -- was one of restoring the 10th article of the Constitution, of the Bill of Rights, that article that says that the Federal Government shall do only those things specifically called for in the Constitution and that all others shall remain with the States or with the people.

And we have drifted a long way in the last few decades from that concept of a federation of sovereign States. That was our great strength and the basis of our freedom. And my dream is that through a program we've called federalism, we are going to make that happen, and we're going to return to the States and to the local communities and to the counties those powers that rightly belong there, along with the revenue sources to fund them. We're not just going to dump them on the local taxpayers. The Federal Government, in usurping the powers and authorities of those other levels of government, has distorted the very structure of this nation and has also usurped the tax sources that properly belonged at the State and local level.

Now, if we're going to do that -- and I think it must be in your mind -- it must be awfully important who is here at this end then to organize, to manage those programs that for so long have simply been functions now and then delegated in part by the Federal Government.

There has been a philosophy abroad in the land that the States should be reduced to administrative districts of the Federal Government. Well, don't you let that happen. This country will remain strong so long as it is a federation of sovereign States. It's unique in all the world in that respect.

And this is the man that I believe has the capacity to handle those enlarged responsibilities. And therefore he's the man that should be in Sacramento as Governor of this State. And when he has to cross the State line -- the constitution still says that you're no longer Governor until you come back -- and then Carol Halett will be there with him, and she'll be able to hold the fort while he's across the State line.

For about 7 of the 8 years I had a hostile legislature. The opposing party had a majority in both houses. Now, maybe many of you haven't thought about this, but in the structure of government the party that has the greatest number of members of the assembly and of the senate in each case has the majority of each committee and names the chairmen of those committees. Well, one year, due to some special elections, we wound up with a bare majority in both houses. And that year, now that we had the majority in the committees and the chairmen of the committees, out of one committee that was literally a burial ground for good legislation came 41 anticrime pieces of legislation. Almost all of them, if not all, were authored by this man.

They had been buried in that committee as long as the other fellows were in charge, and they came out of that committee to the floor, and then once out on the floor even the other side that had bottled them up in committee -- where they could be kind of anonymous in doing it -- didn't have the nerve to vote against them. And in that 1 year we passed 41 pieces of anticrime legislation.

And the polls that not too long ago said that inflation was the number-one problem -- they don't say that anymore, because inflation for the last 7 months has been running at 5.4 percent, not 12.4 percent. I just wanted to get in that lick because -- [laughter] -- because I also wanted to emphasize that now, near the top if not the top of many polls, the problem on people's minds is crime. And I think the moment has come when a man with the experience, George Deukmejian, should be the Governor of the State of California.

But maybe some of you have said to yourself, if he ever came back out here, and I had a chance, I would like to say to him, or I would like to ask him -- and couldn't we for just a few minutes at least have -- I know we haven't got much time. But could we have a little dialog? And, if there's someone that has thought that, sing out. And we'll try to have some dialog here.

You know, every once in a while, these people who have come here from someplace else -- we need to talk to them to get reinspired as we see through their eyes what it is we really have, and what we, too often, take for granted here.

Q. I heard Elizabeth Dole [Assistant to the President for Public Liaison] speak the other day and was extremely impressed with her as a representative of yours. Do you plan to appoint a lot more women like that?

It might interest you to know that at this point, only a year and a half into office, we've appointed more women in top positions in government than anyone at that stage of their tenure has ever done. And we're going to continue doing that. And she is doing a magnificent job there.

Q. Mr. President, the Falklands crisis caused some bad feeling toward the United States, of course, the way it turned out. And, later, the Argentine people, I think, found out that they were slightly misled by their own government. But what can we do now to, sort of, make our neighbors to the south a little bit happier with us and all, as you did start out before you were even into the White House, with Mexico?

The President. Well, this was something that was very much on my mind, and I have long thought that our country, well-intentioned many times, but never quite succeeded in approaching our neighbors to the south and bringing these two continents together. And I have -- that, too, has been a dream, that when you look at these two continents, more than 600 million people, the richest two continents in natural resources and thousands and thousands of square miles that have never even been developed yet, all of us came here with the same dream -- came from someplace else, our ancestors or ourselves, in search of freedom. And what I've dreamed of is an accord between the Americas, where we could be friends. And we started out.

And I think that we established with our nearest neighbor, Mexico -- and I met with the President of Mexico prior to taking office, after I'd been elected -- I think we have a better relationship and a better bond than we've had. And we're continuing with that.

Caribbean Initiative. Now, this is aimed at some of the countries in Central America and then those island nations out in the Caribbean. And it is a program to help them develop their own economies, to help them become self-sufficient and so forth. And I know that our neighbors to the south are looking at that as a sign of our intentions and to see whether we can bring it off. So, our first goal is going to be to resolve that.

But I do intend and we intend to pursue this program of bringing the Americas together. Can you imagine what that would look like throughout the world: North and South America allied together in the cause of freedom and individual liberty and free enterprise? And that's what we're aiming at. And I think there are some signs that the temporary bitterness has receded.

The President. The enterprise zone -- again, this is another thing that's in committee and that we're trying to get out -- the enterprise zone is a plan not only for the major cities but for rural areas as well. We want to start it on an experimental basis of about 75 to begin with, and that is using tax incentives from the Federal to the local level as a lure to -- in the run-down areas, the centers of poverty and so forth, we can persuade businesses and industries to start up because of tax breaks that will be given; hire the people in those areas who will also receive tax breaks -- because they're presently not paying taxes; the bulk of them are on the various help programs of government -- and develop those inner cities to provide jobs in those pockets of great unemployment.

And this plan would not be one that would have a great cost, because, first of all, the local community isn't getting property taxes from those run-down areas. They've taken over most of the land in those areas now in default of taxes. The businesses that would come in would be entitled to a break in that regard while they established a business, and the people who would then become employed are presently not paying taxes -- they are a cost to the government. And so all of these could be the incentives that would bring private enterprise in to refurbish these particular areas in our country.

The Federal budget is out of control because of a number of programs and, again, passed with the best of intention, the programs to help people who require government help. But they were passed, and fixed in them was the trigger that automatically increased them in cost. And this is what's uncontrollable. And so, you come into office, and the budgets have been proposed for a few years ahead, just as we have to when we submit this last budget bill -- suggest where they're going. But automatically those programs increase.

So, we passed last year in our big economic recovery program -- we passed enough cuts to reduce spending by $130 billion over 3 years. The present program that we passed last week with the tax so-called increase but I call ``tax reform'' in it -- that over a 3-year period will reduce the spending by $280 billion over the next 3 years. And yet all of that is in the increase of spending.

Now we -- and by ``we,'' I mean myself and the legislature -- must deal with this problem of what are called the entitlement programs, to find and get a control on those programs to lessen that automatic increase in spending.

Now, with this last program that we passed -- and you know there was great controversy about it and some of us who were alined spiritually found ourselves on different sides. The plain truth was that when we set out to get the second year's installment of budget cuts, we found this time we could not do it unless we agreed to some revenue measures.

Now, we passed the greatest tax cut in history last year to be phased in over a period of more than 3 years. You got the first installment 10 months ago, the second installment a month ago, the 1st of July -- third installment will come next July. And then there will be the indexing that follows that where we will index the tax brackets so that you won't get pushed into higher brackets just by way of inflation. And it is still, in spite of what we did, the biggest single tax cut in history, because in spite of the tax bill that was passed last week, with the additional cuts, the tax cuts over the next 3 years for all of you will amount to $335 billion, in spite of the $99 billion that was in this tax bill.

But in talking to Congressmen about that -- and I have put it in writing -- when they or if -- and there will be attempts to bust the budget, to send down budget-busting bills -- and I sit with pen in hand waiting to veto and have pledged in writing I will veto budget-busting bills. And George knows I've had a little experience. As Governor in those 8 years, I vetoed 943 bills in the 8 years, and none of those 943 were overridden in the legislature. So, I've only had a chance to do this a couple of times in Washington.

The President. The immigration bill that is -- and well, how do I say this -- because this bill was passed. I don't know exactly what I should say, except that it was passed with the intention that we had lost control of our borders, all of them, and that we had to restore the ability to determine immigration to our country here.

We realized, also, that there were many people here who had come a long time ago, and who literally think of themselves as belonging in this country. And that's why the provisions are in there to grant them the right to stay -- permanent residency on the basis of the length of time that they've been here.

Whether we have plugged all the holes or not, I don't know. Whether we have met some of the needs of our neighbors, I don't know. But I know it's a problem that we had to move on to find a solution. And that was evidenced in the last great invasion of people that were not just political refugees but people that just wanted to live in the United States. And we do have an immigration system and quotas and so forth. And this is trying to regain control of our own borders.

But now to get back to the business at hand -- and then I must leave here -- once again, and I mean this seriously, I've known this man, worked with him as a legislator and all those things -- and the welfare reform and everything that we did in California -- know him and you know him and his record as an attorney general. And I don't mean this in any disparaging way about his opponent, but the government of the city of Los Angeles does not allow the mayor to be an executive in the sense that a Governor of the State is. We have a city council form of government.

This plan has been accepted by the Government of Israel. The Palestine Liberation Organization has informed the Government of Lebanon that it also has accepted the plan. A key element of this plan is the need for a multinational force, including a United States component, to assist the Government of Lebanon in carrying out its responsibilities concerning the withdrawal of these personnel under safe and orderly conditions. This will facilitate the restoration of Lebanese Government sovereignty and authority over the Beirut area.

In response to the formal request of the Government of Lebanon, and in view of the requirement for such a force in order to secure the acceptance by concerned parties of the departure plan, I have authorized the Armed Forces of the United States to participate on a limited and temporary basis. In accordance with my desire that the Congress be fully informed on this matter, and consistent with the War Powers Resolution, I am hereby providing a report on the deployment and mission of these members of the United States Armed Forces.

On August 21, in accordance with the departure plan, approximately 350 French military personnel -- the advance elements of the multinational force -- were deployed in Beirut together with elements of the Lebanese Armed Forces, and the departure of Palestinian personnel began.

Under our agreement with the Government of Lebanon, these U.S. military personnel will assist the Government of Lebanon in carrying out its responsibilities concerning the withdrawal of Palestinian personnel under safe and orderly conditions. The presence of our forces will in this way facilitate the restoration of Lebanese Government sovereignty and authority in the Beirut area. Our forces will operate in close coordination with the Lebanese Armed Forces, which will have 2500 - 3500 personnel assigned to this operation, as well as with a total of approximately 800 French and 400 Italian military personnel in the multinational force. Transportation of the personnel departing is being carried out by commercial air and sea transport, and by land.

Our agreement with the Government of Lebanon expressly rules out any combat responsibilities for the U.S. forces. All armed elements in the area have given assurances that they will take no action to interfere with the implementation of the departure plan or the activities of the multinational force. (The departure has been underway for some days now, and thus far these assurances have been fulfilled.) Finally, the departure plan makes it clear that in the event of a breakdown in its implementation, the multinational force will be withdrawn. Although we cannot rule out isolated acts of violence, all appropriate precautions have thus been taken to assure the safety of U.S. military personnel during their brief assignment to Lebanon.

This deployment of the United States Armed Forces to Lebanon is being undertaken pursuant to the President's constitutional authority with respect to the conduct of foreign relations and as Commander-in-Chief of the United States Armed Forces.

I also believe that progress on the Lebanon problem will contribute to an atmosphere in the region necessary for progress towards the establishment of a comprehensive peace in the region under Camp David, based firmly on U.N. Security Council Resolutions 242 and 338.

You are about to embark on a mission of great importance to our Nation and the free world. The conditions under which you carry out your vital assignment are, I know, demanding and potentially dangerous. You are tasked to be once again what Marines have been for more than 200 years -- peacemakers.

Federal statutory pay systems to achieve comparability with private sector pay for the same levels of work. Using the calculation methods developed in the past, my pay advisers have indicated that an average 18.47 percent increase would be required to achieve comparability as that concept is presently defined.

The Comparability Act gives me authority to propose an alternative adjustment in lieu of comparability, if such action is appropriate because of economic conditions. Under that authority, in accordance with our economic recovery program, I am submitting to the Congress an Alternative Plan for a 4 percent increase in Federal white collar pay this October in lieu of the 18.47 percent increase indicated under current comparability calculation methods.

Current law governing military pay increases provides that the annual increase in military pay be the same as the average Federal white collar increase. However, Congress is currently considering legislation dealing with military pay increases. If legislation is enacted, it will supersede the increase that military personnel would otherwise receive under this Alternative Plan.

Footnote: Note. -- Notwithstanding the salary rates shown, the maximum rate of basic pay legally payable to employees under this schedule may not exceed the rate payable for level V of the Executive Schedule, currently $57,500.

The Council will also work on the appointment of women and the development of policy and programs by regularly bringing women's concerns to the attention of the President and appropriate offices within the executive branch.

Dee Ann Jepsen as Special Assistant to the President for Public Liaison, with responsibility for women's organizations. Mrs. Jepsen is a founder of CREED, a nonprofit organization which has been highly successful in bringing about the release of dissidents behind the Iron Curtain through public and political pressure, and a member of the President's Task Force on Private Sector Initiatives. Her husband is Roger W. Jepsen, U.S. Senator from Iowa. She is former manager of his Senate office.

A week ago, the Congress passed important legislation to reduce deficits through tax reform. I worked hard to help win that passage -- and at the same time stressed that if we are to keep deficits down we must also keep Federal spending down. We can only do this if the Congress resists the temptation to slide back into old spendthrift habits. I will use every means in my power, including the veto, to prevent that from happening.

I do not take this step lightly. Delay in the adoption of this legislation poses serious problems for the Department of Defense and other Federal agencies in meeting prior commitments, including payroll, that are funded by this bill. In addition, the bill contains funds for important new programs, such as the Caribbean Basin Initiative, for which funds are needed prior to the beginning of the next fiscal year.

Increases in domestic spending include $367 million in funding for items contained in the urgent supplemental I vetoed in June that were subsequently deleted from the urgent supplemental bill I signed in July. Also restored is $892 million in funding that was cut by the Congress last fall. This simply is not tolerable in the face of triple-digit deficits, and I cannot endorse these unwarranted spending increases.

For these reasons, I am returning H.R. 6863 without approval. I urge the Congress to enact immediately a 1982 supplemental appropriations bill that does not contain excessive and unwarranted spending increases for domestic programs and that provides an acceptable balance of supplemental funding for those programs requiring additional money in fiscal year 1982.

Basin Initiative. This funding is designed to resolve an unprecedented economic crisis that affects a strategic region located at our doorstep. I hope the Congress will review and modify country funding levels to bring them closer in line with the Administration's original request. The Congress has also provided $50 million for special Lebanon emergency relief. This humanitarian assistance is essential for thousands of Lebanese civilians requiring aid. The funds provided for security assistance, while less than I requested, will help demonstrate that countries in pivotal regions of the world can count on American support when they need it. I strongly urge the Congress to continue to include these essential programs as they work on an acceptable alternative.

To bring the sustained recovery we all want we must not only rewrite this measure; we must also press forward in an all-out attack on wasteful and unnecessary spending. I look forward to prompt Congressional action on a revised bill that will assure continuity in the operations of Federal agencies and be consistent with continued progress toward economic recovery.

Trademark Office for fiscal years 1983 - 1985. Throughout our nation's history, the patent system has played a critically important role in stimulating technological advances. This legislation will make it possible for the Patent and Trademark Office to improve its operations and thus revitalize its traditional role of encouraging technical innovation.

This measure reflects the policy of this administration that those who benefit most directly from services should pay their fair share for them. For years the Patent and Trademark Office has not had the resources to carry out its mission properly or to modernize its operations. Now that this legislation is in place, most users will pay the actual cost of processing patents and trademarks.

We neither want nor expect the increased user fees to discourage the ingenuity and creativity of individual inventors. Many of our most important inventions have come from individuals working alone. Accordingly, the bill provides that independent and small business inventors, as well as nonprofit corporations, will pay only 50 percent of the actual patent processing costs.

A major deterrent to using the patent system, especially by small businesses and independent inventors, is the inordinately high cost of patent litigation. This bill authorizes voluntary arbitration of patent validity and infringement disputes. This will not only improve the patent system and encourage innovation but will help relieve the burden on the Federal courts.

Development of new technology is a vital ingredient in my administration's plan for economic recovery. This measure is a significant step in this process. At the same time, it symbolizes our commitment to making the Federal Government more effective and efficient. It is an excellent example of how the Federal Government can provide better service at less cost to the taxpayers, and I commend the Congress for enacting this important measure.

Just 12 days ago, I went on television to ask your support for a bipartisan tax reform and spending reduction bill. As you'll recall, I told you I had to swallow hard to support that bill myself. I didn't like the idea of revenue increases and still don't. But to get the spending cuts which I think most of us want and which we must have to reduce deficits, keep interest rates going down, and get the unemployed back to work, we had to accept the increased revenues. But I argued then and I repeat now: Most of the revenue part of that bill was not really a tax increase at all, but a reform of existing tax laws.

The tax cut passed last year remains the biggest tax cut in history. Even with the $99 billion increase, the tax cut over the next 3 years will amount to $335 billion. The savings to the average American family this year is $400; next year it will be $788. Even more important, however, we'll reduce the deficits over these next 3 years by $378.5 billion. If we stay on course and work together, we can look to a day when we can start reducing that trillion-dollar debt. And I think you like that ``working together'' idea.

I received a letter just the other day from a lady in Florida. I hope she won't mind if I share it with you. Patricia Morgan writes that she sees unity among us again, the kind of unity we had during World War II -- we Americans, all pulling together. That's what America is. That is our power.

The other day, the Security Savings and Loan of Milwaukee, Wisconsin, made $100 million available for home mortgages at 11.9 percent interest. And we've just seen a week-long breaking of virtually every record on Wall Street for trade in stocks and bonds.

No, we're not out of the woods yet. But we can maintain this momentum, reopen factory gates, rebuild America, and make this country number one again -- not overnight, of course, but slowly, surely, we can do it. It all hinges on one question: Do we as a nation have the unshakable determination to get Federal spending under control once and for all? With 20 unbalanced budgets in the last 21 years, the burden of proof is on us.

It is now up to the House leadership to make sure the full House votes on this issue as soon as possible in this session of the Congress. If not, you, the voters, will have an opportunity in November to make your feelings heard about that.

On the subject of spending, though, I can't wait until November. A few days ago a supplemental appropriations bill to fund several programs and agencies for the rest of this fiscal year was sent to me for signature or veto. The legislation contained funding to meet payrolls of the Department of Defense and other Federal agencies. It also included a vital new program we've sought that is essential to our hemispheric solidarity and security -- the Caribbean Basin Initiative. But it also contained funding for several things I've vetoed already as being unnecessary and was almost a billion dollars over budget for domestic programs.

We've gone on record as committed to reduce projected deficits by $380 billion over the next 3 years. I believe that commitment begins with holding the line on a budget that has little more than a month to run. So even though it means delay in getting legislation I believe is vital to our nation's welfare, I have therefore vetoed that supplemental appropriations bill.

We have seen a reaffirmation of Israel's desire to move ahead with the peace process on the basis of Camp David. We continue to have consultations with both Israel and Egypt in an effort to decide how to proceed in our common effort to resolve the Palestinian problem in all of its aspects.

The U.S. -- this administration, as its predecessors -- is committed to the territorial integrity and sovereignty of Jordan and our support for its enduring character. We do not agree that Jordan is a Palestinian state.

The gift of the schooner ``Ernestina,'' restored so carefully by your Government and the ship's many friends, is deeply appreciated. Its presence in New England will be a reminder of the seafaring traditions and special ties that our peoples share.

On behalf of my fellow Americans, to whom you have so thoughtfully given the ``Ernestina,'' let me thank you for an enduring symbol of private endeavor and of effective cooperation between our governments.

Note: The Ernestina, which carried thousands of Cape Verdians to the United States as immigrants in the early part of this century, was purchased and rehabilitated by the Cape Verde Government with help from private U.S. citizens of Cape Verde descent. It was being sailed to Providence, R.I., and New Bedford, Mass., for presentation to the United States.

And now, I didn't remember enough whether the figures are going to be correct that I'm giving, but I understand that you have some 30,000 lawyers and 300 law firms contributing toward the $10\1/2\ million raised for your Second Century Fund. These contributions are the centerpiece of the ABA's public service work for America: hundreds of programs addressing public concerns ranging from child abuse to the problems of the elderly, from government waste to the high cost of justice, from juvenile crime to the energy challenge. We need your idealism and compassion in our families, neighborhoods, businesses, and government. We need you to carry on this fine tradition of public service.

Much like Sam Johnson said about the man to be hanged, it concentrates my mind -- [laughter] -- to stand before so many of America's finest attorneys. I'm reminded of a challenge that one of America's foremost lawyers had to face. I'm speaking about Abraham Lincoln. As a young lawyer, he once had to plead two cases in the same day before the same judge. Both involved the same principle of law. But in one Lincoln appeared for the defendant and in the other for the plaintiff.

American dream for every man, woman, and child in this land. And, make no mistake, we can preserve it, and we will. That promise was not created by America. It was given to America as a gift from a loving God -- a gift proudly recognized by the language of liberty in the world's greatest charters of freedom, our Declaration of Independence, the Constitution, and the Bill of Rights.

Constitution that ``they had solved with astonishing and unexampled success two problems which had hitherto baffled the capacity of the most enlightened nations: they had contrived a system of Federal Government which . . . increased the National power, and yet respected local liberties and authorities; they had founded it on the principle of equality, without surrendering the securities for property and freedom.'' Well, here, for the first time in the history of the world was a system in which man would not be beholden to government; government would be beholden to man.

The promise of America, the character of our people, the thrust of our history, and the challenge of our future all point toward a higher mission: to build together a society of opportunity, a society that rewards excellence, bound by a body of laws nourished with the spirit of faith, equity, responsibility, and compassion. The streets of America would not be paved with gold; they would be paved with opportunity. Success would depend upon personal initiative and merit.

Through the years, this promise was made real, thanks to the hard work, the dedication, and commitment to freedom of the American people. Our commitment to freedom has meant commitment to the rule of law, and commitment to the law has created opportunity: for example, historic legislation like the Homestead Act; passage of the 14th amendment to strengthen the guarantee of civil rights for every citizen, regardless of race, creed, or color; and, more recently, Brown vs. Board of Education, which emphatically decreed that race can never be used to deny any person equal educational opportunity. No future will outshine ours if we hold tight to the torch of freedom, if we remain true to the rule of law, and if we meet the challenge of providing opportunity to all our people.

One of my dreams is to help Americans rise above pessimism by renewing their belief in themselves. And I'm glad to say we are seeing a renewal of confidence in America. We're determined to build an agenda for opportunity on three pillars: excellence, equality, and growth -- economic growth.

God-given talents will take them. For every legal and economic action we consider, I ask: Will this serve to liberate and empower the individual; will it encourage us to reach for the stars, or will it weaken us and drag us down into submission and dependence?

Law is the handmaiden of liberty, essential to preserving order in freedom. And we cannot have order unless people are certain of their full scope of their rights and legal protections. Vague or excessive laws, or inconsistent judicial decisions, threaten our freedom. As organizers, negotiators, and protectors of our civil liberties, your role is crucial. You can help us correct laws which are barriers to opportunity. You can insist on fairness and consistency in the administration of justice. You can help us create America's agenda for opportunity.

We believe that agenda begins with a search for excellence -- men and women of excellence -- to serve as leaders of our government. It's people, after all, who must operate a government that is based upon law.

With your counsel, we've sought judicial nominees who support the limited policymaking role for the Federal courts envisioned by the Constitution. The Founding Fathers did not want our judiciary system to be first among equals. They wanted it to be one of three coequal branches of government.

We aim for a cross section of appointments that fully reflects the rich diversity and talent of our people. But we do not and will never select individuals just because they are men or women, whites or blacks, Jews, Catholics, or whatever. I don't look at people as members of groups; I look at them as individuals and as Americans. I believe you rob people of their dignity and confidence when you impose quotas. The implicit but false message of quotas is that some people can't make it under the same rules that apply to everyone else.

When an opening appeared on this nation's highest court, I selected the person I believed the most outstanding candidate. I'm proud that for the first time in our history, a woman, named Sandra Day O'Connor, now sits on the Supreme Court of the United States. But I'm proudest of this appointment not because Justice O'Connor is a woman, but because she is so well qualified.

We're committed to appointing outstanding blacks, Hispanics, and women to judicial and top-level policymaking positions in our administration. Three women are members of my Cabinet, more than ever before in history. In our first 2 years, we appointed more women to top-policy posts than any administration before us. And I think that's a pretty good start.

Abram, John Bunzel, Robert Destro, and our nominee for Staff Director, Linda Chavez. They are people of distinction and integrity -- all Democrats -- whose talent, independence, and commitment to civil rights are beyond question. They are champions of opportunity. But these fine Americans are under fire. My nominating them supposedly compromises the independence of the Commission. Well, forgive me, but that's hogwash.

National Committee, met regularly with the Staff Director of the Civil Rights Commission to plan strategy. Presidents Johnson and Carter also sought to appoint individuals who reflected their ideas on how to achieve our common goal of civil rights for all Americans. So, isn't it strange that we never heard in the past this charge about compromising the independence of the Commission?

The plain truth is, our nominees are independent, independent from every voice but their own conscience. They don't worship at the altar of forced busing and mandatory quotas. They don't believe you can remedy past discrimination by mandating new discrimination. They are committed activists for genuine civil and human rights, wise and courageous citizens. And I think they deserve your strong support.

If excellence is one pillar of the agenda for opportunity, equality is another, and it's just as important -- equality of rights, treatment, and protection under the law. We want every American to participate fully in society on the basis of individual merit, regardless of race, sex, or national origin. I reaffirm today our unshakable commitment to eliminate discrimination against blacks, women, the handicapped, and other minorities. And let me add, this is not just our legal commitment; it is also our moral commitment.

Racial violence and other criminal violations of civil rights laws are among the most heinous intrusions upon individual liberty. We do not shy from prosecution or punishment. The Department of Justice has filed more than a hundred new cases charging criminal violations of civil rights laws. We have tried 80 cases. That's not just a respectable number; it's substantially more than any prior administration during a comparable period.

In a democracy, there is no greater expression of equal opportunity than the right to vote. And I am proud to have supported and signed into law the longest extension ever of the Voting Rights Act. Under this administration, the Department of Justice has reviewed approximately 25,000 proposed electoral changes under the Voting Rights Act. They have objected to 165 on the grounds of racial discrimination. The Department has been active in litigation, participating in a total of 52 cases, 25 of which were initiated under this administration.

We're also committed to eliminating all traces of discrimination in the law against women. At the same time, we're doing our best to restore respect for the family and the homemakers who do so much to hold our society together.

Take a look at America, 1983. Things are changing -- and for the better. The income tax marriage penalty has been greatly reduced; the maximum child care tax credit for working mothers has been increased -- almost doubled; we've eliminated the estate tax for surviving spouses. We've authorized larger I.R.A. contributions for working women. We're strengthening child support enforcement to make absent fathers meet their obligations; and we've moved in the courts to remedy inequities in pensions. As I've mentioned, we've appointed more women to top policy posts than any administration before us. And we've increased the purchasing power of all Americans by knocking down inflation.

Those who specialize in partisan rhetoric and the politics of accusation may close their eyes to progress, but Americans are fairminded. They don't look at the world with blinders. If given the facts, I'm confident they'll agree that much has and is being done to assure that every woman has an equal opportunity to achieve the American dream.

All these reforms are important. We're committed to them and to doing more. But we need another reform, assurance that the American people can walk the streets and sleep in their homes without being afraid. The rule of law represents the civil discourse of a free people. Crime is the uncivilized shout that threatens to drown out and ultimately silence the language of liberty. I believe the scales of criminal justice have tilted too far toward protecting criminals. And more must be done to protect the rights of law-abiding citizens.

Crime is an issue of social justice. Its elimination is essential to full freedom and opportunity for all Americans. To cite just one example, in 1980, blacks were victimized by crimes against persons at a 25-percent higher rate than whites. So, we've introduced the Comprehensive Crime Control Act of 1983 -- to deny bail to a defendant posing a threat to the community; to make prison sentencing more certain; to end abuses of parole; and to modify the exclusionary rule, so that evidence obtained in good faith can be used in a criminal trial.

We're also carrying out many enforcement initiatives. We now have law enforcement coordinating committees in over 90 judicial districts. Last Thursday, I had the honor of appointing a commission to conduct a region-by-region analysis of organized crime infiltration -- a commission headed by one of the most distinguished members of your profession, Judge Irving R. Kaufman.

South Florida Task Force, which stemmed the heavy flow of drugs into Florida. They're working on 260 cases. We think it's time, also, to crack down on the peddlers of filth and smut. The Justice Department has a program to do this, and we've notified U.S. attorneys that enforcement of pornography laws is a prime concern.

As attorneys you understand the importance of evidence and experience. Oliver Wendell Holmes said a page of history is worth of volume of logic. If we look at recent history, I believe one conclusion is inescapable: No overall improvement occurred in reducing poverty in America during the very period when government spending in the name of the poor was exploding. The decline in the percentage of people in poverty began leveling off in the late sixties, reversing almost two decades of dramatic improvement. Then, and even worse, between 1971 and 1980, the percentage of American households dependent on welfare rose by 20 percent.

This tragedy was accompanied by the increasing breakdown of families. Nearly half of all poor families in 1980 were headed by women, and the number of single teenage mothers is estimated to have grown by 50 percent in the decade of the seventies. The dramatic increase in dependence was clearly associated with a change in the nature of public assistance. The emphasis shifted from F. D. R.'s model of direct payments to the needy. We began supporting a growing army of professionals. I don't question their good intentions, but their economic self-interest lay in extending dependency, not in ending it. And that's exactly what happened. Eligibility standards were also relaxed, and the tradition that public assistance should be shunned was replaced with an income transfer ethic.

Encouraging dependency had a clear impact on reducing economic growth. Irresponsible spending added to the ranks of poverty by generating higher inflation. This triggered a sharp increase in the tax burden, destroying incentives for savings and investment, crippling real earnings. The Joint Economic Committee estimated the drop in productivity growth in the 1970's cost the average household nearly $3,000 in income. America wasn't going forward. We were going backward. Let us have the courage to speak the truth: Policies that increase dependency and break up families are not progressive; they're reactionary, even though they are invariably promoted, passed, and carried out in the name of fairness, generosity, and compassion.

Poverty is far from solved. Problems which had been neglected for more than a decade were made worse by the recent recession. But the conditions for meaningful and lasting improvement are clearly being established. Spending growth has been cut. Public assistance is being retargeted to the truly needy. And over 85 percent of those who have left the welfare rolls have not returned.

The United States is leading the world into economic recovery with strong growth and low inflation. The experts said it couldn't be done. Who will benefit most from an inflation rate below 3 percent -- it's been 2.6 percent for the last 12 months, the lowest rate in more than 15 years -- and a growth rate which approached 9 percent in the second quarter? Well, the answer is those with the lowest incomes. Inflation hurts them most, and our success against inflation will help them most. And let's remember, when the economy was strong and healthy during the fifties and sixties, poverty rapidly declined.

In the name of fairness, let's stop trying to plunder family budgets with higher taxes, and start controlling the real problem -- Federal spending. In the name of growth, let's stop talking about billions for more dependency and start creating enterprise zones and new incentives for opportunity -- so we can keep the dream alive for millions of aspiring whites, blacks, and Hispanics. In the name of America, let's stop spreading bondage and start spreading freedom.

Let's remember what we're all about. All of us, as Americans, are joined in a common enterprise to write the story of freedom -- the greatest adventure mankind has ever known, and one we must pass on to our children and our children's children -- remembering that freedom is never more than one generation away from extinction.

Thank you all for coming this afternoon. Seeing you here reminds me that we've put together a team of pros, of top-notch professionals. And your talents and energies are getting the business of government back on track.

We haven't been in Washington a long time, but I think we've accomplished a great deal. Nowhere is this more true than here at home. America's economic pulse is getting stronger and steadier every day.

The prime interest rate is less than half what it was. The GNP is growing faster than most economists dreamed it would. Personal income is up; production is up; factory orders are up; retail sales are up; and, as we've heard once again today, housing sales are still going up. In the months ahead, I think we'll see more evidence and that even that last dragon -- unemployment -- has started to wilt.

I have a story about that. I don't know whether Jimmy Stewart would object to my repeating his remarks when we were campaigning together. And he would introduce me at the various banquets out there on the campaign trail, and every time they'd talk about -- the emcee in introducing him, he would talk about his great stardom in pictures and all. And then each time I would get up and think it was only fair -- apologize to the emcee for correcting him, but say in addition to that -- his war record and that Jimmy Stewart not only flew the Hamburg run, but he's a major general in the Air Corps Reserve. And one time, after several of these situations, the master of ceremonies did refer to his military record and then said ``Brigadier General Jimmy Stewart.'' So, when I got up I apologized to the emcee again and said, ``It's `Major General Jimmy Stewart.''' And I'm thinking about this when I think about saying these things over again.

With the cornerstones of our economic program in place, it's time to shine the limelight on another mammoth challenge that we also undertook in the early days of the administration. Our attack was on waste and fraud in the Federal Government. We came here vowing to rein in the unwieldy Federal bureaucracy and get this government running as honestly and efficiently as any successful American business. We've been making some pretty good progress on that, and I've invited you here today to enlist your further help in expanding our reach and making our improvements permanent.

I'm proud to report that through the strike force efforts of our departmental I.G. offices, 29.3 billion tax dollars have been saved or put to better use so far. The Government has collected $3\1/2\ billion in debts that otherwise wouldn't have been collected. The paperwork burden has been cut by 20 percent. Our plan to reduce nondefense Federal employment is ahead of schedule.

And over at the Pentagon, Cap Weinberger and our service Secretaries along with many others, have identified nearly $16.1 billion in savings or cost avoidances on waste and fraud. And during the next 7 years, multiyear procurement and other acquisition initiatives will save us almost $30 billion.

There's much more that we've done, but there's still much more to do. Another major initiative undertaken by this administration is our Private Sector Survey on Cost Control, which was established a year and a half ago to identify waste and inefficiency in the Federal Government.

But as important as whistleblowers, investigators, and surveyors are, what our government needs most are good managers on the frontline. And that's why I need you. And that's why I'm calling on you -- on all program managers in every agency of the Government -- to find more efficient ways of carrying out their programs.

Last fall, I asked Joe Wright to head up the Reform 88 program. And he's coordinating our effort to achieve lasting savings by changing financial and information management systems in every department and agency. Our management improvement initiatives will expand the goals of our earlier efforts to streamline and reorganize the processes that control the money, information, personnel, and property of the Federal Government. These new initiatives will bring us closer to fulfilling a promise that we made to the American people: to limit government to its proper role and make it the servant, not the master, of the people.

There's not a lot of glory in our task, but I'm determined that, when this administration leaves the stage, the American people will have a Federal Government that operates in a businesslike manner. Now, that means providing high-quality, essential public services as efficiently as possible. And it means that, by reducing the money lost to boondoggles, more money will be available for legitimate government programs. By cutting waste and abuse and through better targeting of aid, we can ensure that those Americans who need and deserve our help can get it.

I know we share the same goals, and that I can continue to depend on you for your help. We have a chance to leave our permanent stamp on the executive branch. Together, we can do it. And if we succeed, we'll leave behind a better government and a better nation.

I am deeply concerned about the extent to which we have a problem that should not exist in this great and wealthy country. That is the problem of hunger. America is literally the breadbasket of the world. We produce and export more food than any other nation. Our farms are the envy of the world.

At the same time, I admit to being perplexed by these accounts because, the fact is, federal law guarantees that every poor person with an income at or below 130% of the poverty level is eligible to receive free food stamps. Additional federal aid includes free school lunches, free school breakfasts; the Women, Infants and Childrens program, and numerous other federal programs. If the poor, who are eligible by law for this help, are not receiving it, then something is wrong.

In addition, our Administration has been distributing free surplus dairy products to the needy, including cheese and butter. Since we began this distribution program in December 1981, the federal government has given away nearly 700 million pounds of dairy products worth more than a billion dollars. If this assistance is not reaching those for whom it is intended, then again something is grievously wrong.

Unfortunately, we in government cannot respond effectively to this problem unless we know the nature of the difficultuies we seek to remedy. It may be that some people are not aware that federal aid is available to them. It may be that these programs are not administered well enough to serve all those who are eligible. Or some people may have just decided not to take advantage of the available aid programs. We simply do not know enough to say.

To ensure that this promise is realized, I have decided to create a Task Force on Food Assistance to examine the extent of America's hunger problem, to determine its causes, and to recommend specific solutions. This Task Force should be composed of leading experts in poverty research, economics and government administration -- men and women from academia, the private sector, and with experience at all levels of government.

I want the Task Force to bring me a no-holds-barred study. If the food assistance programs are being mismanaged, I want to know that. If certain aspects of our food assistance programs require more funding, I want to know that, too.

If even one American child is forced to go to bed hungry at night, or if one senior citizen is denied the dignity of proper nutrition, that is a national tragedy. We are too generous a people to allow this to happen. I hope that the work of this Task Force will help solve the problem of hunger in America once and for all.

But before I say what I came here to say, may I just tell you how very proud all of us in our land are of your president, Maxine Hays, and these 3 years that she has served you and, in serving you, has served the Nation and the world. And she has proven many of the things that most people need to understand about women, because not only is she the very epitome of our free enterprise system as a small businesswoman, as the president of your worldwide organization; but, also, her State of Oregon has chosen her Mother of the Year.

And Murphy's Law was very much in effect yesterday at 1600 Pennsylvania Avenue. So please just know how very sorry we all are. Evidently, it only confirms some of the criticisms I've made over past years about what can happen at certain bureaucratic levels of government.

And let me just say, also, that I believe it's not enough just to say ``I'm sorry,'' so I intend to do penance. And we have been doing a number of things here with regard to the thing of great interest to you, and that is the recognition of women's place. I want you to know I've always recognized it, because I happen to be one who believes if it wasn't for women, us men would still be walking around in skin suits carrying clubs.

But we have been doing a number of things in this administration, and some things that are carrying on where I began as Governor of California. And we now have -- I won't go into great detail; I know that your leadership has been briefed by Faith Whittlesey [Assistant to the President for Public Liaison] of my staff on some of the things that we are doing here to being about more equality -- and I will just mention this one, and this is where I'll do penance. We have, since we've been here, been having our Justice Department comb all the laws and all the regulations -- and they're vast in number -- here at our national level.

And I say this, that perhaps many of you from other lands might, if it is necessary in your land, take this as a suggestion for future activity there. They have been combing them to find any law or regulation in our land that has a vestige of discrimination in it on the basis of sex. And they have just delivered the results of that study. It is a packet of computer readouts about that thick. And we are now combing through this to find out what can we do administratively, simply by Executive order, to eliminate these matters of discrimination that might be embodied in these laws and those that will require legislation, and then to frame the legislation and send it to Congress to have those laws and those regulations changed.

President Reagan. President Mobutu and I have just had a warm and useful discussion. And I am pleased to have been able to meet again with President Mobutu, who's been a faithful friend to the United States for some 20 years. The President and I took this opportunity to review the state of U.S.-Zairian relations, and we found a large area of agreement on the major points we discussed.

I expressed our admiration for President Mobutu's courageous action in sending troops to assist the Government of Chad in its struggle against Libyan-backed rebels. On the home front, the President has informed me of progress on his government's economic stabilization plan. Zaire is taking the difficult but necessary steps to ensure sustained economic progress, and it's important that we and Zaire's other friends do what we can to help.

President Mobutu and I also discussed his country's political situation, and I told him of the positive reaction in the United States to his recent decision to offer amnesty to his political opponents.

This visit has permitted the President and me to reaffirm our common desire for peace and stability in Africa. And I am confident that the close relations between our two countries, based on shared interests and perceptions, will advance the cause of peace and development in Africa.

President Mobutu. I have expressed to President Reagan during our meeting, first of all, my thanks for the wonderful and warm welcome extended to us in the atmosphere of great friendship that we have experienced throughout our stay in Washington.

We surveyed world events. We talked about the economic situation in Zaire, about the program for financial and economic recovery which is being worked out with the IMF. We talked of Chad, of the aggression against that country, a founder of the OAU and a member of the United Nations. We talked also of Namibia, South Africa, and Central America. In brief, we surveyed world events. Some decisions have been made for economic aid to Zaire, and some more decisions will be made in that context.

This nation's greatest competitive advantage in the past were ideas that helped America grow. We need to put the power of ideas to use again, for the good of our future. America needs her best minds to create technologies that will enhance America's economic leadership in the 1980's. To sustain high rates of real economic growth, we must continue to create new ``miracles'' of high technology -- miracles both for innovation and for modernization of the major areas of our economy in manufacturing, agriculture, and services.

The Commission members I am appointing today are distinguished leaders from large and small businesses, from labor, and from academia. They are ideally suited to lead us in a national dialog -- a discussion of the kinds of actions required by the public and private sectors to make U.S. industries more competitive in domestic and foreign markets. The Commission will be chaired by John A. Young, president of the Hewlett-Packard Co.

The increasingly rapid pace of technological advancement assures us that our economy will change constantly in the future. New developments in information processing, biology, and materials science are spawning sunrise industries. They are improving our quality of life and standard of living in ways few could have foreseen. These technologies are transforming all sectors of our economy and even our livestyles. Not only can information processing capabilities improve the way farmers manage their livestock, provide the ``brains'' in a flexible manufacturing system, and keep track of the paper flow in an office; they will also change the way we live.

Now some believe that the Government should try to read these trends to determine which products, services, and industries have a place in our future and which do not. They would have government planners divert resources away from traditional industries and channel them into new fields. But the history of progress in America proves that millions of individuals making decisions in their own legitimate self-interest cannot be outperformed by any bureaucratic planners.

Government's legitimate role is not to dictate detailed plans or solutions to problems for particular companies or industries. No, government serves us best by protecting and maintaining the marketplace, by ensuring that the rules of free and fair trade, both at home and abroad, are properly observed, and by safeguarding the freedoms of individual participants.

In carrying out this role, the Government must maintain fiscal policies which encourage personal initiative, and monetary policies which ensure stable prices. The lasting, noninflationary growth we are now building will facilitate the movement of capital toward promising economic activities.

By establishing this Commission, we reaffirm this administration's commitment to making sure that this government will be a help, not a stumbling block, as U.S. industries compete in domestic and international markets, opening up new opportunities for all Americans.

Interest on the public debt will cost the American taxpayer over $103 billion in fiscal 1984. One of the major efforts initiated by my administration to reduce this drain is the improvement of the Government's cash management. Cash management has become a highly specialized art practiced by most major corporations and small businesses in America. In fact, most individuals have learned to manage their checkbooks to even out the flow of expenses and income. The Federal Government is just beginning to learn this lesson.

Better cash management is one of our key priorities under Reform 88. It also has been highlighted by the President's Private Sector Survey, the Department of the Treasury, and the Office of Management and Budget. The Department of the Treasury fiscal service is spearheading initiatives to speed the collection process, to time our payments properly, and to improve cash processing and financial management practices.

We are currently putting a great deal of effort into this area. From January 1981 to May 1983, the Government realized $4.6 billion in savings, resulting from more efficient cash management practices. This has been accomplished by using modern technology, such as electronic transfer of funds, as well as improved management techniques. Nevertheless, we are only just getting started.

Management and Budget. Potential savings of $5.3 billion in interest expense have been identified by these agencies through fiscal '88, as well as an average annual cash acceleration savings of $4 billion during the same period.

Efficient cash management is not a one-time issue which will fade away. It must be part of a continuous effort to better manage our resources. The active cooperation of every governmental organization is required. Government executives must be made aware of how they can improve cash management practices within their areas of responsibility, supported, if necessary, by developmental training and performance-based incentives. Efficient cash management has to be a joint, cooperative effort to manage better this most critical part of the public trust.

I am therefore today directing you to take advantage of each opportunity to protect our cash resources and to continue to review your cash management programs to ensure they meet that end. You should be prepared to work closely with the Treasury Department and the Office of Management and Budget to implement measurable savings and to give cash management projects a high priority.

Women have every reason to be proud of their contributions to every aspect of our society -- science, space, government, business, medicine, education, health, and the family. And their contributions are growing.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 4th day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Secretary Heckler has called it a growing national disgrace, and I agree completely. A parent's obligation to a child is one which must not be abrogated. And this is not only a financial debt; it's a moral one.

Today, in proclaiming August as Child Support Enforcement Month, I hope to focus the Nation's attention on these children who are at the mercy of thoughtless parents. Let's make it our national goal to achieve 100 percent collection from the absent, neglectful parents.

August will kick off this drive, but let me say slack enforcement of child support payments will never be tolerated. The Federal child support enforcement program itself can stand improvement, and I want to thank Secretary Heckler and the composers of our proposal for their diligent and compassionate work. We must reform the Federal child support enforcement system so that it can effectively serve the cheated children of America. I urge the Congress to pass the legislation that we've introduced. We want parents who are deadbeats to pay up and deliver on their responsibilities. And I hope signing this resolution will draw attention not only to the problem but to the solution.

More than 15 million children are living in families where the father is absent, and nearly one-third of those are living in poverty. More than half the families who should receive court-ordered child support to not receive full payment, thus depriving children of billions of dollars in support each year. In some cases, these unfortunate children are left without the necessities of life.

The American people willingly extend help to children in need, including those whose parents are failing to meet their responsibilities. However, it is our obligation to make every effort to place the financial responsibility where it rightly belongs -- on the parent who has been legally ordered to support his child.

For several years, the Federal government has worked with the States to recover child support payments from non-custodial parents. Collections for these children have improved dramatically in recent years, enabling thousands of families to leave the public assistance rolls. Nonetheless, we must work even harder to ensure that all American children are provided the financial support they deserve and to support enforcement personnel, judicial officials, and the legal community in alleviating this problem.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 5th day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

The President today appointed Larry M. Speakes to be Assistant to the President. Mr. Speakes will be the President's chief spokesman and will continue to serve as Principal Deputy Press Secretary to the President.

Mr. Janka has extensive experience in foreign policy and public affairs, having previously served three Presidents. Since 1978 Mr. Janka has been a consultant and lecturer specializing in Middle Eastern defense and international economic issues. He has been associated with the government relations firm of Neill and Co. in Washington, D.C.

The U.S. has a strong strategic interest in assuring that Qadhafi is not able to upset governments or to intervene militarily in other countries as is currently happening in Chad. Qadhafi has considerable resources, both military and financial, which makes Libya particularly threatening. If Libya or Libyan-supported forces were to gain control of Chad, close U.S. allies such as Egypt and Sudan would be seriously concerned about their own security. Other states in the region would also be deeply worried. It is important to the United States that its allies and friends be able to count upon its assistance to defend themselves against Libyan aggression.

Ladies and gentlemen, welcome to the White House. It's a pleasure for me to have old friends here, and I know there are some new ones, also. I hope they will be friends. I look out and see so many of you, however, who've been with me in campaigns over the past years, and to each and all of you for all you've done, muchas gracias. And for you who played such an important role in getting here, I think at this occasion it's appropriate for me to add, mi casa es su casa.

Unlike the old gentleman I just mentioned, what we suffered didn't result from a natural catastrophe or something beyond our control. It wasn't even the result of bad people doing something out of malice or on purpose. Our economic problems were a predictable result of decades of irresponsible government spending and taxing policies. And with your support, we've changed those taxing and spending patterns. And I'm proud to tell you today, it's working.

And the good news is that jobs spread across the board. The unemployment rate went down in every major category, from every group that you could name, and spread evenly across men and women employees.

You know better than anyone, the unemployment rate for Americans of Hispanic descent has been much higher than the national average -- 14 percent in June. Well, it's still too high, no question about that. But we've got it down to 12.3 percent.

We know that there are places in this country -- and it isn't inclined to any one segment of our society, but due to the kind of employment -- where there are still pockets of great and heavy employment [unemployment], and we know this is particularly true along our Southern border, many communities down there. So, we're going to keep on with what we've been doing until we can eliminate those pockets as well.

We know that our economic policies are working, and they are getting Americans back on the job. It hasn't been easy, but we've laid the foundation for a strong, noninflationary recovery that is benefiting all our people. When we got here, inflation was running at double-digit levels and had been doing so for 2 straight years. It was the first time that we'd had back-to-back, double-digit inflation in 60 years in this country. But we've brought it down to where, for the last 12 months, it's been running at 2.6 percent. That's the lowest 12-month rate in nearly 16 years.

When we got here the prime interest rate had hit 21\1/2\ percent. Carefully and slowly we brought that down to half that amount. And after years of almost no growth and declining real wages, last quarter the annual growth rate hit 8.7 percent, and real wages are on the rise. Productivity is up.

There's one way you can tell our program is beginning to work: They don't call it Reaganomics anymore. [Laughter] Well, we've managed to give the people a tax rate reduction and to start -- because this is a continuing struggle -- to get spending under control. And this is no time to let up.

There are those who constantly are pushing to return to the disastrous taxing and spending patterns of the past, and I hope I can count on you to stand with us to make sure that doesn't happen. We can't let the people forget what it was like just 3 years ago. You can remember: Our people seemed to have lost the optimism that is so characteristic of Americans. Some people were saying America's best days were behind us. Well, together we've turned the situation around and given the American people hope for the first time in years.

And before we have a dialog, instead of me just standing up here making a speech, I'd like to mention one other area which is vital to all of us as Americans. You, as Americans of Hispanic descent, know well that our country had ignored Central and South America for too long. If we're to prevent the people of this important area from falling under the heel of Marxist dictators and spreading instability to our own borders, it's going to take a determined commitment. It'll require economic and military aid and national resolve.

Let there be no question in your minds: We're dealing with an issue that affects our national interests. Moreover, alien philosophies are being forced on countries that are ill-equipped to reject them. And so we're standing by our friends. We're using American economic and security assistance in the best tradition of President Truman to protect the forces for democracy, economic opportunity, and peace against the expansion of communism. The difference is President Truman was helping countries thousands of miles away when he had to do this. We're trying to assist nearby neighbors who are only a few hundred miles away. And if we run away from our responsibilities so close to home, it won't be our grandchildren, but our children, who will pay the price. So, I just hope that I have your support in what we're trying to do. It affects us all.

You, as leaders in the Hispanic community, can serve as a bridge to our understanding our neighbors to the South. I hope to work closely with you on this and on other challenges that we face. My representative, Cathy Villalpando, [Special Assistant to the President for Public Liaison] a young woman from Texas, will be keeping me up to date on your ideas and areas of concern.

We have many fine Americans of Hispanic descent, like Cathy, who are playing major roles in this administration. The number stands at 125 right now. And don't let anyone tell you these people are being brought on board because of their ethnic background. They are hard-working, competent people, first and foremost professionals. And that's why they're in those positions, because they were the best available for the job. So, we may like to point out that Hispanics are playing a significant role -- Hispanics like Joe Salgado, [Associate Director of Presidential Personnel] who comes from California and has been brought to the White House to make personnel decisions -- and we're glad to have them. They're fine individuals.

I'd like to talk to you today about trade -- a powerful force for progress and peace, as you well know. The winds and waters of commerce carry opportunities that help nations grow and bring citizens of the world closer together. Put simply, increased trade spells more jobs, higher earnings, better products, less inflation, and cooperation over confrontation. The freer the flow of world trade, the stronger the tides for economic progress and peace among nations.

I've seen in my lifetime what happens when leaders forget these timeless principles. They seek to protect industries and jobs, but they end up doing the opposite. One economic lesson of the 1930's is protectionism increases international tensions. We bought less from our trading partners, but then they bought less from us. Economic growth dried up. World trade contracted by over 60 percent, and we had the Great Depression. Young Americans soon followed the American flag into World War II.

No one wants to relive that nightmare, and we don't have to. The 1980's can be a time when our economies grow together, and more jobs will be created for all. This was the spirit of the Williamsburg summit in May. The leaders of the industrialized countries pledged to continue working for a more open trading system. But sometimes that's easier said than done.

Take the case of our own economy. Things are looking up for America. Inflation has been knocked down to 2.6 percent. Economic growth in the second quarter reached 8.7 percent, and 1,700,000 Americans have been hired since last December. Yesterday we learned that total unemployment has dropped to 9.3 percent. Nearly 500,000 of our fellow citizens found jobs in July. More Americans are working than any time in this nation's history. This good news restores confidence in our economy and our currency.

Some people dislike our strong dollar and blame it on our interest rates. Well, we do not want disorderly currency markets, and we've intervened to bring back order to otherwise disorderly markets. But let's remember something. Other countries have higher interest rates than we do, yet their currencies have fallen in relation to ours. One good reason is inflation. It's not the interest you earn from holding a currency that matters most; it's the confidence you have that the value of your money won't depreciate from higher inflation.

Winning the war against inflation is probably the best economic legacy we could leave to the next generation. Remember what life was like only a few years ago when the value of the dollar was being talked down and inflation was going through the roof?

But a strong dollar also brings problems. It makes the goods our exporters are trying to sell more expensive. Still, we're tough competitors. Some $200 billion worth of goods were sold by Americans last year. So, do we listen to those who would go back to dead end protectionism and to sabotaging the value of our currency, or do we go forward, keeping our faith in the American people who made this nation the greatest success story the world has ever known?

I believe our challenge is to marshal the power of this country's best minds and create the technology that will restore America's economic leadership. I have appointed a Presidential Commission on Industrial Competitiveness, asking distinguished leaders from business, labor, and academia to advise us on how best to strengthen our ability to compete in world markets.

We believe the U.S. trade position would be strengthened by uniting many of this government's trade responsibilities under one roof, so we proposed legislation to create a department of international trade and industry. We're also taking action to create opportunities for trade.

Since 1981 we've ended the unfair embargo that had been slapped on American farmers. And now we have an agreement that obligates the Soviets to increase their minimum purchase of wheat -- or grain, I should say -- by 50 percent.

This, along with the likelihood of substantial purchases from China, represents a major step forward for our farmers. It symbolizes our determination to help them regain the markets they lost. It also proves that while we oppose Soviet aggression, we seek to promote progress and peace between our peoples.

Initiative. This package of incentives will establish new commercial relationships between the people of the Caribbean and the United States. Stimulating trade will mean new jobs for their citizens as well as ours. It underscores our belief that economic development based on free market principles is the key to helping our neighbors build a future of freedom, democracy, and peace.

Republic of China. No free market currently exists in textiles, and only what is called the multifiber arrangement, signed by 46 countries. We're a party to that arrangement, but China is not, and our bilateral agreement with them expired last December. To prevent a flood of imports from harming our struggling textile industry, we imposed unilateral quotas on China's products.

We faced three options: option 1, end our restrictions on Chinese textiles, which would help our farmers but risk further damage to our textile workers; option 2, cut back Chinese exports even further, which would cost our farmers billions more in lost sales; or option 3, negotiate a tough but fair 5-year agreement with China to permit controlled, moderate growth of Chinese exports.

Our textile producers can be assured there will be no flood of imports, and they can get on with the task of modernizing their industry, which is the best long-term assurance of jobs for our own people. This new agreement will mean more business for our farmers, and it promises China the opportunity to sell its products here. That's important for good relations between our two countries.

Through the resources of a health care system second to none, this Nation strives to protect all of our children from preventable diseases, to encourage behavior that fosters good health, and to treat their episodic illnesses.

Unfortunately, some children are burdened with disabilities and chronic illnesses and need long-term healing and care. Their ability to thrive and to contribute to society depends on their receiving the kinds of treatment and health care that are available in this country as in few other places on earth.

Our task on this Child Health Day, 1983, is to fuse our efforts as parents, volunteers, health professionals, and educators to help all children -- particularly those with special health needs -- take advantage of opportunities that enable them to heal, to grow, and to achieve everything of which they are capable.

I urge all Americans to join me in encouraging good health habits and attitudes in our children and invite all citizens and all agencies and organizations interested in child welfare to unite on Child Health Day with appropriate observances and activities directed toward establishing such practices in the youth of our country.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 8th day of Aug., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

This Administration is committed to helping people help themselves by strengthening private sector initiatives. We have supported the many efforts made by corporations, civic and religious groups, and other voluntary organizations to increase their involvement in meeting the needs of the people in their communities.

I am counting on you to take a personal interest in this year's Campaign, to make a special effort to encourage your employees to achieve greater levels of support than ever before for the programs of the Combined Federal Campaign. This is our chance to serve as an example of American volunteerism and concern.

Each year we have an opportunity to show our concern for those in need through participation in the Combined Federal Campaign. The Campaign combines the annual fund-raising efforts of a number of charitable organizations working in the fields of health and social welfare both in the United States and abroad.

Through voluntary giving, we can provide services and programs for our neighbors and countrymen without making them dependent on government. We can help relieve pain and health problems now and support research to help eliminate them in the future. The Campaign also makes it possible to help the less fortunate in other countries, extending a helping hand to friends around the world.

Libyan-supported insurgents in Chad. As you have been informed, in response to these requests I have directed that various forms of material assistance be provided to the Government of Chad and other friendly governments assisting it in dealing with this Libyan aggression. In further response to the urgent requirements of these governments to counter this aggression, I have now directed the deployment of certain United States aircraft to the region to be available for the purpose of collecting and providing essential information, including surveillance data and early warning. In accordance with my desire that the Congress be kept informed on this matter, and consistent with Section 4 of the War Powers Resolution, I am hereby providing a report on the deployment and mission of these United States Armed Forces.

Chad and other friendly governments assisting it. The mission of the F - 15 aircraft, which are equipped for combat, is to be prepared to provide protection to the other United States aircraft, if necessary.

Armed Forces in the region. They will remain for only a limited period to meet the urgent requirements posed by the present situation. I will keep the Congress informed as to further developments with respect to this situation.

This deployment of the United States Armed Forces is being undertaken pursuant to my constitutional authority with respect to the conduct of foreign relations and as Commander-in-Chief of the United States Armed Forces. I believe that this action will support the objective of helping to preserve the territorial integrity, sovereignty, and political independence of Chad.

Libya's forces are centrally involved in the fighting in Chad. In fact, if it were not for Libya's forces -- both through advisers and combat elements and air power -- there wouldn't be the kind of fighting that we are seeing in Chad.

We consider the situation at Faya Largeau serious and threatening. The Libyan Government seems to be seeking to portray what's happening in Chad as a civil conflict and to portray the Government of Chad as not having legitimacy. The fact of the matter is that the Organization of African Unity has recognized the legitimacy of the Habre government. The most recent OAU statement was one issued in mid-July by the OAU summit bureau calling for an end to foreign interference and appealing for a cease-fire. There is no question in the eyes of the OAU and the majority of African States that Habre's is the legitimate government. Libya would like to have it otherwise. Libya would like to overturn that government and substitute its surrogate as the government of Chad. Were this to happen -- if Qadhafi were able to set up an established government simply by using its overwhelming military might to do so -- that this would have consequences beyond the borders of Chad.

Our view is that we have provided limited materiel support for the Government of Chad. We have done so in the context of other African support for that government and in a far larger French effort. In all of our contacts, we have no information to suggest that in fact France has changed its position on support of Chad. A French statement over the weekend was subsequently clarified in Paris, and we understand the French position to be that they will make appropriate decisions in light of the situation in Chad. We are operating in the context of African and French support for the Government of Chad.

President Diouf is one of Africa's most impressive leaders. He's a peacemaker and problemsolver, whose fine reputation preceded him to Washington. After meeting with him, working with him, and talking to him, I can only say it is a reputation well deserved.

In our conversations this morning and at lunch, we discussed many important international problems, particularly those of Africa, the Third World, and the Middle East. On many of the issues our views converge; on others we've agreed to differ. We've always done so, however, in the spirit of mutual respect and in the context of a valued bilateral relationship. I have formed a high personal regard for President Diouf's wisdom and integrity, and I value both his views and his counsel.

Senegal and the United States are relative rarities in this troubled world, democratic nations living under the rule of law and devoted to human rights, committed to the search for peaceful solutions for international problems. I've assured President Diouf of America's support for him and for Senegal. I've also expressed our admiration for his accomplishments at home and abroad. In the months ahead, I look forward to both building our personal friendship and stengthening the important ties that bind our two peoples, knowing our relationship can only further the cause of world peace.

American Government and the American people for the particularly warm welcome that they have extended to me and to my delegation on this my first official visit to the United States. The fact that my visit coincides, as President Reagan so appropriately recalled, with the centennial of the first American Consulate in Goree bears witness to the longstanding relations of friendship and cooperation between Senegal and the United States, two democratic nations attached to respecting human rights and basic freedoms.

The fruitful meetings we had this morning and during the lunch were the occasion for thoroughgoing exchanges of views on strengthening and furthering our bilateral cooperation. I should like to rejoice here, reflecting upon both its quality and its effectiveness. We also discussed major international issues confronting the world of today in Africa, the Middle East, and the Third World. We are agreed, in the spirit of the relationship based on confidence that has been established between our two countries, to pursue and intensify our consultation in order to find the most effective solutions in the interests of peace and international security.

To that end we rely upon the wisdom of President Reagan, a leader whom we admire for his candor and his pragmatism. He has already proved, by his actions inside the United States as well as outside of the United States, that he is a major statesman, fully consistent with the full measure of the American people. And I should like to avail myself of this opportunity to renew the assurance that we, the people of the Third World, are following with great interest and comprehension the untiring efforts that he is constantly undertaking in order to secure the triumph of the ideals of peace, democracy, and justice in the world.

Mrs. Murdock is a trustee of the Los Angeles County Museum of Art and serves as a member of the acquisitions and exhibitions committee and the budget and finance committee. She is a member of the board of the Music Center Dance Corp. (Joffrey Ballet).

Control and Disarmament Agency (ACDA) and reiterated his determination to pursue effective reductions in nuclear arms. ACDA has key roles in advising the President, the Secretary of State, and the National Security Council on arms control matters and in negotiating arms control agreements with the Soviet Union and other nations. The decisions today follow on the President's announced intentions earlier this year to invigorate the Agency.

These additional resources will be used primarily to strengthen the Agency's support for the negotiations to reduce strategic nuclear arms and intermediate nuclear forces and in the verification area. The resources will also provide the Agency with a modern state-of-the-art secure computing capability.

Praising the work of the Agency, the negotiators, and advisers, the President also announced that he would seek legislation to upgrade the Agency's executive positions. The Deputy Director, the START negotiator, and the INF negotiator would be upgraded to Executive Level III, while the Agency's four Assistant Directors would be upgraded to Executive Level IV. This reflects the important role of the Agency's leadership and negotiators. This change will put them on the same level as their counterparts in other U.S. Government agencies.

When our Founding Fathers boldly declared our independence in 1776, our fledgling Nation began a seven-year struggle for its freedom and survival; at no other time in our history has our security and existance been so severely threatened. Yet we emerged from the Revolutionary War a united and sovereign Nation.

It is only fitting that this Treaty was signed in Paris, the capital of our oldest ally, thereby recognizing the extraordinary role France played in securing the independence of the United States in fulfillment of the obligations it assumed in the Franco-American Alliance of 1778.

Franklin, and John Jay -- carried to Paris the aspirations of a peaceful Nation willing and able to defend its sovereignty. The brave Americans who fought for our Nation's independence ensured that Adams, Franklin, and Jay could negotiate from a position of strength to achieve an agreement with just and equitable provisions. Their efforts gained respect for the United States among nations of Europe and the world -- an achievement considered the greatest triumph in the history of American diplomacy.

Political, cultural, economic, and defense ties between our two nations are firm and lasting. The solidarity we and all our allies demonstrated at the recent Williamsburg Summit is the heritage of the Treaty of Paris and confirms again our Nation's willingness to pursue peaceful relations and our desire to befriend those others who share our commitment to democracy and liberty.

I just attended the first meeting with the Commission chaired by Dr. Kissinger, the Commission on Central America, and have explained to them -- if any explanation was needed -- what it is that we have in mind for that Commission: that I've believed for a long time that this country in the past, even though it has suggested plans for better neighborly relations with the countries in the rest of the Americas, and while the intentions were good, somehow maybe there was an insensitivity about our size and our suggesting something as a plan that everyone should adopt; that I have been looking for a way in which we could get their cooperation, their ideas, and bring all of the nations of the Americas closer together as equal partners and allies; and that this is the kind of long-range plan to bring this about -- to alleviate some of the conditions that have made many of those countries subject to recurring revolutions, because the revolutions have always been -- or for the most part have been revolutions that simply changed one set of rulers for another set of rulers.

And the very fact that we're all Americans from South Pole to North Pole here in these two continents, with a common pioneer heritage, with a common desire for individual freedom, is such that I just hope that we can begin to bring this about and bring together the more than 600 million people in our two continents and the Isthmus, and that their job would be to start with Central America and see how we could have economic and social reforms that would help bring this about.

The President. Well, Helen [Helen Thomas, United Press International], Chad, actually, you might say, is in a sphere of interest of the French. France, because of its historic relationship with that area, has made it plain that they consider this their principal place. We're in consultation with them and we have, in answer to request, provided weapons and some trainers in the use of those weapons.

We are, at the same time now, because of the concern of all the northern African States there, or the central African States about the Libyan intervention -- Qadhafi and his adventuring down there have them all concerned, and for that reason, many of the African States are providing troops. We have volunteered to some of them to aid in the transportation of those troops, but we're not in any way in line for participating militarily other than that.

The President. Well, it's a very volatile situation, and I don't know that I could -- I'm not going to hazard a guess. But Chad looks so small on the map when you see it pictured so often there. We forget the size of Africa, because if Chad is superimposed on a map of the United States, you find that it's a country that extends virtually from the Mexican to the Canadian border and is a few States wide when it's looked at in that way.

So, Faya Largeau is a city, of course, but it's our understanding, as well as we can get information out of there, that the Habre forces have been withdrawn, that they came out not dispersed or captured or overrun. But again, I have to caution you that any reports we're getting -- there are conflicting reports of all kinds coming from there.

But, no, I don't think that this is such a key spot that this marks the imminent end of the war. The reason I gave you the geographical description is that's a long way from the capital, N'Djamena, where the French paratroop forces have gone in and things of that kind.

The President. As I've said before, it's not our primary sphere of influence; it is that of France. We remain in constant consultation with them, but I don't see any situation that would call for military intervention by the United States there.

The President. There is, as you know, a clearance that has to be done for everyone that is appointed to any group of that kind or to any position. And pending such a clearance, which is going on, why, I'm not going to comment about any. I think it is a fine Commission and represents a variety of viewpoints, and I hope that it will be passed intact.

The President. I have to tell you that I'm not aware of what their plans might be or what it is that they're prepared to do. I know they have introduced ground forces in there, but I'm just not privy to their military planning, and I think that's explainable. I think that they know that the more something is talked about, the more chance there is of leaks, and the leaks in this case could benefit the wrong people.

The President. Well, as I say, I don't know what their plans are. Frankly, we had believed at first that there was going to be some aerial activity there. Now, I don't know whether they're negotiating at the same time with Libya or not. But I know that we had thought that because part of Libya's forces, and key forces in their first advance, not only have been motorized troops on the ground but have been aerial attacks.

Q. To follow up, sir, why are we so concerned about that part of the world? If it is the French sphere of influence, what is it about Qadhafi and perhaps the Sudan or Egypt, why is this an American concern?

The President. Well, I think the whole attitude of Qadhafi and his empire-building is of concern to anyone, but the main concern is to the surrounding African States. They are all very much alarmed and disturbed because they believe that Qadhafi is intent on adventuring far beyond his own borders, and they believe that they're all under a threat.

The President. Well, I think what he was pointing out is that in training the military and in planning your own security, you have to consider what are all of the contingencies that could require, for our security, some action by us. And then this is why you have war games in various parts of the world and joint training exercises.

And what he was pointing out, I think, was that today, unlike a previous day when weapons weren't quite of the kind they are now -- the world has grown more interdependent -- that at one time, and within my lifetime, our principal protection was shore batteries of artillery along our coasts. And I think he was pointing out that our military requirements are different. And in considering the possible contingencies and where we would feel that our security was actually involved is so much more widespread than it has ever been, that our peacetime forces, yes, if they had to be called into action -- but I think, also, that's considering that they could be called into action in all those places at once.

North Africa. We have a military training mission going on with Egypt. And we have a show of military force in Latin America. And there's an impression now that you are responding to troublespots always in a military fashion. Has there been a change in your approach to problems around the world? Is there a shift in our policy?

The President. I don't think so at all. Under a previous President, a few Presidents back, there was an entire division in Lebanon. This was part of our peace program there. They're not there in a combat state; they're there to help while the Libyan Government -- or the Lebanese Government tries to regain control over its own territory. The war games in Egypt that are going on or the practice maneuvers, joint maneuvers, that's an annual thing that we've done for a long time.

Well, we have held joint maneuvers, both naval and on land, repeatedly with our friends and allies here in the Americas. As a matter of fact, many of you have referred to the one in Honduras as the biggest. It's only about half as big as the one we held within the year in Panama, where there were 10,000 troops involved.

The President. No, it is not. It is to recognize that the threats can be that widespread, and the threats to our security, because we know, for example, that a great percentage of the strategic minerals that are needed for our industrial might come from various places in the world. The oil that we import -- we can't stand by and say that we have no consideration of what might happen in closing off the sealanes that are used by the tankers supplying us with the oil that we must import. So, this is all based on what could be, what could involve our own security.

Ownership of one's own business is an aspiration held by many Americans. Minority Americans share fully in this aspiration. The success of minority business enterprise demonstrates that hard work and individual determination can serve as a powerful engine for social mobility and economic progress.

As a Nation, we are indebted to minority entrepreneurs for their contributions to our economic well-being. They bring innovative products and services to the marketplace, create jobs, and provide training to thousands of workers.

In my December 17, 1982, statement, I promised to designate the first full week in October each year to honor the many valuable contributions minority businessmen and businesswomen make to our society.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 11th day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Improvement Program to correct this longstanding problem, I am convinced that more needs to be done. Consequently, I have directed Don Sowle, the Administrator for Federal Procurement Policy in the Office of Management and Budget, to issue a policy directive on noncompetitive procurement to all departments and agencies. That policy directive will establish government-wide restrictions on the use of noncompetitive procurement and will be reflected in the government's procurement regulations. While such congressionally mandated programs as contracting with minority firms and handicapped persons will not be affected, the unwarranted use of noncompetitive practices must and will be curtailed.

The President urged that competitive procurement practices be given preference in agency buying programs. He directed the Administrator for Federal Procurement Policy in the Office of Management and Budget to issue a formal policy directive restricting use of noncompetitive procurement practices. That directive will be issued later this week.

Federal procurement process -- a process which now results in expenditures of over $160 billion annually.'' ``While such congressionally mandated programs as contracting with minority firms and handicapped persons will not be affected, the unwarranted use of noncompetitive practices must and will be curtailed.'' At least a third of all Federal contract dollars are spent without benefit of competition. Under the new policies being proposed, it is estimated that up to $10 billion can be saved annually.

Reform 88 -- a 6-year program to modernize the management practices and administrative systems of government, reducing costs of doing business while maintaining essential public services. Procurement is one of the primary areas targeted for simplification and cost reduction, as reflected in the administration's intention to reduce the number of government procurement regulations by half, through issuance of a single, comprehensive Federal acquisition regulation, expected to be issued next month.

Just a few months ago, there was legitimate alarm that the Railroad Pension System would soon run out of money. Without legislative action, rail industry pensions would have been reduced by 40 percent beginning this October. In addition, a second crisis has arisen. The Railroad Unemployment and Sickness Insurance System was so insolvent that the interest on its debt to the Rail Pension Fund would exceed its income. It was time to act and act in a spirit of bipartisan cooperation.

This bill will prevent the drastic rail pension reductions that would otherwise have been necessary to save the system from insolvency. According to the Railroad Retirement Board's actuary, it'll assure the solvency of the Railroad Pension System, at least until the end of the decade. This will be accomplished through real contributions and sacrifices on the part of all parties involved and through Federal participation.

In February, railroad labor and management requested financing changes that provided a sound starting point for designing a solution to the problem. The process of negotiation and compromise needed to devise legislation that would be acceptable to all parties involved railroad employees, railroad management, railroad retirees, and the American taxpayer, and it was long and arduous.

Broyhill, Senator Hatch, and others joined the administration in pointing to the need for further improvements to make the bill fair and equitable to all involved. The Ways and Means Committee recognized the need for additional rail-sector contributions and for measures to address the Rail Unemployment and Sickness Program funding crisis. With the strong leadership of Chairman Rostenkowski, subcommittee chairmen Pickle and Ford, and the active cooperation of Representative Florio, major improvements were made in the bill. Without their important work and Senator Dole's prompt action in the Senate, we wouldn't be signing this bill today.

None of us would pretend that this bill is perfect. It is a compromise, a reconciliation of differences with a common concern for the need to assure timely payment of full rail pensions to 1 million railroad retirees, the majority of whom are elderly. But given the need for prompt action, it is acceptable to the administration.

In the interest of all railroad retirees, I want to thank the people who played such an important role in the development of the legislation. There are so many people who deserve credit for this effort -- the members of the Energy and Commerce Committee, the Ways and Means Committee, the Senate Finance Committee, the Labor and Human Resources Committee; and the leadership of the Senate and the House and railroad labor and management were all instrumental. As was the case with the Social Security Commission, the spirit of bipartisanship displayed by all who were involved was the key to developing an acceptable solution.

I have today signed H.R. 1646, which will prevent drastic railroad pension reductions that would otherwise have been necessary to save the system from insolvency. According to the Railroad Retirement Board's actuary, this bill will assure the solvency of the railroad pension system at least until the end of the decade.

In signing this bill, I wish to note that section 416 of the bill requires the Board concurrently to submit to the Congress any ``budgetary estimate, budget request, supplemental budget estimate, or other budget information, legislative recommendation, prepared testimony for congressional hearings, or comment on legislation'' whenever it transmits such information to the President or the Office of Management and Budget. The section also specifically prohibits any agency of the United States from requiring the Board to submit this material to any officer or agency of the United States for approval or review prior to transmission to the Congress.

The Attorney General has advised me that such concurrent reporting provisions raise serious issues with respect to the separation of powers under the United States Constitution. Such a provision would be an impermissible violation of the constitutionally required separation of powers if applied to a purely executive agency. However, because it applies to the Railroad Retirement Board, which is an independent agency with quasi-judicial functions, the constitutional issues are less formidable.

Hispanic Chamber have been a tremendous source of advice and inspiration to me. So let me begin by saying to you, Hector, and to all of you for what you stand and for what you've done, ``Muchas gracias.'' I can't do too much more in your language -- [laughter] -- than that.

But you business men and women of Hispanic descent, you stand for much more than efficiency. I feel very much at home with you. There are people in this blessed land who feel that expressions of love for country and family are old-fashioned. They squirm and get uneasy when we talk about pride in neighborhood and work or speak of religious values. There are people like that. But you know something? You won't find them in the United States Hispanic Chamber of Commerce.

Twenty-five years ago, as a struggling immigrant, he dug potatoes for 80 cents an hour. Today, he owns a piece of the dream. In fact, he owns several businesses, including a successful tile distribution company.

And then there is Lourdes Miranda, born in Puerto Rico, into a family in which neither parent had a formal education. Yet, with persistence and uncompromising desire for excellence, she went to college and then on to doctoral studies at the University of Madrid. She is now president of a highly successful media consulting firm in Bethesda, Maryland.

Caldera, a veteran, who later earned his G.E.D. degree. He went on to be an electronic technician and an engineer. And with money he saved and with help from a minority loan program during the Nixon administration, he started AMEX Systems, a company specializing in the development and manufacture of electronic equipment. And today, his company does more than support his family; his company supports 700 employees and earns some $62 million a year in sales.

These few that I've mentioned and others of you right in this room offer us a vision of progress and hope. You prove that with freedom of enterprise comes values that make America more than a rich country -- they make us a good country.

Nor has Lourdes Miranda's success dampened her concern for others. Her company provides specialized training for young Hispanic women. Last year she helped train 40 women to qualify for job opportunities in today's market.

In a fine example of a private sector initiative, Manuel Caldera's company contributes $500 a month to an orphanage in Tijuana, Mexico. And each year, he personally gives to Whittier College for scholarships that enable students of Hispanic descent to study science and engineering.

These are not unusual stories. They are, instead examples of a byproduct of freedom that is always present but often unnoticed -- respect and concern for others. Business men and women realize that success depends on fulfilling the needs of others and doing it courteously and efficiently. And by doing for others, you are also achieving for yourself.

This system of ours has produced the most material abundance, the greatest freedom, and the most compassionate country in the history of mankind. Our people came here from every corner of the world, from every ethnic background, and every race and religion seeking freedom and opportunity. Our history isn't perfect, but we can be proud of our country. And Americans of Hispanic descent can be particularly proud of the contributions they have made and are making to the well-being of this nation.

Today it's my special honor to present your award to the Hispanic business man and woman of the year. So, if Hector will join me, I'd like to ask -- I would like to ask Manuel Caldera, but I can't; his plane was delayed and so, instead, Sergio Banuelos is going to accept in his behalf -- and ask Lourdes to stand up here with us and receive these awards.

The President. You know, maybe I've told this to some of you before, but this whole matter of language difficulties -- some years ago when I was Governor, I was speaking in Mexico City. And I sat down to rather unenthusiastic and not very impressive applause, and I was a little embarrassed. Then a gentleman -- it was worse when a gentleman followed me and started speaking in Spanish -- which I didn't understand -- but he was being applauded about every paragraph. So to hide my embarrassment, I started clapping before everyone else and longer than anyone else until our Ambassador leaned over to me and said, ``I wouldn't do that if I were you.

Three years ago the ominous signs were everywhere. The world seemed to be counting us out, saying America's best days were past. Even our leaders were throwing up their hands, suggesting we were in a malaise, was the word they used, and our problems were unsolvable.

Well, it's taken patience and hard work. Entrenched policies were squeezing the life out of our economy, and basic change was essential. But I'm pleased to report to you today, America has made a new beginning. This great nation is moving forward again, and we're not turning back.

When we got to Washington 2\1/2\ years ago inflation was running at double-digit levels and had been doing so for 2 straight years -- the worst performance in 60 years. Well, we've knocked that inflation from double digits down to 2.6 percent for the last 12 months, the lowest it has been for 12 months in 16 years. And for all their talk about compassion, those who call themselves liberal gave us a terrible inflation that would have devastated millions had we permitted it to continue.

We are launched into a solid recovery. Just before I took office, the prime rate hit 21\1/2\ percent, and there were loud cries for a quick fix. Well, we didn't heed the hysteria. We followed common sense. Today the prime interest rate stands at 11 percent. There will be slight fluctuations like we experienced this week, but if the Congress acts responsibly with regard to spending, interest rates will come down more.

Average working people were being taxed at rates that were once reserved for the wealthy, only a short time before. In these last few years, we have cut personal income tax rates by 25 percent, and soon they will be indexed so that the Federal Government will never again profit from inflation at your expense.

The cumulative effect of our efforts is just now being felt, and the signs are good. Consumer spending is up. Productivity is up. Industrial production, retail sales, auto sales, housing and construction are all up since the beginning of the year. Last quarter, the economy grew by 8.7 percent, a much bigger jump than any of us had expected or predicted.

One of the last indicators to turn around is unemployment. I feel deeply about the suffering of the unemployed, and don't let anyone tell you differently. I went through looking for a job in the Great Depression of the thirties. Do you think that going back to the policies that dragged our economy down and set fire to inflation will really help the unemployed? Or would you agree that the best way to help all Americans is to continue the reforms that have brought down inflation, interest rates, taxes, and that last month gave us the biggest monthly drop in unemployment in almost 24 years?

In these 2\1/2\ years, we have fundamentally changed the direction of government in America. We were headed toward ever-increasing government control, toward a society where power and decisions would be controlled not by you the people, but by a faceless central authority. Permit me to ask you one more question. Is that the America you want to live in and leave to your children? Or do we want to live in a society where all people have the right to make decisions for themselves?

Here again, the Hispanic Chamber is playing a significant role. You have provided a valuable resource to your community, bridging the gap between major corporations and government, making certain that your enterprises and business people have the technical assistance and the contracts they need to compete. In only 5 years, the number of Hispanic-owned firms has jumped 65 percent to some 363,000 businesses, generating about $18 billion in sales per year.

My administration remains firm in its commitment to expanding minority-owned business. And through the strong efforts of the Small Business Administration, which has as its Deputy Administrator, Eddie Herrera, and through our commitment to minority procurement, we've put our money where our mouth is.

If we can prevent our country from being drawn back to the policies of tax, spend, and inflate -- policies that knocked the wind out of our economy in the first place -- we'll be on our way to a new era of growth and expansion that will better the life of every American. With the energy and enthusiasm I sense in this room, I predict Americans of Hispanic descent will be leading the way.

What we are struggling to build, however, is much more than a society of wealth. You need only to look around the world to see the relationship between economic freedom and political and social freedom. Nations with government-controlled economies usually have government-controlled speech, religion, and press, as well. Some of you here know that from personal experience.

And of course, some people believe that governments should dominate human action and that individuals must live like sheep. Such people don't believe in the political and social freedoms that we hold dear. They are contemptuous of the worship of God. That philosophy is alien to this hemisphere and has brought deprivation and tyranny wherever it's gained a foothold.

No better example exists than Cuba. Under Castro's rule, Cuba has become the economic basket case of the hemisphere. The Cuban Government sells its young men as Soviet cannon fodder in exchange for a massive subsidy without which it couldn't survive. The Cuban people have been betrayed. They have neither freedom nor material goods. The only things abundant there today are slogans, weapons, repression, and shortages. Food and the necessities of life are severely rationed.

Communist country. Jamaica flirted with radical socialism, and it turned a tranquil, peace-loving country with great economic potential into a bitterly divided, impoverished society. It's a tribute to the freedom-loving Jamaicans that they withstood the totalitarian temptation and are now rebuilding their country's prosperity with the tools of freedom and democracy.

Today, our nation is confronted with a challenge of supreme importance. A faraway totalitarian power has set its sights on our friends and neighbors in Central America and the Caribbean. If we don't meet our responsibilities there, we'll pay dearly for it.

The security aspect of this challenge must be addressed. Those who suggest otherwise are courting disaster. So, we're helping our friends to defend themselves, and we will continue to help them, showing them we'll stand by them in their hour of need.

But let's get one thing straight. Those who claim our support is only of a military nature are building a huge strawman. Security assistance is not the essence of our approach to Central America and the Caribbean. I don't know how many times it must be repeated before the message gets through: Three out of every four dollars we send to the region are in the form of economic aid. From the early days of this administration, we've been promoting democracy, dialog, and economic progress in Central America and the Caribbean.

Prime Minister Seaga. He was anxious to build his economy and, together, we worked out a program to encourage private sector investment. By turning his country away from socialism, Prime Minister Seaga has ended 7 years of economic decline that plagued his people. One hundred sixty-two new investments have been made to date, providing the potential for thousands of new jobs.

Our Caribbean Basin Initiative is designed to bring the power of private enterprise -- America's most potent weapon -- to help build Central America and the Caribbean. I was finally able to sign this important legislation just 1 week ago, after too long a wait.

Our AID [Agency for International Development] program continues to do some great work in developing the potential of the region's private sector. In Honduras, a team of private sector experts sent by AID helped that country reorganize its forest management, permitting it to protect its resources while reaping the benefits of valuable timberland. I had the honor of personally handing the report of the task force to President Suazo of Honduras.

In Jamaica, AID helped finance an aquaculture project that when fully implemented will provide a new cash crop from fish ponds, just as it's providing loans, capital, to numerous small business enterprises in other developing Latin American countries.

Similar efforts are being made in El Salvador, where AID-financed technical assistance is helping tens of thousands of new landowners under the agrarian reform program to learn how to manage their land and increase their income.

I'm also aware of what the Hispanic Chamber is doing to strengthen our ties with your business counterparts to the South. I applaud you for your international trade conference, held in Guadalajara, and the initiative that you are demonstrating in the Western Hemispheric Congress of Latin Chambers of Commerce and Industry.

But much more of this information should be given to the American public. We're in the midst of a long overdue awakening. The time has come when all us in the Americas, in the Western Hemisphere, can and must recognize our common bonds. Most of us are descended from pioneers, people with the courage to leave the familiar and start again in a new world. We came here in search of a dream, looking for freedom and a better life. We worship the same God. From the tip of Tierra del Fuego to the north slopes of Alaska, we are all Americans, a new breed of people.

I have a vision of a united hemisphere, united not by the arbitrary bonds of state but by the voluntary bonds of free ideals. Today you, our citizens of Hispanic descent, can be a bridge to our neighbors in the south. We have much to do together as Americans and as citizens of the hemisphere. And with God's help, there is nothing that we cannot accomplish.

Hotel. The convention and International Business Exchange was attended by approximately 5,000 representatives from government, the corporate sector, and the Hispanic business community in the United States, Mexico, and other Latin American countries.

H.R. 3564 directs the Secretary of Agriculture to announce the 1984 and 1985 feed grain programs no later than September 30 of the preceding year and to announce the 1985 wheat program no later than July 1, 1984. Current law sets November 15 as the announcement date for feed grains; the wheat program announcement date in current law is August 15. Thus, in each case the announcements would have to be made approximately six weeks earlier than the current law now requires.

The main purpose of acreage adjustment programs is to assist producers in adjusting supplies to meet demand. When projecting the supply/demand situation for the next crop year, it is essential to have the best possible information about the current crop year, while giving due consideration to producers' planning needs. Sound estimates of production as well as timely announcements are a vital component for designing successful programs. Good program design ultimately serves the best interests of producers, consumers, and taxpayers.

The Administration is sympathetic to the need for making acreage adjustment program announcements as early as possible. When conditions warrant, the Secretary of Agriculture will continue the ongoing practice of announcing commodity programs before the statutory deadlines.

This flexibility will enable the Secretary to respond quickly to unforeseen circumstances, such as drought or early frost. Without this flexibility, the mandate in H.R. 3564 could either exacerbate a surplus supply situation and needlessly increase budget outlays by substantial amounts or unnecessarily create a grain shortage and cause food prices to increase sharply.

One thing especially impressed me. The Commission members are all distinguished, well-educated people, but they've made their first task a concentrated study of Central America. Professor Kissinger has promised to make their learning program a tough one. I mention this because the polls say many Americans are confused about what we're supporting in Central America and about why that region, so close to home and to our strategic trading arteries, is important to us.

We have learned from history. Years of poverty and injustice in Central America are a root cause of the violence. That's why our economic assistance there is greater, three times greater than our military aid.

We are on the side of peaceful, democratic change in Central America, and our actions prove it daily. But we aren't the only ones interested in Central America. The Soviet Union and Cuba are intervening there, because they believe they can exploit the problems so as to install ruthless Communist dictatorships, such as we see in Cuba.

Costa Rica and Honduras, which are true democracies, and we're helping El Salvador to become one. Only democracy can guarantee that a government will not turn against its own people, because in a democracy, people are the masters of government, not the servants.

You can't instantly erase something that's been going on for a century or more. But we deplore even passive acceptance of such actions, and I can assure you great progress is being made. Can anyone really believe that the situation would improve if our influence for moderation were removed?

Commitment to human rights means working at problems, not walking away from them. And there are many brave Central Americans who, at great personal risk, are working to end these abuses. President Magana of El Salvador is such a man.

Sandinista government there has treated its own citizens and neighbors. The Sandinistas were not elected. They seized power through a revolution that, true enough, overthrew a dictatorship, but then the Sandinistas betrayed their repeated promises of democracy and free elections. They betrayed many who fought beside them in the revolution, and they've set up a Communist dictatorship. Having seized power, the Sandinista bosses revealed they had chosen sides with Cuba and the Soviet Union a long time ago. We did not push them into that camp.

Unfortunately, there have been such distortions about U.S. policy in Central America that the great majority of Americans don't know which side we're on. No wonder a great many sincere people write angrily that we should support regional dialog, emphasize economic assistance, or take any number of other actions, all of which we're already doing and have been doing for more than 2 years.

Government of El Salvador against Communist-backed guerrillas who would take over the country by force. And we oppose the unelected Government of Nicaragua, which supports those guerrillas with weapons and ammunition. Now, that, of course, puts us in sympathy with those Nicaraguans who are trying to restore the democratic promises made during the revolution, the so-called contras.

Our neighbors in the Americas are important to us, and they need our help. We're working hard to provide economic and political support for development so that ballots will replace bullets in that troubled region. That's the reason for the Caribbean Basin Initiative and all our economic assistance. At the same time, we're helping our neighbors create a defensive shield to protect themselves from Communist intervention while they go forward with economic reform. We do this by providing training, assistance, and firm demonstrations of our resolve to deter Communist aggression. And that's the reason for the bipartisan commission, which has now begun its work.

John Tower, is to the concerns of the G.I. Forum. John is easily one of the most experienced and powerful Members of the Senate. He's been a great friend to you. He's one of the major reasons America is moving toward strength and prosperity. And I join you in saluting Senator John Tower today.

For one thing there is the food. You know about my inclinations in this area. After all, we served enchiladas to the Queen of England. And sometimes when a Cabinet meeting starts to drag, I wonder what would happen if the jellybean jar there and the Cabinet table was filled with jalapeno jellybeans. [Laughter] I'm thinking of trying it one of these days.

But I relish every stop we make while we're on the road. But I have to tell you that this gathering today is one I've especially looked forward to. Speaking to the G.I. Forum gives me a chance to do something that not many American Presidents have done: to say something important to all Americans of Hispanic descent, something that should have been said a long time ago.

The G.I. Forum was founded by Hispanic Americans who wore our country's uniform, who fought in our wars, who account for some of the most astonishing acts of valor and personal sacrifice in the great and long history of our nation's Armed Forces. I don't think I have to recount those deeds to you. I know you're proud of them, and I know they are part of the proud heritage that you pass on to your children. And that's why I thought you might like to know about something that happened recently in Washington -- something that says a lot about the courage and contributions of Hispanic Americans to our freedom.

The Pentagon has a wonderful tradition of dedicating their hallways to some of our greatest military figures. Now, like myself, most of you who were in the military probably didn't spend much time in the Pentagon during your careers. But, as President, I've had a chance to see some of the exhibits and memorabilia in those corridors dedicated to great men like Generals MacArthur and Eisenhower.

Every citizen should know Americans of Hispanic descent have an impressively high, if not the highest honor recipient for their representation in the military. There is a permanent exhibit at the Pentagon, not to a single person, but to these 37 men of valor -- names like Lucian Adams, Jose Lopez, Cleto Rodriguez, Rodolfo Hernandez, Joseph Rodriguez, Louis Rocco, and Roy Benavidez. And I'm proud to tell you today that just last week, Secretary Weinberger opened a new exhibit near the Hall of Heroes with a portrait depicting each of these American heroes of Hispanic descent. It is a real crowd-pleaser. I hope many of you have a chance to visit it. But whether you get there or not, remember one thing: That exhibit -- your exhibit -- is an inspiration to all the American people.

The exhibit is only a small sign of what I see when I visit our military installations or ships throughout the world -- Hispanic names and faces everywhere. For me, those names are a sign of all you've given and continue to give to America. America has always been blessed by the diversity of our people and the rich heritages they brought to our shores. But the contribution of Hispanic Americans -- your devotion to country, your belief in the values of family, work, neighborhood, and religion -- these are among our most precious gifts.

Medal of Honor, it is given for service above and beyond the call of duty. But you know better than most that Hispanic Americans have not always been remembered for their service or valor, have not always been treated with the dignity, respect, and fairness they deserve. This was particularly true at the end of World War II, when those who had fought for their country returned home to confront discrimination in education, health care, housing, employment, and other areas. But true to your tradition, you responded with character and courage.

One of your number, Dr. Hector Perez Garcia, a physician and surgeon in Corpus Christi, founded this forum, and under his leadership, veterans gathered to fight for the rights of Americans of Mexican descent. Within a year's time, there were over 100 chapters in Texas alone.

As you fought for your rights everywhere, you helped preserve the dream that began this country: the dream of government that worked for the people, and not the other way around; the dream of equal justice under the law; of the right of every man, woman, and child to enjoy the blessings of liberty, not as a function of their class or background, but only because they bore the simple title -- that proudest of all boasts: ``I am an American.'' Your fight against discrimination was every American's fight. Your efforts made America better for all of us, and today, on behalf of all your countrymen, I thank you for that too.

Dr. Garcia, all of us pay tribute to you today. I speak for everyone here when I say to you, sir -- and I hope I can get this right -- Usted es un gran lider de su pueblo [You are a great leader of your people].

Now, I don't need to tell you the struggle against discrimination is never over, and this administration will stand beside you as you continue the struggle. We have appointed more than 125 Hispanics to key positions in this administration. And our Justice Department is ever alert to safeguard your civil rights and those of all Americans.

Let me just say a word about our excellent relations with the G.I. Forum. They begin with the efforts of one outstanding individual, your chairman, Jose Cano. Now, he and I may not always agree, but we've worked well together to accomplish a great deal and my pledge to him is my pledge to you: You have a friend in Washington. As long as I am there, the Oval Office will be a place of warmth and hospitality for Hispanic Americans.

Ladies and gentlemen, the concern that you've shown for justice for your own people is the best tradition of America. You should be especially proud that even in the seventies, when the demands of special interest politicians were in full cry, you always advanced your own cause within the framework of advancing your country's interest first.

Now, we've just emerged from the era of special interests, a sad time when coalitions were built with an eye toward the next election, not what's good for the country. Some would have us forget what that kind of politics did to us, especially to those at the bottom of the socioeconomic ladder.

It was those Americans -- many of them of Hispanic descent -- who suffered most from the economic mess that was left to us in 1980. It was they who were deprived of the only chance they ever really wanted: the chance to show how far their faith, dreams, and talents could take them in a free society.

Today, many who still practice the politics of the past would take you back to the days of lost opportunities, special interest politics, tax and tax, spend and spend. Well, let me remind you what those days were like. In the 1970's, it was special interest politics that tripled Federal spending and special interest politics that doubled Federal taxes in just 5 years, between 1976 and 1981. All that big spending and taxing drained life and energy from the economy. Opportunities dried up, and lower income Americans found it harder to make ends meet.

Think back to those desperate days when paychecks grew smaller and the grocery bills grew higher and higher. In 1980 we had the worst inflation since the Second World War, the highest prime interest rate -- 21\1/2\ percent -- in more than a century, soaring taxes, and rising unemployment. But what had you heard from those in Washington: that you suffered from a malaise, that it was your fault, that you wanted too much, that you had to give up your hopes and tell your children not to dream as you once dreamed.

The bureaucratic profiteers were in full control. Even as the economy was collapsing around them, they could only come up with more and more schemes to superintend their disasters and run our lives -- even down to restricting credit cards and supervising thermostats.

But there's a strain of pride, independence, and common sense that runs through this country which no fast-talking, chicken-in-every-pot politician has ever really escaped for long. From the very beginning of this country, our people have had an uncanny knack for reminding politicians who's really in charge here, who it is under the American Constitution that has the final say. And so the people spoke. They spoke for the future and their children's future. They spoke for change.

And that's when we went to work, even as the special interest politicians predicted doom and disaster. They said we couldn't do it -- indeed, they fought us all the way -- but we cut the growth in Federal spending by 40 percent. They said we couldn't do it -- they fought us all the way -- but we cut every American's tax rates by 25 percent. They said we couldn't do it -- they fought us all the way -- but we came up with the most important reform of them all. In 1985 your income tax rates will be indexed, so that never again will you be pushed into higher tax brackets just by inflation, by which government profits.

In a little over 2\1/2\ years we've moved from economic disaster to economic growth. Sure we have a long way to go, but look at the results coming in: The prime rate is down by nearly half; inflation is down by 80 percent; the economy grew last quarter at an annual rate of 8.7 percent; purchasing power is going up; and more Americans are now working than ever before in the history of the United States.

But let me touch on one more important area where we're moving forward, trying to make things better. When I visited San Antonio in May I expressed my concern about the impact of the peso devaluation on the people of southern Texas and the border areas of other States. I said this is not just your problem; it's our problem, and we'll meet it together. Well, that's exactly what we're doing.

I designated a southwestern border States working group to study the problems and give me recommendations. They have done that just a few days ago. And I am pleased to announce that today we are ready to move.

We are determined to coordinate every government program we can tap to mitigate economic hardship in your border regions. We will work with your State and local leaders to help stimulate jobs and diversify your economies, and we'll start doing it not next year or next week -- today.

I believe that we're beginning to restore hope and confidence in America. And it doesn't stop with the economy. Remember a few years ago when American prestige seemed to decline with every new crisis, when Soviet intervention on four continents was going unchecked, even unnoticed?

Well, today our defenses are being rebuilt. The Soviet Union's attempts to dominate the world are being checked, and we have begun hard bargaining that can result in realistic and verifiable arms control treaties.

Let me say something here about a foreign policy area I know you have a special interest in. Our policy in Central America can be very simply put and clearly understood: We want to see the peoples of those nations escape the poverty and oppression of their pasts; we want to see them move toward societies where democratic and human rights are protected and where a decent standard of living is assured. We will bend every effort through economic and technical assistance to help them accomplish this goal. But I know that you'll agree with me that they'll never have a chance to build their future of freedom and prosperity if they're surrendered to the tender mercies of Fidel Castro, Colonel Qadhafi, and their superintendents in Moscow. We can't let that happen; we won't let it happen.

Yes, we respect and we honor our national sovereignty and we're loyal, each to our own countries, but where else in the world do you cross a border as you can here into another nation and still be among Americans?

Now, I realize the naysayers and doomcriers are not tripping over each other to give us credit for a stronger foreign policy, updated defenses, or economic recovery, and I can sympathize with them -- just think of all those campaign speeches that would have to be rewritten. The special interest politicians may forget that the record is clear. Because Americans didn't take no for an answer, they believed in their future, rejected counsels of retreat and supported this administration's efforts to get our measures through the Congress, America is growing in pride and strength at home and abroad.

It seems to me that those naysayers have some explaining to do. They are the ones who said we couldn't do it, but we did it. They're the ones who said it wouldn't work, but it's working. And always remember, they are the ones who fought us all the way and are still fighting us today.

The theme of your convention is the Hispanic American renaissance. During your meetings, I hope you'll keep in mind the real message I have goes far beyond the statistics I've recited or the economic growth that we're enjoying. The fundamental question before us today is not just the Hispanic American renaissance; it is our country's renaissance. Do we keep our country upward-bound and on the move again? Or do we go back to big government and economic decline? Will we hold fast to the values of work and family, or will we return to never-ending government intrusions into how we spend our paychecks and how we raise our children?

There isn't time to outline all that we're trying to do to give back to you, the American people, control over your own lives and destinies. Even as we fight to restore prosperity at home and our prestige abroad, we're dealing firmly and imaginatively with the menace of crime and drugs that has cost us so dearly, especially here in Texas. We've expanded the success of the South Florida Task Force by establishing 12 similar task forces throughout the Nation, including one in Houston. That means more than 1,200 new investigators and prosecutors will be cracking down on the drug racketeers.

And we're moving in another area: to end the politicizing of education, bring excellence back to our schools, better opportunity for our schoolchildren, including effective bilingual programs so important for Hispanic children. And I hope you'll join me in persuading the Congress to accede to the overwhelming desire of the American people for a constitutional amendment permitting prayer in our schools.

Here then are the questions before you and before every American in the years ahead: Will we be better off with a future aimed at growth and opportunity, or one bogged down in lowered expectations and economic decline? Will we choose a future with a sparkling economy where young men and women can climb as far as their talents take them, or will Americans of Hispanic descent face a future with more government, more taxes, and more bureaucracy which suffocate enterprise and initiative?

Will we be better off relying on our pride, respect, and accomplishments as a people, or must we sink into dependency through government busing and quotas and all the other elaborate social schemes dreamed up in Washington during the past 40 years?

And what about our national security? Which road will we take there? Will we be better off with a future where America's interests are firmly protected and defended, or will we choose a future where the only clear goal seems to be a deal cut at almost any price with America's adversaries in the world?

Hispanic Americans are at the threshold -- I think you can sense your own power, your ability to influence America in the future. The decisions you make in the next few years will have an enormous impact on our society. As we move toward the 21st century, you'll be increasingly in positions of power, and your fellow citizens will look up to you for leadership and guidance.

I urge you today remain true to the values -- the devotion to God, family, and country -- that have made you the proud people you are today. Hold fast to the dreams you've always had for your children. Reject those who say that your dreams cannot fashion your future, that your destiny is in the hands of unelected bureaucrats and social engineers in Washington. Cherish your dreams, cherish them because they are what brought you or your fathers or their fathers to this country and have contributed so much to America's growth and vitality.

South Pacific, ``but he will give it to you for a piece of colored ribbon.'' You have always understood this better than most. You've known that the values, faith, and dreams of a people mean far more than a thousand promises of an easy life or a comfortable existence. You have reminded us that independence, honor, and devotion to country and family are more than just words. You have stood by those values, you've lived them, and you've been an inspiration to your children and your countrymen.

As I said when I began, I've come here today to thank you for all that. But I came here today, too, to speak of the future and to challenge you to the role that you must play in it. Because the people have spoken for change, America is better off because of that than she was a few years ago. Now it is in your hands to continue that progress -- through this century and the next. Don't let America sink back into the boredom and mediocrity of collectivism, into the politics of envy, protest, and special interests.

Normally such bills passed as a result of enrollment errors are signed as a matter of course. I am taking this unusual action because of the extraordinarily important constitutional principles raised by this particular measure.

Board of Education of the City of Chicago, No. 80C5124 (N.D. Ill.), if the order is upheld on appeal. The case was brought by the United States to desegregate the Chicago school system. The court ordered the United States to provide a minimum of $14.6 million and froze more than $250 million appropriated by Congress for other educational programs in order to meet expenses incurred by the Chicago Board of Education in carrying out its constitutional responsibilities to desegregate its school system. The court enjoined the Department of Education from providing grants to hundreds of other worthy grantees under several programs of national significance, including grants intended to facilitate local desegregation efforts and others intended to follow up on the report of the National Commission on Excellence in Education.

I well understand the reasons motivating the Congress to pass this legislation. Under the order of the court in Chicago, other education programs throughout the country were denied the funding they rightfully expected to receive. The Chicago court's ostensible purpose in issuing this order was to provide a source of funds for the implementation of its decree. Congress hoped by the passage of this legislation to induce the court to release the funds that were impounded by the court. But I believe that the better course is to seek swift reversal of the district court's order.

This veto is not premised on a desire to protect the Federal budget. It is based upon my conviction that the Constitution and its process of separated powers and checks and balances does not permit the judiciary to determine spending priorities or to reallocate funds appropriated by Congress. Those are exclusively the functions of the Legislative and Executive branches, and the use of judicial decrees to assume such power raises problems of profound constitutional significance.

It is my great pleasure to welcome you and the distinguished members of your party to Mexican territory. I am sure that our meeting, although brief, will contribute to the further strengthening of the loyal, dignified, and fruitful friendship of our peoples.

Cortez' Vermillion Sea that dreams of discovering new worlds began to come true, and here today we find the scene of a new search and affirmation, a search for economic and social progress and the assertion of a convinced and unwavering determination to strengthen our territorial integrity, our will to sovereignty, our national identity, and our commitment to the ideals of freedom, development, and justice that define the historical force of the Mexican people.

Mr. President, you have arrived in a Mexico that trusts in the firmness of its destiny, a Mexico shaped by its own effort, a Mexico that has shown its ability to cast seed on fertile soil and to convert adversity into challenge and trust. Our people are proud of their heritage and of what is theirs today. We are committed to their values and to the development of our nation. However, we are not a self-absorbed people, nor are we engrossed in our immediate circumstances.

History and perception open Mexico to the world and thus the solidarity and constructive contact with other peoples and nations. We know that peace and progress are now, more than ever, shared ideals as well as interlinked realities and that their attainment by all can only come from shared and equal effort based on dignified and respectful relations.

The momentum of history cannot in itself remove the obstacles that states encounter in their course. It is men and peoples who through their will and their action determine the outlines of history, hence the unquestionable value of solidarity, sustained international cooperation, of negotiation and understanding as premises for a concord in these times of redefinition and crisis that are threatening plural and peaceful coexistence and the harmonious development of nations.

Today, as never before, whatever happens in any part of the planet affects the peoples of all countries. In the case of Mexico and the United States, our proximity gives rise to many and complex relations. Despite our different viewpoints and interests, the inescapable consequence of our diverse social, economic, and cultural backgrounds, the border itself creates ample opportunities for cooperation and exchange that can benefit our two peoples.

The maturity of a political relationship which bears witness to our intention of achieving coexistence based on respect, dignity, and mutual benefit rises to oppose the many barriers and new problems brought about by the unique development of the two nations and those created by a frankly deteriorating world. The maturity is the reflection of long and consistent efforts and has not been attained without difficulty. At the same time it is the sound foundation of our desire to comprehend, to understand, and to cooperate. We trust that it will continue to permeate the actions of our governments and our societies for the good of equitable, respectful, and productive bilateral relations.

President Reagan, today as you enter Mexico you cross the threshold of Latin America. The border between the United States and Mexico is also the boundary between two different components of our continent and two different expressions of development and culture -- both a national and a regional boundary, its two faces simultaneously express uniqueness and reciprocal influence.

The worlds of North and South America, the industrialized and the developing worlds, are linked today by their complementary potential and their manifold contradictions. In Latin America, the need for social changes is confronted today with the dramatic impacts of a troubled world that limit its long, unsatisfied urge for development, freedom, democracy, and justice.

In the face of social underdevelopment now aggravated by a profound economic crisis and by shows of force which threaten to touch off a conflagration, we must urgently respond with a firm vocation for peace and solidarity by showing respect for the law and for the institutions of the parties involved and by furthering the development and full predominance of a balanced, realistic, and constructive political dialog.

Mr. President, allow me to express my most fervent hope that at the conclusion of our meeting we may look forward for the good of our two great peoples and of the region to an effective contribution toward the achievement of that peace and solidarity so deeply desired in our times.

October in San Diego and Tijuana, President de la Madrid observed that personal and friendly contact encourages a free and open exchange of ideas. That meeting was very constructive, and I look forward to today's discussion.

We are neighbors, and as such, we are concerned for one another. Our sessions today should open new avenues to put that concern to good use. It's my hope that President de la Madrid and I will continue to meet periodically. Our countries share a host of common objectives and hopes.

Last October President de la Madrid and I had the opportunity to get to know each other better and to strengthen the cooperation between our two countries. Today we will be able to build on our relationship and openly discuss our differences as well as our many areas of agreement. I'm sure that our meeting will further strengthen the mutual respect and understanding which is the cornerstone of relations between the United States and Mexico.

I'm delighted to be here in La Paz in Baja California Sur on the Bay of Peace. This is a particularly appropriate place for us to meet as we work to ensure peace in our hemisphere and in other areas of the world. Your cordiality and hospitality, Mr. President, are deeply appreciated.

Mr. President, you and I have spent a good bit of our time this morning discussing the future and how we can make sure that it's good for both our peoples. Relations between our countries are excellent. Last October we got off to a good start when we met in Tijuana and San Diego prior to your inauguration.

Our sessions have given us a further chance to get to know each other as individuals. I can tell you that you are a man whom I respect and admire. It's a pleasure to work with you. I pledge to you, Mr. President, my best efforts to strengthen and broaden our personal and professional relations to the benefit of both our peoples.

Mexico and the United States share a continent together. We share many traditions and values, as well. Coming from one of the Southwestern States, I greatly appreciate the magnitude of our common bonds and of the strong Hispanic traditions that we have -- something of which I've been reminded these past few weeks when I met with various Hispanic groups in the United States.

I do not minimize the differences between our two countries. We have every reason to be proud of the distinct cultural traditions of our two peoples. Yet our differences need never diminish our good will and our respect for one another, because good will and mutual respect always should be the hallmark of relations between the United States and Mexico.

Over the years, our two governments have established a wide spectrum of arrangements concerning science and technology, educational and cultural exchanges, housing and urban development, and coordinated responses to natural disasters.

States and Mexico have established effective mechanisms for an equitable division of the border water resources. The International Boundary and Water Commission has been exceptionally successful in defusing problems and developing equitable solutions to difficulties involving our precious water resources.

In the United States, we're just now emerging from a long period of economic turmoil, and we fully appreciate the tough job you face in restoring economic health. We're impressed with the efforts being taken by you, Mr. President, and the citizens of your country to resolve Mexico's economic problems. As you've said on a number of occasions, the solution to Mexico's economic difficulties will come from Mexico itself. That, clearly, is as it should be, and we applaud your determination.

Our role is to support your efforts as best we can. We appreciate that droughts and other factors during the past 3 years have severely affected agricultural production in Mexico, compounding Mexico's economic problems. Therefore, I have approved the extension this fiscal year of additional commodity credits to help finance the purchase of agricultural commodities in the United States. We hope that these agricultural credits will be useful to Mexico in buying the food it needs without impeding your economic recovery efforts. We also hope to negotiate a further purchase of Mexican petroleum for our Strategic Petroleum Reserve.

Mr. President, we've demonstrated on several occasions that we intend to shape our future as equal partners. I am pleased that our meetings today have been productive and that we've laid the groundwork for future action along these lines.

Despite the current difficulties, Mexico rightly looks to our market as fundamental to the strength and vitality of its own, and I can assure you that we consider Mexico's economic health of great importance to our prosperity and well-being.

We also see investment as an avenue for Mexico to obtain the capital it needs to expand its industry and increase efficiency. I know that you, Mr. President, understand this and are determined to work out arrangements that will attract investors. We agree that the Maquiladora and the Twin Plants program make a contribution to the economies of both our nations by increasing jobs and promoting economic activity, especially at the border.

Much of our discussion today related to the border. We are looking into ways we can work together to foster economic stability and prosperity there. We're also concerned about protecting the environment in the border region, especially with respect to pollution of the air, water, and land.

President de la Madrid, you and I will sign an agreement today which establishes a framework for environmental action in the border region. We expect this agreement to strengthen cooperation between our two countries by addressing serious pollution problems. Our joint International Boundary and Water Commission has discussed the problem of sewage which affects the communities of Tijuana, San Diego, Mexicali, and Calexico, and other locations. We need to solve these problems quickly, as they affect people in both countries. President de la Madrid, I know you and I are both committed to this task.

Finally, Mr. President, we've discussed the situation in Central America and, while we have differences, there are substantial areas of potential cooperation. I continue to believe that a solution to the crisis in Central America must encompass four basic principles: one, establishment and strengthening of democratic institutions in order to resolve political differences within each state; two, respect for nonintervention, including ending support for subversive elements seeking to destabilize other countries; three, removal of the conflict from East-West confrontation through such measures as the verifiable withdrawal of all foreign military and security advisers and a freeze on the acquisition of offensive weapons; and four, cooperation to sustain a level of economic growth that guarantees the basic needs of the people of this area.

The principle of self-determination is as important to citizens of the United States as anyone. Our history proves it. We've fought wars for that very principle. We believe that people should be able to determine their own solutions, and that's why we've responded to calls for help from certain of our Latin American neighbors. We will consider it a beautiful day in the history of that region when all foreign elements, including our own, may be safely withdrawn.

Parties, agree to cooperate in the field of environmental protection in the border area on the basis of equality, reciprocity and mutual benefit. The objectives of the present Agreement are to establish the basis for cooperation between the Parties for the protection, improvement and conservation of the environment and the problems which affect it, as well as to agree on necessary measures to prevent and control pollution in the border area, and to provide the framework for development of a system of notification for emergency situations. Such objectives shall be pursued without prejudice to the cooperation which the Parties may agree to undertake outside the border area.

The Parties undertake, to the fullest extent practical, to adopt the appropriate measures to prevent, reduce and eliminate sources of pollution in their respective territory which affect the border area of the other.

Pursuant to this Agreement, the Parties may conclude specific arrangements for the solution of common problems in the border area, which may be annexed thereto. Similarly, the Parties may also agree upon annexes to this Agreement on technical matters.

For the purposes of this Agreement, it shall be understood that the ``border area'' refers to the area situated 100 kilometers on either side of the inland and maritime boundaries between the Parties.

The Parties agree to coordinate their efforts, in conformity with their own national legislation and existing bilateral agreements to address problems of air, land and water pollution in the border area.

To implement this Agreement, the Parties shall consider and, as appropriate, pursue in a coordinated manner practical, legal, institutional and technical measures for protecting the quality of the environmental in the border area. Forms of cooperation may include: coordination of national programs; scientific and educational exchanges; environmental monitoring; environmental impact assessment; and periodic exchanges of information and data on likely sources of pollution in their respective territory which may produce environmentally polluting incidents, as defined in an annex to this Agreement.

The Parties shall assess, as appropriate, in accordance with their respective national laws, regulations and policies, projects that may have significant impacts on the environment of the border area, so that appropriate measures may be considered to avoid or mitigate adverse environmental effects.

Each Party designates a national coordinator whose principal functions will be to coordinate and monitor implementation of this Agreement, make recommendations to the Parties, and organize the annual meetings referred to in Article 10, and the meetings of the experts referred to in Article 11. Additional responsibilities of the national coordinators may be agreed to in an annex to this Agreement.

Taking into account the subjects to be examined jointly, the national coordinators may invite, as appropriate, representatives of federal, state and municipal governments to participate in the meetings provided for in this Agreement. By mutual agreement they may also invite representatives of international governmental or non-governmental organizations who may be able to contribute some element of expertise on problems to be solved.

The Parties shall hold at a minimum an annual high level meeting to review the manner in which this Agreement is being implemented. These meetings shall take place alternately in the border area of Mexico and the United States of America.

The composition of the delegations which represent each Party, both in these annual meetings as well as in the meetings of experts referred to in Article 11, will be communicated to the other Party through diplomatic channels.

The Parties may, as they deem necessary, convoke meetings of experts for the purposes of coordinating their national programs referred to in Article 6, and of preparing the drafts of the specific arrangements and technical annexes referred to in Article 3.

These meetings of experts may review technical subjects. The opinions of the experts in such meetings shall be communicated by them to the national coordinators, and will serve to advise the Parties on technical matters.

Each Party shall ensure that its national coordinator is informed of activities of its cooperating agencies carried out under this Agreement. Each Party shall also ensure that its national coordinator is informed of the implementation of other agreements concluded between the two Governments concerning matters related to this Agreement. The national coordinators of both Parties will present to the annual meetings a report on the environmental aspects of all joint work conducted under this Agreement and on implementation of other relevant agreements between the Parties, both bilateral and multilateral.

Unless otherwise agreed, each Party shall bear the cost of its participation in the implementation of this Agreement, including the expenses of personnel who participate in any activitiy undertaken on the basis of it.

For the training of personnel, the transfer of equipment and the construction of installations related to the implementation of this Agreement, the Parties may agree on a special modality of financing, taking into account the objectives defined in this Agreement.

In order to undertake the monitoring of polluting activities in the border area, the Parties shall undertake consultations relating to the measurement and analysis of polluting elements in the border area.

All technical information obtained through the implementation of this Agreement will be available to both Parties. Such information may be made available to third parties by the mutual agreement of the Parties to this Agreement.

Nothing in this Agreement shall be construed to prejudice other existing or future agreements concluded between the two Parties, or affect the rights and obligations of the Parties under international agreements to which they are a party.

The present Agreement shall remain in force indefinitely unless one of the Parties notifies the other, through diplomatic channels, of its desire to denounce it, in which case the Agreement will terminate six months after the date of such written notification. Unless otherwise agreed, such termination shall not affect the validity of any arrangements made under this Agreement.

President de la Madrid, this spirit of cooperation and businesslike approach to the issues of concern to us both have been deeply appreciated on our side. We all have an important responsibility, and that is to represent the interest of our peoples as best we can.

As President, I understand the economic challenges that you face. As a matter of fact, they sound very familiar. We've had a little economic trouble ourselves, and I have every confidence that you will succeed.

Last year when I visited South and Central America -- I always have believed, and even more so after that trip, that while we are citizens of our individual countries, and no one would suggest that we in any way forsake the culture, the tradition, the differences that make us different countries, we should also remember that in this most unique double continent, hemisphere that we're in -- no one else in the world could say anything like this -- even when we cross the borders into one another's country, we're still among Americans, from the North Pole to the South Pole.

And I'm more encouraged than I've been in a long time about the fulfillment of that dream in the meetings that we've had, particularly this one, and we're going to have more of them. I also told the President that the only time people get in trouble is when they're talking about each other, not when they're talking to each other. And we're going to on a regular basis continue to talk to each other.

And I'm not going to say any more because I know that I've confused the interpreter very much by not sticking to the script. But, to the President of Mexico, Miguel de la Madrid, to the people of Mexico, and to the friendship between our two peoples.

Arranged at the invitation of President de la Madrid, the current meeting offered both Presidents an opportunity to discuss important bilateral issues of common concern and to strengthen the ties they established during their previous meetings. They discussed economic, trade and financial matters, as well as border issues, narcotics control, immigration, fisheries, ecological and scientific and technical cooperation.

President de la Madrid stated that the economic policies of his administration are aimed at restoring the necessary conditions for rapid, just, balanced and independent national economic development. President Reagan stated that his government recognized Mexico's efforts to adjust and reorder its economy and reaffirmed United States support of and assistance to the Mexican government in its efforts to resolve its current economic problems.

The two heads of state also discussed negotiations on subsidies and countervailing duties and have committed their administrations to resolving these issues as expeditiously as possible. They discussed problems related to tuna fisheries and stated their hope that the issue could be resolved as soon as possible. While expressing understanding of Mexico's needs to resolve its balance of payments problems, President Reagan conveyed his hope that Mexico would soon return to normal trade patterns. On this subject President de la Madrid stated that the dynamics of trade between the two countries would benefit from greater Mexican exports which would generate foreign exchange revenue and thus help to finance the imports needed for the development of Mexico's economy.

In view of the need for continuing discussion of bilateral trade issues, they recognized the useful role played by the Joint Commission on Commerce and Trade, the consultative body established by both governments in strengthening commercial exchange between the two countries.

Both Presidents recognized the importance of trade along the border and agreed to continue efforts directed toward solving the problems being confronted by border communities of both countries. To that end, they considered a proposal to establish a working group for economic and trade matters in the border region within the Binational Commission. They also discussed sanitation problems along the border, a matter which adversely affects citizens of both countries.

The two heads of State gave special attention to cultural exchange as well as scientific and technical cooperation between Mexico and the United States. They agreed on the need to continue the promotion of such exchange and cooperation and strengthening existing programs and mechanisms in these areas.

The Presidents expressed their satisfaction with the excellent results of the campaign carried out by the Mexican Government in cooperation with the Government of the United States to combat illegal drug production and trafficking. They agreed on the need to continue such cooperation for the benefit and the well-being of both their people.

In this same spirit, they decided to intensify cooperation between the two governments with a view to finding more suitable responses to the problems of environmental pollution along the border. They noted that a cooperation agreement was signed today that establishes the framework for bilateral action on pollution of water, air and land.

In the discussion on the situation in Central America the two Presidents agreed on the need to contribute to the restoration of peace and to the prevention of an even greater conflict in the area by promoting fast processes of political dialogue and negotiation. President Reagan reiterated his strong support for the Contadora initiative. President de la Madrid and President Reagan agreed also on the importance of helping Central American countries to settle their conflicts peacefully.

The Presidents furthermore reiterated their strong support of non-intervention and the self-determination of people. Finally the Presidents recognized the necessity for equitable social and economic development in the region.

The Presidents ended their talks fully convinced that strengthening the friendship and cooperation between Mexico and the United States remains a common objective of their governments. They reaffirmed their desire to hold periodic working meetings between themselves and other high officials of their governments.

President Reagan expressed his pleasure and appreciation for the hospitable welcome accorded to him by the Mexican Government and by the authorities of the State of Baja California Sur. He also extended a cordial invitation to President Miguel de la Madrid to visit the United States in the near future.

Yeats said: ``Think where man's glory most begins and ends and say my glory was I had such friends.'' It's great to be among you once again. As you know, someone in my shop originally turned down this invitation without my knowledge. Now it seems there were some logistic problems about flying from the tip of Baja, Mexico, to Louisiana, and then back to California this afternoon. Well, let me say -- and I want them to keep their ears open and hear this -- I would fly halfway around the world for the honor of meeting with the Veterans of Foreign Wars.

Three years ago this week, I stood before your convention and said nothing would mean more to me as President than to live up to your trust. I've tried to maintain the faith that our men and women in uniform must have in their Commander in Chief. The greatest privilege of this office has been to lead those who wear America's uniform.

Three years ago when I spoke to you, I pledged that peace -- a peace in which freedom could flourish and justice could prevail -- would be our highest priority. I also spoke of the need to provide a stronger defense for the American people. At the time, those were words of hope.

I'd like to report to you on the progress we've made in these areas, because there is no more appropriate forum for such a report. No organization has devoted more energy to America's well-being and security than the VFW. Your uniforms may be in mothballs, but your readiness to assist your country is spit and polished.

We began by letting the world know what we stood for once again. Winston Churchill said of his service in World War II, the nation ``had the lion's heart. I had the luck to give the roar.'' Well, America is the lion's heart of democracy. We have an obligation to give that democracy a voice, even an occasional roar.

For too long our nation had been moot to the injustices of totalitarianism. So we began speaking out against chemical warfare; inflicted on the people of Afghanistan and Southeast Asia, against broken treaties, against the denial of human liberties. We began speaking out for freedom and democracy and the values that all of us share in our hearts.

Now some critics said that this was a return to the rhetoric of the past. Well, if that's the case, then Sakharov and Solzhenitsyn and all those who've suffered to speak the truth are my compatriots, and I'm honored to be counted among them. This nation cannot simply ignore the suffering of oppressed peoples and remain true to our basic strengths and principles. We cannot follow a foreign policy based on the self-delusion that problems would not exist if we did not mention them. We cannot abdicate our obligation to speak out for those who cannot speak for themselves.

And, you know, it's amazing. In my meetings with foreign leaders and their ministers, they've told me how good it is to know what the United States stands for once again. They may not always agree with us, but they respect us. And there's a growing recognition abroad that America once again will stand up for her democratic ideals. Our country is the leader of the free world, and today it is providing that leadership.

But our responsibilities are not only moral, they're practical. One of our most crucial national security objectives was to turn America's economic decline around. Yes, that's a national security objective, and it remains a key one. A country that is weak internally cannot meet its obligations externally.

Unemployment is still too high, but it's heading down. Last month's drop was the biggest in 23 years. More Americans are on the job than at any time in the U.S. history. Economists can argue about the semantics -- strong recovery, steady recovery, robust recovery -- but what matters most is that Americans have regained confidence in the economy, and we're going to make sure they keep that confidence.

Well today, America's military is back on its feet and prouder than ever. We're acquiring and keeping very good people. Today, more of our new recruits are high school graduates than ever before in the history of our military. Retention is also way up. So far this year, 70 percent of those we hoped to retain have reenlisted. In 1980 the figure was only 55 percent.

Yes, the hard-hit economy accounted for a portion of these increases, but the economy didn't raise the dignity and morale of our service men and women or restore their pride in military service. I've heard it from generals and I've heard it from privates that morale, discipline, and unit cohesion have all improved dramatically. Once again, it's an honor to wear the uniform, and our service men and women know it. And I hope that makes you as proud as it does me.

New equipment is now entering the inventory, training is way up, maintenance backlogs are being reduced, and combat readiness rates have surged. We've made real progress. And I'm delighted to report it's across the board. America is safer and more secure today than 3 years ago.

There's something I want to get off my chest, and it deals with the headlines about the Pentagon paying $100 for a 4 cent diode or $900 for a plastic cap. Now what is missing or buried in all these stories about waste is that this administration is the one that found these abuses, the abuses that have been going on for years.

It was Cap Weinberger's people -- Defense Department auditors and inspectors -- who ordered the audits in the first place and conducted the investigations. We're the ones who formed a special unit to prosecute Department of Defense fraud cases. And in just an 18-month period, the Department has obtained 650 convictions. And this doesn't count the number of settlements that have been made.

Our task is to sustain our defense effort. Some would have us slow down just when we're about to achieve what our security requires. Remember the 1970's, when there were those who argued that we should forgo a wide range of modern weapons systems -- airplanes, missiles, a variety of equipment -- because there was something better on the drawing boards for the future? Well, look where that got us. It got us where we were 3 years ago. You can't protect America and her people with drawing boards.

But drawingboards for tomorrow won't give the Soviets incentive to negotiate reductions in nuclear arms today. So, I'm asking you, give us your strong support as we approach the next round of the MX this autumn, and together we'll help keep America secure and free.

We've significantly improved our economic relations with the industrial democracies. And I'm certain the recent Williamsburg summit will become known as the recovery summit. At Williamsburg we established a unified strategy for pursuing our common economic interests [from combatting]\3\ (FOOTNOTE)  protectionism to fighting inflation, and we agreed on security concerns, as well. We agreed to cut the flow of military-relevant technology to those who would use it against us and reduce dependence on any one energy source. We agreed to end the practice of giving subsidized interest rates to the Soviet Union. The minimum loan rate is now set 4 full percentage points higher than it was before. And at home, we're working to bring interest rates down. But we've pushed them up for the Soviets.

Our Western military alliances are stronger than they've been in years. In Europe, despite pressure and propaganda, NATO has stood firm in pursuing the dual objectives of arms reduction and deterrence. NATO today is more confident in its ability to preserve its strength and promote the peace. We in the industrial democracies have forged a clear sense of purpose for our economic and military safety. We still have disagreements, but for the first time in a long time we have unity on where we're going, and I call that real progress.

Of course, another of our objectives is arms control. We've launched the most sweeping proposals for arms control since nuclear weapons became a threat. In our search for peace, we have more negotiations currently under way with the Soviets than any administration in history.

At the strategic arms reduction talks in Geneva, we've proposed deep cuts as well as extensive confidence-building measures to reduce the possibility of any accidental misunderstandings. In contrast to previous agreements which simply dealt in ceilings, the Soviet Union now, for the first time, is willing to talk about actual reductions. The same hard work is proceeding on intermediate-range nuclear forces in Geneva. And in Vienna, the Soviets have shown some movement on the verification needed to reduce conventional forces.

However, we must recognize that the search for real arms reductions involves complex, time-consuming negotiations. This is the occupational hazard of diplomats, and especially those who deal with the Soviet Union. But if I can assure you, we'll keep chipping away and inching along. We're deeply committed to arms reductions. As we remain firm in our objectives, we'll be flexible in our approach. And with the support of the VFW and the support of the Congress, we'll achieve what we all want -- a reduction in nuclear weapons.

Our next objective concerns the United States responsibility as peacemaker. This commitment currently is most visible in Central America. In spite of the discouraging hype and hoopla that you often hear, quiet, solid progress is being made in Central America. Bob Currieo recently returned from a trip there, and I believe he's reported to you on that trip. I know he's referred to news accounts, saying he thinks we're all getting a distorted view of what's actually taking place.

Well, Bob is absolutely right. You wouldn't know from some of the coverage that the greatest portion of our aid to Central America is humanitarian and economic. You wouldn't know that democracy is taking root there. And I don't blame the media alone, because in many cases they're just reporting the disinformation and demagoguery that they hear coming from people who put politics ahead of national interests.

The countries of Central America are working hard to develop and defend their democracies. I'm sure you recall the March '82 Constituent Assembly elections in El Salvador. Eighty percent of those eligible to vote took part in the elections, despite incredible intimidation and threats from the guerrillas. In neighboring Honduras, an elected government took office last year. Costa Rica, of course, already is the democratic jewel of Central America.

We support democracy, reform, and human freedom. We support economic development. We support negotiations. We support any avenue that will give the people of that region a more free and prosperous future.

Because of this aggression, we also support a security shield for the area. The security shield is very much like a program that's springing up all over the United States -- the Neighborhood Watch. The Neighborhood Watch is where neighbors keep an eye on each other's homes so outside troublemakers and bullies will think twice. Well, our policy in Central America is like a neighborhood watch. But this watch doesn't protect someone's silverware; it protects something more valuable -- freedom.

Our policy is to help people toward a better life -- to help them toward liberty, to help them reverse centuries of inequities, to help them toward peace. And let me say with all the conviction I can muster, America would not be America if we abandoned the struggling neighbors here in our own hemisphere.

Elsewhere in the world, we also search for peace. The tragic conflict in the Middle East has one bright spot: Peace between Israel and Egypt was finally concluded in April of 1982, thanks to the American diplomacy that went to work in the Camp David talks. Today our peacekeeping forces in the Sinai, along with those of our allies, are rarely mentioned because they're doing their job in keeping this once volatile area quiet. Unfortunately, the same is not yet so for Lebanon. But whatever progress toward peace we've made in that country is largely due to our marines, who along with peace-keeping troops from France and Italy are striving to give Lebanon a chance to pull itself together. Our diplomats continue to search for agreement among bitter, divided opponents. Yes, America has an active national security program, and it's working.

May I just interject here that there have been some charges made that we're building weapons and spending money on defense, but we don't have any plan, so we're just building weapons like you'd go in and shop for something off the counter and say, ``Let's buy that or buy that.'' That isn't true.

We have carefully worked out a strategy that is based on what we think are all the possible contingencies that could affect our national security, and then our military planning and our weapons purchases are based on that strategy.

My fellow citizens, my friends, let us always remember when we speak of America's security, [we speak of the sacrifice]\4\ (FOOTNOTE)  of individuals. When we speak of freedom, we speak of the freedom of individuals. I feel a sacred trust to America's soldiers and citizens alike. I feel a sacred trust to protect their lives and their liberty.

Our nation also has a sacred trust -- to defend and develop democracy. And as long as this administration is responsible for the Nation's foreign policy, we will protect the freedom of our own citizens and we will pursue liberty for all people.

This bill which I am about to sign, the Emergency Veterans' Job Training Act of 1983, will provide targeted job training for unemployed veterans of the Korean and Vietnam conflicts. The legislation is above and beyond the partisan jobs bill that I signed earlier this year and other administration programs to promote opportunities for our veterans. This bill provides incentives to employers to train veterans by defraying part of the costs of training. But this is not just a training program. The employer who participates must employ the veteran on a permanent basis after the training is completed.

As I said earlier, the Nation has a special commitment to those who've served in the military. And that commitment includes not only our continuing respect but practical assistance, as well. This program will aid veterans at the same time it aids the many small businesses that will participate.

You've already heard one speech by me, so I won't give you another. But a couple of days ago I was at Fort Bliss in El Paso. As I drove through the base on the way into town, the road was lined with service men and women and their families. I felt a great pride in them and in what they're sacrificing for America. And I feel the same way about the veterans that we're about to help today. They did their best for us, now we must do our best for them.

Student Loans with longer repayment periods. This authority has been used in the past year on an experimental basis to see how it could address concerns about student debt burden and capability to repay loans.

Any lengthy extension and expansion of loan consolidation authority must be carefully studied and the costs fully understood before any final action is taken in legislation. Such a change in the current law would affect significantly how college costs would be financed, and under several options it could add hundreds of millions of dollars annually to the Federal budget. The Congress has been considering a variety of approaches to loan consolidation in recent months, but because of the uncertainty about long-term costs has wisely chosen to provide in H.R. 3394 only an interim extension of the current consolidation authority to November 1, 1983. This will provide an opportunity for the Congress and the administration to review loan consolidation options and costs over the coming weeks, so that the future of the consolidation approach can be carefully and fairly assessed.

The Congress continues to reject our efforts to ensure that Federal spending on student aid, especially in the Pell Grants and subsidized Guaranteed Student Loan programs, is better targeted on those who need it most. Recent regulations published by the Secretary of Education relating to family contributions to the cost of education, to the amounts allowed for certain commuting students, and to the definition of independent student are all overridden by this bill.

The cost of education is primarily the responsibility of the family. The Federal Government has a role to play in helping needy students get a chance to receive a college education. This year we are spending over $6 billion on student aid, and the administration has sought to assure that these funds are used most effectively. The relatively modest rule changes promulgated by the Secretary and nullified by the bill would have helped concentrate available funds more on those who most need them to secure higher education.

I want to make clear that my approval of H.R. 3394 does not indicate endorsement of the provisions that would benefit the least needy participants in the student aid programs. Our Federal student assistance dollars are not unlimited, and we will continue to seek legislative and regulatory changes aimed at ensuring that they are spent where they are most needed.

As a result of the President's instructions, FEMA Administrator Louis O. Giuffrida has said that the President has instructed him to ``do all the law will allow.'' The FEMA regional office was in contact with the Governor's office yesterday and again today. Governor White has announced in a press conference within the hour that he has sent a telegram to the President requesting Federal assistance. FEMA before noon Pacific time will be airlifting via the Air Force an emergency communications van to provide communications in the affected areas.

FEMA will open a series of offices to have flood insurance claims and start processing those claims immediately. Fifty to seventy thousand people in the area have flood insurance. Six FEMA field teams will be dispatching to the area to coordinate Federal services. They will be en route as soon as their aircraft is able to land following the winds subsiding in the area.

As soon as we receive the request in Washington from Governor White and if the requirements of the Disaster Relief Act are met, which we are confident they are by the severity of the storm, we will make a judgment as to what services are beyond the capability of State and local governments, and then the President will move to issue a Federal disaster declaration.

Mr. Svahn, 40, also served as Director of the U.S. Office of Child Support Enforcement during his service as Social Security Commissioner until his appointment as HHS Under Secretary. In these positions, as well as in his concurrent capacity as Chief Administrator of Disability Insurance, Supplemental Security Income (SSI), and Aid to Families with Dependent Children (AFDC), he played a central policy and management role in income maintenance, health, and social services programs serving 51 million recipients and indirectly affecting nearly every American. Programs under his concurrent supervision account for more than one-third of the annual Federal budget.

Before joining the administration, he was a consultant specializing in public policy management problems. From 1976 to 1979, he was manager of government services for the accounting/management consulting firm of Deloitte Haskins and Sells, Inc.

Government. In California he served first in the State Highway Department and later as chief deputy director and as acting director of social welfare. During then-Governor Reagan's administration in California, he was a principal member of the Governor's welfare reform task force.

Since 1966 Dr. Wheelon has been with the Hughes Aircraft Co., joining as corporate vice president (engineering). In July 1970, he was named senior vice president and group president (space and communications). This group is responsible for all the development and production of communications satellites and other space vehicles, spacecraft instrumentation, earth terminals, and terrestrial communications equipment. Previously he was with the Central Intelligence Agency in 1962 - 1966.

Lebanon -- the earliest possible withdrawal of all foreign forces, the extension of Lebanese sovereignty throughout its territory, and that Lebanon shall not again become a source of hostile actions against Israel. The agreement concluded between Israel and Lebanon on May 17 is an important step toward achievement of these goals. The President directed that U.S. efforts be renewed in a mission to the Middle East headed by Ambassadors Robert McFarlane and Richard Fairbanks.

Since that time Ambassadors McFarlane and Fairbanks have traveled extensively throughout the region, undertaking intensive talks with Arab and Israeli leaders. Several conclusions have emerged from these talks.

First and foremost is the solid foundation of support in the Arab world and in Israel for the principles of full withdrawal and full authority for the Lebanese Government. Equally clear is the enormity of the task the Lebanese Government faces in seeking to strengthen the consensus among the diverse confessional groups in Lebanon which is so essential to the reconstruction and revitalization of the Lebanese economy and the establishment of political stability. It is clear that President Gemayel is committed to these goals.

The United States pledges its best efforts to help create conditions which will allow these withdrawals to take place at the earliest possible moment. Within this context, the Governments of Israel and Lebanon will coordinate the smooth and orderly return of responsibility in the Alayh-Shuf areas. Concurrently, efforts by the Government of Lebanon to strengthen the consensus will continue so that stability and reconstruction can take hold.

The going rate at the time was about 16 percent. I'm happy to say a number of banks throughout the country followed suit. I'm even happier to say that Milwaukee Security Savings and Loan has done it again. One hundred million dollars has been made available for home mortgages at a 9.9-percent interest rate. The president of the savings and loan says it's their way of trying to help the economic recovery that is now under way. Well, they deserve a big ``thank you'' from all of us.

Last month, on one of these talks, I told you about a few of the things we've been doing to cut down on waste and fraud, unnecessary paperwork, redtape, and on abuses of Federal loan programs, all adding up to current and future savings to you, the taxpayer, of billions of dollars.

Federal agencies. There are a number of vital functions that the Federal Government has to perform, as we all know. But the Federal Government should perform those functions in an efficient, economical manner. It shouldn't cost you, the taxpayer, a penny more than is needed to get the job done.

With that in mind, we made a department-by-department, agency-by-agency review of government operations, looking for needless fat. As a result, by last January, there were 112,000 fewer people working in nondefense Federal agencies. Fifteen departments, agencies, and commissions have been able to reduce their payroll numbers by 20 percent or more. And we've accomplished 90 percent of these savings not by layoffs, but by just not replacing those who retired or left government service. And guess what? The Government is actually doing things more efficiently than it was before.

We're still providing the needed services, and we're doing it with fewer people. The savings to the taxpayer is nearly a billion and a half dollars a year in salaries alone. As you know, most civilian government jobs are not particularly hazardous. Yet we found that one out of every four retirements from government service was a disability retirement. The government didn't require much evidence of disability and this led to considerable abuse of the system.

Today, just by requiring adequate evidence before allowing that kind of retirement, the figure is down nearly 40 percent since 1979 with a savings to the taxpayer of more than a billion dollars by 1985. And to help prevent accidents and disabilities, we have initiated a new health and safety program for Federal employees to reduce the number of injury claims by 3 percent per year over the next 5 years.

The civil service retirement system is one of the most generous in the world. And of course, we all want dedicated government employees to be rewarded for their efforts, just as the overwhelming majority of Americans who work in the private sector deserve to be. But sometimes civil servants have received preferred treatment.

When we came to office, the civil service retirement system was indexing benefits to inflation twice a year, an advantage enjoyed by virtually no one in the private sector. By going to a once-a-year cost-of-living adjustment for Federal retirees and by making other fair adjustments, we have continued to protect them from inflation while saving the taxpayer some 2\1/2\ billion by 1985.

In recent weeks, there's been a lot of talk about my call for merit pay to reward outstanding teachers in America's schools. Well, I think the same principle should apply to the Federal Government itself. Earlier this year, we announced a proposal to require Federal employees to earn, not just automatically inherit, their pay raises. We're still working with Members of the Congress to refine this merit plan to reward good work and good workers so that you, the people, are better served by your government.

Pentagon paying $100 for a 4-cent diode or $900 for a plastic cap. What is missing or buried in all those stories about waste is who provided those figures for all the horror stories. This administration exposed those abuses -- abuses that had been going on for years. It was Defense Secretary Cap Weinberger's people, his auditors and inspectors, who ordered the audits in the first place, conducted the investigations, and formed a special unit to prosecute defense-related fraud.

The U.S. Government trusts that the Government of the Philippines will swiftly and vigorously track down the perpetrators of this political assassination, bring them to justice, and punish them to the fullest extent of the law.

Mrs. Thornton serves as a member of the board of regents of Pepperdine University. She also serves as a member of the associates of the University of Southern California and of the board of directors of the Los Angeles World Affairs Council. In 1981 she served as commissioner of the California Commission on Food and Nutrition. Mrs. Thornton is a benefactor of the Music Center and Los Angeles County Museum of Art.

The President certainly respects [Senator Tower's] decision but also regrets it. He has the utmost respect for [Senator] Tower as an outstanding chairman of the Armed Services Committee and also as a Republican leader and strong supporter of the President's policies. The President understands his reasons and respects his reasons, but regrets it.

Ronald Reagan, Pacific Palisades Post -- as you've been told -- 283, reporting for duty. My uniforms are long since in mothballs, but one of the major responsibilities that goes with my present job is being the chief advocate for America's Armed Forces and veterans, and I take that responsibility seriously.

One of the great lessons of life is that if you set high standards and do your best to live up to them, you won't go wrong. The Legion has set high standards for itself and for our country. And as long as America lives up to your standards, America will not go wrong.

At home and abroad, our country is on the right track again. As a nation, we've closed the books on a long, dark period of failure and self-doubt and set a new course. With your continuing support and the support of millions of other patriotic, God-fearing Americans, we've come a long way. But the task we face is still a challenging one, and a lot of hard work remains to be done.

Boston convention, I pledged to restore America's military posture so that we could promote peace while safeguarding our freedom and security. With the help of groups like the Legion, we've kept that pledge.

Our military forces are back on their feet and standing tall. Modern equipment is being delivered to the troops, training is way up, and combat readiness rates have really soared. And once again, young Americans wear their uniforms and serve their flag with pride. We're getting and keeping very good people in all of the services. We've made great progress, and we're going to make more. And I hope that makes you as proud as it does me.

But while I'm on the subject of our military forces, I want to reaffirm our determination to account for every brave American who served in Southeast Asia. This administration has not forgotten and will never forget the sacrifices that they and their families have made. And we will not rest until the fullest possible accounting has been made.

The other half of restoring our military posture concerns our strategic forces. In the past, we paid a grim price for indecision and neglect -- for a one-way restraint that was never returned by the other side. The resulting imbalance weakened the credibility of our nuclear deterrent, the deterrent that has been the single greatest bulwark for peace in the postwar era. While past American leaders hesitated or naively hoped for the best, the Soviet Union was left free to pile up new nuclear arsenals without any real incentives to seriously negotiate reductions.

But there are a few, and one of them is surely the lesson that weakness on the part of those who cherish freedom inevitably leads to trouble -- that it only encourages the enemies of both peace and freedom. On the other hand, history teaches us that by being strong and resolute we can keep the peace -- and even reduce the threats to peace.

And that was why, at your Boston convention in 1980, I pledged to strive for arms reduction agreements -- not so-called arms control agreements that permitted further growth, but real arms reductions.

Now, our efforts are designed to sustain peace, plain and simple. We don't seek an arms race; indeed, we seek to reverse the trends that cause it by beginning to lower the levels of the nuclear arms. But we will not, and we cannot, accept anything that would be detrimental to our security and to the freedom and safety of our children and our grandchildren.

They will also ensure stability and deterrence, making it clear that aggression by the Soviet Union would never pay. And they're an essential incentive for the Soviets to negotiate seriously for genuine arms reduction so that we can move to a more stable world in which the risk of war is reduced.

Modernization goes hand in hand with deterrence. Both are necessary incentives for successful negotiations. Many of our critics willfully ignore this interrelationship. Instead, they focus their attention and their criticism on some single point which doesn't address the central issue. Often, it's based on wishful thinking or downright misinformation.

For example, one argument contends that the MX Peacekeeper would pose a first-strike threat to the Soviet Union. Well, in the most fundamental sense, this argument runs counter to the whole history of America. Our country has never started a war, and we've never sought nor will we ever develop a strategic first-strike capability. Our sole objective is deterrence, the strength and credibility it takes to prevent war.

And in any case, there is no way that the MX, even with the remaining Minuteman force, could knock out the entire Soviet ICBM force, so the argument is a false one, both philosophically and technically. What we really want and what we would have with the MX in place is enough force that tells the enemy we'd do them a lot of damage.

Starting with the perceptive recommendations of the Scowcroft commission, and strengthened by the bipartisan congressional support in strategic modernization votes in May and July, America has finally begun to forge a national consensus for peace and security.

The MX Peacekeeper program and the development program for a new, small, single-warhead missile will complement the B - 1 bomber and Trident submarine programs, the other legs of the triad. But we aren't over the hump yet. There's still work to be done, and I'm counting on your continuing and active support as we approach the next legislative round on appropriations for the MX this autumn. If we see this mission through, the combined efforts of this administration and the Congress will restore the credibility of America's strategic posture -- the essential foundation for deterrence and successful negotiations.

We've learned over and over again that only common resolve in the West can bring responsiveness from the East. And fortunately, Western allied unity today is a firm reality. Our negotiations have been preceded by close consultations with the Congress and with our allies.

Neville Chamberlain thought of peace as a vague policy in the thirties, and the result brought us closer to World War II. Today's so-called peace movement -- for all its modern hype and theatrics -- makes the same old mistake. They would wage peace by weakening the free. And that just doesn't make sense.

My heart is with those who march for peace. I'd be at the head of the parade if I thought it would really serve the cause of peace. But the members of the real peace movement, the real peacekeepers and peacemakers, are people who understand that peace must be built on strength.

Like you, our allies remain united in a common effort to strengthen both deterrence and the prospect for arms reduction through negotiations. They recognize the dangers to allied unity of Soviet propaganda and thinly veiled threats -- at causing NATO to abandon its dual-track decision to modernize and negotiate. If we lack the will to provide a credible deterrent, then we could look forward to ever more aggressive Soviet behavior in the futue. Because NATO understands this, NATO will persevere.

When you add it all up, despite the problems, there is strong reason for hope. This administration has worked very hard over the course of many months to refine our own negotiating objectives and positions. We've developed a sound, well-thought-out strategy to achieve them. We stand united with the Congress and our allies. Our strategic triad is being modernized. We're negotiating arms reductions in good faith. And there's been encouraging movement in these negotiations.

For the first time, in the START negotiations, the Soviets are willing to actually talk about actual reductions. In Vienna, at the mutual balanced force reduction talks, the Soviet negotiators have shown movement on the verification issues needed to permit us to negotiate reductions in the conventional force safely. There has also been progress in discussing confidence-building measures. All these indicators, modest though they may seem, point in the same positive direction -- new hope for arms reductions and a more secure world.

We can't build a safer world with honorable intentions and good will alone. Achieving the fundamental goals our nation seeks in world affairs -- peace, human rights, economic progress, national independence, and international stability -- means supporting our friends and defending our interests. Our commitment as peacemaker is focused on these goals. Right now this commitment is most visible in Central America, the Middle East, and Africa.

Our policy in Central America is to help the people of that troubled region help themselves -- help them to build a better life, to help them toward liberty, and to help them reverse centuries of poverty and inequity. And that's what they want, too. In Costa Rica, democracy and respect for human rights are a long and proud tradition. In Honduras, democratic institutions are taking root.

We know that democracy in Central America will not be built overnight. But step by step, with humanitarian, economic, and private sector assistance from the United States, it can and will be achieved.

And that's why we established the Caribbean Basin Initiative, a program designed to help the people in that region help themselves. The Caribbean Basin Initiative is based on a combination of trade and private investment incentives. We decided to listen and learn from what our neighbors have been saying for a long time -- that the best thing we could do is to help them build a better, freer life for themselves. We agree, and though you wouldn't know it from some of the coverage, by far the greatest portion of our aid to Central America is humanitarian and economic.

Now, there are some -- in Moscow and Havana -- who don't want to let our Caribbean neighbors solve their problems peacefully. They seek to impose their alien form of totalitarianism with bullets instead of ballots. And that's why we're supporting a security shield for those nations that are threatened.

Unless that shield is there, democracy, reform, economic development, and constructive dialog and negotiations cannot survive and grow. Other than training our own troops, this is the only purpose behind our military exercises -- to demonstrate our commitment to the free aspirations and sovereign integrity of our neighbors.

I've said it before, and I'll say it again: Human rights means working at problems, not walking away from them. Would America be America if, in their hour of need, we abandoned our nearest neighbors? From the tip of Tierra del Fuego to Alaska's Point Barrow, we're all Americans. We worship the same God, cherish the same freedom. Can we stand idly by and allow a totalitarian minority to destroy our common heritage?

Communist economic system ever brought prosperity? No. If the United States were to let down the people of Central America -- people who are struggling for the democratic values that we share -- we would have let ourselves down, too. We could never be certain of ourselves, much less of the future, if we turned our back on our nearest neighbors' struggle for peace, freedom, and evolving democracy.

In the Middle East, the pursuit of peace between Israel and its Arab neighbors remains another fundamental objective of this administration. Yes, it's a thorny problem, and our negotiators have faced serious difficulties over the past 2\1/2\ years. But there's been real progress.

The Sinai Peninsula was returned to Egypt in April of 1982. This essential step in the establishment of peace between Egypt and Israel wouldn't have been possible without our decision to contribute to the multinational force and observers that are currently operating in the Sinai.

In Lebanon, our marines continue to serve alongside their French, British, and Italian comrades as we work for the withdrawal of all foreign forces from that troubled land. Our joint presence strengthens the resolve of the Lebanese Government to assume the tough task of maintaining order.

We Americans covet no foreign territory, and we have no intention of becoming policeman to the world. But as the most powerful country in the West, we have a responsibility to help our friends keep the peace. And we should be proud of our achievements and especially proud of the fine men and women of our Armed Forces who undertake these tough yet vital tasks.

In Africa, we're engaged in a parallel commitment -- economic development, the growth of democracies, and the peaceful resolution of conflict. And here, too, our emphasis is on developmental and economic assistance.

We maintain only a handful of military advisers on the whole African continent. Our economic aid is four times larger than what we spend on security assistance. Contrast this with what the Soviet Union is doing. The record shows that since the Soviets began their aid program to Africa in 1954, military aid has outpaced all other Soviet aid by 7 to 1. Then add more than 40,000 Soviet and surrogate military personnel stationed in Africa, and it's no wonder that Africa is rife with conflict and tension.

For our part, we're actively working to defuse the tensions and conflict in Namibia and Angola while we help fight poverty in the region. In Chad, the United States is a partner in a multinational economic assistance package designed to get this tragically poor and strife-torn country on its feet. But without protection from external aggression, there can be no economic progress. And naked, external aggression is what is taking place in Chad today.

Libya, Colonel Qadhafi has been using Soviet-built fighter bombers, T - 55 tanks, and artillery in a blatant attempt to destroy a legitimate government. President Habre and the people of his country are truly beleaguered as they struggle to preserve their independence. It is in this context that we have joined a number of other countries in providing emergency security assistance to Chad.

Yes, in Africa there is real reason for concern. But there are also harbingers of hope. Less than 2 weeks ago, I had the pleasure of meeting with President Diouf of Senegal. He's a great man doing a great job. His outstanding leadership has brought Senegal fully into the community of truly democratic states. And a similar democratic success story has just taken place in Nigeria, Africa's most populous nation, where free Presidential elections were successfully completed last week.

That's right, there's a democratic revolution going on in this world. It may not grab the headlines, but it's there, and it's growing. The tide of history is with the forces of freedom -- and so are we.

That's the real message, and that's the overwhelming news story of our time, even though it seldom makes the front page. The light of the democratic ideal is not slowly fading away. It gains in brightness with every passing day, but it needs our care and cultivation.

You know, Mark Twain once remarked that he spent $25 to research his family tree, and then he had to spend $50 to cover it up. [Laughter] Well, America is more fortunate. We can be proud of our heritage, and we need never hide from our roots. The world we live in is not an easy one, but we've inherited a noble mission, a mission that casts a beacon of hope for all the Earth's people.

America, more than anything, wants lasting peace -- peace with liberty, with justice, and with the freedom to follow the dictates of God and conscience. To succeed, we will need wisdom, strength, and imagination. We'll need patience and vigor. But to seek anything less would be to deny our heritage and the real meaning of our great nation.

You know, our national anthem is probably the only one that asks a question: Does that banner still wave o'er the land of the free and the home of the brave? When Francis Scott Key wrote that, he was asking if our flag was still flying. Well, today we know the flag still flies. But what we continue to answer is that it does wave over a people that are still free and still brave and determined to preserve this land for generations to come.

Following his remarks, the President met with Republican Party donors and attended a fundraising reception for the Republican Party at the Seattle Center. He then returned to Los Angeles, Calif., and the Century Plaza Hotel, where he remained overnight.

Current law allows the Secretary to deduct 50 cents per hundredweight from the proceeds of sale of all milk marketed, if the Commodity Credit Corporation (CCC) purchases of surplus milk are expected to exceed 5 billion pounds. This deduction program became effective April 16, 1983.

Current law also authorizes the Secretary to deduct another 50 cents per hundredweight if CCC purchases of surplus milk are expected to exceed 7.5 billion pounds. Dairy farmers who reduce their milk production according to Department of Agriculture guidelines will be entitled to refunds of this second 50 cents.

This second deduction and the refund program are scheduled to go into effect on September 1 and are expected to produce net receipts by CCC of about $60 million during September. Even with both deductions in effect, the Department of Agriculture projects that CCC purchases of milk will still exceed 16 billion pounds for the current marketing year at a net cost to taxpayers of $2.4 billion.

I cannot support S.J. Res. 149, as it would reduce by $60 million the amount of funds available to be used to defray the cost of the milk price support program and would reduce the desired downward effect upon milk production. Without the added downward pressure of the second 50-cent deduction there will be less incentive to decrease milk production.

In addition, if I signed S.J. Res. 149, there would be even greater confusion on the part of milk producers. The first deduction has been the subject of extensive litigation. Since Secretary Block has announced that the second deduction and the refund program will begin on September 1, a delay of one month would only add to the confusion and make planning by producers even more difficult.

Implementation of the deduction has already been delayed considerably. As a result, the cost savings contemplated when this provision was enacted have not materialized, further worsening the Federal deficit.

The annual cost of the dairy price support program is now over $2 billion and will continue to grow unless something is done. We cannot continue to absorb these enormous costs. The Administration's position last year, which the Congress failed to accept, called for increased flexibility to set support levels that would facilitate a more favorable supply and demand balance and reduce Federal outlays. We remain committed to an economically sound dairy industry with adequate supplies of milk and dairy products for consumers, and we will continue to work with the Congress to achieve that end. However, until Congress can act on a mutually acceptable dairy program that accomplishes the objectives stated above, we must continue to exercise without further delay what authority we have to deal with our dairy problem.

Sec. 4. The Director shall provide the Administrator of Veterans' Affairs with a copy of any written statement, provided to the appropriate committees of the Congress, which sets forth the reasons for disapproval of any proposed increase in rates of basic pay under this Order.

The President. Yes, I do. But I think part of it is very deliberate and political. I think, very frankly, in the 1982 election, it was made apparent that some of those who are most active in this are most active if it's in behalf of the Democratic candidates. Let me just point out: We had some fine Republican women candidates, and they didn't get any help or support, even though they were in -- well, Millicent Fenwick is an example. So, I think this is part of it.

But if they look back, the California record, I don't know of anyone else in the country that did this. Yes, it's true that I happen to disagree about the equal rights amendment, but not because I think it would give women something of value to them.

The same would be true militarily. But mainly, the main thing is, as I see it, it would put -- it isn't an instant solution. It would put things in the hands of the courts that belong in the hands of the legislature. If you thought it was discrimination, you would have to take -- you would have to file a suit.

Now, what I set out in California, when I was faced with this, and I finally came to the decision about that, I said, but there should be equality. And so we started combing the statutes to find out where in the State law might be based discriminations. We found 14 laws that deliberately discriminated against women. For example, a wife with her own money could not invest that money without her husband's permission. Well, that's ridiculous. And so, we got all these 14 changed.

Then when I got to Washington, I'd been dreaming about this -- and one other State had done it -- and I said let us in this whole federalism talk, let us go to the States, to the Governors, the State legislatures, and see if they won't set up the same kind of operation. Well, all 50 States did. Now, I understand, if what Miss [Barbara] Honegger said is right, that maybe some of them have dallied and so forth. There's a limit. Once I persuade them to do this, you can't force them. The States are sovereign in our system here. But maybe there is more we could do to encourage them.

Federal laws. Well, that's quite a sizable undertaking. And she's absolutely wrong in what she said about what we're doing there, and the pace. It has come in, as I understand it, in three very voluminous packets.

Tunisia and Morocco and will strengthen our relations with Algeria, an important nonaligned country. The Vice President's visits to Yugoslavia and Austria underscore the important international role of these countries and U.S. support for Austria's neutrality and respect for Yugoslavia's independence and nonalignment. Finally, the Vice President's visits to two important Eastern European countries underscore the United States continued willingness to maintain dialog with the East and the continuing U.S. policy of differentiation toward the countries of Eastern Europe.

National Hispanic Heritage Week pays tribute to a rich part of America's cultural tradition, offering all Americans a welcome opportunity to recognize the qualities and contributions of Hispanic Americans from earliest colonial times to the present. The dedication to principles of loyalty, patriotism, strong religious faith and devotion to family displayed by Hispanic Americans is basic to the American way of life.

Hispanic Americans have played an important role in the development of our rich cultural heritage and every State has benefitted from their influence. They have distinguished themselves in the arts and sciences, education, industry, government and many other areas of productive endeavor.

Just as their forefathers sought a dream in the New World, Hispanic Americans have realized their dreams in our great Nation and will continue to do so. Their dedication to higher purposes reflects what is best in the American spirit.

Through the years, Hispanic American citizens have risen to the call of duty in defense of liberty and freedom. Their bravery is well-known and has been demonstrated time and again, dating back to the aid rendered by General Bernardo de Galvez during the American Revolution.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 25th day of Aug., in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and seventh.

But it's great to be back in California speaking to business men and women who are on the front lines of economic progress in America. If our country is to move forward, if our people are to improve their standard of living, if we're to meet the challenges of world competition, it will depend in large measure on you, your skill, your faith, and your dedication.

Business men and women make decisions every day that direct the resources and energies of our country, making investments and taking risks and putting in that extra effort that makes all the difference between success and failure. This is what made our country a miracle of efficiency and the envy of the world.

You business men and women of Hispanic descent stand for much more than efficiency. Being back here in California, I feel very much at home, but there's something else that makes me feel comfortable, and that is being among men and women like you who exemplify the values I admire.

There are people in America today who feel that expressions of love for country and family are old-fashioned. They squirm and get uneasy when we talk about pride in our neighborhood or our work or speak of religious values. Yes, there are people like that. But you won't find them in the Hispanic business community.

To every cynic who says the American dream is dead, I say look at the Americans of Hispanic descent who are making it in the business world. With hard work and no one to rely on but themselves, entrepreneurs of Hispanic descent are not just building corporations, they're building a better America for all of us.

Manuel Caldera, a veteran who later earned his G.E.D. degree. He went on to become an electronic technician and then an engineer. And with money he saved and with help from a minority loan program during the Nixon administration, he started AMEX Systems, a company specializing in the development and manufacture of electronic equipment. Today his company does more than support his family. His company supports 700 employees and earns some $62 million a year in sales.

English, she and her husband Ramon worked as laborers. And in 1960 the family pooled their savings, and with a private loan, they started a small restaurant in Santa Monica. With hard work and an eye on quality, their business expanded and eventually they opened nine restaurants in the Los Angeles area. In 1980 they moved to San Diego, and today they've opened four Casa Bonita restaurants there.

While making her mark in the business world, Xochitl raised eight fine children. Her seven lovely daughters take after their mother. All of them, along with their brother, are deeply involved in the family business.

I know Robert Alvarez agrees with that. He and his wife Marguerite are another husband and wife team with a dream. In 1949 Robert saved $700 he earned as a laborer, bought some produce, and started selling it from the back of a truck in San Diego. He operated that way for several years till he figured out his paperwork wouldn't be that much greater if he expanded his operation. So, he set up an office and started to deliver to stores. In 1962 his wife joined in and so did the children.

Julio Rivera, who immigrated from Colombia 18 years ago, began as a repairman and then tried to start his own mail-sorting business. He wasn't successful in that first try, but it was just a first try.

Now, these few that I've mentioned, and others of you right in this room, offer us a vision of progress and hope. You prove that freedom of enterprise, with it come values that make America more than a rich country -- they make us a good country.

I don't have to tell you that the Mexican and American Foundation named Robert Alvarez man of the year for 1983. And, Robert, congratulations. But Robert was honored for more than his business accomplishment. He and Marguerite have used their success to help others, providing scholarships for young Americans of Hispanic descent and giving generously to religious and humanitarian efforts. Through the Mexican and American Foundation, they've given over $10,000 in the last few years to a home for orphaned girls in Tecate, Mexico.

These are not unusual stories. They are, instead, a byproduct of our freedom that is always present but often unnoticed -- respect and concern for others. Business professionals realize that success depends on fulfilling the needs of others and doing it courteously and efficiently. And by doing for others, you're also achieving for yourself.

This system of ours in the United States, based on that principle, has produced a better quality of life and more freedom than any other country has ever known. We're a people blessed with abundance. And we're a compassionate people. We came here from every corner of the world, from every ethnic background and every race and religion, seeking a better way of life. Our history isn't perfect, but we can be proud of our country. And our citizens of Hispanic descent can be particularly proud of the contributions that they have made and are making to the health and vitality of this nation.

All of us share a sacred responsibility -- to maintain the opportunity and freedom we've been given and to pass it on to future generations. In a free society, the future is in the hands of the people, and that means us.

In recent years, our task has not been easy. We're now emerging from an economic crisis so severe that had we not taken the necessary steps to correct it, it would have robbed our children of the America that we know and love.

Three years ago, pessimism totally inconsistent with our national character had spread across this land. I think you'll remember. The world seemed to be counting us out, suggesting that America's best days were past, that even our leaders were throwing up their hands, talking of national malaise, and saying that our problems were unsolvable.

Well, at first, the challenge seemed overwhelming. It's taken patience and hard work, just as it does for any enterprise. What was needed was not slight alterations, but basic change. I'm pleased to report to you today that after a long period of stagnation and decline, this great nation is moving forward again, and we're not turning back.

When we got to Washington, inflation was running at double-digit levels and had been doing so for 2 years straight. Long-range investment and planning were useless. Capital flowed into nonproductive inflation hedges instead of job-producing investment. Our senior citizens helplessly watched as the value of their savings eroded. Poor and middle-class working people saw their real wages and their standard of living begin to shrink. Well, together, we've licked inflation, and we're never going back to the policies that unleashed this monster on the American people.

Inflation was only part of the picture. Two-and-a-half years ago the prime interest rate hit 21\1/2\ percent. Today the prime stands at 11 percent. There will be slight fluctuations, but if the Congress acts responsibly, interest rates will come down some more, and soon.

The basic reason for our economic troubles, troubles from which we're now just emerging, is that for years, government was spending too much and taxing too much. And I don't have to tell you in the business community; if more and more resources are channeled into the government bureaucracy, consumers will have less and less to spend and business will have less to invest and create new jobs.

You know, there's an old saying that in levying taxes, as in shearing sheep, it's best to stop when you get to the skin. [Laughter] Well, by the end of the 1980's, the tax rates were -- or the seventies, I should say -- the tax rates were making a lot of us bleed. Average working people were being taxed at rates that, only a short time before, had been reserved for the wealthy.

Now, it's taken time for our program to take hold, but the cumulative effect of our efforts is just beginning to be felt, and the signs are good. Consumer spending is up; productivity is up; industrial production, retail sales, auto sales, housing and construction are all up since the beginning of the year. Last quarter, the economy grew by 9.2 percent. They first reported that as 8.7 percent and then had to make a correction; it was really 9.2, a much bigger jump than anyone had expected. The leading economic indicators have been on the rise for a full year now.

Do you think that going back to the policies that dragged our economy down and set fire to inflation will really help the unemployed? Or would you agree that the best way to help all Americans is to continue the reforms that have brought down inflation, interest rates, taxes, and unemployment, which last month dropped by a half percent, the biggest monthly decline in almost 24 years.

Our economy got into trouble because past leadership permitted our country to drift away from some of the fundamentals that were the basis of our progress and freedom. We were headed toward a society where the power and decisions would be in the hands not of you the people, but of a faceless central authority. Well, giving such power to the government and blindly hoping that it will benevolently watch over our interests is not the American way, and besides, it just doesn't work.

Your four organizations prove that by working as independent forces in the community and working together, you can help others succeed. I know, for example, of the Latin Business Association's sponsorship of the Silesian Boys Clubs in East Los Angeles, helping promote skills and healthy self-images at an early age in order to open new horizons for tomorrow.

Professional Association of Orange County and the Inland Empire. And Ray Najera has told me of the professional guidance of the scholarship and loan fund of the Hispanic Business and Professional Association of Orange County and the Mexican and American Foundation.

All of this activity is aimed at building strong and independent people, individuals who can contribute and earn their own way in doing so. Your organizations are providing technical assistance and contacts so Hispanic businesses can compete. With this kind of effort going on all over the country, no wonder in 5 years the number of Hispanic-owned firms has leaped 65 percent to some 363,000 businesses, generating about $18 billion in sales per year. I want to take this opportunity to applaud those in the American corporate world who've seen the potential of the Hispanic community and invested in it. You can count on me to encourage them to do that more.

Let's make one thing clear: Our goal is not welfare or handouts; it is jobs and opportunity. And if we keep on course and not be maneuvered back into the policies of tax, spend, and inflate, policies that are the root cause for the economic turmoil we've been through, we'll be on our way to a new era of growth and expansion that will better the life of every American. And looking around me today, I predict Americans of Hispanic descent will be leading the way.

What we're working for is much more than wealth. One need only look at a map to see the relationship between economic freedom and the other freedoms that we hold so dear. Nations with centralized, government-controlled economies usually have government-controlled speech, religion, and press, as well. They are countries with neither freedom nor material well-being, nations that erect walls and barbed wire to keep their people inside.

Much of the world is in turmoil, with the mass of humanity living in wretched conditions, suffering deprivation and tyranny. I know that you agree with me that all of us can be so grateful for this blessed land. God has placed in our hands the responsibility of watching over it. I thank you for all that you have done. Together we will keep America the land of the free and the home of the brave, a land that still offers that last, best hope of mankind.

I'm especially delighted to be here today, Women's Equality Day, the 63d anniversary of women's suffrage and the date on which, in 1920, the 19th amendment was finally added to the Constitution. That was a great milestone for individual rights, but there is so much more.

Republican women have a great deal to celebrate. Our party was at the forefront in seeing to it that women got the right to vote and has, our party has a great history of fighting for the rights of all Americans. We want to continue those traditions. And that's why today I want to urge women not only to vote, but to run for public office.

I know that many of you are interested in doing just that. In fact, many of you here hold office. I know women have felt excluded in the past. We're changing that. Now, more than ever, we need women like you -- Republican women -- to run for office, to serve in local, State, and Federal appointments, to work for the party. We need your leadership, your perspective, and your experience. We need your participation. And that's why I believe wholeheartedly in what you're doing at this forum. I applaud your efforts to recruit, train, finance, and elect Republican women.

And we do belong to a party that has pioneered women's rights. Republicans were the party that was primarily responsible for suffrage for women, as I said. Republicans were the first to elect a woman to the Congress. The GOP is the only party to elect women to the Senate who had not first filled unexpired terms. And today, the two women in the United States Senate are both Republicans -- Nancy Kassebaum and Paula Hawkins.

I'm still disappointed that Millicent Fenwick didn't make it to the Senate, and I regret that some who supposedly are women's advocates didn't support that distinguished legislator. Indeed, in last year's election, it was apparent that some who talk the loudest in behalf of women's equality only extend their advocacy to women candidates if they're Democrats. Now, we have outstanding Republican women serving in the House, including our own Bobbi Fiedler, who's with us here today. And all across the country in statehouses and city halls, Republican women are making significant contributions to our democracy.

And I think you should know that just as we did in California, the Cabinet isn't something that just gathers a few weeks for a kind of ceremonial visit, as has been rather traditional in the past. We operate the Cabinet like a board of directors. We meet regularly and often, and the problems that come up, we believe aren't really limited to one Cabinet office or agency. They do cross lines. And therefore it is a meeting of give and take, and I can tell you that in that Cabinet system the three women who are there are not observers, they are active participants, and their opinions carry great weight.

We've also appointed more women to top policymaking positions in our first 2 years than any previous administration has in a similar period. We've appointed more than 1,200 women to executive positions throughout the government. And while that record is better than our predecessors, it's only a beginning.

Supreme Court. There have been a few decisions in which I've been very happy that she was there. [Laughter] Well, what all this adds up to is clear: The greatest political opportunity for women in this country, real progress rather than words and promises, rests with the Republican Party.

For women receiving Aid to Families with Dependent Children, we've increased training opportunities that will help them secure permanent productive jobs. Our Job Training Partnership Act, which replaces the discredited CETA program, specifically targets these women as a group that must be served.

For all women, we've provided various forms of tax relief. We've greatly reduced the income tax marriage penalty and increased, almost doubled, the maximum child care tax credit for working mothers. We've expanded participation in IRA accounts, benefiting women whether they work at home or in paid jobs, and we're acting to remedy the inequity some women suffer in pension programs. And of course, we have also virtually eliminated, and eventually will, what was known as the widow's tax -- the estate taxes levied on a surviving spouse. This has special benefit to those with family farms and small businesses, where women have been hardworking partners.

Women are interested in the very same issues that interest men -- those that affect the peace and prosperity of this nation. And I believe our record on these issues is an excellent one for women candidates to run on in 1984.

Just consider where the Nation was 3 years ago. Our leaders were throwing up their hands and throwing in the towel, suggesting that we were in a malaise -- that was their word -- and our problems were unsolvable. But the American people didn't buy the argument that America's best days were behind her, and they were right. It's taken patience and hard work, but I'm pleased to report to you today that America is moving forward again, and we're not turning back.

When we got to Washington, inflation was running at double-digit levels, and America had been living under that burden for 2 straight years. That was the worst such performance, with regard to inflation, in 60 years. Inflation was taking an especially serious toll on those on fixed incomes, a disproportionate number of whom are women. In the 2 years before we took office, inflation robbed the purchasing power of low-income men and women on a fixed income of $10,000 by over $2,000.

Today, a family of four on a fixed income of $20,000 has nearly $2,000 more in purchasing power this year alone than it would have had if we hadn't taken action against inflation. Now, if food prices had risen these last 2 years, as they did in the 2 years before we took office, a loaf of bread would cost 7 cents more, a half gallon of milk would cost 18 cents more, and a pound of hamburger would cost 60 cents more.

Incidentally, interest rates aren't all that fixed either, what someone says is the official rate. I got a call just a few days before I came on this trip. It was from the chairman of the board of directors of the Milwaukee, Wisconsin, Security Savings and Loan. And they told me, or he told me, that their financial institution has just made $100 million available for home mortgages at a 9.9-percent interest rate. Now they did something like this a year ago, a higher interest rate, but still several points below the going rate. And I made that public, as I'm doing now, because a number of other banks around the country got the idea and followed suit. So, spread the word.

And following 5 years in which the Federal tax take doubled, we came in and reduced personal income tax rates by 25 percent across the board. And soon they'll be indexed so that beginning in 1985, the Federal Government will never again profit from inflation at the people's expense.

Last quarter, the economy grew at an annual rate of 9.2 percent. It was a much bigger jump than anyone had predicted or expected. It was first announced as 8.7, and then they had to go back and correct themselves. It was 9.2.

The output for all businesses in the second quarter rose by 12\1/2\ percent. Now, that means that productivity is increasing at a rate of 5.7 percent and the unit labor cost, the cost of labor per unit of production, fell by 2.1 percent, which is a further pledge that we've got inflation under control.

Well, unemployment, of course, I should say, is the last of the major indicators to show improvement. The rate is still too high. But last month we achieved the biggest monthly drop in almost 24 years. Nearly 2 million jobs have been added to the economy since the first of the year.

But what we're seeking for women is what we're seeking for all Americans: economic opportunity and economic security associated with a sustained recovery, the security to plan for the future. If we can prevent our country from being drawn back to tax, spend, and inflate policies of the past, we'll be on our way to a new era of growth and expansion, and women will share in this.

It's estimated that in the next decade, two out of three new workers will be women. And I'm very optimistic about women's business ownership. There are almost 3 million women-owned businesses in the United States, and their number is growing dramatically, several times the rate of man-owned businesses in recent years. These are businesswomen who share our philosophy. They know how tough it is to meet a payroll. They understand the importance of a sound economy.

But a growing economy not only will help these women, it will help all women -- those who are looking for work, those who seek to advance up the career ladder and, yes, those who have families to feed. At this point in the pursuit of equality, economic opportunity provides the greatest, most immediate advance for women. It's economic recovery that will move women forward the fastest. It's economic recovery that will produce more options for women than anything else.

I believe the greatest contribution this administration can make to women is to get the economy moving and keep it moving. This will provide more opportunities for women than if all the promises of the Democratic Presidential candidates were enacted into law. You know, the truth of it is not any one of them could get all of them enacted, because they've made so many differing promises to differing groups that they conflict with each other.

But economic opportunity doesn't guarantee equal opportunity. There are laws already on the books to safeguard the rights of women. Those laws must be enforced; some must be strengthened. I think it's time to cut through the fog of demagoguery that surrounds this whole issue. All of us are interested in one goal -- ensuring legal equity for women.

Federal laws and regulations that unfairly differentiate on the basis of sex, and I initiated this because I believe it's important. And contrary to what you might have heard or read, that process is going forward. After receiving a preliminary report, we worked with Senator Dole on legislation that will make many of the necessary corrections recommended by the report.

Policy. I have directed the Justice Department and the Cabinet Council to accelerate their review of Federal laws and to have specific recommendations on my desk for discussion immediately upon my return to Washington.

In addition to the review of Federal laws, I initiated a project to encourage the States to review their own laws. Now, I did it based on our successful experience here in California when I was Governor. And of course, the Federal Government could not and should not tell the States what they have to do or should do. But if the States are not moving fast enough, you who live in some of those States can help, because they did, every one of the 50 Governors appointed a representative to start that process in their own States. I understand that some of them are not moving as fast as others in that regard.

Americans, of course, are interested not only in the economy, they're interested in the safety and security of the Nation. They want peace. You want peace, lasting peace. And here, again, is a record that Republican women can run on. I know you'll recall when only a few years ago the United States had war planes that couldn't fly, ships that couldn't leave port, and military personnel that couldn't wait to get into civilian clothes. This was a situation that endangered America's security and the peace. And there was serious talk at the time that the volunteer military was a failure, and that we must return to the draft.

Well, we didn't return to the draft, and today our volunteer military is back on its feet and prouder than ever. We have a backlog of applicants. We have a higher intelligence and educational average than we've ever had in the history of the military. Maintenance backlogs are being reduced; training and retention are up; combat readiness rates have surged. We're recruiting very good men and women. Morale, discipline, and unit cohesion have improved dramatically. I've heard it from generals and I've heard it from privates that once again it's an honor to serve in our military. I'm sure that makes you as proud as it does me. And what this means is that all those sons and daughters who wear America's uniform are safer today than they were 3 years ago, and so are the people of this country.

American marines serve in Lebanon, increasing the chances for a peaceful settlement there in that very troubled area. No one should think that our current efforts there mean that we're any less concerned about solving the broader problems of the Arab-Israeli conflict, particularly the search to reach a fair and practical resolution to the Palestinian problem.

The Middle East peace initiative which we announced just almost a year ago is definitely alive and available to those parties willing to sit down and talk. It's unfortunate that neither Israel nor its Arab neighbors have yet grasped the opportunities afforded. We remain committed to the positions we set forth, positions that remain sound, positions that thus far are the only realistic basis for a solution. We'll continue the pursuit for peace in the Middle East.

We're also pursuing arms control. We've undertaken the most sweeping proposals for arms reductions since nuclear weapons became a threat. In our search for peace, we have more negotiations underway with the Soviets than any administration in history. In strategic nuclear forces, in intermediate-range nuclear forces, in conventional forces, we want to lessen the danger to ourselves and our children. We remain flexible in our bargaining, but as Commander in Chief I have an obligation to protect this country, and I will not let political expediency influence these crucial negotiations.

The issues I've been discussing today and our solutions to them are the basis for a solid record on which all Republicans can run in 1984 with pride. The path we've followed is one that leads to prosperity and peace.

I came here today to urge Republican women to run for public office and to participate more actively in State and national Republican conventions, beginning with our Republican convention in 1984. You embody the goals that guide the Republican Party. You share the values that have made America the great nation she is. And you represent the future, a future of opportunity and equality.

Now is the time to become active. America's women have the right to the economic, political, and social power of this country. Exercise that right. And with the greatest encouragement I can summon, I urge you to declare your candidacy. I urge you to campaign on the issues that face us.

You know, it's no secret that in the last few years, Nancy and I have grown to view this area as home. The Santa Ynez Mountains and the beautiful coastline are as precious to us as I know they are to you. One of the nice things about living here is that we're represented in the Congress, as he told you, by Bob Lagomarsino, a man whose roots go very deep, a good and decent man who reflects the values and traditions of this unique part of California.

In '74 Bob won his seat in the Congress. And by the time I arrived, 2\1/2\ years ago, he was already well accustomed to fighting the growth of Federal taxes and spending. In fact, when it comes to responsible government, to keeping control of the budget and taxes, few in the Congress can boast a record that is equal to Bob's.

Now, I may have to fish around in my notes here for what I'm going to say next, because -- well, you get the idea when I tell you that what I was going to say, with his help, we've managed to turn around an economic situation that was destroying much of what we know and love about this blessed land. And when I say ``with his help,'' though, I mean he was instrumental to the whole game plan.

Bob is a member of the House Republican leadership group, and that's why we meet frequently, because they come down and we get together there on the problems and how we as a minority are going to have our way. And we've done pretty well at it. Some of those problems Bob talked about, we were told, were unsolvable. I've just come from speaking to a group of Republican women in San Diego, and I explained to them why maybe some of them turned out to be solvable.

You know, inflation was supposed to be institutionalized, couldn't get rid of it in less than decades. Well, we just didn't know that, so we did it. [Laughter] And it's been, as he told you, running at those double digits, and now down to the 2.4 percent. Government spending -- he left that out -- was running at 17 percent a year -- increasing at 17 percent a year, and we've cut that by 40 percent. Taxes were rising faster than people's incomes, pushing working people into tax brackets that had been reserved for the wealthy only a short time before.

The Federal tax take doubled in just the 5 years of 1976 to 1981. But that's been turned around, too, with the 25-percent cut across the board. And beginning in 1985, your taxes -- and it's already been passed, so it will go into effect automatically -- your taxes will be indexed to inflation so that never again can government make a profit on inflation off the people of this country.

And you were told by Bob about the growth, the increase in housing and in construction and in retail sales and auto sales and all of those things. Last quarter, the economy grew by 9.2 percent, and that was a much bigger jump than had been expected. As a matter of fact, they had to announce it twice, because the first time they had it at 8.7, and then they had to correct themselves. It was 9.2. The leading economic indicators have been on the rise. Even unemployment has begun to drop. Last month gave us the biggest single monthly decline in unemployment in almost 24 years.

But Bob recognized early on the threat confronting America from the south. It's our sacred responsibility to see that Central America does not become a string of anti-American, Marxist dictatorships. And I pledge to you right now, we don't intend to let that happen. We will stick by our friends, helping them develop their democratic institutions and to strengthen their economies, while at the same time we will provide them what they need to defend themselves. We don't intend to let Soviet-supported Marxists shoot their way into power in those countries of the Americas. To do that would be to gamble with our country's security and with our children's future.

You know, it's strange that the last few days I've been reading that because I have spoken to some groups of our fine Hispanic Americans that, well, I'm doing this all now just in the interest of trying to fence build and because there's an election year coming and so forth. How many remember that within 24 hours after I announced my candidacy in 1979, I made a speech outlining my dream for the Americas? -- that these borders that separate us here in the Americas are separating us, even though we're all Americans from the South Pole to the North Pole. We all worship the same God; we all have the same pioneer heritage. And my dream has been -- and that's why I have continued and why I went to South and Central America a year ago to talk to the leaders there.

Yes, we've proposed plans before of what we could do. But always it was the big colossus of the north coming down with our idea and saying, ``Hey, here's what everyone should do.'' Well, I went down there and asked them what we should do. I said, ``How can we recognize that we are, even when we cross a border into another country here in this hemisphere, we're among Americans. And I said, ``Maybe you think that we've taken that name for ourselves because we call ourselves Americans. But,'' I said, ``that's just because of the name we picked for our country.

Well, I must conclude, but I just want to say due to the disgraceful redistricting that we've gone through here in California, redistricting that hit even new lows in the annals of power politics, Bob is in the fight of his political life. And we need him, and therefore, he needs all of us.

Lagomarsino is a man whom I respect, and I'm proud to be here helping any way that I can in supporting him today, because he has been of great support to all that we've accomplished and all that we're trying to do there in Washington.

Twenty years ago today, a quarter of a million Americans peacefully and prayerfully assembled in the shadow of the Lincoln Memorial for a noble cause. They asked only what all of us ask of our country: that it live up to its high ideals, those cherished ideals of freedom, human dignity, opportunity, and brotherhood that gave birth to the United States. It was a moving moment in American history, and those of us who witnessed it will never forget it.

Although the emphasis of the 1963 March on Washington was on the rights of black Americans, the values that were appealed to are shared by us all -- the goal of a more just, more abundant, more free society that Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr., so eloquently spoke of on that day. In the last 20 years, great progress has been made. It is fitting that on this anniversary we should give thanks for that progress, and to those who sacrificed so much to bring it about. But much remains to be done.

America, mankind's last, best hope for freedom, is a special place, a place where so many dreams have come true. Today, let us resolve anew to do everything we can, in our time, to continue to fulfill Dr. King's dream -- a dream that all men and women of good will, black and white alike, share with all their hearts.

Senate bill 46, which I have signed into law, is a major step forward in this administration's efforts to revitalize the United States merchant marine and shipping industry. The bill modernizes and simplifies the marine safety and seamen's welfare laws administered by the Coast Guard. This legislation is remarkable in that it culminates more than 50 years of effort to make these laws more understandable by the regulated public and by the administering agency.

States Code. Title 46 is a confusing collection of statutes that have been enacted throughout the history of this nation. Some of the provisions date back to 1790 and were among the first laws passed by the Congress. Many of the provisions have outlived their usefulness. Those that are still relevant are poorly organized and confusing. Because of their complexity, these laws are difficult for the Coast Guard to administer. Individuals subject to the requirements are often unsure of their rights and obligations. Understanding these laws is a difficult task, even for an experienced maritime attorney. The Supreme Court has labeled these laws a ``maze of regulations.'' S. 46 eliminates this maze.

S. 46 represents a truly nonpartisan effort. Without the cooperation of both Houses of Congress, industry, labor, and the maritime bar, I would not be signing this bill today. This is an important step, but much still needs to be done to help the United States merchant marine and shipping industry revitalize itself. This is a priority goal of the Department of Transportation and of my administration. Therefore, I look forward to rapid enactment of the administration's maritime promotional, deregulatory, and reauthorization legislation.

Last June, the 19th of June to be exact, a well-known TV network producer was the commencement speaker at the high school where he had graduated on that same day, June 19th, 43 years ago. In speaking to this year's graduates, he pointed out some things that should be of concern to them regarding the state of the world. They were items taken from the front page of a June 19th issue of the New York Times, their graduation day.

He said, ``In Washington, the administration is asking for more money, not to fight cancer or educate young people, but more money to build some of the most destructive weapons the world has ever seen.'' Not very reassuring for a high school graduate hoping to live to an old age, and not very reassuring, either, to have a President who is called a warmonger.

The President being called a warmonger was Franklin Delano Roosevelt, who kept increasing the defense budget. The Japanese threat was military, not economic, and Ford was going into the fighter plane business. And, oh, yes, the European country that was being crushed was France, not Poland.

The Middle East peace initiative which we announced almost a year ago is definitely alive and available to those parties willing to sit down together and talk peace. We remain committed to the positions we set forth, and we stand ready to pursue them in the context of the Camp David accords. Those positions are in the best long-term interests of all parties. Most importantly, they're the only realistic basis for a solution that has thus far been presented.

The establishment of new Israeli settlements in the occupied territories is an obstacle to peace, and we're concerned over the negative effect that this activity has on Arab confidence in Israel's willingness to return territory in exchange for security and a freely and fairly negotiated peace treaty.

We will help Israel defend itself against external aggression. At the same time, the United States believes, as it has always believed, that permanent security for the people of Israel and all the peoples of the region can only come with the achievement of a just and lasting peace, not by sole reliance on increasingly expensive military forces.

Unfortunately, the opportunities afforded by our initiative have yet to be grasped by the parties involved. We know the issues are complex, the risks for all concerned high, and much courageous statesman -- statesmanship, excuse me, will be required. Nevertheless, those complex issues can be resolved by creative and persistent diplomacy. Those risks can be overcome by people who want to end this bitter and tragic conflict. And in the process, the United States will be a full partner, doing everything we can to help create a just and lasting peace.

We are shocked and grieved by the deaths of the U.S. marines in Lebanon. They died while serving the United States in its efforts to help the Lebanese Central Government restore order to the greater Beirut area. We condemn those who are responsible for the continuing violence, which has claimed many victims, including our own marines. Our forces are there at the request of the Government of Lebanon in helping to provide security for the Lebanese people. Once more we call on all elements to end this senseless violence and unite behind the Lebanese Government to restore national harmony.

The President was informed this morning at 1:55 a.m. Pacific time at the ranch by national security adviser Bill Clark. This notification took place 1 hour and 6 minutes after the incident occurred in Beirut. The President expressed profound sorrow, terming the death of two U.S. marines as tragic. The President paid tribute to the courage of the marines in their role as peacekeepers. The President will shortly speak by telephone to the families of the two marines, expressing his and Mrs. Reagan's personal condolences and sorrow.

Secretary of Defense Caspar Weinberger, as well as Bill Clark. At the President's direction, a national security group, composed of representatives of the departments and agencies most involved in this matter, was convened in Washington this morning. The purpose was to review the current situation in Beirut and to make additional recommendations on the U.S. role in continuing to pursue the peaceful withdrawal of all foreign forces from Lebanon.

The President directed a meeting of the administration's most senior officials be convened this afternoon in Washington to continue the review. I would anticipate the President will confer with the Vice President following that meeting.

The President has directed his staff to inform the congressional leadership and the chairmen and ranking members of the Armed Services Committees and the Foreign Relations Committee members on the situation.

Not only during this week, but throughout the year, we should continue to seek that ``more perfect union'' which will establish justice and insure domestic tranquility for each of us and our future generations through the Constitution.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-ninth day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-three, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eighth.

Forces in Lebanon to participate in the Multinational Force (MNF) requested by the Government of Lebanon. The presence of this Force was designed to facilitate the restoration of Lebanese Government sovereignty and authority, and thereby further the efforts of the Government of Lebanon to assure the safety of persons in the area and bring to an end the violence that had tragically recurred. I directed this deployment pursuant to my constitutional authority with respect to the conduct of foreign relations and as Commander-in-Chief of the United States Armed Forces.

We have periodically provided Congress with updated information on the activities of these forces and on the circumstances of their deployment in Lebanon. In light of recent events, I am providing this further report on the deployment, in accordance with my desire that Congress continue to be informed on this matter, and consistent with Section 4 of the War Powers Resolution.

On August 28, sporadic fighting between Lebanese Armed Forces and various armed factions took place in South Beirut; from time to time during the course of this fighting, positions in the vicinity of the Beirut airport manned by U.S. Marines of the MNF came under small-arms fire (without injury to U.S. personnel), and this fire was returned. On August 29, fighting erupted again. Marine positions came under mortar, rocket, and small-arms fire, with the result that two Marines were killed and fourteen wounded. In addition, several artillery rounds fell near the U.S.S. IWO JIMA (an amphibious support vessel lying offshore), with no resulting damage or injuries. As contemplated by their rules of engagement, U.S. Marines returned fire with artillery, small arms, and, in one instance, rocket fire from a helicopter gunship. There were additional exchanges of fire earlier today, August 30, without injury to U.S. personnel.

Later today, a ceasefire came into effect in the area in which the Marines were deployed, and firing on Marine positions ceased. Diplomatic efforts are underway to extend this ceasefire. In the meantime, U.S. forces will be prepared to exercise their right of self-defense should such attacks recur.

I believe that the continued presence of these U.S. forces in Lebanon is essential to the objective of helping to restore the territorial integrity, sovereignty, and political independence of Lebanon.

I wish you and the crew of the Challenger Godspeed on your historic journey. Like those other select Americans who at heroic risk to themselves traveled into space before you, you will have the minds and hearts of your fellow countrymen -- and of the world -- with you.

Betty R. Sepulveda is a former administrator for the Denver Public Schools, where she served as an instructional consultant for language development in the office of curriculum. She resides in Denver, Colo., and was born January 26, 1923. This is a reappointment.

Three years have passed since the working class of Poland challenged the whole might of a modern totalitarian state and without shedding one drop of blood won the right to have their own free trade unions. In the 15 months of its legal existence, Solidarity offered a ray of hope that people who had no other weapons but their courage and determination may gain more freedom for themselves and thus bring about a more peaceful and secure world.

It seemed for a moment that such hopes were dashed in December 1981, when the military regime of General Jaruzelski, acting under strong pressure from the Soviet Union, introduced a state of war, and the legal structure of Solidarity was destroyed by force. But such an assessment was wrong. The 13th of December 1981 did not mark the end of the Polish quest for freedom.

One more thing has to be said on this occasion. In spite of the great intensity of hostile feelings generated by repressive measures, there was not one single case of violence against the oppressive regime in Poland. Solidarity has remained a nonviolent, massive popular movement which is renouncing the use of force or any attempts to overthrow the government. In our world tormented by terrorism, this is in itself a remarkable achievement.

Government will have to recognize that Polish problems can be solved not by intimidation, but only on the basis of reconciliation with this proud and courageous people. If the Polish Government makes tangible progress toward this end, we are prepared to reciprocate with concrete steps of our own.

To us Americans, Solidarity should serve as a reminder of the power of ideas born out of peoples' readiness to accept sacrifices and to face risks. The Poles are struggling for the common values which we cherish in our democratic society: for dignity and the rights of man and nations. They can proudly repeat their old motto: for your freedom and ours.

Well, listen, congratulations on a successful and a spectacular night launch. Every one of these launches of the shuttle is a spectacular and a noteworthy event, but this one has certainly its share of firsts. I know it was touch and go with the weather, but you were launched right on schedule, and I think about 250 million Americans breathed a great sigh of relief.

And you will serve as a role model for so many others, and be so inspirational that I can't help but express my gratitude to you. And then Bill, at 54, is the oldest astronaut to ever fly in space. You have an especially warm place in my heart. It makes me think that maybe some day I might be able to go along.

National Satellite, which I understand will bring a broad range of communication and weather resources to the people of India and serves as a good example of international cooperation in space. But on behalf of all our people, I want to thank you all for your courage, your commitment to space research. You've set a fine example for all our young people, who represent our hope for the future.

Now, I know that this call came -- I caught you on your way to your bunks for some well-deserved sleep, so I better cut this short. I just wanted to let you know that we're all looking forward to another successful mission and to your safe landing here in California on Labor Day.

The Comparability Act gives me the authority to propose an alternative adjustment in lieu of comparability on the basis of ``economic conditions affecting the general welfare.'' Under that authority, in accordance with our economic recovery program, I am submitting to the Congress an Alternative Plan for a 3.5 percent increase in Federal white collar pay effective in January, 1984 in lieu of the 21.51 percent increase indicated under current comparability calculation methods.

The United States has made clear to the Soviet Government in a series of high-level messages that it accepts the Soviet Union's June 29 proposal and is prepared for serious talks in Vienna on outer space, including antisatellite weapons. We have expressed our view that the problem of weapons in space cannot be considered in isolation from the overall strategic relationship, but that we have no preconditions for the Vienna agenda.

States has rejected the Soviet proposal. The latest Moscow press briefing repeated these charges, despite the clear statement of the United States position in a series of high-level messages conveyed to the Soviet Government in diplomatic channels.

In our communications with the Soviets, we have stated our view that their proposal for a conference on the militarization of outer space is an excellent idea and that we are prepared to have a U.S. delegation in Vienna on September 18 to engage in such negotiations.

We recently presented a proposal for a possible joint Soviet-American announcement on the content and objective of the Vienna talks. This proposal states explicitly that the aim of the talks should be to work out and conclude agreements concerning the militarization of outer space, including antisatellite systems and other aspects of this issue.

In response to the Soviet proposal of a mutual moratorium on antisatellite tests from the outset of the talks, the United States expressed a readiness to have our negotiators consider what mutual restraints would be appropriate during the course of negotiations. The latest Soviet statements have converted this proposal into a precondition, a transformation which suggests a disingenuous Soviet approach. We continue to believe that possible mutual restraints are an appropriate subject for the negotiations; the joint statement, however, should not prejudge the outcome of these negotiations.

The Soviet Union has repeatedly misrepresented the U.S. position regarding the opening of arms control talks between our two countries in Vienna. From this latest Soviet statement, it appears that the Soviets were not serious about their proposal. We regret this. As noted above, we have consistently accepted their proposal to meet in Vienna. We prefer that this matter be dealt with in diplomatic channels.

Following a working lunch, the White House announced that the President and the Archbishop exchanged views on a number of issues, including East-West relations, the situation in Central America, and recent events in Poland.

Government on July 21. He believes that it represents a significant move in the direction of national reconciliation in Poland. Therefore, in accordance with his step-by-step approach for dealing with the Polish situation, he has decided to take two steps.

First, the President has authorized the lifting of the ban on landing rights for regularly scheduled flights by the Polish state airline, LOT, subject to the regularization of our civil aviation relationship, and the full reestablishment of scientific exchanges between the United States and Poland.

Second, the President has indicated that complete and reasonable implementation of the amnesty decision will create a positive atmosphere that would allow the reactivation of Poland's application for membership in the International Monetary Fund. The United States would, of course, consider any final application on its merits, including Poland's willingness to fulfill the obligations of IMF membership.

The purpose of our sanctions has from the very beginning been to encourage movement away from confrontation toward reconciliation in Poland. While the United States remains concerned with the situation in Poland, we view the Polish Government's amnesty declaration as a potentially positive development.

The United States is prepared to take further positive steps in response to further significant movement toward national reconciliation in Poland. In the meantime, we will be consulting with our NATO allies and others on the situation in Poland and a Western response to it.

When he accepted the Democratic nomination, he declared that he will increase your taxes. He said it several times since. But he still hasn't said exactly how. He has, however, come close to saying how much he would raise your taxes.

It takes a little calculation, but here's how it all adds up. The Democratic nominee has said he accepts deficit projections of over $200 billion a year, as far as the eye can see. Now, I don't accept them. And if we can keep our economy growing strongly, no one will have to. But he says he accepts them.

Senator John Glenn, on the other hand, said the cost of the Democratic nominee's promises would really come to somewhere between $90 and $170 billion. The Wall Street Journal reported estimates of experts that the amount of increased spending would come closer to $90 billion. So, let's use that for working purposes.

The Democratic nominee says he will make some budget cuts. He says he'll cut defense, health care, and agriculture programs by a total of $55 billion to $65 billion. And although his plan isn't likely to produce them, he says he expects interest savings of $15 billion to $20 billion. Now, that would bring his total savings to less than $90 billion. So, when you add it all up, the Democratic nominee's savings, assuming he would achieve them, still don't quite add up to enough to pay for the likely cost of his promises. And the deficits would be even higher than he assumes, except for one thing -- there's another element to all this, another promise.

The Democratic nominee says he'll cut those deficits by two-thirds. How? By raising taxes. He says he estimates increased taxes of ``at least $60 billion.'' He says he would get these by doing such things as deferring indexation, capping the third year of your tax cut, and adding a tax surcharge -- all supposedly targeted at higher income taxpayers. Well, the truth is he'd need an increase of more than twice his $60 billion, an increase of $135 billion to square with his promises. That averages $1,500 in increased taxes for every American household, and one way or another, that means you. It's the same tired old formula -- tax and tax to spend and spend.

I think the Democratic nominee owes the American people not a partial explanation, but a full explanation of how and where he expects to get that $1,500 more per household, over $135 billion in increased taxes. That's the secret that should be brought to light.

My approach to deficit reduction is entirely different, and it's no secret. We should reduce deficits first and foremost by continuing our economic growth and by reducing wasteful government spending.

Through the Grace commission, for example, we've developed 2,478 recommendations of possible ways to reduce spending without hurting the needy. These recommendations are no secret. We've made them public. We've already begun to implement almost 20 percent of them.

As for taxes, my approach there is also well-known and no secret. We have already reduced personal income tax rates for all Americans by 25 percent. That has not only lightened your burden, it's helped give us the strong economic growth, without inflation, that we now enjoy.

Our tax cuts have meant more money for you to spend and invest and for you to save and use as you wish; more money to create jobs and expand the economy. I mean to keep that growth going and not stifle it with a new burden of taxes. And I mean to simplify the tax system and broaden its base so that we can bring income tax rates further down, not up. That, too, is no secret. I announced it in this year's State of the Union Address to the Congress.

Finally, let me tell you one more thing that should be no secret in case the Democrats talk of so-called secret plans has you worried. I will propose no increase in personal income taxes, and I will veto any tax bill that would raise personal tax rates for working Americans or that would fail to make our tax system simpler or more fair.

As I have stated on a number of occasions, nuclear proliferation would pose a severe threat to international peace, regional and global stability, and the security interests of the United States and other countries. I continue to regard the prevention of the spread of nuclear explosives as a fundamental national security and foreign policy objective, and I remain firmly committed to the pursuit of policies designed to advance our non-proliferation goals.

Mr. Kaiser graduated from the University of Michigan (B.A., M.A.). He served as an assistant professor of speech and broadcasting at the State University of New York and was director of radio and television at Lehigh University.

Widening Horizons, a volunteer organization which emphasized the importance of career development and planning for inner-city youth. She was a teacher in Montgomery County, MD, where she developed a program for disadvantaged students, promoting language development and skills with creative arts as a teaching tool.

The President has been following congressional action on the armaments supplemental bill with regard to funding for Central America. He was quite pleased with the strong support yesterday in the Senate for this funding, evidenced by overwhelming votes against proposed amendments to delete or reduce funds for Central America.

He also noted a favorable action by the House Appropriations Foreign Operations Subcommittee in approving most of the military aid for El Salvador requested for fiscal year '85 and a significant portion of the economic aid requested for El Salvador for fiscal year '85.

Together, the fiscal year '84 supplemental and fiscal year '85 bills provide over a 2-year period the economic assistance to stabilize and stimulate recovery in Central American economies, lay the foundation for long-term development, and permit military assistance necessary to provide security essential to protect that economic growth. These vitally urgent programs should not be delayed.

The Agreement is the first complete income tax treaty between the two countries. A limited treaty concerning the taxation of income from international shipping and air transportation, signed at Beijing on March 5, 1982, was approved by the Senate on July 27, 1983 and is now in force.

The Agreement will contribute to a long-run expansion of economic relations between the two countries by providing clear rules as to the tax consequences of investing or working in the other country. It reduces the tax which residents of one country must pay to the other on certain types of income, such as dividends, interest, and royalties and provides limited exemptions for visiting teachers, researchers and students. The Agreement also assures nondiscriminatory taxation in the host country, and provides a mechanism for cooperation between the tax authorities to try to resolve any potential problems of double taxation.

You might remember that I recently asked the House Democratic leadership to permit a vote on equal access and to permit votes on five other legislative measures important to you and your families that they, the Democratic leadership, had bottled up. Well, the Congress recessed yesterday, and the House Democratic leaders are returning to their districts. Some of these leaders and other Democrats have been campaigning on what they call their ``new realism.'' But before they give too many speeches about all the wise things they promise to do for America, I want to give you a little report card on what they in fact did do -- or, rather, did not do -- as their new realism was put to the test.

Of those six important pieces of legislation we requested, specific measures to help reduce deficits, reward hard work and thrift, make your neighborhoods and cities safer, and increase personal liberties, only one was voted on -- the equal-access bill. Equal access was only voted on after a majority of the House, led by the late Carl D. Perkins, defied the Democratic leadership, which continued to resist right up to the bitter end.

When the Democratic leadership keeps saying no to America, they show how far they are from new realism and how far they've drifted from mainstream thinking. We asked for a vote on a constitutional amendment mandating a balanced Federal budget. We will insist that the Congress move toward a balanced budget, not by imposing new taxes on your families, but by spending within its means and allowing economic growth to continue.

The overwhelming majority of Americans agree with this position, but the House Democratic leaders don't. They don't want spending restraint, because their party has made so many campaign promises, promises they intend to fund by raising your taxes more than $1,500 per household.

We asked for a vote on our enterprise zones bill to provide incentives for people to invest, work, hire, and start up new businesses in economically distressed areas. This measure has been passed twice by the Republican Senate. It's supported by a majority of Members in the House, including many Democrats, and by a broad coalition of community leaders. We're ready to designate 75 zones to create opportunity, independence, and hope for our neediest citizens. But the Democratic leadership said no.

We asked for a vote on our proposal granting spouses working in the home the same individual retirement right, IRA's, as spouses working outside the home. Each could save and exclude from taxation up to $2,000 a year. The House Democratic leadership said no.

We asked for a vote allowing tuition tax credits for low- and middle-income parents who pay to send their children to parochial or independent schools, while also paying their full share of taxes to support public schools. The House Democratic leadership said no.

And we asked for action on our comprehensive anticrime package to crack down on criminals through new restrictions on bail, tougher sentencing, and stricter enforcement of drug trafficking laws. This bill passed the Senate 91 to 1, but the House Democratic leadership said no.

You might be interested to know what House Speaker Tip O'Neill has called these proposals for a balanced budget, expanded IRA's, enterprise zones, tuition tax credits, tougher law enforcement, and equal access for students. He says they're ``a right-wing agenda.'' Does the Democratic leadership truly believe that common sense in budgeting and greater opportunity and security for people is a right-wing agenda?

All this has gotten me to thinking about a great Democrat. Just 36 years ago, Harry Truman called the 80th Congress the ``do-nothing Congress.'' One thing is sure: Harry Truman wasn't afraid of the American people. He wasn't afraid of democracy, of putting issues to the test of a vote. Were he with us now, I think he would relish the chance to run against those who proclaim a new realism and then do nothing.

I have signed H.R. 559, the Insider Trading Sanctions Act of 1984. This legislation makes several important changes to the Federal law governing insider trading in securities. Most important, it strengthens the penalties for violating Federal securities fraud law, which reflects my commitment to enforcing all our country's laws -- both on Main Street and Wall Street.

The U.S. securities markets are the fairest in the world. Insider trading is the exception, not the rule. Nevertheless, abuses by insiders and those who receive their tips erode investor confidence in the securities markets. Public investors may be less willing to place their money at risk in securities if they believe that other traders, unlawfully utilizing material nonpublic information, have unfair advantages.

The legislation authorizes the Securities and Exchange Commission to seek a new civil penalty against persons who violate existing provisions of law in connection with certain purchases or sales of securities. This bill also increases the maximum criminal penalty for any violation of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 to $100,000, adds commodities law violations as the basis for statutory disqualification under that act, and authorizes the Commission to remedy proxy and tender offer violations administratively.

This bill responds to two deeply felt concerns of this administration: first, the need to improve the quality of science and mathematics education in our country and, second, the need to restore freedom of religious speech for students attending public schools.

Science, mathematics, and technology have special importance in this country. Our economic and military strength, as well as our health and well-being, depend to a great extent on continuing developments in these areas. If we are to maintain our strength and independence, we cannot afford to allow our skills in these fields to diminish. Yet the disturbing fact is that the quality of science and mathematics education in our nation is declining, due in large part to a growing shortage of qualified science and mathematics teachers.

The administration has also already established a program of Presidential Awards for Excellence in Science and Mathematics Teaching, similar to the one in H.R. 1310. I am very pleased to see that this bill emphasizes the critical importance of teacher training in improving the quality of science and mathematics education in activities authorized for the Department of Education and in endorsing the excellent ongoing science, mathematics, and engineering programs of the National Science Foundation.

I am also very pleased to approve the equal-access provisions of the bill. It has been the consistent policy of this administration to support the right of students in public secondary schools to meet voluntarily for religious purposes in school facilities during noninstructional periods, a right which this bill recognizes. I believe the equal-access provisions of this bill represent an appropriate balance among the free speech rights of students in public secondary schools, the prohibition against government establishment of religion, and the need to maintain in our public schools an orderly environment which is conducive to learning. These provisions honor, in a public school setting, this country's heritage of freedom of thought and speech, and I am delighted that they now become the law of the land.

H.R. 1310 is far from a perfect bill. It has a number of serious weaknesses: It is too expensive; it authorizes too many complex and administratively burdensome programs; it duplicates some existing activities; it authorizes unnecessary or inappropriate programs that are unrelated to improving science and mathematics instruction in our country; and it denies State and local governments the broad flexibility and decisionmaking authority they need to address local educational needs in the most effective manner.

I want to make clear that my approval of H.R. 1310 does not indicate endorsement of the objectionable provisions of the bill. Nor will I feel compelled to request funding at the excessive levels authorized by H.R. 1310. I believe, however, that the need to enhance the quality of science and mathematics instruction and to protect the rights of public school students to free speech, including religious speech, tips the balance in favor of approval.

Lumber Co. He is a lieutenant colonel in the Air Force Reserve and is coordinator of admission counseling, downstate Illinois, for the United States Air Force Academy. He is immediate past president of the U.S. Conference of Mayors.

I have reduced the tax burden on the American people, and I want to reduce it even further. I have no plan to raise taxes, nor will I allow any plan for a tax increase. My opponent has spent his political life supporting more taxes and more spending. For him, raising taxes is a first resort. For me, it is a last resort.

Therefore, I will use the power and authority of the Office of the President to: (1) continue strong economic growth, (2) eliminate wasteful government spending, and (3) reduce the size of government, as the means to reduce the deficit. As I said at my last press conference, after -- and only after -- wasteful government spending has been reduced to its absolute minimum would I consider raising taxes to eliminate any gap between revenues and expenditures. Even then, I would not consider raising the personal income taxes of working Americans.

This election will offer the American people a sharp contrast between my opponent, who promises to raise taxes, and me, who will do everything I can to avoid having to. And if the Congress would give the President of the United States line-item veto authority -- which 43 State Governors now have -- and pass a constitutional amendment mandating a balanced budget, the deficit could satisfactorily be reduced by reducing wasteful Federal spending instead of raising the taxes of the American people.

My opponent has said that he will reduce the deficit by two-thirds in 4 years. To do this, and fulfill his campaign promises to various interest groups for additional spending, will require that taxes be increased by over $135 billion. My opponent owes the American people an explanation of exactly how and why he would impose this enormous and stifling burden of additional taxes on the American people -- over $1,500 in additional taxes for every American household.

A. A President of the United States should never say never, but a tax increase has always been for me a last resort. I will first want to do everything I can to reduce the deficit by keeping our economy growing and reducing wasteful Federal spending.

A. I have no plans for a tax increase in 1985 or beyond. And as I said in my press conference, the only time I would consider a tax increase in order to reduce the deficit would be if I felt we had reduced wasteful government spending to the absolute minimum.

Q. Mr. President, on August 6 the Vice President was asked if you were keeping your options open on taxes except for an increase in the personal income tax. He said, ``Any President would keep his options open. Conditions can dramatically change one way or the other.'' Do you agree with that statement?

A. Yes, but that does not in any way lessen my strong opposition to increasing taxes. I would seek to reduce the deficit by continuing strong economic growth and reducing wasteful spending and doing everything I could to avoid raising taxes.

Thank you, Bill Simon, and thank you all very much. As the newest member of the team, I'm trying to figure out how I qualify. [Laughter] In high school, there was the 880 relay. But we only finished second in the State finals in that. And then there was swimming, but in my day we didn't do a flip turn. So, I'd have to learn that if I am going to qualify in that.

And you gave us moments that we'll never forget. There was Blatnick dropping to his knees in thanks. And Mary Lou Retton getting that perfect 10. There was Steinseifer and Hogshead hitting that wall at the exact same hundredth of a second. And Carl Lewis' smile when he tied Jesse Owens' record.

And I want to take a moment here to single out and say thank you to the uncelebrated story and the people -- your coaches and trainers, your parents and friends -- all the quiet people who stood behind you when the shot rang out and the race began. And, yes, those you may have defeated, but whose own efforts helped push you to do your best. Every hero knows that no hero does it alone. The people who stood behind you deserve our thanks. And the way I see it, there ought to be an Olympic event in moral support, and they'd get a perfect 10.

I want to say, too, that the city of Los Angeles did a marvelous job, and there are a lot of terrific people in this town. Just about everyone in this city had to put him-or herself out some way, one way or another, while the games were on. They not only did it; they did it with a smile. They won the admiration and the thanks of the entire country.

This is a good time also to thank the generous corporations that decided a few years back to contribute money and personnel and time to help our athletes. They proved that the profits reaped from a free economy can be used to help our young people compete on an even footing with the state-subsidized athletes of other countries. Those corporations did us proud. And so did Bill Simon, who led this great citizens effort. So did the Los Angeles Olympic Organizing Committee and the U.S. Olympic Committee.

The 23d Olympiad of the modern era is over, but it will never be forgotten. It was attended by more countries than ever before. There was more competition than ever before. There was more brilliant talent than ever before. And, as you know, a lot of records were broken.

The games were a triumph, a triumph of friendly and generous competition, a triumph of fellowship, and a triumph of the spirit. And it turned out that nothing could mar those games, nothing could detract. The only losers of the 23d Olympiad were those who didn't or couldn't come.

As for those who did, what greatness they and you all showed us. I know you're impressed by the athletes the other countries sent -- the South Korean boxers, the Chinese gymnasts, the Romanian athletes, the Jamaicans, the Japanese. For a lot of us, one of the really indelible images of the games was of Gabriela Andersen-Schiess of Switzerland walking dazed and dehydrated to the finish line, refusing to give up, pushing on even when all her strength was gone, summoning up just that last bit of reserve and crossing that line. She truly was heroic.

And I have just a final point here. One of the things I noted and liked so much as I watched the games on TV was that often in many of the events, you could sort out or figure out who represented what country, except with the American athletes. With the American athletes, we almost always had to see the U.S.A. on your uniforms, because our team came in all shapes and sizes, all colors and nationalities and races and ethnic groups. And I was thinking, you can talk on and read forever books about the melting pot; but the past 2 weeks, there it was winning medals for us, representing us every day -- 140 countries represented here in the only place in the world where those who are competing for this nation had the bloodlines and the background of more than those 140 countries.

And now, you remember that right before the games you gave me a gift of all your Olympic teams pins. And today I want to return the favor. I have a gift for the future U.S. Olympics Hall of Fame. It is the American eagle and is given to honor the members of America's team at the '84 games, because you've soared to greatness.

The President met this morning with a group of distinguished women leaders representing a cross section of the American Jewish community. Their discussion focused on foreign policy issues and concerns, including U.S.-Israeli relations. The President expressed his commitment to the security of Israel and his belief that the United States can play an important role in assisting the dialog between Israel and her neighbors.

Nairobi, marking the end of the United Nations Decade for Women, noting that while the original goals of the previous two United Nations Women's Conferences (in Mexico City in 1975 and Copenhagen in 1980) were noble, both conferences became dominated by political issues extraneous to these goals. Specifically, these conferences became fora for attacks on the State of Israel and an infamous association of Zionism with racism.

The President made clear today that the United States will actively oppose any conference agenda item which deviates from important women's issues and calls for the discussion of nongermane political issues, including any agenda item that could be used as a vehicle to defame Israel. The United States has consistently opposed such efforts, most recently at the United Nations Population Conference in Mexico City earlier this week.

Nairobi Conference which associates Zionism with racism. If, despite our efforts, such an agenda item is adopted, the United States will have no choice but to consider seriously canceling its participation in the conference.

Heckler -- and this administration are approaching the very important problem of child support enforcement. And with your help we hope to put the new authority for child support enforcement, provided by House Resolution 4325, into practice quickly and efficiently. The advice from this symposium should help us get things off to a running start.

It's an unfortunate fact of our times and one in four American children live in single-parent homes, and millions of these children endure needless deprivation and hardship due to lack of support by their absent parent. The failure of some parents to support their children is a blemish on America.

Understanding the situation, we've already moved forward to do what we can. In this administration, the Department of Health and Human Services has put a special emphasis on the Federal-State child support enforcement program. In 1983 this program collected some $2 billion in support for the children. Yet this is still only a portion of what is owed. And with billions of dollars still unpaid each year, our child support enforcement system needs new tools, new muscle, and new commitment throughout the Nation. And that's what this legislation is all about.

Last year, I proposed that we bolster our Federal-State child support system by mandating effective and proven collection practices. I believe that we should emphasize service to all children, welfare and nonwelfare alike, and improve incentives for State government to get the job done. The Child Support Enforcement Amendments bill contains all these features.

This legislation represents a significant break from the tradition of simply throwing tax money at a problem. Instead of creating more dependency on government, we're requiring responsible behavior by our citizens. And this is the kind of innovative and principled approach to problemsolving that will make a difference. It will not only make a difference in the lives of our children but for so many women who have been forced through no fault of their own on to welfare rolls due to abandonment. Left with the full load to bear, they often find themselves trapped in a cycle of unhappiness and destitution.

The goal of our efforts is not just the transfer of funds. We also hope to discourage abandonment and, if families do split up, to encourage the absent parents to invest time and love in their children. Permitting individuals to ignore parental obligations and giving the bill to the taxpayers in the form of higher welfare costs have been tantamount to a stamp of approval. And this is not the kind of message public policy should be sending out.

It's deeds, not words, that count. Many policies of the past were anything but supportive of the family. Programs like this, on the other hand, are not only aimed at justice for the children but also at encouraging ethical behavior and bolstering vital social institutions like the family.

We hope that by placing the responsibility where it should be, on the parent, people will be encouraged to make moral decisions. Our administration is trying to bring this kind of spirit to all its endeavors.

Congress has acted honorably, in the best bipartisan manner, for the benefit of children who really need the help. Many people deserve thanks on this occasion for what they've done to make this possible. Those of you here on the platform have earned a special word of appreciation.

Since the Congress is in recess, many other Members who worked long and hard on this bill can't be with us. And I want to express my special appreciation to Senate Finance Committee Chairman Dole, Senators Bill Armstrong and Russell Long, under whose able management the legislation passed in the Senate. In the House, Dan Rostenkowski, Carroll Campbell, Barbara Kennelly, and Barber Conable were instrumental in steering the bill through the legislative process.

State and local governments have also been a positive force, and I believe this legislation underscores a change that's taken place in the way we do things. As demonstrated by this symposium, we've developed new working partnerships with State and local government. And in the months ahead, that working relationship will be put to use to carry out this new law with maximum effectiveness.

And you've already heard a little bit of history about my home State of California and all, and it was a part of a key welfare overhaul reform at that time. And our success was what moved me to testify before the Senate Finance Committee in support of a nationwide child support enforcement system. So, as you can tell, I have a very special reason myself to celebrate today.

The Convention obligates States party to the Convention to prevent interception and distribution on or from their territory of program-carrying signals transmitted by satellite. The purpose of the Convention is to clarify the status of satellite signals, in view of the uncertain nature of the commitment with respect to satellite signals which States have undertaken by adhering to other conventions which bear on radio communications and copyright. The Convention does not impose obligations on States party to it with respect to signals emitted from a satellite and intended for direct reception by the general public (direct broadcast satellite signals) or with respect to purely private reception and viewing of program-carrying signals provided there is no further distribution of such signals.

Ratification of the Convention will constitute an important policy statement by the United States concerning the unauthorized interception and distribution of television programs transmitted by satellite and will benefit United States television program producers, distributors and broadcasters by extending to them protection in other countries party to the Convention from unauthorized distribution of their works transmitted by satellite. In view of these benefits, there is strong support for early ratification of the Convention by the U.S. industries concerned with the creation and dissemination of television and radio programs.

On August 26, 1920, the 19th Amendment, which guarantees women the right to vote, became part of the Constitution, the supreme law of our land. By that measure, women became equal partners with men in the responsibilities of citizenship.

In democracies, government is founded on popular consent, expressed through the process of free elections. Indeed, the absence of free and fair elections is a crucial element by which we define regimes that are not democratic. By exercising the right to vote, American women and citizens of other free countries continue to affirm their faith in self-government.

The 19th Amendment gives women the same political means as men have to participate in the process of self-government. On this 64th anniversary of its ratification, we honor the pioneer suffragettes, and we applaud today's women who are pioneering in fields new to women and men alike. Most importantly, we reaffirm our national commitment to the goal of equal opportunity for each individual to pursue and to achieve her or his goals.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 16th day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

Polish resistance to aggression throughout World War II had been courageous and uncompromising. As the Nazi forces retreated before advancing Soviet armies, the Polish Home Army that led the resistance seized its chance to throw off the Nazi yoke. For sixty-three days, the people of Warsaw fought against insurmountable odds, endured unimaginable suffering, and made countless sacrifices to regain their independence. Nevertheless, the lightly-armed resistance fighters were overwhelmed by the full weight of Hitler's war machine. The Nazis mercilessly crushed the uprising while Soviet forces passively looked on from across the Vistula River.

The example of those who fought for freedom during the Warsaw Uprising is a stirring chapter in history, as vivid today as it was then. The ongoing struggle of the faithful, the shipyard workers of Gdansk, the miners of Silesia, and farmers throughout the countryside is but a continuation of the proud history of the Polish quest for freedom.

It is right that we pay tribute to those who sacrificed all for independence and freedom. All of us who share their passion for freedom owe the heroic people of Warsaw and all of the valiant people of Poland a profound debt.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this seventeenth day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

The United States is a country in which people of many different heritages are bound together by a common dedication to democratic principles. The mosaic of ethnic diversity invigorates our culture and strengthens our society. For this reason, the Polish American Congress and other Polish American clubs and organizations across the country are celebrating August 1984 as Polish American Heritage Month.

Nation. Tadeusz Kosciuszko and Kazimierz Pulaski crossed the ocean to help the American colonies win their independence. Throughout the last two centuries, thousands of Polish Americans have fought bravely to help preserve that independence. Polish Americans have also made outstanding contributions in the arts, the sciences, and in industry and agriculture. Through these efforts they have helped in innumerable ways to establish a strong and free United States.

Americans of Polish descent take great pride in and honor two great world leaders who have their roots in Poland. Both Pope John Paul II and Lech Walesa, the Nobel Peace Laureate and founder of the Solidarity Labor Federation, have gained the world's respect and admiration. Solidarity has been continuing the Polish people's struggle for freedom since its founding in August 1980.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this 17th day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

Well, now I'd like to offer our apologies for having to postpone our program last month. I know that many of you'd made travel arrangements and that the changes in my schedule caused you some difficulties. I am, however, delighted that we're all here today and together for this important commemoration.

But today we pay tribute to a nation which for two centuries has struggled for freedom and independence. From the uprisings in 1794, the November uprising in 1830, and then again in 1863, the people of Poland demonstrated courage and a commitment to human liberty that inspired free men and women everywhere.

And this 200-year record of perseverance and bravery coincided with the development of our own precious liberty here in the United States, and that is no mere coincidence. Our two peoples drank from the same well of freedom, held dear the same Judeo-Christian values, respected the simple virtues of honesty and hard work. And even today, it's often noted that unlike many others, our two peoples take their religious convictions seriously. These heartfelt convictions have kept the spirit of freedom burning in our hearts, especially during times of great adversity.

The continuing suppression of the Polish national identity brought wave after wave of Polish immigrants to the United States. And for that, we can be grateful. We all know the list of contributions and the names of those who rose to great prominence. But just as important are the millions who came here and, with their hard work and with their moral strength, helped shape the American character.

During this century, Americans and Poles have stood side by side in those two conflagrations that swept the world. The First World War, unfortunately, did not end all wars, but it did result in the reestablishment of the Polish state.

This month, we commemorate a desperate battle of the Second World War, an heroic attempt by free Poles to liberate their country from the heel of Nazi occupation, and to protect it from postwar, foreign domination. For years they covertly resisted the occupation forces. And then in 1944, for 63 brutal and agonizing days, ill-equipped and overwhelmingly outnumbered, they -- and I could say, many of you -- held off the Nazi war machine. And it's fitting that we and all free people take special care to remember this occasion.

And today we honor three individuals, heroes of the Polish Home Army, never given their due after the allied victory. And it's my great honor to now present the Legion of Merit to the families or representatives of these men.

These brave men and the courageous individuals who fought under their command represent the best of the human spirit. They risked all for their ideals, for their God and country, at a time when the odds were so much against them. They're now part of the inspiring legacy of the Polish people.

If there's a lesson to be learned from the history books, it is that Poland may be beaten down, but it is never defeated. It may be forced into submission, but it will never give up. It may be pressured to acquiesce, but it will never accept foreign domination and the suppression of God-given freedom. After two decades of brutal foreign domination, we witnessed, just a short time ago, a resurrection of the indomitable spirit of the Polish people. And I assure you we have not forgotten and will never forget Solidarity and the freedom of the Polish people.

There are some, of course, who seem all too willing to turn a blind eye to Soviet transgressions, ostensibly to improve the dialog between East and West. But those who condemn firm support for freedom and democracy -- who, in order to prove their sincerity, would project weakness -- are no friends of peace, human liberty, or meaningful dialog.

First, let me state emphatically that we reject any interpretation of the Yalta agreement that suggests American consent for the division of Europe into spheres of influence. On the contrary, we see that agreement as a pledge by the three great powers to restore full independence and to allow free and democratic elections in all countries liberated from the Nazis after World War II, and there is no reason to absolve the Soviet Union or ourselves from this commitment. We shall continue to press for full compliance with it and with the Charter of the United Nations, the Helsinki Final Act, and other international agreements guaranteeing fundamental human rights.

Passively accepting the permanent subjugation of the people of Eastern Europe is not an acceptable alternative. In 1981, when it appeared that Poland would suffer a similar fate to that of Hungary in 1956 or Czechoslovakia in 1968, we raised our voices in support of the Polish people.

Many credit, trade, and fishing privileges extended to Poland, due to its somewhat broader degree of freedom than other Eastern European countries, were suspended. At the same time, we have assisted voluntary organizations to provide humanitarian aid through the Polish church to avoid hurting the very people we want to help.

In cooperation with the church, they've provided over $40 million worth of food, clothing, and medical supplies to the people of Poland. And I know that I speak for Nancy -- my wife is thrilled to have been selected honorary chairman for the Polish American Congress' Infant Charity Drive.

I've pledged that our sanctions can be lifted, one by one, in response to meaningful improvement of the human rights situation in Poland. For example, a complete and reasonable implementation of the Polish Government's amnesty decree would create a positive atmosphere that would allow reactivation of Poland's application for membership in the International Monetary Fund.

Polish church program to assist individual farmers. I am pleased to announce today that I am seeking support for a $10 million American contribution to the pilot phase of the church's program. And we will follow the progress of this program carefully to determine whether additional support should be forthcoming.

Europe, Radio Liberty, and the Voice of America. Our radio programming is becoming the mighty force for good that it was intended to be. As the Scriptures say, ``Know the truth and the truth will make you free.'' Well, our broadcast will carry the truth to captive people throughout the world.

The free peoples of the world are in ideological competition with the followers of a doctrine that rejects the basic tenets of freedom and declares the worship of God to be a social evil. As important as this competition is, until recently the democracies, including the United States, seemed paralyzed by uncertainty and lacking the will to compete.

In the last 3\1/2\ years, we've quit apologizing, and at long last we're standing up and being counted. As our United Nations Ambassador, Jeane Kirkpatrick, said, we've taken off our ``Kick Me'' sign. We're proud of our way of life; we're confident that freedom will prevail, because it works and because it is right. We believe the free peoples of the world should support all those who share our democratic values.

Parliament in London 2 years ago, has been established to encourage the democratic forces and the development of free institutions throughout the world. Its concerns include nonviolent, democratic movements like that of Solidarity in Poland.

And the rise of Solidarity is a matter of historic significance. It continues to be an inspiration of all free people that the Marxist-Leninist myth of inevitability is crumbling. Communism has brought with it only deprivation and tyranny. What happened in Poland is one sign that the tide is turning.

Mr. Korbonski. Mr. President, on behalf of former underground Home Army soldiers, who celebrate this month the 40th anniversary of the Warsaw uprising, in my native Poland and throughout the world, and who are presently here, I thank you very much for what you said about our history, about Warsaw uprising, about your understanding of the Yalta agreement, and about Solidarity, which, in my opinion, is also underground, but which fights for freedom and independence of Poland by other means than arms.

Your words broadcast to Poland by Voice of America and Radio Free Europe will bring a new inspiration, new hope, to our people in Poland. To what you said about the Warsaw uprising, I want only to add a few words.

Mr. President, 1984 is not a year for mourning. It is true that we have suffered tremendous human and material losses during the uprising. But they were well balanced by the immaterial, spiritual, moral gains. In these defeats, they were seeds of victory. Warsaw uprising demonstrated to the whole world the indomitable Polish spirit -- our unshakable will to live free and independent.

Mr. President, I, as the last chief of the Polish wartime underground State, thank you very much for bestowing these high American military decorations on our dead national heroes -- General Rowecki, Komorowski, and Okulicki, who were my close friends. And in order to express our gratitude for your unshakable support for the Polish cause, I have the great honor to decorate you with the Home Army Cross.

Something very bright and happy and hopeful has been happening across our country in recent days. We've watched a grateful nation shower its affection on those who showered us with glory -- our Olympic athletes.

Now, I've been accused of being an optimist, and it's true. All my life I've seen that when people like Mary Lou have a dream, when they have the courage and opportunity to work hard, when they believe in the power of faith and hope, they not only perform great feats, they help pull all of us forward as well.

Somehow, the idea that American progress begins with spirit and a willingness of the heart was ignored during the 1970's. The intellectual establishment was so busy demanding more power for government, more bureaucracy, regulation, spending and -- oh, yes -- more and more taxes, they forgot all about the secret of America's success -- opportunity for people, for all the people.

When the economy reached the point of collapse by the end of the seventies, they began talking about our crisis of spirit, about our malaise. But we hadn't given up hope; we just hadn't been allowed to hope.

But from the beginning, the old-guard establishment -- people who still make policy from abstract statistics, theories, and models rather than looking at the reality of human behavior -- have filled the airwaves with gloom, predicting our program couldn't meet our goals. And from the beginning, they've been wrong: When they said inflation and interest rates wouldn't come down, when they said recovery wouldn't come, when they said the expansion wouldn't last, and when they said the deficit wouldn't come down.

Recently, many liberal analysts have been reviewing our record and our prospects. Their message remains: ``hasn't worked; can't be done.'' So, when the Urban Institute came out with a study a few days ago, it was only natural that some of the press would look for the same old doom and gloom. For example, they didn't report that the study also said elderly Americans have clearly done better under our policies with real gains in disposable incomes, nor that the social safety net is still largely intact for the nonworking poor. Even the Urban Institute said there is no evidence that working welfare mothers who have been eliminated from the rolls are quitting their jobs to requalify for benefits, and that despite all the furor, it finds surprisingly few changes from 1980 with respect to the environmental, public lands, and water resources activities of the Federal Government.

And no one seems to mention that the centerpiece of our policy, the tax cut, was not fully in place until 1983. Our program has just begun. But let's look at the record since it has: over 6 million jobs created; a surge in investment and productivity; a record 600,000 business incorporations; the biggest increase in real after-tax personal income since 1973; and perhaps most important, a new spirit of optimism and confidence about America's future. It's clear that once people get a chance to show what they can do -- well, America got well and got strong.

What isn't clear is why those pessimists, with so little faith in people, so little understanding of incentives, and so many bad predictions, are not more humble and not treated a little more skeptically by the media.

In 1984 we face an historic choice. Will we heed the pessimists' agenda of higher taxes, more bureaucracy, and a bigger welfare state leading us right back to runaway inflation and economic decay, or will we continue on our new road toward a true opportunity society of economic growth, more jobs, lower tax rates, and rising take-home pay?

I believe the spirit we've seen during and after these Olympics reveals something very important about America. We believe in ourselves, we're hungry for real opportunity, and we're up to any challenge.

Thank you, Governor Bond. Before we get started, I want you to know how pleased I am to get a chance to meet with all of you here in Missouri. I know the Vice President, as Kit told us, has met some of you on the Governor's Advisory Council on Agriculture in Columbia last April. And I won't get to see the university on this trip, but I'm delighted to be here at the State fair.

Being a farmer has been anything but easy in these last several years. From our first day in office, we've been trying to help the farm community recover from past policy mistakes, economic difficulties, and I think we have turned a corner. With the task of writing up a new farm bill for 1985 before us, we're looking to get American farmers and agribusiness leaders' thoughts and ideas on the issues that we'll be addressing.

But he's heard from over 200 farmers, ranchers, and agribusiness representatives from all over the country, and he's received over 1,000 pages of written testimony. We think this input from those who know the farm business inside-out and whose lives are most affected by farm legislation will make our new farm bill the best that we've ever had.

And I told you of what Jack Block has been doing, the other information that he's been gathering, and I can assure you that all of these matters are going to be very much on our minds as we try to find an answer to this.

The one question there with regard to the deficit -- believe me, I've been making speeches out on the mashed-potato circuit for years about deficit spending. It was a regular part of government policy over the last 50 years. Now, all of a sudden, it isn't a part of government policy -- it's mine.

I want you to know in spite of all the things that you've heard, where someone has said that a tax increase is the first resort, tax increases in my book will always be a last resort. We have no plans for a tax increase. We are going to continue along the lines that we have in trying to get further government reductions in spending. We don't think that we have begun to get eliminated all the fat that is in government.

Peter Grace headed up a group to do something that we did in California, and we had 2,000 leaders from every activity volunteer to help in that. And that is the result, these recommendations. We have a task force working virtually around the clock on this -- we've already been able to implement some that we can just simply do administratively; many will take legislation -- but to see what of these -- we don't say that all of them are going to turn out to be things that are practical -- but to see how much we can implement these. And as I say, the goal is to get rid of the inefficiencies and the uneconomic things that government is doing.

You've spoken on a number of things that I've had some familiarity with myself -- soil erosion, and so forth. All of these, as I say, are going to get our best thinking on how we approach the new farm program. And there aren't any of us that are not aware of the basic importance of agriculture. It is the very basis of an economy any place. And the remarks about subsidized competition, believe me, we have been leaning on our friends from abroad quite heavily on this very matter and even have taken advantage of some opportunities, like one with regard to flour in Egypt recently, to show them that we weren't going to stand back and let this go on. We believe in free trade, but we believe in fair trade, and we're going to keep on.

One of the problems -- we're all very proud of the fact, and I think it's a great advantage that we've been able to reduce inflation. But on the other hand, when you had runaway inflation over the long period of time that you had, you had an economy that became geared to a continuing inflation. And the comedown from that has difficulties as well, just as you have spoken here with regard to depreciating land values once inflation has gone on to the downward trend. But we're going to keep on staying ahead of that.

And as to interest rates, I think there's been some indication just recently that the long-term notes, there has begun to be a certain slide. I have said before and I'll say again, I think the only justification for the high interest rates right now is the inability out in the money markets and the business community to believe that we really have gotten a handle on inflation. They're looking over their shoulder, and they're charging interest rates accordingly. And maybe the market recently is an indication that they're beginning to become true believers.

But we're not going to resort to a quick fix and try to get back to the old-fashioned way that we've had over the seven or eight recessions since World War II of an artificial stimulant to try and end the so-called recessions, and all they did was bring on another inflation -- or another recession a few years later that was worse than the one before. This time, I think we're on the way to a real recovery and a solid expansion. And you've got to be able to share in that, too. And we're going to do our utmost to see that you do.

Following the meeting, the President went to the shorthorn barn to view a livestock display and then proceeded to the coliseum, where he watched the Junior Champion Auction and addressed the fairgoers.

But there is another fact of life right now in this heartland: a powerful economic expansion which has given birth to millions of new jobs and a spirit of hope, but has not still spread thoroughly and throughout this farmbelt. And I've come today to see you, to meet with you, to listen to Missouri farmers and Governor Bond's Advisory Council on Agriculture, and to give you three important messages of my own.

First, after years of drift and decline and deepening despair, America is moving forward again. But our progress won't be complete, it won't be good enough, and we won't rest for 1 minute until all our people are moving forward together.

And the second thing I want to tell you is that we will make this progress together. We'll make it because our history tells us so. Those who've been proven right in the last 4 years are not the do-nothing pessimists who only see America wringing her hands; it's been the millions of hard-working achievers who see America raising her hands.

You know, we have so many strengths in this country, but I think the greatest are often ignored by those so-called Washington experts. Because I'm talking about a different kind of strength -- strength born of a dream, strength of motivation and confidence that ours truly is the freest land in the world. Ours is a society that rewards honest toil, risk-taking, and achievement, for the factory worker, the small businessman and, yes, the family farmer, because the promise for America is for everybody, no matter who you are, who your parents are, or what lonely corner of the world you may have come from.

We're strong because we still believe in a bedrock principle: We are a government of, by, and for the people, not the other way around. And we're strong because we know that true greatness begins with the deepest treasures of the human spirit, with faith and courage, with loyalty and love, with a quiet, unselfish devotion to our families, our neighbors, and our nation.

I couldn't help but think of these things as I watched our Olympic athletes. Didn't you get the feeling that the Soviets must have been relieved when the closing ceremonies for the Olympics were over? [Applause] But the one thing they'll never see is closing ceremonies for America.

These values reach deep into our national character. They're rooted in the lives of our parents and grandparents, of all those who settled these hills and tilled this good earth. And they live on each day in people like you in Sedalia, in Knob Noster, La Monte, Smithton, Pilot Grove, and in Sweet Springs.

The heritage of our past will bring forth the harvest of our future. And that's why there's a third message I want to give you: We must all move forward together. We will move forward together, and we'll do it by strengthening one of our most cherished, vital institutions -- the American family farm.

We know the problems that still haven't gone away. The threat of crippling droughts and floods is still with us and always will be. Credit burdens are still too heavy, largely because of high interest loans during the late seventies while the value of land that farmers use as collateral for their loans was dropped as inflation has come down, and that's keeping financing difficult.

The first, most important thing is that we got rid of a cynical, wrong-headed, totally unfair grain embargo. I seem to remember someone who now says he opposed the embargo in private, speaking a little differently in 1980. He said then, ``What we've done will really sting.'' Well, someone got stung, all right, but it wasn't the Soviets. They're still in Afghanistan. It was thousands like you who deserved better from your own government. And for the life of me, how do you show you're strong by punching yourself in the breadbasket?

But we're doing things a little differently. I believe our foreign policy reflects priorities that are based on common sense. One of my first actions as President was to remove the embargo, and we're doing our best to help you work your way back, strengthen your prices, increase your exports, and regain your reputation as reliable suppliers.

We've begun rebuilding -- [interruption] -- we've begun rebuilding America's defenses. And after all those years of shameful neglect, I can tell you that today America is more secure, and the men and women representing us in uniform are the brightest and the best that we've ever had.

But what we're trying hardest to do is to move aggressively to expand markets and open other markets that have been closed. [Interruption] Last November I met with Prime Minister Nakasone of Japan, and this spring our two countries reached an agreement that should virtually double American beef exports over the next 4 years.

So, we got rid of the grain embargo. We're going after the other barriers to American exports around the world. We took action and eliminated the huge crop surpluses that had piled up after the embargo. And we expect the value of agricultural exports this year will be up almost 10 percent over last year.

But remember, we've broken with tradition, we've resisted the quick fix, and that's making all the difference. With inflation low and confidence building that it will stay low, then I just have to believe that interest rates can come down more and will come down more.

We came to Washington with a radical idea: America's economic problems weren't caused by you living too well, they were caused by government living too well. So, we struggled to reduce personal tax rates by 25 percent, to provide help and hope to individuals, to small farms, and to family farmers who pay taxes by the personal rates. Next year, your taxes will be indexed so that government can never again profit from inflation at your expense by shoving you up into a higher tax bracket just because you got a cost-of-living pay raise.

Also, we believe it's not right for widows and children to lose what generations of love and toil have created. So, the estate tax exemption will increase to $600,000 by 1987, and of even greater help, there will be no estate tax for a surviving spouse.

Everything that we're trying to do is directed toward one challenge: to rekindle opportunity so everyone has a chance to pursue the American dream. America can only grow if you grow, can only prosper if you prosper; and America can only be strong if you are strong. And that's why I'll fight any attempt to destroy these reforms or to impose new taxes on your families. If the born-again budget balancers have discovered the meaning of frugality, let them start by imposing some frugality in Washington, DC, and not in Sedalia, Missouri.

For some people, tax increases are a first resort; for me, they'll be a last resort. Forgive me, but those who have forgotten about the grain embargo, forgotten about killer interest rates, forgotten about runaway inflation, forgotten about soaring fuel costs, and who now intend to increase taxes $1,500 per household if they're going to keep their promises -- Missouri is the Show Me State, not the Snow Me State.

We have no plans to raise taxes by any amount on anybody at any time -- period. Our plan is to make the tax system more simple, more fair, and, most important, to bring your tax rates further down. That's our idea of compassion.

And that's our idea of progress, too. For if we restrain spending, reduce tax rates further, and keep our economy growing by over 5 percent a year, we can sharply reduce the deficit through growth. Yes, it's a difficult but by no means impossible challenge.

So, I'd like to leave you with this thought: Let's take our cue from our Olympic athletes. Rather than punish success, rather than raise taxes, let us challenge America to raise her sights and reach for greatness. Let's go for the gold, let's go for growth.

You who struggle so hard and devote so much and give of yourselves to feed the hungry are a true light of hope for all the world. And through you, America can be the source of all the hopes and dreams that she was placed on this good Earth to provide. I thank you for what you do every day. I thank you for giving me this chance to be with you to share your joy and spirit.

The President. I have a feeling that I ought to quit right now while I'm way ahead. But it's great to be in the city of the Bengals and the Cincinnati Reds. It's great to know that Pete Rose has come back home. I talked to him on Air Force One coming out here.

Trumpy. And I'm heartbroken, because I have an invitation in my pocket that just came and that my schedule won't allow me to accept. And that was that Bob Howsam invited me to the ballgame tonight and said that I could broadcast a couple of innings, which I used to do for a living. But I'm afraid the schedule will have me a long way from here.

Oh, they tell me you've already met them, because I was going to ask them to stand up so you could say hello to Darell Pace and Betsy Mitchell and David Wilson and Kim Rhodenbaugh and Julie Isphording. The day after the Olympics closed, they gave me one of those jackets and made Nancy and me members -- honorary members of the team.

It's great also to be in a city that has become a symbol of the economic renaissance that's been sweeping our country. I'm happy to be here, because Cincinnati has always been very kind to visitors, who are almost always impressed by what Cincinnati has to offer.

And let me say that I don't have to visit Ohio to benefit from the good judgment and support of the Taft family. Back in Washington I have the help of William Howard Taft IV. He is an appointee in our Department of Defense.

Cincinnati's thriving. You're not in economic recovery; you're in economic expansion. Just look around, look around at all this construction, at the gleaming office towers and the shops and the restaurants below. I understand that 67 new businesses have been created here in the central business district since 1980. The building trades are booming. In the last 4 years, 16,000 new jobs have been created here, and it's estimated that over the next 4 years another 7,000 new jobs will be added. You put that all together, and you realize Cincinnati's a modern boomtown. And she's not alone.

Now, none of this happened by accident. None of it happened by chance. It took hard, concerted effort by the leaders, the builders, business and working people of your city. Men like Tom Nies, who started out 15 years ago with $600 and what he called ``an impossible dream.'' He was a worker at IBM. His field was computers; but he loved Cincinnati, and he wanted to stay here. So, he started his own company, Cincom Systems, and it has grown by leaps and bounds.

Well, a healthy America is one in which individuals can choose the work they want, start a business if they want -- and those businesses can create jobs. And the jobs create a demand for housing and services, and that in turn creates more jobs as the healthy spiral continues.

Let me tell you more about that healthy spiral. It's based on the simple proposition that growth is good. And it starts with a foundation of faith -- faith in the spirit of a people under God and faith that the Government will continue policies that will reward effort. And as for continuing policies that will reward effort, believe me, we will.

We've tried to create an environment in which business can bloom and people can blossom. We've failed to create the kind of America that we seemed to be sliding into a few years ago. What we've done is simply a people's program. You can call it populism or some other high-sounding phrase; but what it comes down to is creating an environment that will help the people help themselves.

Now, there are those -- and they will go unnamed here -- who sit back and see our success, and they try to peddle the tired old cliche that helping the economy means helping the rich. They encourage envy and division and resentment. They deal mostly in falsehood and fiction. But I don't think the American people will buy what they're selling.

The truth is, what we've done has been done to help all the people. And we couldn't have done it without you, the people. Somehow, that truth, that message, always seems to get lost. But when inflation was lowered, it helped all the people. When interest rates were lowered, it helped all the people.

When tax rates were cut for every living American in this country, everyone -- not just the rich, not just the middle class, not just the poor -- when income tax rates were cut across the board, it helped all the people. And today the average family is giving Uncle Sam $900 less than if our tax cut had not been passed. And when tax indexing goes into effect next year, it will help all the people, because never again will the Government be able to benefit from your efforts to keep up with inflation by moving you up into higher tax brackets.

And we ask for no great credit, because in the truest sense, no credit is due to us. We didn't do anything but get government out of the way of the American people. It's your recovery. All we did was remove some of the obstacles so you could make the race. And let me tell you about what else we're going to do to get out of your way. We're going to simplify the tax system, actually make it understandable and clear and fair. And when we do that, your tax rates are going to come down, not go up.

I've been talking about what we did to help the people with the help of the people. But let me tell you what the other side will do to the people. They will -- and they've declared it -- raise your taxes.

You know, months back, when Senator John Glenn of Ohio was running for President, he got a bad rap. The leaders of his party wouldn't listen to him. His opponents ignored him and his policies. But he told the truth. He said the policies of the current Democratic nominee would cause a huge increase in spending and taxing. He said those policies revealed a fundamental lack of support for an adequate national defense.

He knows, as you know, that we do not live by material things alone, that the hunger for spiritual values has transcendent importance in the life of man on Earth. We all need to believe in things that are bigger than us: to believe in the importance of religion and the central importance of the family; to believe there is a God to be worshiped and ideals to be honored; to believe in the principles upon which this nation was founded, and have pride, honest pride, in the success of those principles. These are things which, in the past few years have been renewed and reborn -- taken out and looked at again, considered again as a new thing, a helpful thing, by which we live.

The past few weeks, the whole Nation watched the Olympics, and we were moved by what we saw. We saw all the pride and love of America unabashedly on display. We saw all that America can do when she sets her sights high, all that individuals can achieve when they dedicate themselves to achievement. We saw our young people, in many ways the trendsetters of society, show that it's in style again to put your hand over your heart when the flag goes by, and it's in style again to sing the words of the national anthem.

It happens that -- you might have suspected -- I'm involved these days in a race. [Laughter] And I have no hesitation about setting my candidacy before you, the working men and women of America. That's why I'm here, and that's why I came here -- to put my case before you as I make my way to the convention of our party in Dallas. You are the judges in this contest, and that makes me glad. Our whole impulse, in all our policies, in all of our administration comes down to this: Trust the people. And we do. And I'm happy to put my faith in your hands.

I thank you. I thank you for coming here to see us and thank you for listening to this speech. And the day is beginning to get warm. I thought maybe I wasn't going to be able to say that, but it is kind of warm out here in the sun, so I better let you go so we can get back to the air conditioning.

The President. This is a very special treat. Having been a Governor myself, I decided that the uniform for up here on the platform had already been determined by Jim Thompson, so I joined him. And I'm happy he made it that way, too.

There's been much talk about the work ethic, of late. The first job I ever had was working on a construction crew, and it was here in Illinois. I was 14 years old. And I want you to know I haven't forgotten something. I was swinging a pickax on that job; and I wasn't swinging it to help somebody in Washington live better, I was working so our family could live a little better.

In the last 3\1/2\ years, we've kept taxes down so that people will be able to keep more of what they earn. And that's the way to develop a work ethic. There are some people around right now that you're hearing from that -- they've made it evident that a tax increase is their first resort. Well, believe me, it's our last resort. In these last 3\1/2\ years, we've kept taxes down so that people will be able to keep more of what they earn. And that's the way it's going to be.

For the last 3\1/2\ years, we've been trying to restore the economy so there would be jobs for those who wanted them. It took time to put our program in place, and it took time for it to take hold. The debate now, however, isn't whether the program is working. People are arguing about how long the expansion will last. Well, don't worry about the gloom-mongers. They're the same ones who said the program wouldn't work in the first place.

We've ignited, for the first time in decades, high growth, decline in unemployment, and inflation going down all at the same time. Now, this is creating so many jobs that our European allies are calling it the American miracle -- 6\1/2\ million new jobs just since the recovery began. More people in our country are working right now than ever before at any time in our history. We're not tied to the failed policies of the past, policies that relied on more taxing, more spending, and more government.

Right here in Decatur, as the Governor told you, you're trying out an idea that I'd like to see put to use nationally. Thanks to Governor Thompson and your Mayor Anderson, Decatur is one of eight areas designated by the State of Illinois as an enterprise zone, and I understand the list is growing. Your community and your State are in the forefront of this novel approach to development.

All over America, entrepreneurs are investing in new ideas. All we needed to do was to get government out of the way. This is no time to go back. America is moving forward again, and together we can keep her moving forward.

State and local level -- it is an idea that we have been trying for almost 3 years to get done at the national level -- nationwide. And in the Democratic-dominated House of Representatives, they have kept that program buried and will not even allow it to come out to the floor for a vote.

But I know the schedule calls, and we have to move on to some other errands here in this community. I want to thank you, Governor Jim Thompson and Senator Chuck Percy and each of you, for coming out here to welcome me back to my home State.

So, thank you again for coming out here. Oh, boy, nostalgia's beginning to move in. I could stay and visit, but I know we haven't time, and we've got to move on. But God bless you all. This is just wonderful to see you and be here again.

And my greetings to Governor Thompson and Senator Percy, who've been with me here on the visit so far today. I hope that I'll be able to continue for some time extending greetings in Illinois to Governor Thompson. I hope that I will be able to extend those greetings on a daily basis in Washington for some time to Senator Percy. That means both of us have to live in Washington.

But I was thinking of the importance of Senator Percy's returning there, because when I think of the position we would be in if we did not have what we have had in the Senate -- well, I don't think we would be having the expansion you spoke of at such a level.

I have to tell you how impressed I was -- and once again, nostalgia started flowing when, coming in on Air Force One, I was seeing those rows of corn, those cornfields and the soybeans stretching out there as far as I could see from the plane. I was going to say something about the importance of -- I know anytime that I head toward a rural area anymore, I have to find out in advance, now, do I go there and commiserate about the floods or the drought? [Laughter] But I find neither here, that you've had some pretty good rainfall and that, while all of the State couldn't say this, you were doing pretty well in this area.

Benson was the Secretary of Agriculture, and he was out in a time of hardship meeting with some farmers and hearing some of their problems. And one particular place, there was one man that was really giving him a bad time. His complaints were numerous, and he was going on about them.

Well, anyway, I still remember back, also, when the Chicago Bears used to be the Staley football team here in Decatur. And it seems to me they had a better record before they moved than they've had recently. [Laughter] There must be something catching about the winning spirit in Decatur. I hope it's very catching.

You've always been innovators. In fact, I remember when John Beall invented the cornsheller back in 1875. I was just a small boy at the time. [Laughter] And you've never given up when the going got tough. I'm convinced that what you're doing will be a victory for all America. If people want to see the country at her best, if they want to see the bright light of adventure and innovation and hope bringing economic growth, security, and human progress to people throughout the world, let them come here to the heartland and to Decatur, Illinois. They'll see miracles being created from America's abundant renewable resources by the men and women of Archer Daniels Midland and A.E. Staley.

It wasn't long ago that we were being told that our best days were behind us. The crippling inflation, the record interest rates, and the energy crisis were so severe they would destroy the greatest heritage of our past -- our faith and hope that have always brought us the harvest of a better future. Well, here in the land of Lincoln, I'm afraid you didn't listen very well to those cries of gloom. The progress -- and I've heard described on my visit to those plants here today -- I've just heard described, would inspire your countrymen and fill their hearts with pride.

From corn and soybean processing that produce food products to feed a hungry world, to exciting research and production in hydroponics, to your pioneer work in ethanol that increases demand for farm products, creates new jobs, and leads to greater energy security for our country -- it's all happening here, because here in America's heartland, you are on the cutting edge of progress.

When we took office in 1981 only 75 million gallons of ethanol fuel were being produced. This year more than 450 million gallons will be produced, requiring more than 180 million bushels of corn. It just goes to show, there's no limit to what free people can do when the gloom-and-doomers stand aside and get out of the way.

In our Food for Peace efforts, the United States has delivered over 27,000 tons of food a day to recipient countries for three decades. The value of these U.S. farm products exceeds $33 billion -- more than $3 million each and every day. And who could put a pricetag on the good and simple virtues of decency and generosity that are the heart of Food for Peace and of the people who support it?

Sometimes I wish more attention were paid to facts like these. They underline one of the most compelling lessons of the 20th century: Capitalism, not socialism, is the most progressive, revolutionary, and powerful economic force for good in the world today. For only where freedom lives is economic growth strong, does opportunity thrive, and are the forces of human betterment always at work. Socialist countries are held down by a gravity of their own making. In America -- something like a rocket shooting to the stars.

Agriculture is a driving force in our economy, and leaders like you can be proud that you have a record of productivity unmatched anywhere in the world. From our first day in office, we have been trying to help the farm community recover from past policy mistakes and economic difficulties.

We know that the Federal Government has an important role to play as a partner to the farm community -- and not a senior partner. I think the gist of that role is to help farmers do what they can't always do on their own: seek out new markets -- as you indicated -- counter unfair trading practices for our trading partners, promote research, provide a measure of protection from erratic weather and natural disasters, and create a proper environment for supply-and-demand forces to allocate resources efficiently.

We began by insisting that the Department of Agriculture represent farmers first, which wasn't always true in the past. And representing those interests has led to several changes that I believe give us hope for a brighter future.

The first was ending a cynical, wrongheaded, totally unfair grain embargo. I remember someone who now says he was opposed to that embargo privately, but he was speaking a little differently in 1980. He said the grain embargo was a strong, absolutely crucial action that would force the Soviets to pay a heavy price for their aggression in Afghanistan.

I guess it's difficult to see the world clearly when you're scrooched down behind the American farmers. [Laughter] We, of course, know that it was they -- or, I should say, you, who paid the heavy price, not the Soviets. They're still in Afghanistan.

Farm prices declined, and our entire agricultural marketing system -- elevators, barge lines, railways, millers, and exporters -- was disrupted. The embargo cost farmers 17 million tons of grain sales to the Soviet Union. But the greatest loss was the loss of American credibility around the world as a reliable, long-term supplier.

Now, I know it hasn't been easy, trying to make a comeback from that situation. But, make no mistake, we are coming back. In 1980 we had weak defenses, a weak economy, and that grain embargo that filled your bins and emptied your wallets. In 1984 we have stronger defenses, a stronger economy, and grain sales to the Soviet Union -- the country our critics say won't deal with us -- of over 20 million metric tons since last October. And if they want to buy more, we'll sell more.

We've reached an agreement with Japan that will open up their markets to American beef. We expect that our beef exports to Japan will virtually double over the next 4 years. We eliminated huge crop surpluses, and we expect the value of farm exports to be up nearly 10 percent over last year.

And credit burdens are still too heavy, largely because of high interest loans during the late seventies. The value of land that the farmers use as collateral for their loans has dropped. But we're hopeful on interest rates, because we haven't succumbed to the quick fix. So, inflation has dropped to about 4 percent or less, even as our economy has expanded with terrific power. If we can keep inflation down -- and confidence is building that, indeed, we can -- then I'm convinced interest rates will come down more.

I want to reaffirm my absolute determination to protect the tax reforms we've made -- accelerated cost recovery to stimulate business investment; personal tax rate reductions, which have benefited many family farms; indexing to prevent inflation from pushing taxpayers into higher tax brackets; and estate tax changes, increasing the exemption to $600,000 by 1987 and, of even greater help, abolishing the estate tax for a surviving spouse.

We will resist any and all tax increases. Our plan is to simplify the tax system -- make it more fair, easier to understand -- and to bring your personal rates further down. Our agenda is an agenda for growth and opportunity for all Americans.

As you know, my opponent made a big promise to the leadership of the AFL - CIO. He pledged his support for protectionist legislation called domestic content. This would force foreign and domestic manufacturers of automobiles sold in the United States to build their cars with an escalating percentage of U.S. parts and domestic labor.

Congressional Budget Office itself pointed out, domestic content would destroy far more jobs than it would save. It would add substantially to the cost of a new car. And the cost of protectionism for one group of workers would be passed on to another group down the line.

He's right. A true friend of farmers would renounce immediately his or her support for such misguided legislation. Our administration is determined to create jobs the right way, with economic growth, technological innovation -- and we've created 6.4 million new jobs in the last 19 months.

You know, Albert Einstein once said that ``Everything that is really great and inspiring is created by individuals who labor in freedom.'' And freedom is what we're trying hardest to preserve and strengthen -- for you, your children, and your children's children. And without freedom, we will surely fail. And, again, I can only tell you that all of the discussion that is going on today -- increasing taxes is not in anything in our mind. We have no plans to do such a thing. Others may have taxes as a first resort. For us, they are only a last resort, a last, desperate resort. Now, with this freedom, we can remain an inspiration to all the world and unlock the golden door of progress for years and generations to come.

Now, gentlemen, I'm going to take back all that I've heard here today, because we are having a comprehensive study made. Jack Block has been out all over the country, as you know, listening to farm leaders. He has over a thousand pages of written testimony on these problems, and we now, for the first time, as you know, in a great many years, are faced with redrawing the government farm program. And we will be doing that on the basis of all of the input and the information that we have been receiving from around the country. So, I assure you that all of the concerns that you mentioned will be getting our deepest consideration.

And I want you to know that I feel just as closeminded about protectionism as I sounded a moment ago about taxes. I am not in support of protectionism, and I know that it is a two-way street. It can be used against us. And we have been working with our friends and allies in the other industrial States. And I think we are making some sizable progress, as I mentioned, with regard to the one incident of Japan.

I thank you all for welcoming us to your city and to this university. I thank you for your kindness, and I thank you more than anything, because whether you realize it or not, you are the ones that brought about this return to the America that I think we all know and remember so well, not the America of the doomcriers. Without you, without the people, none of the gains that we've made could ever have been accomplished. And so, I thank you for making America the great and good Nation that it is.

Hawaii is one of our major agricultural States. It is the Nation's largest producer of sugar cane and pineapple, and the only major domestic source of coffee, macadamia nuts and certain kinds of flowers. Always on the frontiers of technological progress, the State is an outstanding leader in commercial aquaculture, astronomy, ocean science and energy research and development. It is also essential to our national security as the site of some of the country's most renowned defense facilities. Finally, it is an important international commercial center and base for cultural and technical exchange with the Pacific nations.

In Witnesss Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-first day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

Mrs. Ahmanson has been involved in business, cultural, civic, national, and world affairs and has traveled worldwide to encourage cultural exchanges and for people-to-people programs as well as to promote trade for the United States and the Los Angeles area. Mrs. Ahmanson is currently Chairman of the Board of the Federal Reserve Bank of Chicago and chairman of the board of Caroline Leonetti, Ltd. (a self-improvement center she founded in 1945). She is vice president of the board of directors of the National Committee on United States-China Relations and vice president of the board of directors of the Los Angeles World Affairs Council. Additionally, she serves on the City of Los Angeles Economic Advisory Council and has served as senior vice chairman of the Los Angeles Area Chamber of Commerce.

The Convention replaces an earlier convention signed at Nicosia on March 26, 1980, but returned by the Senate for renegotiation in December 1981. The new Convention incorporates the provisions of the 1980 treaty and includes revisions designed to eliminate the potential for abuse by third-country residents.

But the people of this Lone Star State have always been very good to me. And I guess I arrive feeling a little like that husband who sent a telegram to his wife on their 25th anniversary. And it read: ``Can't live without you. Request you renew contract indefinitely.'' Well, in our case, we'll settle for just 4 more years.

I've just come from a delightful visit with a man who's given a great deal to our party and much to our country -- President Ford. And I'm pleased to report to you that Jerry is ready to go all out for our ticket -- top to bottom, from here to election day.

But we are honored to be here where the spirit of progress and patriotism is as strong as the heart of Texas is big. Texans play hard, and Texans play to win. There's -- you have an expression down this way that I like. You don't just score victories; you romp 'em.

When we asked for the people's help to bring down inflation, to bring down interest rates, to cut tax rates for every working American, and to index taxes so that never again could government profit from inflation at the people's expense -- when we accomplished each of these important victories, we only did it with the people's help. And all of the people, as a result, have been helped.

We say without embarrassment that we seek to honor our traditions, that we believe our fellow citizens are good and decent people. And their values and aspirations deserve to be respected -- not patronized. For us, words like faith, family, work, and neighborhood are not slogans to be dragged out of the closet every 4 years. They are values to respect and to live by every day.

We will be America's party because the American dream begins with opportunity, and our goal is to build an opportunity society for every man, woman, and child. We'll do it because GOP doesn't just stand for Grand Old Party; it also stands for Great Opportunity Party. Now, you'll forgive me, lately it looks like that letter ``D'' in their name is going to stand for defeatism, decline, dependency, doom, and despair. You can take your pick of any one or all of those.

Standing for opportunity means that we're determined, despite the do-nothing Democratic leadership, to push forward for enterprise zones, to push forward for a youth opportunity wage, so that people can get off unemployment, get off welfare, and get the chance for decent jobs that they deserve. And I happen to believe that helping people climb higher and make it on their own is a darned sight more progressive and compassionate than keeping them down and dependent on government for the rest of their lives.

Now, standing for opportunity means that we will push for spousal IRA's; that is, for wives who may not be working and earning, but housewives, that they too will be able to deposit in IRA accounts with the same advantages that those who are working have. We're going to push for tuition tax credits, for the protection that will come from passage of our comprehensive crime package, and for a constitutional amendment mandating the Federal Government spend no more than the Federal Government takes in.

And, yes, we want to enact an historic reform of our tax system. We need a tax reform that makes the system simple enough to understand, fair to all, and that can bring everyone's tax rates further down, and not up.

And that leads me to something else that I believe with all my heart, because we represent all the people, because we represent an agenda of opportunity to benefit all the people -- from excellence in education to developing new frontiers in space and high technology: The Republican Party is America's party of the future.

Now, we know what the other side wants. And for heaven's sakes, don't argue with them. Don't argue for 1 second. Just let them be the party of tax and tax and spend and spend. And the Republican Party will continue to be the party of growth and growth and jobs and jobs. That's our idea of progress and compassion. For if we restrain spending, reduce tax rates further, and keep our economy growing, we can sharply reduce the deficit through that growth.

Now, what I'm suggesting is let's take our cue from our Olympic athletes. Rather than punish success, rather than raise taxes, let's challenge America in the next 76 days to raise her sights and reach for greatness. Let's go for growth, and let's go for the gold.

House and Senate. But I just take this moment to salute all of you. And there are so many bright stars who are reaching out to all Americans and charting the path to a brighter future. So, let me say to the members of the news media who are present, those new ideas that you're always looking for, the vision for the future, leadership for the Nation, you've finally come to the right place. It's all right here at this convention in Dallas, Texas.

But our nation is more than 200 years old. But somehow, America has never been newer, never been younger, and never been more full of hope. We've been truly blessed. And for this we must be truly thankful.

Thank you, ladies and gentlemen, very much. And, Martha Weisend, thank you very much. And I could say that if the morning ended with the music we have just heard from that magnificent choir, it would indeed be a holy day for all of us.

These past few weeks it seems that we've all been hearing a lot of talk about religion and its role in politics, religion and its place in the political life of the Nation. And I think it's appropriate today, at a prayer breakfast for 17,000 citizens in the State of Texas during a great political convention, that this issue be addressed.

I don't speak as a theologian or a scholar, only as one who's lived a little more than his threescore ten -- which has been a source of annoyance to some -- [laughter] -- and as one who has been active in the political life of the Nation for roughly four decades and now who's served the past 3\1/2\ years in our highest office. I speak, I think I can say, as one who has seen much, who has loved his country, and who's seen it change in many ways.

I believe that faith and religion play a critical role in the political life of our nation -- and always has -- and that the church -- and by that I mean all churches, all denominations -- has had a strong influence on the state. And this has worked to our benefit as a nation.

Those who created our country -- the Founding Fathers and Mothers -- understood that there is a divine order which transcends the human order. They saw the state, in fact, as a form of moral order and felt that the bedrock of moral order is religion.

James Madison in the Federalist Papers admitted that in the creation of our Republic he perceived the hand of the Almighty. John Jay, the first Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, warned that we must never forget the God from whom our blessings flowed.

George Washington referred to religion's profound and unsurpassed place in the heart of our nation quite directly in his Farewell Address in 1796. Seven years earlier, France had erected a government that was intended to be purely secular. This new government would be grounded on reason rather than the law of God. By 1796 the French Revolution had known the Reign of Terror.

In 1962 the Supreme Court in the New York prayer case banned the compulsory saying of prayers. In 1963 the Court banned the reading of the Bible in our public schools. From that point on, the courts pushed the meaning of the ruling ever outward, so that now our children are not allowed voluntary prayer. We even had to pass a law -- we passed a special law in the Congress just a few weeks ago to allow student prayer groups the same access to schoolrooms after classes that a young Marxist society, for example, would already enjoy with no opposition.

Cases were started to argue against tax-exempt status for churches. Suits were brought to abolish the words ``under God'' from the Pledge of Allegiance and to remove ``In God We Trust'' from public documents and from our currency.

If all the children of our country studied together all of the many religions in our country, wouldn't they learn greater tolerance of each other's beliefs? If children prayed together, would they not understand what they have in common, and would this not, indeed, bring them closer, and is this not to be desired? So, I submit to you that those who claim to be fighting for tolerance on this issue may not be tolerant at all.

When John Kennedy was running for President in 1960, he said that his church would not dictate his Presidency any more than he would speak for his church. Just so, and proper. But John Kennedy was speaking in an America in which the role of religion -- and by that I mean the role of all churches -- was secure. Abortion was not a political issue. Prayer was not a political issue. The right of church schools to operate was not a political issue. And it was broadly acknowledged that religious leaders had a right and a duty to speak out on the issues of the day. They held a place of respect, and a politician who spoke to or of them with a lack of respect would not long survive in the political arena.

It was acknowledged then that religion held a special place, occupied a special territory in the hearts of the citizenry. The climate has changed greatly since then. And since it has, it logically follows that religion needs defenders against those who care only for the interests of the state.

There are, these days, many questions on which religious leaders are obliged to offer their moral and theological guidance, and such guidance is a good and necessary thing. To know how a church and its members feel on a public issue expands the parameters of debate. It does not narrow the debate; it expands it.

The truth is, politics and morality are inseparable. And as morality's foundation is religion, religion and politics are necessarily related. We need religion as a guide. We need it because we are imperfect, and our government needs the church, because only those humble enough to admit they're sinners can bring to democracy the tolerance it requires in order to survive.

A state is nothing more than a reflection of its citizens; the more decent the citizens, the more decent the state. If you practice a religion, whether you're Catholic, Protestant, Jewish, or guided by some other faith, then your private life will be influenced by a sense of moral obligation, and so, too, will your public life. One affects the other. The churches of America do not exist by the grace of the state; the churches of America are not mere citizens of the state. The churches of America exist apart; they have their own vantage point, their own authority. Religion is its own realm; it makes its own claims.

We establish no religion in this country, nor will we ever. We command no worship. We mandate no belief. But we poison our society when we remove its theological underpinnings. We court corruption when we leave it bereft of belief. All are free to believe or not believe; all are free to practice a faith or not. But those who believe must be free to speak of and act on their belief, to apply moral teaching to public questions.

I submit to you that the tolerant society is open to and encouraging of all religions. And this does not weaken us; it strengthens us, it makes us strong. You know, if we look back through history to all those great civilizations, those great nations that rose up to even world dominance and then deteriorated, declined, and fell, we find they all had one thing in common. One of the significant forerunners of their fall was their turning away from their God or gods.

Without God, there is no virtue, because there's no prompting of the conscience. Without God, we're mired in the material, that flat world that tells us only what the senses perceive. Without God, there is a coarsening of the society. And without God, democracy will not and cannot long endure. If we ever forget that we're one nation under God, then we will be a nation gone under.

If I could just make a personal statement of my own -- in these 3\1/2\ years I have understood and known better than ever before the words of Lincoln, when he said that he would be the greatest fool on this footstool called Earth if he ever thought that for one moment he could perform the duties of that office without help from One who is stronger than all.

I am pleased to sign into law H.R. 4280, the Retirement Equity Act of 1984. This important legislation is the first private pension bill in our history to recognize explicitly the importance of women both to the American family and to the Nation's labor force. It contains significant measures to enhance women's ability to earn pensions in their own right. It improves and protects the vital role of pensions as retirement income to widows.

An end to inequities in the provision of pension benefits to women has been a top priority of my administration. In September 1983 I sent to Congress our own pension equity bill. I am pleased that most of that bill has been incorporated into this legislation I have now approved.

Existing pension rules, when originally enacted, did not fully anticipate the dual roles many women have come to play as both members of the paid labor force and as wives and mothers during periods of full-time work in the home. Provisions in many pension plans now operate in ways that fail to recognize paid work performed by women at certain periods in their lives and penalize them for time spent in childrearing. To address this inequity, the Retirement Equity Act lowers the age limits on participation and vesting, permitting more pension credits to be earned during the early working years when women are most likely to be employed. The legislation also eases break-in-service rules so that parents who bear children and stay home to care for them in the early years will no longer lose the pension credits they previously earned while working.

The Retirement Equity Act also clarifies that each person in a marriage has a right to benefit from the other's pension. No longer will one member of a married couple be able to sign away survivor benefits for the other. A spouse's written consent now will be required on any decision not to provide survivors' protection. The legislation also helps assure that when a vested employee dies before retirement, the employee's surviving spouse will benefit from the pension credits the employee has earned, and it restricts considerably the latitude now allowed pension plans to impose additional conditions on survivors' benefits. Survivors' benefits will be paid automatically in more instances than now. In addition, the bill makes it clear that State courts can allocate pension rights in divorce cases and other domestic relations settlements.

Buenos tardes. Mis buenos amigos, gracias, gracias. This has truly been a convention to remember. I see so many old friends here, and we've shared many memories together. It's great to be here with Tirso and Sally del Junco, with Katherine Ortega, Congressman Manuel Lujan, and Governor Ferre.

Having come from California, I wouldn't feel at home unless there was a strong Hispanic flavor to these festivities. Hispanic Republicans are an increasingly important part of a Republican coalition, and the fact is pretty hard to miss with Katherine Ortega giving the keynote at this convention. I'm mightily grateful to have her on our Republican team and proud to have her serving as Treasurer of the United States. She's one of a multitude, more than 225, of our appointments of Americans of Hispanic descent throughout our administration.

We're not a party of special interests that divides America into camps. We're a party of people who share the same love of country and God, who have the same respect for family and hard work. We're people who appreciate our freedom and are not ashamed to admit that we still feel a stirring inside every time we see the flag waving in the wind. And knowing the strong values that we share, I predict that in the years to come it is the Republican Party that Americans of Hispanic descent will flock to in ever-increasing numbers.

We're a party that will build not bigger bureaucracy in Washington, but an expanding economy throughout our land. We aren't for dependency, but for independence and upward mobility. We're not for handouts and welfare; we're for jobs and opportunity.

There's been a lot of talk lately about family. Well, I'm glad to see that some on the other side have finally discovered traditional values. [Laughter] But we don't wait for election years to proclaim our allegiance to those things that are fundamental to our way of life. Furthermore, we're not just using slogans and empty words; we've got tangible policies to back up our words.

November. We Republicans call for increasing standards; the liberals are for increasing taxes and spending. We're for restoring discipline to the classroom; the liberals are for increasing taxing and spending. We're for more local control and community cooperation with teachers and schools; liberals are for more taxes and spending. [Laughter] You tell me who has the better plan for your children's education.

The voters, if we help them see beyond the rhetoric, have a real choice in November on this issue and on the issue of crime, as well. We Republicans are not just mouthing tough slogans against crime; we've proposed tough legislation to deal with crime, and the liberal leadership of the House has it bottled up in committee. The people deserve to hear from those now touting the commitment to fight crime. How do they feel about the anticrime package that liberals have held up in the House of Representatives? Republicans say let's get that bill through the process and start getting more criminals off the streets.

The liberals talk about jobs, yet it was their taxing, spending, regulating, and inflating policies that knocked the wind out of the private sector that provides those jobs. When we Republicans talk about jobs, we don't mean make-work, do-nothing jobs.

Enterprise zones would provide a real opportunity and break the bonds of dependency, and if we could elect a few more Republicans to the Congress, maybe we could force the liberal Democratic leadership to permit a vote on that bill.

You know, the people vote nationwide and elect a Republican President. They vote statewide and they elect a majority of Senators. But then, when it's broken down into the congressional districts, somehow we seem to keep having a majority in the House of Representatives of the other party. I think it's time we took a good look at who has been in charge over the years, every 10 years, of laying out those districts.

Americans of Hispanic descent, like the rest of us, believe in the dignity of work. There is an empty ring when the liberals talk about the work ethic. You can't be the party of high taxes and the champion of the work ethic at the same time. Republicans offer incentives to work, save, and invest. We want people to keep more of their paychecks, to do as they see fit with their money and the money that they've earned.

The liberal big spenders act like everything belongs to the government and we should be grateful for what they let us keep. As a matter of fact, it was only a few years ago that they coined an expression they were using over and over again called ``tax expenditures.'' And when you interpreted what they were talking about, they were talking about the legitimate deductions that we take in computing our income tax, and they were saying that that was an expenditure of tax money, to let you keep your own money for those purposes. [Laughter] Well, we're going to get rid of that term.

What we who are Republicans want is a strong America. We've been rebuilding our economy, rebuilding our defenses, and, yes, rebuilding the American spirit. And that's a job that takes all of us working together. Our most important job now is getting the word out to the people. Each of us, young and old, men and women, Americans who love our country and who come from every religious, ethnic, and cultural background, we have a job to do. And I know that you're already doing so much, and especially the young people. Isn't it grand to see so many wonderful young people at this convention?

Vargas, from Houston, Texas, was the youngest Hispanic election judge in this State on primary election day last May. He is just 18 years old. And he's a member of the Republican National Hispanic Assembly and is doing his part for the cause.

Pedro and all the other fine young people in this country are what this election is all about. Very simply, we want to leave them -- our generation must leave them -- an America as strong, as free, and filled with opportunity as the America that we were given when we were young. Together, we can do just that, and I know that I can count on you.

I don't feel self-conscious or like I'm bragging at all when I talk about what's been accomplished in these last 3\1/2\ years, because none of us did it by ourselves. If we hadn't been able to turn to you, the people, and if you had not made some people in Washington not necessarily see the light, but made them feel the heat -- [laughter] -- we wouldn't have accomplished what we've accomplished so far. So, muchas gracias and vaya con Dios.

Thank you all for inviting me here today. [Laughter] I wanted to be here to thank all of you for your generosity to our party and your dedication to our cause. And in the midst of the hoopla of this convention, I also wanted a chance to share a few quiet words with you about where we're going in the next few weeks and months.

You know, the events of this week have shown me once again how much is at stake this year, how much depends on the efforts of people like yourselves. Over these few weeks, all America has seen the choice that we'll face in November. On the one hand, they've seen our party, the party of new ideas and fresh initiatives, the party of energy and excitement, the party of the future.

So, while that other party is trying to return us to the days of malaise and defeatism, we'll bring a message of hope about America's future to the people. We're leading America to economic expansion and progress, to opportunity for all our citizens and, we hope, someday, freedom and self-government for all the people of the world. I think the election returns this year and for many years to come will show that our party is truly the party of the eighties and beyond. I really think that that's why the American people voted the way they did in 1980 and that's why they supported us when we needed their help in getting those tax cuts and spending cuts through the Congress.

But you know, despite all the defeats they've suffered, the Democrats still aren't listening to the people. What we must do now is go to the American people with that long list of legislative initiatives favored by the American people but held up in the Congress by liberal Democrats. I mean the balanced budget amendment, the tuition tax credits, and enterprise zones -- not to mention an anticrime bill that passed the Senate on a 91-to-1 vote, but which the liberal Democrats have kept bottled up in committee. They won't even let it come out to the floor for a vote.

Now, we have to use these as instances of the ideological stubbornness and intransigence of the liberal Democrats. This year we must speak to the American people about what distinguishes the two major political parties of this country. The other day I said the GOP has a new meaning: It is now the Great Opportunity Party.

The leadership of the Democratic Party -- and by that I mean the eccentric clique that was calling the shots in San Francisco and not the rank-and-file members -- the leadership of the party has abandoned the principles that formed their party. They're no longer the party of Jefferson and Jackson, and they speak no more for the working people of this country.

But there is one party that does -- our party; one party that speaks for working people and entrepreneurs and risk-takers and dreamers and great souls and heroes -- the kind of people who made this country and who keep it going every day. There is one party that sees the future not as a big dark cloud waiting to rain on us, but as a great and happy challenge waiting to be seized.

And when he had won the Presidency, he said some words that reflect what all of us think when we look at the policies of the other party. He said: We must disenthrall ourselves with the past, and then we will save our country.

So, this year there's a lot more at stake than just a national ticket. We need to remind the people of the liberal Democrats' record in the Congress, especially in the House of Representatives, and especially on the issue of taxes and deficits. We need a Congress that won't thwart and won't obstruct the people's visions of domestic legislation. We need a Congress that won't try to gut the defense budget or lead America down the garden path of naivete in our dealings with those who do not wish us well.

Congress and one House, the House of Representatives, for an additional 4 years, these last 4. In only one 2-year period of all those 20 did a Republican President have the help of a Republican Congress. That was the first 2 years of Dwight Eisenhower. I believe we should appeal to the inherent fairness of the American people and ask them to elect a Congress that would help a President fulfill his promises, the promises that the people must have approved when they elected him.

That's the task before us this year. And together, I think we can do it. We can move forward with all the important legislation I mentioned. We can give the American people that era of national renewal that we promised them. And I thank you all for all that you've done, but more than that, I ask you to take one message to the people. Yes, we're proud of our record in office. But most of all, we have to talk about the future and how bright it can be with a Republican President and Vice President, a Republican majority leader, and a Republican Speaker of the House.

Republican Assembly, and I was talking to them about this congressional thing. And, you know, it's time for the American people to really look at how government runs. You know, I hear about ``the President's budget.'' There isn't a line in the Constitution that lets the President spend a nickel. Everything, all the spending that's done starts over there in that House of Representatives.

But I told them, isn't it funny that when the people of this country, voting as a nation, choose so often a Republican President, and then when voting statewide they choose a majority of Republican Senators, shouldn't we be asking ourselves why it is that for all but 4 of the last 50 years, the Democrats have controlled the House of Representatives, which is elected in congressional districts? And I think it has to do with who's been in charge in these 50 years, every 10th year, when they laid out those districts. And maybe if we do that, the people of this country will begin to see not that there has been pure government of and by the people, but that there has been a deliberate thwarting of what the people, as a whole, have made evident they want. And then maybe the people will go to the polls with a little idea of redressing a grievance in mind.

You know, I've been an after-luncheon speaker for a long time, many years, but this is the first time that I've been a luncheon speaker and no lunch, because I have to go on -- [laughing] -- some more is scheduled before the evening takes place.

Thank you very much. You know, Paul, if you really have all morning been talking about all those things you said, then I haven't got anything left to say. [Laughter] That's what I was going to talk about.

National Committee. And incidentally, if we are the reason for all of this, we wouldn't have been in a position to be responsible for all of this if it hadn't been for people like you putting us here, and we're most grateful.

Each of you has dedicated years of effort to the cause that unites us. And today, you take up positions of the highest responsibility in one of the oldest, proudest political parties on Earth -- a party that's always stood for human freedom, a party that's given the world leaders like Theodore Roosevelt and Dwight David Eisenhower and, yes, Abraham Lincoln.

During your time in office you'll face many challenges, but none will be greater than the challenge you face in the next 74 days. And I just know that with the people by our side, we will -- and by ``we'' I mean Republicans -- we'll lead not only our party but our country. And we'll fight this campaign with every ounce of strength we have, and the people will win.

This year offers us an historic opportunity to get across an historic truth: that we are the party of new ideas; we are the party of the future; and we are the party whose philosophy is vigorous and dynamic. The old stereotype of a kind of pudgy, stolid, unimaginative Republican -- there may be a few cartoonists around that still want to portray us as that, but they're lying in their teeth if they do.

This isn't going to be a cakewalk. I know that all of you know that. And it's no time to sit on our laurels. 1984 is the year when we can get out there in the union halls and the VFW, the church meetings, and get out the word. As a matter of fact, we'll be walking away from here in a few minutes, because Nancy and I are due in Chicago to speak to the VFW this afternoon at their national convention.

But we want to get out the word on how, through cutting tax rates, we're making the GOP stand for ``Great Opportunity Party,'' and get out the word on how our policies have enhanced America's strength and this has made the peace that we enjoy more solid and durable; get out the word on how inflation has plummeted and unemployment has fallen and the value of the dollar is higher and the economy is expanding. And we didn't do this to help some of the people; we did it to help all of the people.

Well, this expansion has already lasted 20 months without fueling inflation. It's given nearly 6\1/2\ million more Americans, as I said last night, jobs. There's nothing dangerous about an expansion that is based on hard work and innovation, and the American people know it.

But let's get the word out on that one, too. Our people don't believe, or our party doesn't believe, that the people are undertaxed. We believe the Federal Government is overfed. To bring the budget under control, we need more Republicans elected who will support the line-item veto and the balanced budget amendment. You've heard me say that before, but we're going to keep on saying it, because every poll indicates that the American people support those measures overwhelmingly, once again showing that the leadership of the other party totally is ignoring what their own people are telling them they want.

And to spur new investment, to enable the people to keep a greater share of their earnings, we need that historic simplification of the tax code. And if we can broaden that base, if we can begin to get the unpaid tax that is now out there from those who are freeloading on their neighbors, we can reduce the rates for everyone.

But let me leave you just one last thought from my heart: Holding this office has allowed me to see as never before how richly our nation has been blessed. Around the world, totalitarians tread ideals underfoot and oppress millions. But in America, it's still our privilege to stand for liberty.

This election is for more than our party and more than the White House; it's for the future of our beloved country, the place Mr. Lincoln called the ``last, best hope of man.'' For the sake of our children and the millions on Earth who look to America for hope, I know that we'll fight the good fight, we'll keep the faith.

There was one thing -- I know that many of the things I've said here were repeated many times in the convention, because they had to do with the actual record of what we've been doing in the management of the Government, but I think you might be pleased to know -- you'll remember back a couple of years ago when we were talking about a private sector initiative, encouraging that. And thousands of volunteers came forth with every kind of idea, and we had a commission, temporarily put together, that collected, and then in the White House we had computerized the literally thousands of programs throughout the country that citizens and community groups have themselves put in place to solve some problems that heretofore our opponents always would think was only for government to do.

Well, we still maintain a headquarters in that private initiatives, and there's hardly a week goes by that we don't have something that we pick up the phone to them and say, ``Hey. . .'' And sometimes it's a problem only involving one individual that we've heard about, or that we've read in the press about, with a situation that government isn't equipped to solve, and we call them. And you know, a couple of days later a call comes back: All taken care of. And the same thing is true with programs.

In Washington one day I turned on the television, and I saw a bunch of fellows out there, and they were painting houses and they were doing all sorts of things and carrying things in and out, and then the TV cameraman was stopping them, and they were being questioned. Well, some were lawyers and some were doctors and some were business people and even some judges, and yet they were painting houses and so forth.

April'' program in a town here in Texas where all year long they collect the information about the elderly, the disabled, the people who can't afford to fix up their houses, to restore the plumbing, to do the things that need doing. And when they've got all this list complete, then the merchants contribute the paint and the things of that kind, and then the people go out, and ``Christmas in April'' is refurbishing all those houses for those people in need.

And, by golly, it was Washington, DC, that was doing it, because our private sector initiative had carried the word throughout the country of ``Christmas in April,'' and every community, literally, that heard about it said, ``Hey, that's a good idea,'' and took it up. And we haven't talked much about that; it isn't the easiest thing to talk about, I guess. But it is showing that the America that used to have a barn-building bee when a farmer's barn burned, when they used to help the fellow that got injured to harvest his crop and all, that America has always been here. The Government just tried to take some of your fun away from you. And we're stopping that.

I'm delighted to have another chance to speak to the Veterans of Foreign Wars. Last year, I told you that I would fly halfway around the world for the honor of meeting with the VFW. Well, it's not quite that far from Dallas to Chicago -- [laughter] -- but it sure is a great way to wind up a terrific week.

Now, before I say anything else, I want to congratulate all of you for reaching an important milestone -- your 2-million membership goal. You can be proud. For 85 years, the VFW has stood united in support of the values which have made our Republic great, and today you're doing it better than ever.

Four years ago, right here in Chicago, I stood before your convention, and when you think back to 1980, it's hard to forget the mess America was in, hard to forget the foolish talk of a malaise, the unfairness of runaway price increases, 21\1/2\-percent interest rates, weakened defenses, Americans held hostage, and the loss of respect for our nation abroad. It seemed that we woke up every morning wondering what new humiliation our country had suffered overseas, what disappointing economic news lay waiting for us on the front page.

We knew we couldn't continue on that road. We knew we had to change course and get America back on her feet. And we knew that peace and freedom could not be protected without cost and commitment, without perseverance and courage.

One cannot sit in the Oval Office without realizing the awesome responsibility of protecting peace and freedom and preserving human life. The responsibility cannot be met with halfway wishes. It can be met only by a determined effort to pursue and protect peace with all the strength that we can bring to bear.

My deepest commitment is to achieve a stable, enduring peace, not just by being prepared to deter aggression but also by bringing steadiness to American foreign policy, by being prepared to pursue all possible avenues for arms reduction, by ensuring that our economic strength leads the way to greater stability through growth and human progress, and by having the spiritual strength and self-confidence that enables us to reach out to our adversaries.

Well, I think we've come a long way together. In fact, I believe we've closed the books on that dismal chapter of failed policies and self-doubt. May it never return. And our progress wouldn't have been possible without you of the VFW and millions of other concerned Americans.

Gone are the days when we abandoned principle and common sense. Gone are the days when we meekly tolerated obvious threats to our peace and security. Gone are the days when we either sought to achieve overnight grandiose arms control agreements that were bound to fail, or when we set our sights so low that the agreements permitted the numbers and categories of weapons to soar.

To all of you who have served your country with such courage and distinction, and to all the young men and women who look to their future, I can tell you today from my heart: The United States of America is prepared for peace.

And because we're stronger than before, we can be confident that we're in a position to secure a future of peace, not peace at any price, but a true, meaningful, lasting peace supported by freedom and human dignity.

As I said last night in Dallas, our military serves to protect our freedom and keep the peace. None of the four wars in my lifetime and none of the wars that you have seen came about because we were too strong. History shows that weakness invites tyrants to believe that the price of aggression will be cheap. And while military strength alone is not enough to ensure a more secure world, without military strength, there can be no effective diplomacy, no meaningful negotiations, no real security, no lasting peace.

And the payoff is in performance. In Grenada, with less than 72 hours notice, our forces successfully rescued 600 American students, disarmed Cuban and peoples revolutionary armed forces, and restored the chance for democracy to that troubled island.

As one company commander of the Army's 1st Ranger Battalion explained -- now quote: ``The lead assault elements had less than 24 hours between the time we were issued our final combat orders and our departure for Grenada. We fought with the equipment on which we were trained.

The equipment worked throughout the operation. New laser rangefinders gave accurate distance to targets, and the night vision devices operated up to standards. And of the 150 Rangers in my company, only 2 had ever seen combat before, yet they all performed like seasoned veterans.

Well, come to think of it, I seem to remember that it took critics weeks to decide whether it was a good idea to rescue our students. They should have asked the students, for those students were already home. Incidentally, Nancy and I were pleased to have about 400 of them on the South Lawn at the White House and about 40 of the men who had returned from Grenada, representing all four branches of the service that had been there. And it was wonderful to hear these young people -- and they were all the same age, the students and the military -- but it was wonderful to hear these young students tell us that, yes, they had been prone to kind of look down on the uniform and all, but not anymore.

And we heard stories about how, when they were escorted to the helicopters after they'd lain overnight and for hours under their beds in the dormitories because of the bullets coming through the buildings, and then our Rangers arrived, and when it came time to go to the helicopters, those young fellows in uniform put themselves between the students and where the firing was coming from.

Well, that young Army officer said -- and what he said about his own Ranger battalion, about being able to take on combat operations on short notice, get the job done and get it done right, was just as true for our other units. The 22d Marine Amphibious Unit had just embarked at Morehead City, North Carolina, for a normal rotation to the eastern Mediterranean when their orders were changed to Grenada. With no advance warning, with very little time, they put together their operational plans, went ashore, professionally accomplished their mission, and then continued on their way.

During the months that the START and INF talks were underway, we proposed seven different initiatives, and none of these were offered to the Soviets on a take-it-or-leave-it basis. Indeed, we made a number of adjustments to respond to the stated concerns of the Soviet side, and that's why we've put forward new proposals on reducing the levels of conventional forces in Europe, on a worldwide ban on chemical weapons, on ways to help reduce the possibility of conflict in Europe, and why we're working to prevent the spread of nuclear weapons.

When I took office, our newest long-range strategic bomber was 19 years old. Early next month, the first B - 1 bomber will roll off the production line. In 1981 our newest strategic submarine was 14 years old. Today three new Trident submarines are at sea; a fourth was delivered in January, 6 weeks ahead of schedule; and seven more are under construction, on schedule and within budget.

I'm not talking about bullets or guns, but about heart and spirit. Once again, young Americans wear their uniforms and serve their flag with honor and pride. From the NATO lines to the Demilitarized Zone of Korea and at bases and ports all across America and all over the world, young Americans are carrying on in your footsteps, in the courageous footsteps of those who stood in harm's way so that others might have a chance to find freedom, peace, and happiness. In fact, no improvement in our military readiness has been more dramatic or more important than the improvement in the quality and retention of our service men and women.

You know, the critics kept telling us that the all-volunteer military would never work and, as soon as the economy turned around, we'd be faced with severe enlistment and retention problems. Well, forgive me, but those are the same people who were wrong on inflation. They were wrong on unemployment. They were wrong on interest rates. They were wrong on the recovery. And there they go again. We're now in the 21st month of the best economic recovery since 1949, and last year was the best we've ever had for reenlistment in both the Navy and Air Force and one of the Army's best years for recruiting. And those trends are continuing.

You know, every time I see a young service man or woman I get a lump in my throat thinking of how lucky we are to have them serving our country and protecting our freedom with real honor, courage, and competence.

I believe that we've come too far, struggled too hard, and accomplished too much to turn back now. Once again the world knows that America will stand up for freedom, democracy, and peace with human dignity. And once again America is prepared for peace.

General Marshall had said in World War II when he was asked what was our secret weapon, and he said, ``The best damned kids in the world.'' Well, you aren't kids anymore, but there's another generation who are, and you can say the same thing about them.

I have to tell a little story -- I promised all my people I wouldn't tell this anymore, I've told it so often, but I have to tell it to you. It has to do with Grenada. Not too long ago, the Armed Forces Journal over in the Pentagon came over and delivered me a little plaque, and they had engraved on that plaque some paragraphs from a letter received from a marine lieutenant, flyer of a Cobra, who had been at Grenada and then had gone on to Lebanon. And he wrote back to the Armed Forces Journal, and he said when he was at Grenada, he noticed that every news story contained someplace the line, ``Grenada produces more nutmeg than any other spot on Earth.'' And he decided that appeared so often, that it was a code -- and he had broken the code.

In our own hemisphere, 26 of 33 Latin American countries today are democracies or are striving to become democracies. Now, this represents 90 percent of the region's population -- up from 50 percent only a decade ago.

Afghanistan, in Africa, and elsewhere. The spirit of men and women to breathe free is a mighty force that cannot and will not be denied. Our country is the leader of the free world, and today we're providing that leadership. In my meetings with foreign leaders, they've often told me how good it is to know what the United States stands for once again.

Now, before I close, I want to thank your outgoing commander in chief, Cliff Olson, for all that he's done, and I want to congratulate your incoming commander in chief, Billy Ray Cameron. I will always remember your strong support. It stayed rock solid even when the going was rough, but then you've always been a tower of strength. The VFW has always set high standards, lived up to them, and looked out for America, just as you've always looked out for the veteran.

The VFW and the Ladies Auxiliary didn't become great organizations by accident. You've done it through hard work and outstanding leadership. You've done it by serving our nation's veterans in your communities, volunteering your services to our veterans, fighting the good fight for a strong, safe, and secure America, supporting our POW - MIA efforts, sponsoring youth activities, directing your highly acclaimed drug abuse and safety projects, your Voice of Democracy Scholarship program, and so many other worthwhile projects.

You understand that we are what we are because of Normandy and a thousand other lonely battlefields. Words could never express what the patriotism of generation after generation of American heroes means for the very soul of our nation. But you and I do know that we're free because of those who went to Omaha Beach and Guadalcanal, Mig Alley and Pork Chop Hill, Khe Sanh and the Iron Triangle.

I'll never stop working as hard as I can to make sure that our nation keeps its special commitment to those who served, to those who have kept the torch of liberty burning brightly. Because of you, America's best days are still to come, and with faith, freedom, and courage, there's no limit to what America can and will accomplish.

When I look at you, when I think of all you've lived and known and learned from your lifetime of service, a lifetime of honor, I can't help wondering, who, more than you, could better understand how precious are the gifts of life and freedom and faith? Who more than you has the courage and the wisdom to help us protect these gifts for our children and for our children's children?

You are wise men of history whose burdens have become our blessings. Your struggles preserved democracy, and today all of us are lifting America into a new springtime of hope. Yes, in my heart I know it is true: America's future must be a future of peace, and together, we'll see to it that it's done.

The legislation commemorates the Illinois and Michigan Canal, which was a main artery of commerce in the 19th century, by designating a National Heritage Corridor from Chicago to LaSalle-Peru, Illinois. The legislation also establishes a National Heritage Corridor Commission to assist local and State entities in any appropriate preservation treatment or renovation of the old structures of the canal. We believe such activity will stimulate tourism, jobs, and economic growth, as well as greater cooperation between local, State, and Federal Governments.

Section 1. Establishment of Board. There is established, effective August 25, 1984, a board of three members to be appointed by the President to investigate this dispute. No member shall be pecuniarily or otherwise interested in any organization of railroad employees or any carrier. The board shall perform its functions subject to the availability of funds.

The President announced the creation of Presidential Emergency Board No. 204 to investigate and make recommendations for settlement of a current dispute between Port Authority Trans-Hudson Corporation and employees represented by the Brotherhood of Railroad Signalmen. The President, by Executive order, created the emergency board pursuant to an appropriate request as mandated by the Railway Labor Act.

The campaign of 1984 is underway. This campaign is about what it was like 4 years ago and what it's like today. But even more important, it's about the future. I believe our Republican Party is the true party of the future because our vision, ideas, and proposals seek to bring out the best in America by challenging the best in our people. The Great Opportunity Party believes in challenging people to do better. The Democratic leadership still insists on challenging government to grow bigger.

Our vision of a strong, secure future rests on our confidence that Americans can continue making progress toward four specific goals: strong, steady economic growth; developing the frontiers of science, high technology, and space; strengthing our community of shared values; and building an enduring peace.

As a nation, we've already begun meeting the challenges we set forth 4 years ago. I won't rehash all the problems we faced, but from a collapsing economy to weakening defenses, to rising rates of crime and poor educational performance, it was clear that America was in deep trouble. We were being led by a group of pessimists whose ideas had been threadbare for years and they hadn't even noticed. The realities of a changing world had long since passed them by.

We said if Amerca is to be a successful leader in the world again, we must face up to the problems that have dragged us down. And we must begin doing that by trusting the people again. We said that together, we must meet the challenges of reducing the growth of government, bringing down inflation and interest rates, and cutting tax rates to create jobs and get our economy moving again -- and America has. We said we must restore America's ability to defend itself and fulfill its responsibilities as a trustee of freedom and peace in the world -- and America has.

As for our first goal -- economic growth -- our position is clear. We've seen from the mistakes of the past and from the recent recovery that our economy grows best when earnings flow not to government, but stay with the people and in the economy. That's why we must meet the challenge of simplifying our tax system, making it more fair, easier to understand, so we can bring personal tax rates further down, not up.

With strong economic growth, we'll continue bringing down deficits. We must also control spending, and one tool is a constitutional amendment mandating that government spend no more than government takes in. Another is a line-item veto, so that a President can veto specific spending requests without vetoing an entire appropriations bill. Until the leadership of the Democratic party supports these two long-overdue reforms, they should close their mouths forever about budget deficits.

Our second goal -- developing America's next frontiers in science and high technology and into the far reaches of space -- will enable us to surge forward on the crest of progress and peaceful change.

We have it within our power to make astonishing advances in technology and medicine, and that will make us a more competitive, successful, and healthy people. Our greatest resources and hope for the future are the minds and hearts of our people.

That's why our third great goal is to help revive America's traditional values: faith, family, neighborhood, work, and freedom. Government has no business enforcing these values, but neither must it seek, as it did in the recent past, to suppress or replace them. That only robbed us of our tiller and sent us adrift.

To continue the peace we enjoy, we must show clear support for our allies and exhibit strength and steadiness to those who wish us ill. Setting goals, meeting challenges, striving for excellence are key to the endless possibilities the future holds in store for America. It's not for the Federal Government to set those goals, but we can help challenge Americans to challenge themselves in all areas of their lives and, like our Olympic athletes, to reach for greatness.

Welcome to the White House. I want to thank each one of you for joining us here today, and I want all of you to know how grateful I am -- as George expressed it so well -- me, too -- for all that you've meant and all your contributions to our administration.

Today, on this Women's Equality Day, we remember the history of women in America. We celebrate all the gains that women have made. During our early years, women cooked, cleared fields, harvested crops, raised the children who would go on to make this the greatest Nation on Earth.

Yet while in those early, difficult days women were partners in hard work, in many other respects their value and dignity was ignored. In many States it was difficult for women to get a public education. In the working world, women were prevented from holding most jobs. Worst of all, women were denied our most fundamental right, the democratic right to vote.

As America became a more mature and thoughtful nation, all this began to change. The suffrage movement at the turn of the century had a profound effect. World War II broke down many of the barriers that women used to confront in the workplace. And the 1960's gave rise to a women's movement that has made all of us aware of the rightful role of women in our society, a role that includes full access to the professions and complete equality before the law.

We still have a long way to go, but already American women are finding opportunities that their forebears never dreamed of. Today two-thirds of women between 25 and 44 work in paid positions. Half our college students are women, and growing numbers of women are doctors, lawyers, police, and military officers.

You know, I can't help thinking that women like you -- women who have accepted the burdens of government service and worked so successfully to give our country a new birth of freedom and vitality -- show clearly just how much American women can accomplish.

Well, one of my proudest days in office came when I appointed Sandra Day O'Connor to be the first woman on the United States Supreme Court. And she, too, illustrates all that the modern American woman can achieve. Justice O'Connor has brought up three sons, pursued a brilliant legal career that has ranged from private practice to service as the assistant attorney general of Arizona. Today she's setting an example for all our daughters as one of the highest ranking women in American history.

Because of the sweeping and exciting social changes our country has undergone, it no longer makes sense to talk about a great divide between women and men. There are no longer any men's issues or women's issues, just issues that concern each of us as Americans. That's why it's our policy to benefit all Americans, and to do so not by raising taxes, or multiplying regulations, or fattening the Federal bureaucracy, but by promoting economic growth. Growth is good for everybody.

And tomorrow morning -- I can't tell you the details, it isn't fair -- tomorrow morning there will be some information that will be released with regard to growth in our economy. And believe me, it will be continued good news.

The economic expansion that our policies produced has already distinguished itself as the strongest sustained economic expansion in America since 1949. And not even during the boom years of the fifties, when our nation was providing millions of new jobs and achieving unparalleled industrial strength -- not even then was our economy so vital, or our progress so rapid. And as this expansion provides new opportunities for all Americans, it's giving American women a powerful lift.

Last year, women filled almost three-quarters of all the new jobs in managerial, professional, and technical fields. Today the number of women-owned businesses is growing three times faster than the number of those owned by men. And over the next 4 years, we'll work to promote still more economic growth and still more opportunities for women.

You're probably wondering why I didn't stop at seven words, but I couldn't get in all I wanted to say if I had. [Laughter] But now, thank you for being here again, and God bless all of you. And I guess it's time to picnic now -- after we have our picture taken.

The President. Thank you all very much. And, Secretary Bell and Principal Vera White, ladies and gentlemen, and most of all, you the students who are in and will be entering this fine school: It's a genuine honor to be with you today to help celebrate the vitality of young minds and the superb education that Jefferson Junior High School provides.

And I'm delighted to be with you today, because Jefferson Junior High is setting an example of academic excellence for schools all across our country. Students at Jefferson Junior High receive just the training they need to go on to successful careers in high school and from there to good jobs and college. This school, I've already sensed, hums with excitement. It's sort of like being with a football team the week before the opening game. At Jefferson Junior High the game is life itself, and the goal is education. And I can tell, you already know you're going to win. It's that sense of teamwork at this school that's impressed me most this morning.

The teachers and staff play their part with enthusiasm and skill. To keep themselves at the top of their form, they constantly evaluate themselves and each other, and they participate often in teacher workshops. And in the classroom, Jefferson Junior High teachers and high school teachers and staff never stop giving. I understand, for example, that the teachers participating in today's orientation session are volunteering their time.

Parents of Jefferson Junior High students also play a critical role. And, again, they play it -- I've seen already -- with enthusiasm. Parents have organized themselves to get in touch with other parents if their children fail to appear in school. They help with activities. And parents who are members of the Home-School Association help to give Jefferson teachers the honors that they deserve.

I have been in schools, back several years ago when I was Governor, State of California, and I have seen such a difference here and in some of the schools that I was in. Here, I'm sure there's no mother that's going to say to me, as one did in California, that she found out almost by accident that her son, leaving home every morning for 10 weeks, had never shown up in school. And no one in school ever contacted or told her that he wasn't present. That's just an impossibility here, I know.

But, believe me, it's the kind of parent support that you're getting that can make the difference between a mediocre school and a true temple of learning. You Jefferson mothers and fathers are showing parents throughout the district and throughout America that it can be done, and you certainly, for one, have my heartfelt gratitude.

The stars of the Jefferson team are you, the students -- and when I say stars, I mean stars. I've been watching and listening this morning -- they haven't given me very much time -- but I don't think I've ever seen a brighter or more attentive group of young Americans. When I think back to my own school days, I've just seen Shakespeare being portrayed here, I didn't run into that until I was well into high school. I understand that foreign languages -- I didn't run into those until I was well into high school.

Now, this school will expect a great deal of you. And you'll be asked to arrive on time and work hard all day and develop your talents through activities like music and sports. And if it's any consolation, I'll tell you that I have a lot of homework to do, too, because at the end of your day, I know that's when you just come to the moment when you then have to face homework.

Jefferson Junior High will hold you to high standards, but that's not a prescription for gloom. Far from it. It's a recipe for happiness and success. This school holds a firm belief in the dignity and the worth of every one of you and is going to hold each of you -- or help each of you to live up to your very best. Yeah, there'll be low moments -- there are in any great enterprise. But most of the time you'll be caught up in the excitement of learning. And at the end of your time here, you'll be standing tall, facing the future with confidence and courage.

You students are the stars of the team, but let me say a few words about your coach -- your principal, Mrs. Vera White. Now, I've spent some time with Mrs. White, and I can only describe her as a genuine torrent of energy and ideas. Her devotion to this school shines through in all that she says and does. She's proud of the teachers, proud of the facilities, and proud of each one of you. If Jefferson Junior High really were a football team, I think Mrs. White could take you to the Superbowl.

I know some of the things that she's said -- some from hearing them myself and some from hearing them from others. She's said, ``I let every child know I care enough to make them learn in school. I have high expectations of everyone including myself. I tell the kids, `Just go for it,' and that's what I do, too. Every student in my school knows that I expect them to succeed.'' And you do.

That's the way Jefferson Junior High is -- a team where teachers, staff, parents, students, and principal work together to achieve excellence. You're winners, every one of you. And you're showing schools throughout America that they can be winners, too.

I know there's a microphone there, and I had hoped -- anytime my people know that I get around young people, I hope that I will have time to take any questions. I'm afraid that our time's about exhausted, but could I cheat and ask this -- could I take one question?

About a year ago, we got our first report from a commission that I'd appointed on excellence in education, because of the problems facing schools throughout this country. There was a nationwide problem. Ten percent, fully, of the 17-year-olds in our country were functionally illiterate. And to get by, many schools had reduced the requirements in math and science, foreign languages, had gone to extended freedom -- choosing courses that the students wanted to take.

And in just this year, since that commission's report was made public and transmitted to all the schools, there has been just a revolution. It shows that education, that teachers, staff, administrators of schools, and, I think, parents and teachers were waiting and begging for this drive for excellence that we now see. And here, your requirements for math, for science, for the things that you're doing are evident that that is the most essential thing.

It's too late once we get behind to try and catch up with those who have gone before. But you here are now the beneficiaries of that. And I have a feeling that this school didn't wait for that excellence in education report. I have a hunch that you've been practicing it. And you were probably one of the examples they used.

And let me just close and say this, because I'm sure that if I had time for more, somebody would ask -- I'm going to tattle on your principal now. She let me know that sometimes the age of the facilities here concerns you, and you wonder about that. Don't. I attended six elementary schools myself, and one high school. And in none of them was there a library. I think the facilities aren't nearly as important as the humanity in the facilities.

But I find this quite sufficient in view of what I learned in myself. I could even stand here in the gymnasium and tell you that in our high school gymnasium in my day, there were a few places on the floor that you couldn't try for a basket because the beams holding the ceiling up interfered. So, I think you can be proud of your facilities, of your teachers, of your whole school here. And I know that you are.

Secretary Bell and ladies and gentlemen, I'm delighted to be here today to join you in honoring some of the finest secondary schools in America. And I want to extend a special greeting to the students in the audience. May I also extend a warm welcome to the principals who are here today, including Mrs. Vera White, who was kind enough to show me through Jefferson Junior High School this morning.

But I am pleased to help honor the 262 middle, junior, and senior high schools that are receiving awards today for outstanding educational performance. Today we honor you for doing a superb job of educating students and for setting an example that all our schools can follow.

We must remember, though, that American schools have not always performed as well as those represented here today. From the early sixties to 1980, combined SAT scores declined steadily, dropping by 90 points. Science achievement scores of 17-year-olds showed a steady drop. And, most shocking, our National Commission on Excellence in Education reported that in 1980 more than one-tenth of America's 17-year-olds could be considered functionally illiterate. The dropout rate increased so much that by 1982, 27 percent of our students failed to complete high school, and dropout rates among minority students were higher than 40 percent.

Now, this erosion in academic achievement took place during the very period, overall, when spending was up by over 600 percent. The crisis in our schools was symptomatic of a much larger crisis in our country. We were living under a tired philosophy of government knows best. It was out of touch with the reality of a changing world. And while spending was going up, that tired philosophy was dragging America down.

Big taxing and spending had led to soaring interest rates and inflation, and all over the world our once-proud nation was no longer known for strength and resolve but for vacillation and self-doubt. The future seemed clouded. And since the whole aim of our schools is to prepare our children for the future, it was only natural that when leaders lost faith in our future, many of our principals, teachers, and students felt robbed of their sense of purpose and self-esteem.

Well, the American people decided to put a stop to that long decline, and in the past few years our country has seen a rebirth of vitality and freedom -- a great national renewal. We've knocked inflation down, and all across our land a powerful economic expansion is providing new products and new work for millions. Once again, the United States is respected throughout the world as a force for peace and freedom. This is a springtime of hope for America.

When we came to Washington, we knew that the problems in education hadn't developed overnight and couldn't be cured overnight. We knew the key to educational improvement was not proposing still more Federal involvement and control, but helping to chart a new course that challenges State and local governments, teachers, administrators, students, and parents to meet the goals of an agenda for excellence.

Education. And today -- from Maine to California -- parents, teachers, school administrators, and principals have begun the crucial work to carry out the Commission's recommendations by improving fundamentals of basic teaching and learning. Since the Commission's report, we've been witnessing a great reawakening of learning, reflecting a culmination of concern over the quality of American education at all levels.

On the State level, progress has been significant. When our administration took office only a handful of States had task forces on education. Today they all do, and many have begun to work on pay incentives for teachers. They know that to promote good teaching we must reward good teachers.

On the local level, parents, teachers, and administrators are making dramatic strides. The PTA reported last year that after a 20-year decline in its membership, 100,000 new members joined the organization. As with so many challenges throughout our history, the American people are showing again that it can be done.

Although we're doing much to make our schools more like the temples of learning we all want them to be, I don't believe there's an educator in this room, or in America, who wouldn't agree that we've barely begun. Our challenge is to sustain and build on the progress that we're now making.

As we strive to move forward, let's remember one essential precondition for success: We cannot reach for the future without a firm grasp of basic educational tools and the importance of traditional values.

School disorder destroys the learning atmosphere, drives good teachers out of teaching, and hurts minority and low-income students who are concentrated in urban schools where the problem is most severe.

To keep learning in our schools, we must get crime, drugs, and violence out. We cannot expect to raise a new generation of responsible leaders in a lawless environment. We cannot expect young Americans to master the complexities of computers if they're high on drugs and alcohol. We must teach our sons and daughters a proper respect for academic standards, for codes of civilized behavior, and for knowledge itself.

As the National Commission forcefully argued, we must also get our students back to the proper study of basic subjects. Today too many students are allowed to abandon vocational and college prep courses, so when they graduate, they're prepared for neither higher education, nor work, nor the training they may later need to keep up with technological advances. In 1980, 35 States required only 1 year of math for a high school diploma; 36 required only 1 year of science. This, too, must stop. We must insist that all our students master math, science, history, reading, and writing, the fundamentals of our civilization.

Earlier this month, I signed into law the Education for Economic Security Act. It authorizes more scholarships for science and math teachers to help raise the level of instruction in those crucial basics. But it isn't just basic subjects that need to be taught; it's also basic values. If we fail to instruct our children in justice, religion, and liberty, we will be condemning them to a world without virtue, a life in the twilight of a civilization where the great truths have been forgotten.

In many schools, students are being taught the dangers of nuclear weapons and the burdens of national defense. Well, let's make certain they understand not only the price of defending America but the price of failing to. The students from St. George's University School of Medicine learned in Grenada that freedom is worth sticking up for.

And while it makes sense that our children learn of our nation's problems, I hope they're also learning that Americans are good and decent people who face up to those problems with courage and conviction.

So, we've identified long-neglected problems. We're beginning to turn them around. We're remembering the all-important foundation of basic educational tools, values, and discipline -- all good and important steps of progress, but still not good enough. If the world of learning is to meet the needs of America's future, then we must clearly see where America is headed.

You know, during my own lifetime I've seen this country change so much. When I was a boy, dirt roads were still the rule. Cars had been invented, but very few people had one. In the winter, people got around by horse and sleigh. A huge number of Americans were farmers, and the one-room schoolhouse was common.

Those dirt roads gave way to sleek interstate highways. The commercial development of the airplane, then the creation of the jet engine, revolutionized our transportation. In agriculture, innovations in farm equipment and techniques made it possible for more and more workers to leave the fields to pursue other jobs. As they did so, our great industries grew -- became the mainstay of our economy.

I, just a few years ago, received a great shock when I was told about a satellite of ours and a communications thing -- in which the entire Encyclopaedia Britannica could be transmitted in a matter of something like 3 or 4 seconds.

Today our children learn to tell time on digital watches. They mix traditional games like baseball with the latest video craze. And they grow up with constant exposure to the mass media, watching television some 25 hours a week. Today's children can expect to live longer, have more leisure, enjoy better health, change jobs more often, and move to more new locations then ever before.

We've heard it said that our nation's most important recess [resource]\1\ (FOOTNOTE)  is the mind of a child, and that's truer than ever. Not long ago we were asking how America could bring the world of learning into better harmony with the world of work. Well, those worlds must not only come together, but also strengthen and enrich each other.

This will mean a school system that teaches our children how to enrich their lives by using telecommunications as educational tools, that shows them how to educate themselves so they'll be able to keep their skills current in an ever-changing job market, and that gives them an appreciation of the arts and humanities so that they may broaden their vision and deepen their understanding of the values that give life meaning.

One way of helping American schools better serve and shape our future is to keep bringing technology into more classrooms. Now, when I was a boy, an apple was something you brought the teacher. [Laughter] Today you learn on an Apple or a MacIntosh or an IBM.

Already our schools and universities have begun to make extensive use of the technological revolution. Young children can use computers to teach themselves colors and basic concepts like ``up'' and ``down'' or ``fast'' and ``slow.'' Others, older students, can use computers to sharpen their grasp of virtually any subject from math to history. Computers can tie in with vast libraries and, in effect, put those libraries in every classroom. One dramatic advantage of the new technology is that, as we put it to use in our schools, it can ease the burden on our teachers. In any given classroom, some students are able to work quietly with computers while their teacher spends time with others -- perhaps with students who require more personal attention.

At the same time, technology can produce new opportunities for learning in the workplace and the home. Audiovisual courses can teach workers how to use new techniques and equipment, and computers can help them prepare for new fields. In the home, personal computers can put all the world's great art, literature, and drama at a family's fingertips. Two-way cable television stations can bring classroom instruction into the living room, and new techniques of viewer participation can enable people in the home to take tests and practice skills. If we apply technology to education with thoughtful skill, good education will be available to all. Education and technology will enable all to participate fully in the wonders and benefits of American life.

One area where those wonders and benefits is most apparent is space. It's long been a goal of our space shuttle, the program, to some day carry citizen passengers into space. Until now, we hadn't decided who the first citizen passenger would be. But today I'm directing NASA to begin a search in all of our elementary and secondary schools and to choose as the first citizen passenger in the history of our space program one of America's finest -- a teacher.

Now, I promise you there will be a little bit of voluntarism in that, also. [Laughter] But when that shuttle lifts off, all of America will be reminded of the crucial role that teachers and education play in the life of our nation. I can't think of a better lesson for our children and our country.

So, now we know that there's reason for hope. We can see an exciting future, but we also know what the current problems are. We've defined them, studied them, quantified them. We've made some progress in combating them, but not enough. Now is the time to set ourselves some additional challenges.

We've slowed the downward trend in SAT scores in the past few years. We may even have ended that trend. But that isn't enough. We have to do better. We have to challenge ourselves further, and we must challenge ourselves as individuals. The state can't do it for us. This town and the Federal Government can't do it for us. We have to challenge ourselves to get moving again.

Before this decade is out, scholastic aptitude test scores should regain at least half the losses of the last 20 years -- a big challenge. And we know what hurdles lie ahead, but it's doable if we try.

Gallup Poll now shows that the number of parents with children in public schools who cite violence as their major concern is down from 29 percent last year to 23 percent this year. And that's reason to cheer. But, again, it's not enough. We have to do better.

So, here's our goal: Before this decade is out, every school in the Nation should have adopted clear discipline codes, and the percentage of parents who cite school safety as a major concern should be half of what it is now.

You know, our country is perfectly poised to meet these challenges and reach these heights. So many things have begun righting themselves the past few years, or, I should say, you have helped right them. It's a time of good feeling about the future. It's a time of progress. And we're showing ourselves again that effort and dedication and tenacity really make a difference.

Less than 2 years ago, one of our great Olympic heroes, Jeff Blatnick, was lying in a operating room being operated on for cancer. He vowed he'd come back, reach his potential, and meet his destiny. And a few weeks ago, we saw him drop to his knees in joy and thanks when he won an Olympic gold medal in wrestling.

And like those shining young men and women that we sent to the Olympics, we'll stick to these goals; we'll meet them; and this will change our country. We will continue to be what we've already started to be: America reemergent on the scene, full of dynamism and vision; America renewed in a golden age of learning.

Olympians of the classroom. And as school doors open this week and you and 45 million of your fellow students return to your classrooms, I wish you success in your studies, success in helping America meet these great challenges for excellence in education in the 1980's and beyond.

I have been advised by the Attorney General that, in view of the requirements of the appointments and the incompatibility clauses of the Constitution, a majority of the members of the Commission, and therefore the Commission itself, may perform only ceremonial and advisory functions.

This agreement will replace the existing governing international fishery agreement with the EEC, which entered into force on June 9, 1977, and is now due to expire no later than September 30, 1984. This agreement may be signed by the European Economic Community only following the completion of EEC internal procedures, which are now underway. I am transmitting this final text to you prior to its signature. While it is the usual practice to transmit to the Congress only signed agreements, it is my intention in this case that this transmittal initiate the period for Congressional review under Section 203(a) of the Act (16 U.S.C. 1823(a)) to further the objectives of that Act.

Like other such agreements, it will enter into force only after the completion of the requirements of Section 203 of the Act, signature of the Agreement by both Parties, and written confirmation that the internal procedures of the EEC have been completed.

The Young American Medal for Bravery is so special that the law mandates that it be given to the recipients only by the President of the United States and is to be given to no more than two young people a year. And two points are made by these directives. One is that the recipients are so important to us that the Chief Executive of the Nation must personally honor them. And the other is that the winners are the very bravest of the brave.

Now, it's been said that of all the virtues, courage is the most important, because without it we would never have the strength to practice the others. Now, that's a comment about moral courage. But what about physical courage? The stories of these two young men tell us something about that.

Both these young people made a conscious decision under pressure to ignore personal safety, to ignore personal -- or potential pain and the possibility of death, and do an incredibly heroic thing -- save another human being from death.

On the evening of February 3d, 1983, the home of then 11-year-old Brian Gill was the scene of a terrible fire. Brian escaped without harm and was standing near a tree when he realized that his 3-year-old sister had become separated from his father and was still inside. Brian ran back into the house, which was now engulfed by flames. He felt his way along a wall, followed the sound of this sister's coughs, made his way to her side, and pulled her outside to safety. His little sister survived, and so did three other sisters. His 2-year-old brother, however, perished.

Almost 2 weeks after the fire in Brian Gill's house, 17-year-old, then, Jim Morris, was driving along an overpass near Grants Pass, Oregon. It was late and he was returning from work. Driving along, he and a companion looked down to see a car in flames on Interstate 5. A station wagon had been struck by a truck and was in flames, its gas tank ruptured. Morris raced for the car; and when he got there, he saw the driver, Thomas Bishop, trying desperately to get out. But Bishop was disoriented and shaking badly, and Jim tried to open the door of the burning car, but it stuck.

So, he thrust himself through the driver's window, grabbed Bishop under the arms, and single-handedly pulled him to safety through the window. Less than a minute later, there was an explosion, and the entire inside of the car was engulfed in flames.

Later, Thomas Bishop wrote to Morris: ``It required much courage for you to come through those flames.'' If it had not been for what Jim Morris did, Thomas Bishop might not be alive. If it had not been for what Brian Gill did, his sister would not be alive.

I want to say to our audience, these are America's children. And look at what kind of people they are. The actions of these young men reflect great strength of character. We can only wonder how, at such a tender age, they managed to develop it.

I happen to think that it's always hard to be young. The young are so vulnerable and often feel misunderstood. But the children and teenagers and young adults our society has produced the last 20 years or so seem in some ways to have had it harder than many of us older folks did. We grew up in a different America -- an America of small towns and big families; an America where generations lived together and lines of authority, both within the home and outside it, were clear.

But the world is changing. And the facts of our life have changed. Throughout our history we've relied on the family as the principal institution for transmitting values. But these days the American family is very different from what it was. Many families are headed by a single parent.

Families are smaller, not only with fewer children but with fewer generations living together. The extended family is increasingly a thing of the past, and so is the old tradition of generation after generation living in the same town and the same house.

We're a country on the move. We're wed to mobility, and the ties that bind us seem looser. We watch a lot of television, seeking continuity and reassurance in the regular and predictable appearance of our favorite TV stars and programs. They visit us -- as if they were a friend or relative coming by for the evening. TV is increasingly becoming the American neighbor. And the fact that it serves that function reflects what it is that we're missing.

Our youth seemed disoriented. But now in the eighties, when some would have thought that things would be worse, they seem better. The young people of today are so solid, so alive to the good things in life, the deepest pleasure. They seem to care about the things worth caring about.

You saw the Olympic athletes a few weeks ago -- teenagers, many of them. You saw that they had faith in themselves; faith that great effort will be rewarded, that trying to improve your talents is worth it. You saw the love of country that they displayed with a shining lack of self-consciousness.

Somehow amidst all this change, all this movement, our young people have held on. What we're seeing, I think, is a reappreciation of our sense of national roots; a reappreciation of the traditions and values our country lived by; a reappreciation of the things that give us a sense of continuity, a sense that there is a purpose to life. And many of our young people seem to be doing it on their own, as if they're personally rediscovering these things and making them new again.

I'm not talking about nostalgia for the past, but refinding what worked about the past and bringing it into the present and the future. Refinding our bearings, forging a sense of continuity where it doesn't exist outwardly in the facts of our lives, we have to recreate connections -- connections with our family, between the family and the community. We need guideposts to help us find the way. And all this will evolve as we bring the best along with us.

People wonder why there's such a feeling of hope these days, and they come up with reasons -- oh, the stock market's up, inflation is down. That's only a part of it. I think we're feeling hope again, because we're taking old values and making them new again. And by giving them new life, they're giving us new life.

These two young heroes that we see here today reflect the achievements and heroism of a shining new generation. But as we honor them it's good for us to think of the quiet heroes of that generation -- the children who are starting out with some of the odds against them, the quiet heroes who haven't had a chance to develop their potential and show us their greatness.

Think of a child with drug problems -- a child who, because of bad judgments or peer pressures, becomes a slave to a terrible addiction. Think of a young person with a drinking problem enslaved in the same way and needing our concern. Think of a young person in high school who, for a whole combination of reasons, decides to drop out and end his or her education forever. Usually we say that child failed to continue. Sometimes I wonder if it isn't also true that we failed and our schools failed that child.

So many of these young people with things going against them early on are quiet heroes trying to do their best. I believe we must challenge ourselves, personally, to help them personally; to show them our support and affection and to show them we care -- asking today that all of us commit ourselves to those silent heroes; that together we accept a national challenge and see to it that children in foster care are given our special affection, that we make sure they're in loving homes.

Just today, however, it is Brian Gill and Jim Morris, who deserve our applause. Gentlemen, you represent the extraordinary courage of an extraordinary new generation. You're brave. You're decent. And we're proud of you. It's good to know that the future of our land will be in the hands of people like you.

Ostomy is a type of surgery which allows for drainage when a person has lost the normal function of digestive or urinary systems due to birth defects, disease, injury or other disorders. Nearly 1.5 million Americans have had ostomy surgery, and approximately 125,000 new ostomates join their ranks each year.

Ostomy was formerly referred to as ``the secret surgery'' because ostomates did not want others to know. Today, largely through the efforts of the United Ostomy Association, Americans needing this treatment are becoming more aware of the opportunities for education, mutual aid, and support that are of such great benefit to them and to their families. Increased public understanding of ostomy will eventually help dispel the fear of those about to undergo this surgery as well as the fear that confronts their families. Both the Federal government and the private sector are deeply committed to the proper care and advancement of knowledge about gastrointestinal diseases and public education about ostomy.

To increase public acceptance of ostomy surgery and to emphasize the need for continued educational efforts, the Congress, by House Joint Resolution 587, has designated the month of August 1984 as ``Ostomy Awareness Month'' and authorized and requested the President to issue a proclamation in observance of this month.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-eighth day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-four, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and ninth.

As its title suggests, the bill would reauthorize the Department of the Interior's program for funding State mining and mineral resources research institutes. In order to assist in the operation of this program, the bill also continues the Committee on Mining and Mineral Resources Research, which was originally established in 1977 under the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act to advise the Secretary of the Interior on matters relating to mining and mineral resources research. H.R. 4214 would require the Committee to assist in the determination of organizations eligible for funding under this act.

I am concerned that since two of the current Committee's members were appointed by private organizations, the requirement to assist in determining eligibility for Federal funds could raise fundamental constitutional questions. The Attorney General has advised me that this vesting of authority to assist in the determination of eligibility for Federal funds in a committee that includes members appointed by private organizations could constitute a violation of the appointments clause, article II, sec. 2, cl. 2, unless the responsibilities of the Committee are given a careful narrowing construction. The Supreme Court has decided that all persons ``exercising significant authority pursuant to the laws of the United States,'' must be appointed by the President. Buckley v. Valeo, 424 U.S. 1, 126 (1976). For this reason, I am signing the bill based on my understanding that this committee, which includes members appointed by private organizations, would only perform advisory functions.

Finally, I must reiterate my concerns that the mineral institute program is no longer an appropriate use of Federal funds, given changes in the mineral industry since the program's inception in 1977 that have reduced the demand for technical personnel. My administration will continue to propose reductions in Federal funds for the program, in the belief that it should be funded primarily by State and private sources.

Public broadcasting constitutes an important national resource and contributes to the diversity of news, information, and entertainment choices available to the American public. Under S. 2436, however, Federal funding for public broadcasting would be increased by too much too fast. The Fiscal Year 1987 authorization of $238 million for the Corporation for Public Broadcasting represents a 49 percent increase over the already enacted funding level for 1986. Likewise, next year's spending on new public broadcasting facilities grants would be authorized at $50 million or four times this year's appropriation.

When all of the demands on the Federal budget are taken into account, increases in spending on public broadcasting of the magnitude contemplated by this legislation cannot be justified. They are incompatible with the clear and urgent need to reduce Federal spending. Moreover, this view is clearly shared by a large portion of the House of Representatives as indicated by the 176 votes in favor of the Oxley amendment to reduce the three-year authorizations by 25 percent.

In disapproving this bill, therefore, I urge the Congress to consider a revised bill providing more reasonable and moderate increases for the Board for Public Broadcasting along the lines of the Oxley amendment. I also reiterate my strong opposition to the huge increases for public facilities grants contained in S. 2436 and the unjustified expansion of this program to include repair and replacement of existing equipment.

I must also stress that my firm insistence on scaling this bill back to more fiscally responsible levels in no way jeopardizes the continued operations of public broadcasting stations across the Nation. Under the established funding mechanism, ample appropriations have already been enacted into law for all of Fiscal Years 1985 and 1986. Funding for another 25 months is already guaranteed.

Thus, the issue regarding S. 2436 is really one of long-range fiscal prudence. Given the magnitude of the deficit cuts that will be needed in the years ahead, I do not believe we can justify locking-in public broadcasting funding levels for 1987 - 1989 that are so obviously excessive. To do so would be wholly inconsistent with our pledge to slow the growth of spending and reduce the size of the deficit.

You go quietly about your work, far removed from the glare and the gloss and the glitter of public spotlights. But what you do is important. You're expanding our wealth of knowledge, and with that knowledge, you're fueling a mighty tide of progress, carrying the hope of an optimistic future for people here and everywhere.

Yours is the work of a true revolution; not a revolution poisoned by hatred and violence and the will to conquer, but one that's rising from the deepest yearnings of the human spirit that challenge the limits of knowledge and to put the power of discovery at the service of our most noble and generous impulses for decency, progress, and, yes, for peace.

Today, on behalf of a grateful nation, I salute you and your colleagues in private enterprise and the academic world. You're the heroes of high-tech; the pulse of America's technological power; the champions of a confident people whose faith and courage are pushing America up and out to a world of wonders for us, our children, and our children's children.

The space age is barely a quarter of a century old, but already we have taken giant steps for all mankind. And our progress is a tribute to American teamwork and excellence. We can be proud that we're first, we're the best; and we are so because we're free.

There's nothing that the United States of America cannot accomplish, if the doubting Thomases would just stand aside and get out of our way. In a single generation, we've freed ourselves from the bounds of Earth; we've set our footprints on the surface of the Moon; we've used our instruments to explore space, the Sun, and our sister planets; and our space shuttle provides the first reusable space transportation system for research, commercialization of space, and scientific exploration.

Meeting these great challenges has given us benefits far more valuable than our original investments. It has proven wrong those dreary souls who lacked the vision to support your efforts. With their pessimism, America could never have gotten off the ground. And with your space shuttle, we have again and again. And I'm convinced your success confirms a vision that we share: An America unafraid, reaching into space with courage and leadership, will be an America unsurpassed. We have it within our power to create a bounty of new jobs, technologies, and medical breakthroughs surpassing anything we've ever dreamed before or imagined.

We already benefit daily from a modern revolution in worldwide communications. We can communicate with each other at a moment's notice, virtually anywhere on the globe. We can anticipate tomorrow's weather and prepare for it. Our space shuttle system provides access to space for science, technology, communications, and national security.

Only a few weeks ago, we watched the Olympics on television, sharing excitement with people all over the world. I can remember -- and believe me it doesn't seem long ago -- when we lived in the horse-and-buggy days of television. We couldn't see a breaking event on the other side of the world until the film was shipped here. But, today, thanks to your research and development work, we have modern communications satellites beaming crystal-clear telecasts worldwide.

Another quiet revolution in technology has also been driven, in part, by the rigors of our space program. New materials from plentiful natural resources like carbon and silicon are taking the place of expensive metals in virtually all manufactured products. Our automobile engineers in Detroit are using lightweight, super-strong, plastic-like materials to reduce the weight of modern cars -- and consumers are getting the benefits in the form of more miles to the gallon.

Computers using microchips are constantly redefining our world as they become smaller, more powerful, and less expensive. Those chips are the heart of inexpensive electronic calculators now commonplace in the workplace, community, and classroom.

Sometimes these technological changes take place so gracefully over time that we hardly notice them. Today our children have access to more computer power than most professional scientists and engineers had in their laboratories at the beginning of the space age.

Dr. Robert Jastrow, chairman of the first NASA lunar exploration committee, predicted nearly 2 years ago that the computer industry would double in size by 1986, becoming America's biggest business. Already, tens of thousands of practical applications of space and aeronautical technology are touching our lives. I've just seen an exhibit here with a vast array of new products from lifesaving vests for firemen to sophisticated aerial-scanning techniques to locate and identify everything from schools of fish to mineral deposits to healthy timberland.

In medicine we're seeing the vision of technology with a human face with one miraculous breakthrough after another. The procedure called CAT scanning uses a computer to compile a clear picture from x rays taken at different angles, often permitting patients to avoid the risks and discomforts of surgery. CAT scanning has come a lifesaver in detecting diseases of the brain and other vital organs.

HTS, for Human Tissue Stimulator, sends electrical impulses through wire leads to targeted nerve centers or particular areas of the brain, providing relief from pain and stopping unwanted involuntary motion. I'm happy to point out that HTS was sponsored by the Goddard Space Center.

It would be difficult to put a pricetag on the value of these human benefits. Even more dazzling opportunities lie ahead, if only we have the faith and courage to keep pushing on. Each technological breakthrough enables us to work from a new and higher plateau. It opens the door to great leaps in productivity which would have been considered unthinkable only a few decades ago.

Permit me to suggest that the fraternity of pessimists, who today insist strong growth will ignite high inflation, are looking at abstract statistics, theories, and models, not the reality of a changing world. They do not see that as we acquire more and more knowledge from new technologies, we no longer move forward in inches or feet; we begin to leap forward.

Working the zero-gravity environment of space, we can manufacture in just 1 month's time lifesaving medicines that it would take 30 years to manufacture on Earth. And we can manufacture crystals of exceptional purity that may enable us to produce super computers and make even greater breakthroughs in productivity.

Our vision is not an impossible dream; it's a waking dream. As Americans, let us cultivate the art of seeing things invisible. Only by challenging the limits of growth will we have the strength and knowledge to make America a rocket of hope shooting to the stars.

High technology is born from capital, and more capital will require continued incentives for risktaking and investment, not tax increases, which would stifle growth. We support high-tech, not high taxes. The Federal Government must constantly endeavor to strengthen the private economy, while supporting research and development, particularly in universities, to train tomorrow's industrial and academic scientists and engineers.

Our agenda for excellence in education at the elementary and secondary school level is also crucial, so students, like those I met at Jefferson Junior High School on Monday, can acquire the knowledge to enter universities and, one day, step into these vital positions of leadership and responsibility.

Between 1981 and 1985, Federal investment in basic research will have increased by almost 30 percent in real terms. And we will carry forward that strong commitment into the future. We will also continue our support of tax credits for industrial R&D expenses, and we'll strive to lessen concerns that cooperative R&D between companies may violate antitrust statutes.

With the power of economic growth and the courage and determination of a free people, we can keep our number one challenge in space -- to develop a permanently manned space station, and do it within a decade. From that space station, we can carry out the kind of work in medicines and crystals I mentioned a moment ago; we can conduct new research, explore the distant planets, and, at the same time, unlock the vast potential for commerce in space by easing tax laws and regulations which discriminate against commercial ventures. And we'll be doing all these things for the sake of a more peaceful and prosperous world.

America has always been greatest when we dared to be great. We will be leaders in space, because the American people would rather reach for the stars than reach for excuses why we shouldn't. And as American technology transforms the great black night of space into a bright new world of opportunities, we can use that knowledge to create a new American opportunity society here at home. We can ensure every person has not only an equal chance but a much greater chance to pursue the American dream.

To do this, we must maintain and increase our older industries ability to compete in the world, stimulate creation of sunrise industries, and meet the challenge of ensuring American leadership and prosperity into the 21st century. Call me an optimist, but I'm convinced that if we do accept this challenge, if we maximize incentives, invest fully in the new technologies, and strive for the great breakthroughs in productivity, then, yes, we can outproduce, outcompete, and outsell the pants off anybody, anywhere in the world.

We can build an America that offers productive, secure job opportunities for all our fellow citizens, from assemblyline workers to research scientists in new industries such as biotechnology, robotics, and information processing.

We can apply new agricultural technologies to preserve our soil and environment, and dramatically enhance productivity through improvements in crop yields and resistance to disease and harsh environments. We can enhance our world leadership in agricultural production and in nutritional assistance to millions who look to America for hope and for help.

Our success will depend on each person's willingness to adopt healthy habits, our collective ability to improve an already effective health care system, and our continued research and pioneer work in the kinds of medical technologies you're developing right here. Before this decade is out, our administration is committed to reducing significantly the death rate for all age groups and to ensuring older Americans can live healthier, longer, and more productive lives. We can, and we must.

The dream of America is much more than who we are or what we do. It is, above all, what we will be. We must always be the New World -- the world of discovery, the world that reveres the great truths of its past, but that looks forward with unending faith to the promise of the future. In my heart, I know we have that faith. The dream lives on. America will remain future's child, the golden hope for all mankind.

Mr. Beggs. Mr. President, if we may offer and present to you a small token of our appreciation for your coming here today. As you know, on the last shuttle mission, we went up and repaired a satellite. And that satellite, the Solar Maximum Mission Satellite, was developed here at Goddard; and indeed, the repairs were designed and developed here at Goddard. And they were installed with cooperation with the Houston Mission Control and the Houston astronauts, of course. It was a very successful mission, and we now have another very valuable scientific satellite working again for several years.

This model is a glass-blown model of that, showing the astronaut on his way out. And we hope that it will remind you many times, both of the visit to Goddard, as well as the strong support that you have given to this program and which we very much appreciate. And the encouragement which you continue to offer -- we thank you for that very much.

Under the Federal Pay Comparability Act of 1970, the President is required to make a decision each year on what, if any, pay adjustment should be provided for Federal employees under the General Schedule and the related statutory pay systems.

General Schedule and the related statutory pay schedules shall be increased by an overall percentage of 3.5 percent for each schedule, with such increase to become effective on the first day of the first applicable pay period beginning on or after January 1, 1985.

Accompanying this report and made a part hereof are the pay schedules that will result from this alternative plan, including, as required by section 5382(c) of title 5, United States Code, the rates of basic pay for the Senior Executive Service.

Trade Commission from spending appropriated funds to enforce certain provisions of the substantive antitrust laws. First, this provision raises questions pertaining to the separation of powers among the branches of government, because it seeks to permit unwarranted intrusion by Congress into pending law enforcement proceedings brought by an administrative agency.

Congress has attempted to prevent the Federal Trade Commission from carrying out the constitutional duty of executing the substantive antitrust laws. I am hopeful that, at the earliest possible date, appropriate legislative action will be taken to amend existing substantive law so as to specify the intention of Congress regarding the Federal Trade Commission's authority under the antitrust laws.

I am also concerned about the bill's provision relating to the Legal Services Corporation, which purports to mandate continued funding for current grantees of the Corporation at essentially the same level of funding as in fiscal year 1984, unless action is taken prior to January 1, 1985, by Directors of the Corporation who have been confirmed by the Senate. To the extent that this provision may be intended to disable persons appointed under the Constitution's provision governing Presidential appointments during congressional recesses from performing functions that directors confirmed by the Senate are authorized to perform, it raises troubling constitutional issues with respect to my recess appointments power. At my request, the Attorney General is looking into the question whether this provision can, consistent with the Constitution, effect this intent.

In this regard, I urge the Senate to avoid any constitutional issues by acting promptly on the confirmation of the Board members I have nominated, who have been the subject of extensive hearings and action by the Senate Labor and Human Resources Committee.

H.J. Res. 600 would establish a National Commission on Agricultural Trade and Export Policy to conduct studies of agricultural trade and export policies, programs, and practices of the United States, and to make recommendations to the President and Congress.

The congressional sponsors of this legislation see the Commission's work as providing recommendations for the agriculture community, the administration, and the Congress to consider as they work together in developing the 1985 farm bill. I expect the 1985 farm bill to be an historic watershed in laying the groundwork for assuring the continuation of a prosperous and productive agricultural economy. While I am not convinced that we need yet another commission to study agricultural policy, I hope the Commission will constructively join the debate on the future direction of American agriculture, including that of agricultural trade and exports.

Numerous other groups, including the President's Export Council, official industry advisory groups, and the President's Working Group on Future Food and Agriculture Policy, are also examining the many issues that can affect the future course of American agriculture. We hope that the free exchange and critical review of all such views will lead to the development of farm legislation that sets a sound course for agricultural policy.

Commission. Under this resolution the Commission is to be composed of 3 officers from the executive branch, who serve in a nonvoting capacity, and 32 members who are either selected by, or are Members of, Congress. Although the Commission would appear to serve primarily legislative functions, this bill would place the Commission partly within the executive branch. I believe that creation of such a commission, which is neither clearly within the executive branch, nor clearly within the legislative branch, tends to blur the functional distinction between the governmental branches that is fundamental to the concept of separation of powers. It would be more appropriate for the Commission to be composed either entirely of members selected by the legislative branch, if it is to serve primarily legislative functions, or entirely of members appointed by the President, if it is to serve the executive branch.

Moreover, I do not consider it advisable to have the Secretary of Agriculture or any other executive branch official receive private donations to assist the Commission. The Department of Agriculture will provide such staff resources as are needed from existing resources and make use of Commodity Credit Corporation funds as authorized to cover travel expenses, per diem, and other expenses as needed.

The President. Thank you very much, and it's a joy to have all of you here. It's very kind of you to understand the scheduling demands of a few weeks ago and to come back again and give me the chance to meet with you.

There's Margaret Mealey, whose work I've known of for some time. She's been honored by five former Presidents for her work with many organizations, including the USO and the National Council of Catholic Women. She is president of the Catholic Golden Age Association. She is a marvel, and we're proud to have her here today.

And I want to mention, even though she couldn't be here, Sister Bernadette de Lourdes. All of you know her work. She's one of the reasons that some writers who muse on humanity conclude that there are saints among us.

Now, there are a number of things I want to talk about today, and I'm going to get to it. But since we'll be talking about Federal programs that have had some problems, I want to tell you a story that I heard about how such problems can happen anywhere.

But, seriously, I think I have a sense of what concerns you and what your concerns are and what the realities are for older people in America. Those 85 and older are almost the fastest growing segment of our population. Back in 1920, the percentage of our population aged 65 or older was less than 5 percent. Now it's more than twice that, and growing. So things are getting better. And as the baby boom generation gets older -- and some of them are entering their forties -- the senior citizens of our country will be a huge group, and their interests will continue to be a matter of great concern to our society.

Security system. As a result of the recommendations of our bipartisan commission which were enacted by the Congress, we rescued Social Security from imminent bankruptcy and assured its good health well into the next century.

Social Security now. Under present law, as you know, Social Security beneficiaries would receive no cost of living increase next January if the cost of living adjustment is below 3 percent. Well, given the progress that we've made in fighting inflation, that could be a real possibility. But we should and we can give Social Security recipients the full cost of living increase in a timely manner, because there has been a delay in their receiving a Social Security increase that was due and that was a part of our settlement to make Social Security fiscally responsible. So, I have asked the Congress, to amend the law to assure that this is done, and that in January, 3 percent or no 3 percent, there will be such a cost of living adjustment.

Second is Medicare. All our actions have been aimed at making it stronger and assuring its continuation. Millions of Americans depend on the Medicare program to help meet their health care costs, and while it's not in the same immediate trouble that Social Security was, we must ensure the long term solvency of the Medicare program. And I'm confident that we can find the right solutions in a bipartisan manner, just as we did with Social Security.

Medicare program. Ever since Medicare was established in the mid-1960's, hospitals were paid pretty much whatever they spent. Giving hospitals a blank check resulted in costs that were rising out of control. Now, under a new program, hospitals are paid set rates, and if the hospital can provide care for less, they get to keep the savings. Now, this has successfully reduced cost increases while ensuring that the quality of the hospital care stays high. We're monitoring this new prospective pay system closely to continue to assure that quality is preserved while health cost inflation continues to go down.

Third -- doctors and the high cost of medical care. It's terribly tough when you're tight on funds and get sick. It's tough when you're not tight on funds, but you have an ongoing ailment and you're hit with a lot of bills.

And believe me, we're trying both to control costs for older Americans and the Government. And we're doing everything we can to try to ensure that medical care will be both available and affordable for all the senior citizens in our country.

Americans -- crime for one. Our administration is making extra efforts to help local law enforcement help those agencies combat street crime as a great national menace. In the past 2 years, we have actually seen a drop in the overall national crime rate. In fact, for 3 years in a row, there has been a drop, and that's the first time this has ever happened in our history. And I assure you that we intend to continue our efforts in a second administration.

We believe, as you do, that decent people have the right to walk the streets at night or take a stroll through a park. We're a little tired of the fact that, with all the locks on our doors and such, it's the law-abiding part of our society that is really locked up. We're tired of it, as you are, and we're trying to do something about it.

We live in a time of great challenges. That doesn't worry me, because all of us have seen again and again that America is very good at meeting challenges. One of the great challenges of our time is to improve the quality of life for all Americans, and especially our older citizens. The folks who've paid their dues, who kept the world going during the tough years of the thirties and the Depression, and the forties and the war, and the fifties and sixties and seventies and beyond -- all of you have earned the right to sit back and take it easy and let the world take care of itself. But you don't. You're in there swinging. You're contributing to things that no one else could. You're our most valuable asset, and I'm proud to be one of you. I'm proud we're still in there slugging together.

We have every right to be proud of our generation. You know, there are only a few generations in all of history that have ever had to preside over a great transition period, and ours was one of those. We've lived through four wars and a Great Depression that toppled governments and brought misery such as younger generations have never seen.

We're one of those rare generations, as I say, that saw in a lifetime -- in our lifetime -- a great transition. Our young people today are going to see astounding things, but they'll never see quite the great change that we saw. We literally went from the horse and buggy to walking on the Moon.

Well, you know, usually in a thing of that kind, you don't think of the answer until the whole meeting is over and you're home. But he talked just long enough for the Lord to bless me with the answer, and when he paused for breath, I said, ``You're right. Our generation didn't have those things when we were your age. We invented them.'' It sure did change the tone of the discussion.

Well, all of us care about older Americans and their financial security -- and I could say ``ours'' instead of theirs. We see the younger people growing up these days, and they'll be living in a world we can't even envision. And we care about those young people, and we care about our country and its future.

And that's why I'm asking that we go forward to meet a challenge together. To build a future -- or a world in which the future generations of America can be free from fears about economic security, free from fears that when they're old they'll be superfluous people, free from fears that they won't have a place in the work force if they want one, that they'll be lonely or that they'll be forgotten. We have to ensure that the aged get the respect they deserve, that they have opportunities to express their creativity, that there are challenges for all of us.

Conception on the feast of Our Lady of the Assumption, to whom Catholic Golden Age is dedicated, to participate with thousands of our members in a eucharistic celebration to light symbolic candles and to pray for peace. This ceremony was duplicated throughout the country by thousands of members and their friends, from Alaska to Florida, from New York to California.

We know, Mr. President, it was not possible for you to be with us on that occasion. But we did want you to have a copy of the prayer which was led by Archbishop Pio Laghi and said by all those present. We know your dedication to peace is our dedication to peace. So, we take great pride in presenting this to you.

Seriously, I want to take a moment to first thank so many of you for keeping me in your prayers when I was in the hospital. A number of you sent some very kind words of encouragement, and I'm truly grateful.

May I take a few minutes of your time today to lay out some of the thinking that went into our tax reform proposals, some of the philosophy behind it. When you talk about taxes, you're talking about the movement of money in the United States -- what goes to the Government, what stays in the economy and in the pockets of the people. And I want you to know what concerns motivated us as we considered the flow of money. We're concerned about those who would manipulate the system and invest a hundred dollars in a tax shelter to get a thousand dollar writeoff. And it's the system itself that we want to change.

We didn't worry about special interest groups and special interest pleading. We were concerned about the interests of all working Americans, starting with the central entity -- an entity that is itself central to the interests of the entire nation. We were concerned about the family, and so, we created a tax reform proposal that puts the family first. Why? Because there's nothing more important to all of us and nothing more important to our society and our nation and our future than the family. The family is where our children learn a moral view; it's where the values of personal responsibility and loyalty and kindness are taught. And it's not saying too much to say as the family goes, so goes the nation. And there are many people who share this view, and it isn't exactly revolutionary. And yet, in spite of that, in spite of our general agreement in this country that the family is important, the public policy of our nation has, in fact, worked against the interests of the family for decades now. You know the facts; you've heard them repeated today.

But I'll just say that for me the biggest proof of how careless we've been in our support of the family is the personal tax exemption for each child and dependent -- 1948, the amount of that exemption was $600. If we had kept up with inflation, the exemption today would be $2,700.

Well, as you know, it hasn't nearly kept up. Administration after administration just hasn't been interested in raising the exemption. They've been more interested in finding new ways to spend each family's earnings. I'm tired of that kind of behavior, and I'm sick and tired of governments that put the family at the end of the line.

And now, in our tax reform proposal, we're raising the exemption to $2,000 and, again, indexing it to inflation. Now, I'm proud of this, and there's one thing I want to make clear: Our tax reform plan is not static. We're working with Congress so we can put together a plan that we can all live with. But I'll tell you one thing: The $2,000 exemption is the centerpiece of our program. This is a family-first bill, and that $2,000 is very important to us and, I think, to you. Not only are we going to get the exemption up, we're going to get tax rates down in order to encourage economic growth. And it's economic growth that will give new economic power to the family. We're talking about jobs for your children, a future for your children.

Well, there are many elements of our plan that benefit the family that you're familiar with, such as our attempt to expend full IRA benefits to those who work in the home, as well as those who work outside it. And the point I want to make is that so often in the past we've met and we've discussed issues that are important to you and important to this administration -- school prayer and abortion, for instance.

But I want to urge all of you and ask all of you to help us also in the area of the tax reform. It has as much to do with how this nation lives its life as any other proposal or initiative put forth in the past decade. It has as much to do with how the family lives and whether it will flourish as any initiative that's proposed in the past decade. It's nothing less than crucial. And so, I frankly ask for your help and your interest. And if there's any more you need to know or discuss, any questions you have, please contact the members of the staff here, and they'll do whatever they can.

I need your help. I'm not embarrassed to ask for it. And I have faith that you'll come through, because you always have. So, that was the last, I guess, on the agenda here after all the other. I hope I've not been repeating too much of what you might have already heard.

Energy Act of 1954, as amended (42 U.S.C. 2153 (b), (d)), the text of an amendment modifying the 1961 defense nuclear cooperation agreement between the United States and France to provide for cooperation on the safety and security of nuclear activities and installations for mutual defense purposes. I am also including a copy of my written approval, authorization, and determination concerning that agreement, as amended. A copy of the joint unclassified letter submitted to me by the Secretaries of Energy and Defense, which provides a summary position on the amendment, is also enclosed. A classified letter and attachments are being transmitted directly to the appropriate congressional committees.

The amendment focuses our cooperation on the safety and security of each nation's nuclear activities and installations. It does not allow transfer of nuclear components or weapons, or special nuclear materials, or source material and, therefore, fully complies with the international agreements in matters of non-proliferation and does not alter other mutual cooperation agreements that exist between the two countries in the field of defense.

I have concluded that the cooperation authorized by the amendment is in the United States' interest and have determined that performance of the amended agreement will promote and not constitute an unreasonable risk to the common defense and security. Accordingly, I have approved the amendment and authorized its execution.

Act, as amended, for agreements for defense nuclear cooperation; and therefore, I am transmitting it to the Congress without exempting it from any requirement contained in Section 123 a. of the Atomic Energy Act. The transmission shall constitute submittal for the purposes of Sections 123 b. and 123 d. of the Atomic Energy Act. The 30-day continuous session period specified in Section 123 b. shall begin immediately. Upon completion of this period, the 60-day continuous session period provided for in Section 123 d. shall commence.

Today's budget resolution compromise follows a long and difficult effort by the Senate and House conferees, but it marks only a beginning, not an end. I would have preferred more substantial reductions, such as were in the original Senate version in May, so I will continue to work to reduce spending even further and put budget deficits on a downward path.

In this connection, I plan to examine each and every upcoming appropriations bill line by line; and if it is excessive, out of line, or in any way jeopardizes our national security, I will not hesitate to use my veto pen. I am pleased that the deficit reductions agreed to by the conferees are achieved through spending reductions and not tax increases and are consistent with the budget philosophy we proposed in February. Large budget deficits were not created by the American people paying too little in taxes, but by the Federal Government spending too much of the people's money.

Over the long term, the budget can be brought into balance by a steadily expanding economy and a firm grip on the Federal purse. Therefore, we intend to redouble our efforts in the weeks ahead to secure passage of tax reform, the line-item veto, and a constitutional amendment mandating a balanced Federal budget.

With these changes and the prospect of additional budget reductions in the future, there is every reason to expect continued strong economic growth. This should have a positive effect in encouraging lower rates of interest, creating new jobs, and keeping inflation down, which is very good news for every American.

Act, I am transmitting a fiscal year 1985 budget supplemental of the District of Columbia. This supplemental proposes a net increase of $35 million in the city's General Fund Budget, including $53 million in program increases and $18 million in rescission of budget authority of District agencies.

Freedom of the press is one of our most important freedoms and also one of our oldest. In the form of the First Amendment it is permanently embedded in our Constitution, but its roots go back to colonial America and indeed to the traditional laws and customs of England.

Two hundred and fifty years ago, on August 4, 1735, one of the landmark events of American legal history occurred when a court exonerated the newspaper publisher John Peter Zenger, who had been accused of sedition because of his zeal in uncovering official corruption. Since then, his case has become a symbol of our Nation's continuing commitment to maintaining freedom of the press.

Today, our tradition of a free press as a vital part of our democracy is as important as ever. The news media are now using modern techniques to bring our citizens information not only on a daily basis but instantaneously as important events occur. This flow of information helps make possible an informed electorate and so contributes to our national system of self-government. Freedom of the Press Day is an appropriate time to remember the contributions a free press has made and is continuing to make to the development of our Nation.

The month of August marks an important milestone for our country. Four years ago we took our first giant step toward putting this economy back in your hands when I signed our bill to lower and permanently index the tax rates of every working American. After being held back so long, a ringing declaration went forth that the dream of economic freedom was alive and well in America's soul. And you responded, bursting ahead with energy and enthusiasm, ignoring all those who were downright panic-struck that Washington could no longer reach deeper and deeper into the pocketbooks of your families. While they were busy predicting disaster, you began transforming our economy from top to bottom.

From the nightmare of interest rates that, at 21\1/2\ percent, had pierced the highest level since the Civil War, double-digit inflation raging like an uncontrollable virus, long gas lines, and the worst tax burden in peacetime history, we awoke to a new dawn of progress -- swift, sure, and steady progress that has continued for 4 years and is continuing today. Inflation, which has been as high as 13 percent, has not just eased but has sharply declined to less than 4 percent. The prime interest rate, while still too high, has dropped to its lowest level in almost 7 years. And decontrolling oil prices did not send the price of gas at the pump skyrocketing as some said it would; prices are lower today than 4 years ago.

Progress regained has renewed our confidence. We can see and feel that confidence in the vigorous increases in consumer purchases, in greater incentives to save, and in the advances to record levels in the stock market. All of us are building a new America, a dynamic America that's created nearly 8 million jobs in the last 32 months and almost 500,000 last month alone; an enterprising America with a record 635,000 new business incorporations last year, the auto, housing, and construction industries rejuvenated, and spectacular breakthroughs in new technologies; and, most important, a successful America with one of the most impressive economic expansions in postwar history. Even as we speak, new strength in factory orders, jobs, leading economic indicators, and equity markets show the U.S. economy flexing its muscles for another big push toward greater prosperity.

But this building of a new America is not complete. We still face a great challenge in reducing the deficit, but those who insist that spending cannot be cut any further and that we must increase your taxes to reduce the deficit are flatout wrong.

Last February I submitted a budget calling for large savings, including elimination of 17 costly and wasteful programs. The budget resolution finally agreed to by the Congress this week represents a good-faith beginning to tackle the deficit the right way -- by reducing what government can spend, rather than simply taking more of what you earn so government can keep spending levels high. But when Congress votes on the various spending bills this fall, we will review each one line by line to be sure they don't contain excessive spending levels or might jeopardize our national security.

Let's all recognize that spending has not been cut to the bone and that a tax increase would only reduce our incentives to work, save, and invest and ultimately weaken our economy and make deficits far worse. Sometimes it's difficult to remember that you didn't send us to Washington to feed the alligators; you sent us to drain the swamp. We didn't come to raise your taxes, but to lower them. And what better moment than this anniversary of our first tax cut than to sound the trumpet once more.

This nation is poised to forge ahead, poised to give every citizen the noble chance to break free and taste the thrill of high adventure. Our next great advance must come from a total overhaul of our tax code. And make no mistake, that day is coming. As Congressman Dan Rostenkowski, chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee, indicated this week, ``Reports of the death of tax reform are greatly exaggerated.'' We can pass an historic tax reform to sweep away unjust loopholes favoring the powerful few. We can reduce the top rate of tax to 15 or 25 percent for all but a tiny fraction. We can reach for excellence and make America the most powerful success story for growth and human progress the world has ever known. And, yes, with your help, we can continue the success we began 4 years ago.

America's at peace and helping to push forward the frontiers of freedom. We can draw confidence from seeing interest rates still trending down, an inflation rate that is still remaining under 4 percent, and nearly 600,000 jobs created this year. And now with the economy's batteries recharged, we're setting forth with new zest. The road ahead looks clear to a strong job market, with no new tax increases to slow us down and no dark clouds of inflation on the horizon.

We will intensify our efforts for budget reform, for a line-item veto -- which 43 State Governors already have -- and for a balanced budget amendment, finally mandating Congress may spend no more than it takes in. We cannot reduce chronic overspending by Congress with a mere carrot of friendly appeals to good intentions. We must also be able to bear down with a rod of real discipline. We'll also devote special attention to the areas of farm and trade, which have great impact on the budget and the health of our economy. Come Labor Day, we're going to pull out all the stops for passage of tax reform. We cannot abide the injustices and disincentives in the current code. We must replace it with a new system offering lower marginal tax rates and greater fairness for the American people. For the sake of our future, there is no higher nor more pressing priority.

On the legislative front, we didn't get all the savings we sought, but we held firm on principle, and we did succeed -- which I consider crucial -- in attacking budget deficits, not by reducing the people's earnings but by reducing government spending. Many appropriations bills will be coming up, and I'm looking forward to examining each one with my veto pen hovering over every line.

In foreign affairs, we've turned the tide of gradual Soviet expansion so evident 5 years ago. Our alliances are stronger, and we have regained our position of leadership, working to resolve the international debt burden, carrying the flag for the spread of democracy, and seeking real gains on key global issues from human rights to nonproliferation. At Geneva we're in the best position in more than a generation to achieve real reductions of nuclear weapons. All we need is a serious approach by the Soviets. I look forward to my meeting with General Secretary Gorbachev in Geneva this November.

Congress has supported our strategic modernization program, and our deterrent is stronger. But we must press on and complete that program. We're also going forward with research on our nonnuclear Strategic Defense Initiative, holding forth the great hope that we may one day protect the people of this planet from the threat of nuclear attack.

And we achieved a breakthrough when Congress recognized the importance of Central America to our national security by voting to assist the freedom fighters in Nicaragua. The cause of freedom is the cause of peace, and I commend all those in Congress who voted to support the profreedom movements in Nicaragua, Afghanistan, and Cambodia and to repeal the Clark amendment that banned help for the freedom fighters in Angola.

Q. Mr. President, some of the Senate Republicans feel you've really pulled the rug out from under them, that you really did not go for a big deficit cut, and that you are going to face a very tough time. Your statement's very rosy, but that isn't the outlook that's coming from the Hill.

Majority Leader] Bob Dole came over late in the afternoon, and we had a good meeting up there and were in agreement that, yes, the budget resolution that we got was not as much as we had hoped; a compromise never is. But we think it came very close to the figures that -- well, in some instances, were even greater than the figures that I had first proposed in February. And we were in agreement also, and Bob agreed that the Senate and I -- the Senate Republicans -- we could be working together. And I'm hoping that it'll continue to be a bipartisan effort.

Q. But, Mr. President, the figures that came out of the two Houses -- the $56 or $57 billion -- are being challenged by the Congressional Budget Office and by some of the legislative leaders who say the first-year savings won't be anywhere close to that. Sir, do you think that next year, a congressional election year, you can do any better in actually eliminating programs as you first proposed?

The President. We're going to try. We're going to try to get -- well, in other words, let's say over this 3-year projection we have to make -- I have never believed that what we agree to now is the final for the next 3 years and we're frozen in. We're going to continue trying to eliminate programs that have outlived their usefulness and are no longer serving a worthwhile purpose and some things that the Government never should have been doing in the first place. And I think that there will be some pretty sizable support for that because, even though it's an election year, I think most in Congress know that the number one -- every poll shows this -- the number one concern of the people of the country today is the deficit and the overspending by government. So, I think that they'll be aware of that.

The President. Well now, let me point something out about the entitlement area. I didn't pull it off. We had a meeting out here in the patio, outside the office one day, with the leadership of both Houses and both parties. And at that meeting, the Democrat leadership made it plain that as far as they were concerned Social Security was off the table -- nonnegotiable. Now, at that time, the conference had broken up. There were no longer any conference meetings going on to try and bring a conference resolution.

When the proposal was then made again from the Senate with regard to Social Security COLA's and the tax increase, I immediately called Bob Dole and told him that there was no way that I could support a tax increase; I think this would be counterproductive with regard to spending cuts and all. And I told him also that I thought we all were aware that we couldn't go back into conference if it was based on Social Security COLA's that had been taken off the table.

But let me point out something else about Social Security. Social Security as a part of the deficit is nothing but a bookkeeping gimmick. Social Security runs a surplus. By incorporating it in the budget, you then add to the budget the outgo and the income. But with that surplus, this apparently reduces the size of the deficit. But the Social Security payroll tax goes into a trust fund and cannot be used for anything else; not one penny of it can be used to reduce the deficit in the overall management of government. To continue to say that this could somehow reduce the deficit by reducing Social Security benefits is a snare and a delusion. And that's why I believe that we shouldn't even wait till 1992, when it is slated to be taken out of the budget and made a separate program. It originally was, and it was during the Johnson years that Social Security was incorporated into the budget for the very purpose of making the deficit then look smaller than it was.

Africa justifies our continuing on that score. Obviously, and as we've made very plain, we all feel that apartheid is repugnant. Now, this is the actual participation on a more equitable basis of the black citizens of South Africa. But if you look at the gains that have been made so far by our so-called constructive engagement -- the increase in complete biracial education; the fact that American businesses there have over the last several years contributed more than $100 million to black education and housing; the fact that the ban on mixed marriages no longer exists; that some, I think, 40-odd business districts have been opened to black-owned businesses; labor union participation by blacks has come into being; and there's been a great desegregation of hotels and restaurants and parks and sport activities and sports centers and so forth.

There are other things -- I can't list them all here, but all these have been coming about as they've continued to work toward what is the final answer. And I think just recently, and over the weekend, the words of Buthelezi, who is the leader of the Zulus -- and they're a full third or more of the black population of South Africa -- he has come out against the idea of hostility, of sanctions, and so forth, and said what we have said, that things of that kind would only hurt the people we're trying to help.

The President.  --  -- thing gets to my desk. But I am going to say that in principle I have to say what I've said, that our continuation of our present program, I think, is the best way that we can be of help to the black citizens of South Africa.

Q. But, sir, this is the third week of the state of emergency in South Africa. Your administration has called for it to be lifted, and yet there's been no results on that. What are you going to do to make that point more forcibly to the South African Government?

You're talking though now about a governmental reaction to some violence that was hurtful to all of the people. We have seen the violence between blacks there, as well as from the law enforcement against riotous behavior. I think we have to recognize sometimes when actions are taken in an effort to curb violence.

The President. Well, let me wait till I see what comes to my desk. I know that in some of the things that we are talking about in that legislation were things that could be helpful in the very way that I have been talking. I know also, however, that the sanctions would not only be harmful to the black citizens there, they would be harmful to the surrounding black countries whose economies greatly depend on their trade and economic relations with South Africa.

The President. Well, it depends on what you mean by change. If you mean by turning to the thing of sanctions and so forth, no. But there can be fluctuations in your conversation and your relationship with another government.

The President. Yes. So, if I can, let me give you an update on this. So far, all the statements that have been made -- by Larry [Speakes] and by myself, by others -- have been the truth as we knew it. And I'm coming to a correction now, but we did not know it at the time.

It is true I had -- well, I guess for want of a better word -- a pimple on my nose. And the doctors have a word -- papule -- that sounds nicer than the first one. But I violated all the rules; I picked at it, and I squoze it and so forth and messed myself up a little bit. But it seemed to be getting a little better when I went into the hospital. And then after the operation, when they put that tube in through my nose and down to my innards, they taped on the side of my nose quite heavily to hold that in place. I happen to have an allergy to adhesive tape. I can wear a band-aid maybe overnight or something, but not that kind. And when, finally, they took it off and removed the tube, why, I was quite swollen and inflamed all around here.

I'm getting 3 days in the wrong place here. Well, when I went over to the doctor for my weekly allergy shot, I called attention to this matter, and it was snipped off. And then, I wore a patch -- there's where the 3 days come in -- for about 3 days before you all noticed it in the East Room.

But I'd heard some talk when they -- it only took a couple of minutes -- I'd heard some talk about possible -- and they wanted to look at it for possible infection because of the irritation around there. But I did not know until this weekend at Camp David -- I was informed that it had been examined, and it was indeed a basal cell carcinoma, which is the most common and the least dangerous kind. They come from exposure to the sun. Nancy had one removed above her upper lip some time ago. They're very commonplace, and they do not betoken in any way that you are cancer-prone.

It is a little heartbreaking for me to find out, though, because all my life I've lived with a coat of tan, dating back to my lifeguard days. That's why I didn't have to wear makeup when I was in movies. But now I'm told that I must not expose myself to the sun anymore. And, you know, I don't mind telling you all this because I know that medicine has been waging a great campaign to try and convince people to stop broiling themselves in the sun because of this very ailment. And so, if I can contribute any by saying, here I am a veteran all my life -- and it took a long time for it to finally have an effect -- but for others to give up their dreams of a good tan, because evidently this is what causes it.

Q. Sir, we had some trouble getting information about your nose last week. And I wonder to what extent do you think the American people have a right to know about your full condition and your full health and welfare?

The President.  --  -- capable of performing the tasks. And, on the other hand, I think there can be invasions that go beyond the need to know that. And I think we were trying to tell you as much as we could, what we believed was the truth.

The President. Well, carcinoma, the very word -- it is a form of cancer. This is the, as I say, the commonest, the least dangerous. It is not known as becoming or spreading or going someplace else, and it is virtually totally caused by the sun, exposure to the sun.

The President. Well, I always thought it was barbaric of Stalin to kill some 20 million people in his own country, of his own countrymen. But we dropped the bomb in an effort to end what had been the greatest war in man's history. The resistance of the enemy and the island campaigns leading up to an invasion of Japan was such that we knew we would be facing that kind of to-the-death resistance. The casualties were estimated at more than a million if we continued. And I think to second-guess now those who had to make that awesome decision is ridiculous.

I think, horrible as it was, we have to say this, too -- that it did give the world a view of the threat of nuclear weapons. And I think that should be an aid in one day, now, ridding ourselves of them.

They have just finished their tests, or they even have a couple left they might try to sneak in before the 6th, which was their opening date. But they had finished their tests on their 24's and 25's, the 18, which is comparable to our MX. And we have not yet begun the testing and certainly haven't completed it in some of our weapons of that same type to keep pace with them.

So, this is why we said to them: ``Look, we still have our tests to do, same ones that you've been doing. You're welcome to send somebody over and watch all our tests.'' And I would like to add also that after that limited moratorium, which was supposed to end around December or something, if they want to make that a permanent moratorium or if they want to agree with us and have bilateral inspection of each other's testing, we're willing to do that.

In Geneva is where the decision should be made and not with moratoriums of that kind. Let's get down to the business, once and for all, of reducing the numbers of nuclear weapons, hopefully leading toward a total elimination of them. Then there wouldn't be any need for testing.

The President. Well, I don't think government should intervene in labor-management affairs of any kind. But I do think that all parties really should sit down there with the fans in their minds and their obligation to the baseball fans.

I am pleased to be able to approve H.R. 2378, a bill to extend the Equal Access to Justice Act. I support this important program that helps small businesses and individual citizens fight faulty government actions by paying attorneys' fees in court cases or adversarial agency proceedings where the small business or individual citizen has prevailed and where the government action or position in the litigation was not substantially justified. It was with great regret that I vetoed the bill to extend this program that passed at the end of the last session of the Congress. I am pleased that the Congress has corrected the problems I perceived in that bill.

On the important definition of the position of the United States or position of the agency, this bill would allow the court or the agency to look at the agency action that is the basis of the litigation or the agency proceeding, in addition to the position taken by the United States in the court or in the formal agency proceeding, to the extent these differ, in determining whether the position of the United States was substantially justified. I note that the bill strictly limits the court's or the agency's fee inquiry to the agency action that is at issue in the litigation or proceeding and does not permit the examination of any other agency conduct. I note further that the Congress has specifically instructed the courts to base the fee inquiry on the record made in the litigation or agency proceeding for which fees are sought and not to engage in additional discovery or evidentiary proceedings in considering the question of substantial justification. I believe these changes take care of my concerns that the fee proceeding not become another trial and that fee proceedings not involve matters not at issue in the principal litigation. It is with these understandings that I sign this bill.

In addition, it is my understanding in signing this bill that the Congress recognized the important distinction between the substantial justification standard in the fee proceeding and a court's finding on the merits that an agency action was arbitrary and capricious or not supported by substantial evidence. The substantial justification standard is a different standard, and an easier one to meet, than either the arbitrary and capricious or substantial evidence standard. A separate inquiry is required to determine whether, notwithstanding the fact that the Government did not prevail, the Government's position or action was substantially justified. The Equal Access to Justice Act was never intended to create an automatic fee award every time the Government loses a case. The current bill is true to that principle.

This week millions around the world will mark the 40th anniversary of the first and only uses of nuclear weapons -- events that brought to an end a long and terrible war. The war over, an unprecedented friendship between the free peoples and democratic governments of the United States and Japan was born. Thus, as we reflect on the meaning of the events of 40 years ago, we and the people of Japan can take pride in having demonstrated that, even between former enemies in warfare, lasting reconciliation is possible.

We must never forget what nuclear weapons wrought upon Hiroshima and Nagasaki, yet we must also remain mindful that our maintenance of a strong nuclear deterrent has for four decades ensured the security of the United States and the freedom of our allies in Asia and Europe. In Europe, these years represent the longest period of peace since the early 19th century. Peace has not made us complacent, for we are continually seeking ways to reduce still further the risks of war. As I have often stated, ``A nuclear war cannot be won and must never be fought.'' This anniversary is, therefore, a time not only for reflection but for action.

The United States will take every reasonable step to build a more peaceful world. Just last week I extended to the Soviet leadership an invitation to send a team of Soviet experts to our Nevada test site to observe and measure the yield of an American nuclear test. My offer involved no preconditions; the Soviet experts were invited to bring with them any instrumentation devices that they deemed necessary to measure the yield of the test. Our objective was straightforward: to set in train a process that, regarding limitations on nuclear testing, could markedly increase confidence and cooperation between our nations.

It is my hope that the Soviet leadership will accept this invitation in the spirit of good will in which it has been tendered. I would also urge the leadership of the Soviet Union to work with us to achieve deep, verifiable, and equitable reductions in nuclear arsenals; to resolve questions relating to compliance with existing arms control agreements; and to establish a constructive dialog on ways to reduce the risk of accidental war.

We must also be vigilant in our efforts to prevent nuclear proliferation -- and here all nations must share the burden. Those who would profit from the transfer of sensitive nuclear technology to trouble parts of the globe pose a threat to world peace. Action must be taken, and we encourage all nations to join us in requiring comprehensive safeguards as a condition of nuclear export. We look forward to the third review session of the nonproliferation treaty, which will begin this month. The United States, the Soviet Union, and all the nations of the world must work to ensure that the atom is never again used as a weapon of war, but as an instrument of peace.

The publication of The Regulatory Program of the United States Government marks a major milestone in our continuing effort to make government more accountable to the American people and more responsive to their needs. This document presents, for the first time, a comprehensive program of regulatory policy to be carried out over the coming year.

Regulations are a feature of almost every government program. Though many regulations accomplish worthwhile ends, we should not forget the huge hidden costs they entail. The Federal government mandates tens of billions of dollars of expenditures every year -- dollars paid for by the people but not included in any of the Federal budget accounts, not appropriated by the Congress, and not constrained by any spending limits.

Paperwork Reduction Act, my Administration mounted an attack to reduce the paperwork burden. These efforts have helped to reverse the trend of more intrusive and burdensome Federal regulations and paperwork. But more was needed.

The Regulatory Program is a critical step in this process. In order to see that the laws are faithfully executed, and that the policies of this Administration are reflected in the regulations issued under those laws, I issued Executive Order No. 12498 initiating this Regulatory Program.

To set goals and priorities for different programs, government officials must choose the right regulatory tools and identify legitimate needs for regulation as opposed to those that merely benefit special interests. Because some complex regulations take years to develop, involving studies, surveys, and the identification and selection of regulatory options, it is important that senior Federal officials be able to review regulatory options early in the rulemaking process and plan regulatory actions over a longer time horizon. It is also important that they examine and reexamine the nearly 200 volumes of existing regulations to see what regulations need to be modified or have outlived their usefulness.

All of this cannot be accomplished simply by publishing a book. This Regulatory Program is the end product of a long process of agencies planning their regulatory activities: gathering and reviewing information, evaluating past progress and program effectiveness, and setting goals and priorities. The publication of the Regulatory Program for 1985 is, however, only the first step in this annual planning process. The next step is for each agency to implement its part of this first Program, as planned and on schedule.

Sec. 2. Functions. (a) The Board shall advise the President and the Secretary of Commerce, through the White House Office of Private Sector Initiatives, with respect to the objectives and conduct of private sector initiative policies, including methods of increasing public awareness of the importance of public/private partnerships; removing barriers to development of effective social service programs which are administered by private organizations; strengthening the professional resources of the private social service sector; and studying options for promoting the long-term development of private sector initiatives in the United States.

The President. Well, first of all, thank you, gentlemen, for being here -- and to all of you. We're here for the signing of the foreign assistance authorization bill, and it's the first one that I have had to sign since 1981, and I am particularly pleased.

The Congress has approved renewed aid to the Nicaraguan freedom fighters and replaced the so-called Clark amendment -- or repealed it and provided support for the Philippines and Guatemala. And these gentlemen have my deep gratitude for that. These measures are important in signaling American resolve and support for freedom.

And I must say with the substantial reduction, however, in the support levels, the security assistance has been disappointing. These reductions, plus the reduction in the defense, I think, reduce our effectiveness and the effectiveness of our foreign policy. And I realize that the budget pressures have been very severe, and there's a general lack of enthusiasm for foreign aid, and that made the job more difficult. We have to make the people aware that these programs are the most effective instruments we have for a more secure international environment, and I hope that we can all work together in the months ahead to reinvigorate the program.

Today I am signing into law S. 960, the International Security and Development Cooperation Act of 1985. This act authorizes appropriations for security and development assistance programs and related activities and makes certain substantive changes in the statutory requirements governing these programs.

S. 960 is the first foreign assistance authorization bill since 1981 to be passed by both Houses of the Congress and presented to me for signature. I am pleased that the authorization process on foreign aid is back on track. Enactment of foreign assistance legislation is never easy, and I appreciate the tough decisions Members made in their support of it. In helping our allies and friends meet their security, development, and humanitarian needs, we directly support U.S. interests and objectives. Our foreign assistance programs, despite any perceptions to the contrary, are manifestly in our own national interest.

S. 960 authorizes appropriations for both fiscal years 1986 and 1987. I understand the desire of the Congress to enact a 2-year authorization, and I support it. I will, of course, assess the requirements for foreign aid programs in preparing the fiscal year 1987 budget and will transmit to the Congress any additional authorizations that are required to support our national interests.

I am concerned about the sizable reductions made in S. 960 to my fiscal year 1986 requests for security assistance programs. Security assistance enables us to help our friends deter aggression, deepen bilateral ties, build forces which are more compatible with our own, and develop the confidence necessary for advancing peace and stability. These reductions, coupled with legislated earmarkings of numerous programs for individual countries and international organizations, will necessitate severe cuts in other programs that are critical to U.S. security interests. I will review the impact of these reductions and determine whether additional funding in fiscal year 1986 will be required in support of these interests.

Security assistance is, quite simply, the most effective instrument we have for helping to shape a more secure international environment. And yet since the decades of the fifties and sixties, the resources committed to these programs have shrunk drastically in real terms. I invite the Congress to work with us to see how we might best go about reinvigorating this important area. We need to strengthen our security assistance partners so as to give them the confidence and the capability to better defend our common interests. Foreign assistance resources are essential to a successful foreign policy. One of our highest national security priorities in the years ahead must be to reinvigorate our foreign assistance program. At a time of defense reductions, we must pay particular attention to our most compelling international security needs.

I am pleased that S. 960 contains many of the substantive legislative provisions that I proposed over the past 2 years; in particular, the main policy recommendations of the National Bipartisan Commission on Central America. Although it has required extensive debate and compromise on all sides, I believe that this bill sets forth a viable policy framework for Central America, which enjoys strong bipartisan support. It will guide our assistance programs as we seek the goals of peace, democracy, and development in that region of such great importance to the United States.

Nicaragua. This aid is an important element in our overall efforts to assist neighboring countries in their defense against Nicaraguan attack and subversion. Unfortunately, the provision unduly and unnecessarily restricts efficient management and administration of the program. Nevertheless, I will continue to work with the Congress to carry out the program as effectively as possible and take care that the law be faithfully executed.

I am gratified by the assistance authorized in this bill for the Afghan people and the non-Communist opposition in Cambodia who are resisting foreign aggression and occupation groups. The repeal of the Clark amendment relating to Angola is also welcome, eliminating a symbol of unnecessary and inappropriate restrictions in the conduct of U.S. foreign policy.

On the other hand, I do have serious reservations about sections 717 and 1302 of   S. 960. In spirit both sections are consistent with my foreign policy. Section 717 directs the Secretary of State to enter into negotiations with the Government of Mexico over certain trade issues. I am deeply committed to efforts to facilitate international commerce and welcome congressional attention to this matter. Similarly, section 1302(a) correctly describes U.S. policy not to recognize or negotiate with the Palestine Liberation Organization (PLO) so long as the PLO does not recognize Israel's right to exist and does not accept United Nations Security Council Resolutions 242 and 338. This administration reaffirms that policy and welcomes congressional support for it.

I am compelled, however, as a matter of principle, to reiterate my refusal to accept any congressional effort to impose legislative restrictions or directions with respect to the conduct of international negotiations which, under article II of the Constitution, is a function reserved exclusively to the President. I will therefore consider sections 717(b) and 1302(b) as constituting only nonbinding expressions of congressional views on these issues.

I also wish to mention the new certification requirement relating to arms sales to Jordan. I believe that this requirement is unnecessary and inappropriate in light of King Hussein's recent public statements confirming Jordan's commitment to the recognition of Israel and to negotiate promptly and directly with Israel under the basic tenets of United Nations Security Council Resolutions 242 and 338. Furthermore, the King has made and is continuing to make significant and courageous efforts in putting these principles into practice by moving Jordan toward direct negotiations with Israel.

Finally, I would note that the bill contains a number of other restrictions and requirements that the administration must meet in carrying out its foreign affairs programs; for example, tieing security assistance for Greece and Turkey to an arithmetic formula ignores the changing conditions in the region and unnecessarily limits our flexibility to respond. None of these restrictions by itself is unacceptably onerous, but in the aggregate, they seriously constrain my ability to carry out foreign policy, particularly in rapidly changing situations. I believe that rigid, detailed, prescriptive provisions of law can also frustrate the desires of the Congress. Thus, I plan to work with the Congress to minimize such constraints in the future.

The programs authorized by S. 960 are central to attaining U.S. foreign policy objectives and to promoting international security and stability by helping our allies and friends to achieve economic growth, to deal with problems requiring humanitarian assistance, and to deter and defend against military threats. It is therefore imperative that we join in a mutual effort with Congress to ensure the success of these programs during the years ahead.

In a few days, we'll be commemorating V - J Day, the 40th anniversary of the end of the war in the Pacific, which brought to a close the most destructive and widespread conflagration in the history of mankind. Over 3 million American airmen, soldiers, sailors, and marines served in the Pacific and Asian theaters between 1941 - 1945. They endured some of the most savage combat of the war, from the frozen Aleutian Islands in the north to the jungles of Guadalcanal and the volcanic sands of Iwo Jima.

Pacific: ``He plods and groans, sweats and toils. He growls and curses. And at the end, he dies, unknown, uncomplaining, with faith in his heart, and on his lips, a prayer for victory.'' Well, the victory was won, and our freedom and way of life were preserved because of the courage and honor of those who put their lives on the line four decades ago.

The Americans who went through this ordeal of storm and sacrifice, just as their counterparts who battled our enemies in Europe, deserve a special place in the hearts of all those who love liberty. Vice President Bush might be a little embarrassed if he knew I was going to say this, but he's one of those Americans I'm talking about. As a young fighter pilot in the Pacific, his plane was shot down on a military mission. He came perilously close to losing his life. If you know any veterans of the Second World War, you might take the time on August 14th to thank them. There are so many heroes among us, and I'm sure they'd like to know how much we appreciate them.

The veterans of the Pacific war should take special pride that today the Pacific rim is blessed with stability and bustling with enterprise and commerce. The hard-fought battles of the Pacific laid the foundation for what is becoming one of the most vibrant regions of the world. The devastation and rubble of the war have given way to great centers of human progress, futuristic metropolises with vast industrial complexes, modernistic transportation systems, and impressive institutions of culture and learning.

Nowhere is this more evident than in Japan, now a close and reliable friend and one of our most important allies. In these last 40 years, the Japanese have transformed bombed-out ruins into a great industrial nation. With few natural resources of their own, they now produce over 10 percent of all the world's goods and services. They've accomplished this economic miracle with hard work, free enterprise, and low tax rates. The Japanese are today in so many ways our partners in peace and enterprise. Our economic ties are a great boon to both our peoples. Our good will and cooperation will be maintained by a mutually beneficial trading relationship based on free trade and open markets on both sides of the Pacific.

The great strides forward being made in the Pacific rim bode well for the United States. We are, after all, a Pacific rim country. Already our trade with Pacific and East Asian countries is greater than with any other region of the world. We can look forward to the future with anticipation of a better tomorrow. The people of our country will be in the forefront of the economic renaissance of the Pacific.

Liberty not only spawns progress, but it is the genesis of true peace as well. As free peoples, it is unthinkable that the Japanese and Americans will ever again go to war. Where there are differences, as there are in the relations of any two great nations, they can be settled in the spirit of good will.

Those brave Americans who fought in the Pacific four decades ago were fighting for a better world. They believed in America and often they gave the last full measure of devotion. One such man was Marine Lieutenant David Tucker Brown from Alexandria, Virginia. While in the Pacific, he wrote home: ``I am more than ever convinced that this is Thomas Jefferson's war, the war of the common man against tyranny and pride. It is really a war for democracy and not for power or materialism.'' Well, Lieutenant Brown was later killed in action in Okinawa, one of so many brave and courageous young Americans who made the supreme sacrifice.

I think if those brave men were with us today they'd be proud of what has been accomplished. At war's end, with victory in hand, we looked forward, not back. We lived up to our ideals, the ideals of heroes like Lieutenant David Tucker Brown. And we worked with our former enemies to build a new and better world, a world of freedom and opportunity. That's the America we're all so proud of.

The President today announced his intention to appoint M.B. Oglesby, Jr., to assume the responsibilities of Max Friedersdorf, who will take a new position within the administration in the fall. Mr. Oglesby will continue to serve as Assistant to the President for Legislative Affairs. In his position, he will serve as the President's chief liaison with the United States Congress.

Previously Mr. Oglesby has served as Deputy Assistant to the President for Legislative Affairs and as minority staff associate for the House Energy and Commerce Committee, dealing principally with railroad, environmental, and commerce-related legislation. Mr. Oglesby also served as deputy and acting director of the State of Illinois Washington office and as executive assistant to Congressman Edward Madigan (R-IL). Prior to coming to Washington, he served in Illinois State government as an assistant to Gov. Richard Ogilvie and as executive assistant to the speaker of the house. Mr. Oglesby also spent 3\1/2\ years in management positions with Illinois Bell Telephone Co.

The history of Polish Americans is an inspiring part of our Nation's heritage. The first massive wave of Polish immigrants came to America to flee the political and economic oppression thrust upon their homeland by the 19th century imperial powers of Eastern and Central Europe. While they came with few material possessions, they brought something much more important -- a deep faith in God and a determination to succeed in this land of opportunity. And succeed they did.

They established churches, schools, and fraternal benefit societies. They worked hard in the mines, steel mills, and stockyards. They understood the importance of education, so that today, the children and grandchildren of the first immigrants can be found in America's leading businesses and educational institutions.

Americans of Polish descent have made, and continue to make, enormous contributions to the culture, economy, and democratic political system of the United States. The names of Tadeusz Kosciuszko and Kazimierz Pulaski, heroes of the American Revolution, have left a lasting imprint upon our history. Highways, bridges, and towns dedicated to the preservation of their memory dot our countryside. In the future, other public facilities and institutions will be named for today's prominent Polish Americans, such as those serving our Nation in the Executive branch, in Congress, the armed services, and in state capitols and city halls from coast to coast.

The dedication of Polish Americans from all walks of life to the ideals of freedom and independence, which Kosciuszko and Pulaski fought for in America and in Poland, and which their worthy successors within the Solidarity movement are struggling for in Poland today, serves as a model for all Americans. That struggle remains alive today and two Polish leaders of international stature -- Pope John Paul II and Lech Walesa -- provide inspiring examples of moral leadership for us all.

Fewer households were victims of crime in 1984 than in any of the previous nine years, due in part to greater public awareness and understanding of crime. This Administration is committed to increasing that awareness and understanding, thereby assisting in our Nation's effort to combat crime.

We recognize the effectiveness and the growth of local crime watch organizations throughout the country and the major role they have played in turning the tide against crime. By working together and in cooperation with their local law enforcement agencies, citizens have always been one of our most effective deterrents against crime. Such citizen action reaffirms those values of community, respect for the law, and individual responsibility that are so much a part of our national heritage.

It is important that all of the citizens of this Nation are aware of the significance of community crime prevention programs and the valuable impact that their participation can have on reducing crime in their neighborhoods. A ``National Night Out'' campaign will be conducted on August 13, 1985 to call attention to the importance of community crime prevention programs. All Americans will be urged to spend the hour between 8 - 9 p.m. on that evening on their lawns, porches, and steps in front of their homes to signify that neighbors looking out for one another is the most effective form of crime prevention.

Participation in this nationwide event also will demonstrate the value and effectiveness of police and community working together in a partnership on crime prevention. It will generate support for, and participation in, local crime watch programs; strengthen neighborhood spirit in the anticrime effort; and send a message to criminals that neighborhoods across America are organized and watching. This is a unique effort to remind the American people of the crucial role they can play in making their streets and neighborhoods safer. Strong, safe communities don't just happen. They are built by people who care and volunteer their time and energy to make the community a good place to live.

Utah, he rose to become one of the world's most successful and respected businessmen, but he never lost the values of honesty, decency, and hard work instilled in him as a youth. He built an enterprise and raised a family, both of which are models for us all.

No one ever had an unkind word about Bill Marriott -- only words of praise and admiration for a man who never stopped caring about others. He never quite got used to the trappings of status that his hard-earned success brought, preferring instead the quiet and unpretentious world of life on his farm with his beloved family.

Apartheid is a system that has long plagued South Africa, and it must be ended. A cycle of violence and repression has engulfed South Africa; this too must end. South Africa must find peace with itself and develop a system of government which accommodates the legitimate rights and needs of the black majority and provides for justice, equality, respect for fundamental rights, and, most importantly, government based on consent.

We hope that the steps President Botha has outlined will advance the end of apartheid. He has called for negotiations on a new constitutional structure and has recognized the principle of participation and the responsibility of all South Africans in their country's future. We look for early implementation of those principles through a process of negotiations between the South African Government and the leaders of South Africa's other communities. The President's statement advances new ideas on citizenship. These ideas and other ideas contained in the speech must be clarified.

The tragedy of South Africa can only be resolved if negotiations begin quickly and produce concrete progress. The United States looks to the South African Government and all South Africans to explore every opportunity for negotiation and reconciliation.

I have signed H.R. 2577, the Supplemental Appropriations Act for 1985. The act provides additional funding for a number of important programs, including economic aid to several nations in the Middle East, essential humanitarian aid to the Nicaraguan democratic resistance, funding for improving security at our Embassies and facilities abroad, and start-up funding for several water projects.

H.R. 2577 provides funds that I requested to support the Nation's foreign policy. It will contribute significantly to our ability to provide urgently required aid to our friends in the Middle East and will support our efforts to bring peace to the region. I would note in particular the funds it appropriates for both Israel and Egypt, as well as for Jordan. All three of these nations have a vital role to play if there is to be peace in the Middle East.

Moreover, the act contains $27 million in funding for humanitarian assistance to the Nicaraguan democratic resistance. While the program that has been approved is more modest than I believe necessary, we have clearly won bipartisan support on this very critical issue as well as recognition and humanitarian support for those fighting the Sandinista dictatorship. This is an important element in our overall effort to assist neighboring countries to defend themselves against Nicaraguan attack and subversion. Unfortunately, the provision unduly and unnecessarily restricts efficient management and administration of the program. Nevertheless, I will continue to work with the Congress to carry out the program as effectively as possible and will take care to ensure that the law is faithfully executed.

H.R. 2577 is also an important first step in reforming and revitalizing the Nation's water resources development program. Little progress has been achieved in recent years due mainly to the impasse over the proper Federal role in water projects and the amount of cost sharing that local project sponsors should assume. This act acknowledges that the traditional Federal role is no longer appropriate and that project beneficiaries must contribute a larger share of costs for water projects. It allows for progressive and essential new approaches to the financing of projects, while retaining a significant Federal role and demonstrating commitment to implementation of viable water projects. I commend the Congress' efforts in this matter. The act represents only the first of two steps that must be taken to reform national water policy. I anticipate that the Congress will soon be addressing a comprehensive water policy and project authorization bill that could set national policy for years to come. This administration has already demonstrated flexibility in working out a reasonably implementable cost-sharing agreement with the Congress. I am confident that the Congress will act in this matter in a prompt and responsible manner.

I am concerned that the act mandates a specific and excessive number of new grants to be awarded by the National Institutes of Health (NIH). Such requirements not only undermine the flexibility essential to the continued success of the NIH but also threaten the long-run stability of biomedical research funding. In signing this bill, it is my understanding that the Congress will take future appropriations action to restore programmatic flexibility and budgetary stability to the NIH.

This act authorizes the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) to establish a national board to oversee an emergency food program. I am deeply concerned about the membership of the board. If read literally, the act would permit six private organizations to appoint members of the board. As members, these persons would be officers of the executive branch because the board will perform executive functions. Such appointments by private organizations is in clear violation of the Appointments Clause of the Constitution (U.S. Constitution, Article II, Section 2, Clause 2). In order to avoid this constitutional infirmity, I direct the Director of FEMA to construe this provision as granting him complete discretionary authority to determine who should be appointed to the national board. The organizations mentioned in the act may make recommendations, but only the Director, as the ``head of a department,'' id., is authorized to appoint members to the board.

August is a happy time for most of us, a time of vacations and State fairs. A number of America's farmers will be showing their livestock and produce at those fairs, and this month they'll have more to show than ever. It's been another bumper-crop year on the farms, and that's good news for America's consumers, but a mixed blessing for our farmers. Big crops mean weaker prices, and under current conditions, that means more financial strain for some of those who grow the food that feeds our country.

It's no secret that American agriculture is facing hard times. And it's particularly painful to know that those affected are among our most productive and hard-working citizens. American farmers are the backbone of our country. Their crops and stock and related industries account for nearly one-fifth of our gross national product and almost one-fifth of our exports.

Now, not all farmers are in trouble; many are not. And it's important to note that those whose crops are the beneficiaries of governmental programs are worse off than those who operate without such assistance. Current farm problems arise from a host of reasons. There were the shocks of the seventies: grain embargoes, double-digit inflation, and record interest rates at 21 percent. Some farmers borrowed large sums of money based on inflated land values, and when we brought inflation down, those farmers were left with declining land values to cover their loans.

Today we find ourselves with farmers who grow more than they can sell, and the result is low commodity prices and a depressed rural economy -- and this, in spite of how much we've spent. In 1979, for instance, the Federal Government was purchasing less than 1 percent of all dairy products at a cost of $250 million. Just 4 years later, in 1983, it was purchasing 12 percent of those products at a cost to the taxpayer of well over $2\1/2\ billion a year. And it's not just the dairy program. From 1981 through this year, we will have spent just under $59 billion on farm price supports. That's nearly 3\1/2\ times what we spent from 1976 to 1980. Our administration has spent more on the farm program than any other administration in history. If spending more money on agriculture would solve the problem, we already would have solved it by now.

We've got to create a future for the farmer that's every bit as bright as the future is for the rest of our economy. A big part of that is keeping inflation and interest rates down. We've made progress on these fronts, as you know, and it's helped farmers control their own costs. Farm production costs were rising fast in the 1970's, but now they've been stable since 1981.

I support long-term policies that will enable the American farmer to enter the 21st century stronger than ever before. The world market holds the potential for increasing opportunities for our products, but we must have a farm policy that maintains our competitiveness. Through our trade policies, we must ensure that farmers have full and fair access to all foreign markets. That is one of the Federal Government's greatest responsibilities; another is to provide stability in programs. Much of the farm problem stems from the past practice of lurching from one emergency program to another, coming up with so-called solutions that never solve anything.

The answer to our farm problems cannot be found in sticking with discredited programs and increasing government controls. The answer can only be found in our ability to help our entire agriculture industry stand on its own feet again. You know, this country is nothing without the farmer, and those who work the land have the right to know that there's a future in farming. Their children have the right to know that they'll still be able to work the family farm generations from now and make a decent living.

The law governing our farm program expires September 30th. I'm eager to sign historic legislation that will put American agriculture on a sound course for the future. In writing farm legislation, I expect the Congress to stay within its own budget goals. I need your help to send Congress an unmistakable message that change in our farm policy is not only desired but essential.

A few serious problems are raised, however, by several other provisions of the act, the foremost of which pertain to our relations with the United Nations and its specialized agencies. These provisions establish conditions that may be impossible to meet within the period of time indicated, thereby requiring reductions in U.S. payments of assessed and voluntary contributions. Activities of these organizations of importance to the United States could be deleteriously affected as a result.

Secretary [of State] Shultz to begin discussions toward that end. He will stay in close contact with the Congress as he proceeds. Depending on the outcome of those discussions, it may be necessary to seek legislative changes.

Commissioner for Refugees (UNHCR) after June 1986 unless the High Commissioner provides for annual audits by an independent consultant. The Department of State will begin to work immediately with the High Commissioner to see if this requirement can be satisfied, since the limitation could put the United States in a position of being unable to respond adequately through the UNHCR to life-threatening emergencies such as those found in Africa and Southeast Asia. If it cannot, legislative relief may also have to be sought.

Similar difficulties may also result from section 151, which assumes that the United Nations can determine whether and the extent to which some U.N. employees are required to pay part or all of their salaries to their respective governments. This provision also assumes that the United Nations can correct such a practice and requires a reduction to U.S. payments of its assessed contributions to the United Nations to the extent that the practice continues. The difficulties in administering section 151 may require some modification of it at a later date.

I am also concerned about the numerous earmarkings of appropriation authorizations for particular activities included in this act. I understand the intent of the Congress in setting out these amounts. Nevertheless, they may severely limit our ability to meet other important program needs within the limited appropriation amounts that are likely to be enacted by the Congress. In this regard, I am particularly concerned about earmarkings enacted for refugee assistance and for the United States Information Agency. Because of the lack of clarity in the earmarkings of the exchange of persons program of USIA, I am asking the Director of that agency to plan on program levels of $148 and $159 million in 1986 and 1987, respectively. Because of the large number of earmarkings found in the bill, the Secretary of State and the Director of USIA will have to work closely with both authorization and appropriations committees as fiscal years 1986 and 1987 progress so that interests of the Congress and priority foreign affairs needs can best be accommodated.

It was with sincere regret that I learned of Paul Laxalt's decision to retire from the Senate after 12 years of honorable service. Paul Laxalt has been a dedicated public servant who has given more than 20 years of his life serving the people of Nevada and this nation, first as district attorney of Ormsby County, then as Lieutenant Governor, then as Governor, and now as U.S. Senator from Nevada. His friendship and support have been invaluable to me over the years.

The Soviet Union has for many years had the world's only operational anti-satellite system. There is also a growing threat from present and prospective Soviet satellites which are designed to support directly the U.S.S.R.'s terrestrial forces. The United States must develop its own ASAT capability in order to deter Soviet threats to U.S. and allied space systems and, within such limits imposed by international law, to deny any adversary advantages arising from the offensive use of space-based systems which could undermine deterrence. Systematic, continued testing is necessary for us to be able to proceed with ASAT development and finally to validate operational capability, in order to restore the necessary military balance in this area.

A number of serious problems, including definitional and monitoring difficulties plus the need to counter existing Soviet targeting satellites, contribute to the conclusion that a comprehensive ban on development, testing, deployment, and use of all means of countering satellites is not verifiable or in our national security interest. Moreover, no arrangements or agreements beyond those already governing military activities in outer space have been found to date that are judged to be in the overall interest of the United States and its allies and that meet the congressionally mandated requirements of verifiability and consistency with the national security. We will continue to study possible ASAT limitations in good faith to see whether such limitations are consistent with the national security interests of the United States.

The United States is presently engaged in negotiations with the Soviet Union at Geneva on nuclear arms reductions, defense and space issues. We believe that ASAT testing can constitute an incentive to the Soviet Union to reach agreements on a wide range of issues.

Well, California is always in the forefront of new trends, and perhaps this idea of a before-dinner speech -- I'll make it a short one, though -- will catch on. I was happy to see our friend John Gavin, our Ambassador to Mexico, and Jack, as you know, has done a superlative job there. I think he's one of the best Ambassadors this country has ever had, and we're enormously pleased that he's going to stay on in his post and continue his great work.

I can't tell you how much of a pleasure it is for Nancy and me to be here with old friends and back in California. I've told [British Prime Minister] Margaret Thatcher on several occasions that if only their people had come across the other ocean first, the Capitol would be in California.

This was my second serious visit to the hospital since getting to Washington, and I'm not a bit discouraged or anything about it. My father told me that optimism, and as Duke pointed out just a few moments ago, is something that is probably a part of my Irish heritage. As a matter of fact, there's a story that illustrates that. You knew that I'd get around to telling a story, didn't you?

We've been through a great many political battles together. Mike Antonovich and Pat Nolan were just kids back in those days when I was making my first run for the Governor's office. They were walking precincts for Youth for Reagan. And they called their gang the Brown Is Out To Lunch Bunch. [Laughter] I've still got the T-shirt they gave me. Well, now those same young people are assuming leadership positions in State government, and some hold positions of responsibility in our administration in Washington.

Perhaps the most heartening development in recent years is that today's crop of young people is turning to our party as never before. I used to say -- sometimes discouraged back in an earlier time -- that every time I went to a Republican affair, I thought the only young people there looked like they couldn't join anything else -- [laughter] -- but not anymore. In that '84 campaign, all the way across the country and on a great many campuses -- and I could remember when if I went to a campus, I started a riot -- but this time, to see them all filled with energy and idealism at our Republican rallies all across America. Young voters will continue supporting us as long as we offer the way to a better future, as long as we're the can-do party with an agenda for an opportunity-filled tomorrow, the party with a positive strategy for freedom and growth.

States, we're reaching out to Asians, Hispanics, blacks; and it's making a difference. I know, for example, that a big factor in Bob Dornan's race for Congress was his going to the Hispanic community even though he was told why they belong to the other party. Well, they got almost 50 percent of the Hispanic vote. Inroads are being made in the Asian community. You see, the other party looks at all those groups and others and says they're ethnic groups. Well, we look at them, and we see Americans. More and more Democrats are realizing they have more in common with our goals than those targeted with the leadership of their own party.

And today we're a major political force for change in America. That's evident by the teriffic job that Governor Deukmejian is doing here in California. And, believe me, we're seeing it all across the country. Now, I hope -- indeed, I know that all of you are going to do your best to reelect him next year, and I'll bet I know what his wish would be if he were blowing out birthday candles right now. It would be: Send him a legislature that he can work with -- more Republicans.

This fall we're going to campaign for the most extensive tax overhaul this country has had since the 1920's. It will bring down the rates and close the loopholes. It'll be fair. And once in place, it will energize our economy, spurring investment and enterprise. People will have an incentive to channel their resources into job-creating businesses and commercial investment, rather than nonproductive shelters and tax dodges. We're going to take our case directly to the people. It's a choice between the special interest and the general interest. This is a big one, and with your help, we're going to win it for America.

Looking to the future, we're moving forward with research on a project that offers us a way out of our nuclear dilemma -- the one that has confounded mankind for four decades now. The Strategic Defense Initiative research program offers us the hope of protecting ourselves and our allies from a nuclear ballistic missile attack. This will permit us to shift our focus to saving lives, rather than avenging them. We seek an antinuclear shield, using technology to make us safer. Our success will be measured by the number of people we can save, not destroy. We keep hearing some self-declared experts and some of those blame-America-first crowd saying that our SDI concept is unfeasible and a waste of money. Well, if that's true, why are the Soviets so upset about it? As a matter of fact, why are they investing so many rubles of their own in the same technologies?

Today we have so many reasons to be grateful. Nancy and I have said a few prayers of thanks in these last few weeks, but all of us can be thankful that we're citizens of this blessed land. I want to thank all of you for what you're doing to keep it the good and decent land that God intended it to be. And I'm sorry we can't spend the rest of the evening here with you, but I appreciate -- and I know Nancy does -- this opportunity, at least for this limited time, to be here with you. Just seeing you here like this makes me sure we'll preserve this last best hope of man on Earth.

Women's Equality Day is celebrated each year on August 26 because it was on that day in 1920 that the 19th Amendment, guaranteeing women the right to vote, became part of our Constitution. This was an accomplishment of great practical and symbolic importance, since it recognized women as full participants in our democratic system of self-government.

The adoption of the 19th Amendment was a tremendous victory for the ideals of democracy, but its consequences have not been confined to our political system. In every field of endeavor, women have made notable contributions to our national life. Their achievements have shown that America's women are a tremendous human resource for our Nation -- an inexhaustible reserve of talent, imagination, and ambition.

Today, women have an unparalleled degree of opportunity to decide what they want to achieve in their lives. Whether they devote themselves to raising families or to pursuing careers, their contributions to America are leaving an indelible mark on our Nation's life. In the years ahead, their accomplishments will continue to shape profoundly our Nation's destiny.

In Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this twenty-third day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-five, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and tenth.

As summer draws to a close our thoughts naturally turn to the coming school year. Few things could be more central to the life and health of our nation than the education of our children. Our schools hold the future of America in their hands. They will decide whether that future is enlightened, free, and informed, or shrouded in the darkness of ignorance.

From the beginning, our administration has made excellence in education a top priority, and from the beginning, we've recognized that excellence is formed in the classroom by teachers, administrators, and parents working closely together to give their children the very best education possible, not by bureaucrats in the far-off city of Washington. When it comes to education, it's the classroom, not Washington, where the real action is.

That's why, starting in the next couple of weeks, Bill Bennett, our Secretary of Education, will be traveling to eight elementary, middle, and senior high schools across the country and teaching a class in each one. Secretary Bennett will not only be honoring the teaching profession and paying tribute to the art of teaching, he should be having something of a learning experience for himself as well. Now, I remember from my own school days the tough time we used to give substitute teachers, and I warned Bill he might be getting in over his head. But he said he's had a lot of practice dealing with unruly groups like the Congress. Still, I'm going to ask all of you kids who may be in his class -- as a favor to me -- go easy on him.

Unfortunately, parents today all too often find themselves confronted with so-called experts and a large battery of misguided opinion that says their children's education should be what they call value-neutral. Well, to me, and I bet most Americans, a value-neutral education is a contradiction in terms. The American people have always known in their bones how intimately knowledge and values are intertwined. We don't expect our children to rediscover calculus on their own, but some would give them no guidance when it comes to the even more fundamental discoveries of civilization: our ethics, morality, and values. If we give our children no guidance here, if we give them only a value-neutral education, we're robbing them of their most precious inheritance -- the wisdom of generations that is contained in our moral heritage.

Our Founding Fathers weren't neutral when it came to values. ``We hold these truths to be self-evident,'' they wrote in the Declaration of Independence, ``that all men are created equal,'' and that they're ``endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable Rights.'' Our forefathers found their inspiration, justification, and vision in the Judeo-Christian tradition that emphasizes the value of life and the worth of the individual. It most certainly was never their intention to bar God from our public life. And, as I have said before, the good Lord who has given our country so much should never have been expelled from our nation's classrooms.

My message to parents is simply this: Your school system exists to serve you; keep getting involved. The more parents get involved with their children's schooling and education, the better it will be and the brighter the future of our country will be.

Finally, I'd like to address a few words to all you students. If you're anything like me when I was in school, you're looking forward to the beginning of the school year with mixed feelings. You've probably got those ``end-of-summer blues'' now, but soon you'll be wrapped up in the excitement of your classes. But you, too, can help make America's educational system second to none. If your teachers don't give you homework, ask them why not. If discipline is lax, see how you can help to make it better. It's your right to learn, your right to the opportunities that a good education can bring. Remember, you're not only studying for yourself but for your family, your community, your country, and your God. So, go for it, kids. Give it your best effort.

The President. Well, we're working on the schedule of appearances and so forth. I will be taking this issue to the people. I think they're the ones who have to show us exactly what they think. And according to all the evidence we have so far, the people are pretty much united that tax reform is exactly what we need. I think they have been misinformed to a certain extent by some pressure groups that want one item or the other taken out of the tax reform program. But we feel we have a good reform there, and it'll be the first one, literally, that we've ever had in the income tax.

Mr. Doty. How do you plan to persuade Congress to accept both budget cuts and tax reform, particularly now that you're getting some negative reaction, not only from Democrats but also from Republicans in both House and Senate?

Now, the same thing is true of the budget. It is true that they have gotten together, and before they went home they passed a budget resolution in the Congress. It's a nonbinding resolution; it is a compromise. I still think that the budget we originally submitted was the best for dealing with the deficit problem and reducing government spending. But we now have this one, and, again, if there is disagreement, it would be over particular items -- where to cut, for example, and how much. I'm going to be watching it very carefully because each one of the features has to be augmented by legislation and appropriation bills, and I'm prepared to veto at any time if they start to add in things that would increase the deficit. And I know that there are a number of spending bills that are still before the Congress.

Mr. Doty. President Harry Truman once kept Congress in session when the Members wanted to go home. Do you have any plans for keeping them in session, perhaps through Christmas and New Year's, in order to force tax reform or spending cuts?

I don't think I would mention them now. But, no, we haven't considered that. We've just thought that we're going to do everything we can to aid the Congress in dealing with these and getting the plate cleared this year.

Mr. Doty. Mr. President, here in Washington, the uproar over apartheid in South Africa is reaching something of a crescendo and there's talk of economic sanctions against South Africa. If Congress passes such sanctions, what will be your reaction: veto or no veto?

The President. Well, Dick, I've always refused to say whether I will specifically veto something before it gets to my desk because you never know just exactly what it's going to look like when it gets there. I will tell you that I am basically opposed to the idea of punitive sanctions. I think in this particular case -- South Africa -- they would hurt the very people we want to help. They would have an effect on the economy that would result in more unemployment, setbacks in the gains that have been made by labor and by the blacks in South Africa. And so, I can tell you I'm standing back and looking with a kind of jaundiced eye at what may come to me. But then, the final decision as to whether to veto or not will depend on exactly what does hit my desk.

The President. Well, that's a decision that I have to give an answer to in the next several days. I'll answer that in a broad brush stroke also. I am opposed to protectionism. Protectionism is a two-way street, and you may help some particular industry with protectionism or some group of employees, and you find that you've done it at the expense of other employees. And I recall very well in the Great Depression back in the early thirties when this country did turn to protectionism with the mistaken belief that it might help somehow in the Depression. It was then the Smoot-Hawley tariff bill, and all it did was expand the Depression more worldwide than it was and make it worse and prolong it. So, I have to tell you, basically, I don't think that protectionism is the way to go. We're trying to talk to our trading allies about a meeting to get trade more open, more fair, between all countries -- open markets in all countries.

The President. Well, I'm looking forward to the talks with him, and I hope that it won't be just a session of trying to make some agreements on particular, specific issues, but that we can get right down to discussing the problems between us and an agenda for the future so that we can eliminate the hostilities and the suspicions, if that's possible. There's no question but that the Soviet Union has made it plain that they are embarked on an expansionist program. They believe in the one-world Communist state, the world revolution. But at the same time, you have to wonder if this is not based on their fear and suspicion that the rest of us in the world mean them harm.

Now, I think that we can present evidence to show that we have no such intention and if we could discuss things from the standpoint that we're the only two nations in the world, I believe, that could start world war III. We're also the only two nations in the world that could bring about world peace, and I would think that that would be our task in history -- to deal with that problem.

And I'm going to do my best to present the evidence that would show and prove that this country has no intention of taking hostile action against them and also, however, that we believe we have good reason to believe -- to think -- that they do have hostile intent -- their expansionism worldwide, their invasion of Afghanistan, and so forth. But I wish we could get that out on the table and, hopefully, reduce the suspicions between us.

Mr. Mohan. Thank you so very much, Mr. President, for this opportunity to talk with you this morning. Since time is at a premium, I have a three-part question regarding South Africa, sir. In view of the increased unrest in South Africa, Mr. President, do you anticipate any change in our policies in South Africa?

The President. No, not really, because I have to look at what has been accomplished so far. Our relationship with South Africa, which has always over the years been a friendly one -- we have made it plain, in spite of that, that apartheid is very repugnant to us and that they should go down the path of reform and bringing about a more perfect democracy in their country. And our present relationship has, we believe, resulted in some very substantial changes: the very fact that now the blacks have ability -- being in labor unions or even having their own labor unions; the fact they can buy property in the heretofore white areas; that they can own businesses in some 40 white-dominated business districts. They have eliminated the segregation that we once had in our own country -- the type of thing where hotels and restaurants and places of entertainment and so forth were segregated -- that has all been eliminated. They recognize now interracial marriages and all.

But we believe that for us to take an action now such as some are suggesting, turning our backs and walking away, would leave us with no persuasive power whatsoever. We think that if we continue we can help the present administration there, which is a reformist administration as evidenced by the things that I have just mentioned.

The President. Well, I was very pleased to see his clarifying statement -- yesterday, I believe it was -- and what he had to say about that and his apology to Bishop Tutu. It seems from what I could read that his original statements were based on more, not his judgment, but on quotations from those people that he had met with in South Africa -- both blacks and whites. You know, we must recognize that the black majority in South Africa is a combination of minorities. There are at least 10 tribal divisions there. And so, he heard that some considered Bishop Tutu a leader; others rejected him as a leader. And this is what he was trying to say. But I was very pleased when he went public and said that his use of the word ``phony'' was really an unfortunate choice of words, and he certainly had never meant in any way to describe the character or the beliefs or philosophy of Bishop Tutu. He was trying -- he used mistakenly, the word to describe the thing that he had found -- that he was not recognized as a black leader of all the blacks.

Mr. Mohan. Okay. The next question I have regards tax reform, Mr. President. Several members of the Georgia congressional delegation are saying that tax reform will be the first order of business when Congress reconvenes. After all the gnashing of teeth, debate, and compromise, can the American people expect any reform in the tax system this year?

The President. I have to be optimistic and believe they can, because we're going to push very hard for it. You see, if we don't do it this year, then we've got to wait a whole other year, another year before this can be implemented. I think there are such advantages to the program, the tax reform program that we've presented: the simplification, the fairness, the advantage to the family. I was greatly encouraged when a committee of the House, dominated by the opposing party, came forth the other day with a statement that this tax plan as we've presented it offers the most advantages to the American family of any of the tax proposals that have been made. So, we're going to try very hard. I know that with the Congress it isn't so much an outright opposition as it is their concern that they've got too much on the plate to get to this in time.

Mr. Mohan. Mr. President, I have one more question I've been allowed. You have been very kind to allow me to ask you some questions. Since my listening audience comprises about 36 States, I would like to afford you an opportunity to ask them something that they can discuss with me during my show on Monday night. Is there something you would like to ask them?

Mr. Mohan. You'll probably think of a thousand things afterwards. I know that's sort of slipping it in the back door. I didn't check with Sue Mathis on that, but I thought perhaps you would have something that you might like to ask them because they'll be talking to me on Monday night.

The President. Well, there are a couple of things where I think there's a possibility of great misinformation: one we've just been talking about -- the tax reform. I know that the people have been told where we're eliminating a number of so-called tax deductions and so forth in return for the much lower rates; that if the people have any questions as to exactly how this would come out for them regarding what the fairness would be -- would their taxes be increased or reduced? They, in fact, will be reduced. The only people who have to fear this are those people who've been avoiding their fair share of taxation by taking advantage of certain tax shelters and loopholes and so forth -- but if they would ask, so that they would know and understand.

Mohan referred to Susan K. Mathis, Deputy Director of Media Relations. A tape was not available for verification of the content of this interview, which was released by the Office of the Press Secretary on August 26.

Mr. Regalado. Sir, 2 years ago in the White House, I asked you about the Kennedy-Khrushchev agreement, and you said that as far as you're concerned, that agreement has been abrogated many times by the Russians and Cuba. My question, sir, is are you prepared to denounce that agreement publicly and officially?

The President. Ah. Well, actually, that was an agreement, an informal agreement; it had no legal standing. And it is true that the Soviet Union have observed the most important part, which was not replacing the nuclear missiles in Cuba or having any there. They have observed that. Almost from the beginning, however, there are other facets of that kind of informal agreement that have been violated: the use of Castro's forces throughout the world, such as in Angola and all; his interference in Central America and Latin America in attempts to get overthrows of legitimate, democratic governments and all. So, I don't see where there's any need to take action with regard to that particular agreement, but simply to deal with each issue as it comes up and what they are doing and what they're not doing. And what they're doing with regard to stirring up revolution in Central America is wrong for all the Americas, and I think all of us should oppose it.

Mr. Regalado. Mr. President, as you have said, Castro has been waging war on the U.S. for 26 years, exporting terrorism and suppression in this hemisphere and now trafficking with drugs. Isn't it self-defense to take measures to counter those attacks by Castro?

The President. Yes. And I think we are in dealing with it where he is attacking, such as right now in Nicaragua. We did it before that in El Salvador. When we first came into this administration, the whole question was whether Salvador was going to go Communist. Well, now we have a democracy there. There have been several elections, supervised elections in which we know that they were free of any corruption. Democracy is on the march in other areas, and right now the sore spot is Nicaragua. And we're going to continue our help and support of the freedom fighters.

Mr. Regalado. Mr. President, by the way, speaking to the OAS in 1982, you said that freedom cannot survive if our neighbors lived in misery and oppression. Can you tell us if the Cubans can expect some kind of help from the United States to seek freedom for Cuba?

The President. We have -- on more than one occasion -- we have heard some proposals from the present Cuban Government about wanting a better relationship and wanting to discuss with us how that could come about. We've responded, and then we've found that, really, they had no concrete proposal. They were offering nothing. I do not believe that armed overthrow is the answer, but I believe that we should continue some of the restraints and restrictions that we have with regard to our relations with Cuba but, at the same time, make it evident that any time that they want to prove by deed, not just word, that they are willing and want to come back to the community of American nations, as they once were, we'd be very happy to help and to help open the door for that. But at the present time, they are openly a satellite of the Soviet Union and taking their orders from the Soviet Union, and we see no opening for us to be of help.

The President. I don't know whether we can accomplish that ``entirely'' -- to qualify that word -- but I think that the progress that is being made in Latin America with regard to democracy is far more outstanding than many of us have realized over these past couple of years. Right now about 50 percent of the people in Latin America live in democracies or in countries that are rapidly moving toward democracy. That has never been true before, and we're going to continue helping in every way we can to keep that trend going. But I think great progress has been made.

The President. I would think that that subject could very well come up, because, as I view these talks with Mr. Gorbachev and our effort to try and lessen the hostility and see if we can't eliminate some of the suspicion that exists between the two countries there, I think very much that we would point out to him the contrast between our own conduct and what he is doing with regard to the Americas -- or what his country is doing with regard to the Americas -- by way of Cuba principally, and get that out on the table as one of the facets of the relationship that we think stands in the way of any better relationship with the Soviet Union.

President was at Rancho del Cielo, his ranch near Santa Barbara, CA. A tape was not available for verification of the content of this interview, which was released by the Office of the Press Secretary on August 26.

The Census Bureau has just released news for which every American can be thankful. Some 1.8 million Americans escaped from poverty last year, the largest single drop since 1968. Four hundred thousand black Americans moved up and out of poverty, as did more than half a million children. The poverty rate among the elderly in the United States is lower than it has ever been in American history. I believe these numbers are further proof that the greatest enemy of poverty is the free enterprise system.

Today we increasingly find ourselves confronted with demands for protectionist measures against foreign competition, but protectionism is both ineffective and extremely expensive. In fact, protectionism often does more harm than good to those it is designed to help. It is a crippling cure, far more dangerous than any economic illness. Thus, I am notifying the Congress today of my decision not to impose quotas on non-rubber footwear imports.

As President, it is my responsibility to take into account not only the effect of quotas on the shoe industry but also their broader impact on the overall economy. After an extensive review, I have determined that placing quotas on shoe imports would be detrimental to the national economic interest. While we support the principle of free trade, we must continue to insist of our trading partners that free trade also be fair trade. In that regard, I have instructed our Trade Representative to take action to initiate investigations under section 301 of the Trade Act of 1974, as amended, to root out any unfair trade practices that may be harming U.S. interests.

With respect to the footwear industry, the Council of Economic Advisers estimates that quotas on non-rubber shoe imports would cost the American consumer almost $3 billion. Low-income consumers would be particularly hard hit as shoe prices rose and less expensive imports were kept off the market. Instead of spending billions of consumers' dollars to create temporary jobs, I am directing the Secretary of Labor, through the Job Training Partnership Act, to develop a plan to retrain unemployed workers in the shoe industry for real and lasting employment in other areas of the economy.

Between 1977 and 1981, U.S. footwear manufacturers received protection from foreign imports, but emerged from that period even more vulnerable to international competition than before. In fact, while unprotected by quotas, the shoe industry has begun to show positive signs of adjustment. Producers have invested in state-of-the-art manufacturing equipment, modernizing their operations, and diversifying into profitable retail operations.

While bringing no lasting benefit to the shoe industry, quotas or other protectionist measures would do serious injury to the overall economy. The quotas proposed by the International Trade Commission could cost over $2 billion in compensatory claims under GATT and could invite retaliation from our trading partners. The result would be an immediate and significant loss of American jobs and a dangerous step down the road to a trade war, a war we fought in 1930 with the infamous Smoot-Hawley tariffs and lost. Our economy is truly interwoven with those of our trading partners. If we cut the threads that hold us together, we injure ourselves as well. If our trading partners cannot sell shoes in the United States, many will not then be able to buy U.S. exports. That would mean more American jobs lost. Thus, we find that the true price of protectionism is very high indeed. In order to save a few temporary jobs, we will be throwing many other Americans out of work, costing consumers billions of dollars, further weakening the shoe industry, and seriously damaging relations with our trading partners.

The United States can set an example to other countries. We must live according to our principles and continue to promote our prosperity and the prosperity of our trading partners by ensuring that the world trading system remains open, free, and, above all, fair.

Second, import relief would result in serious damage to U.S. trade in two ways. If the ITC global remedy were imposed U.S. trade would stand to suffer as much as $2.1 billion in trade damage either through compensatory tariff reductions or retaliatory actions by foreign suppliers. This would mean a loss of U.S. jobs and a reduction in U.S. exports. U.S. trade would also suffer because of the adverse impact import relief would have on major foreign suppliers, such as Brazil, who are heavily indebted and highly dependent on footwear exports. Import relief would lessen the ability of these foreign footwear suppliers to import goods from the United States and thus cause an additional decline in U.S. exports.

Third, I do not believe that providing relief in this case would promote industry adjustment to increased import competition. While imports of non-rubber footwear have increased rapidly over the last 12 months, I believe that the industry has been and is in the process of successfully adjusting to increased import competition. An industry that was once characterized by many small firms with limited manufacturing capability, has now emerged as an industry led by larger, more efficient producers who have invested in state of the art manufacturing equipment, diversified into profitable retail operations, and filled out their product lines with imports to respond to rapidly changing consumer taste.

While the escape clause provisions of the Trade Act of 1974 require the ITC to determine the question of whether a domestic industry has been seriously injured as a result of increased imports, I am charged with the responsibility of determining whether the provision of import relief to the domestic industry is in the national economic interest. After considering all relevant aspects of the case, including those set forth in Section 202(c) of the Trade Act of 1974, I have determined that granting import relief would not be in the national economic interest. I believe my decision today will promote our national economic interest by encouraging an open, nondiscriminatory and fair world economic system, a system in which jobs are created and prosperity grows through increased productivity and competitiveness in an open market. As my determination does not provide import relief to the industry, I am setting forth the reasons for my decision.

I was gratified to hear from you of the important accomplishments of your government's ongoing investigation of the murder of thirteen persons, including American and Salvadoran citizens, in a brutal raid in San Salvador on June 19, 1985. I congratulate you on the speed and professionalism of the arrest of William Celio Rivas Bolanos, Juan Miguel Garcia Melendez, and Jose Abraham Dimas Aguilar. On behalf of the victims' families and the United States, I personally thank all involved.

Terrorism is the antithesis of democracy. By brutal acts against innocent persons, terrorists seek to exaggerate their strength and undermine confidence in responsible government, publicize their cause, intimidate the populace, and pressure national leaders to accede to demands conceived in violence. Where democracy seeks to consult the common man on the governance of his nation, terrorism makes war on the common man, repudiating in bloody terms the concept of government by the people.

I am proud that the Special Investigative Unit, which we in the U.S. worked with you to develop, is playing an active role in the investigation. I shortly will be consulting with Congress to find new ways to assist Central American nations in their laudable efforts to overcome the scourge of terrorism. I hope that, with the support of the Congress, we can help police and military units to respond consistently with the maturity, professionalism, and respect for the law shown by your police in this case. We must not compromise with criminals. Appeasement only invites renewed attack. Terrorists merit only swift, certain justice under the rule of law.

Chapter V of the Supplemental Act, and the provisions of this Order, administer the program of humanitarian assistance to the Nicaraguan democratic resistance authorized thereunder. The Office may, to the extent permitted by law and the provisions of this Order, enter into such grant agreements and contracts and take such other actions as may be necessary to implement the program effectively.

Sec. 3. Policy guidance. In accordance with the FAA, and to the end that such programs and activities are effectively integrated with and supportive of the foreign policy of the United States, the Secretary of State shall be responsible for the continuous supervision and general direction of the programs and activities carried out by the Office.

Sec. 4. Administration. (a) At the head of the Office there shall be a Director, who shall be an officer of the United States designated by the President. The Director shall exercise immediate supervision and direction over the Office.

Sec. 8. Reports. The Director shall assist the President in preparing the reports required by section 722(j)(2) of the Act, including a detailed accounting of the disbursements made to provide humanitarian assistance with the funds provided pursuant to section 722(g) of the Act. The Director shall keep the President informed about the implementation of the program.

The democratic resistance in Nicaragua was born and has grown in response to the steady consolidation of a totalitarian and interventionist Marxist-Leninist regime in Nicaragua since 1979. Most of the members of the armed and unarmed opposition supported the overthrow of General Anastasio Somoza and expected that a democratic, pluralist government would follow.

Very quickly, however, it became clear that the Sandinistas intended to make Nicaragua a one-party state. There would be no room for those who opposed the Sandinistas or who sought through democratic elections to challenge the Sandinistas' right to absolute rule. There would be collaboration with Cuba and the Soviet bloc in assisting revolutionary groups seeking to subvert and overthrow the democratic governments of neighboring countries.

The good will that had existed between the Sandinista front and the Nicaraguan people who had welcomed the new government soon began to crumble. Prominent leaders who served in the government after the revolution and who had led the opposition to Somoza fled the country and broke publicly with the Sandinista regime. By 1982 significant numbers of Nicaraguans were compelled to pursue the last resort for civil resistance of bearing arms against the government because there was no other choice. Their numbers have grown steadily. In recent months, with the resistance forces desperately short of weapons, ammunition, food, and supplies, volunteers kept coming. The resistance could not even provide boots, but people from all walks of life left their homes to join the cause. Tens of thousands of Nicaraguans have gone to refugee camps in Costa Rica and Honduras rather than continue to live under the Sandinistas. Many of these people are poor, simple peasants -- the very people the Sandinistas claim to be helping -- yet under the Sandinistas they lost too much. They lost their individuality, they lost their freedom, they lost the opportunity to control their own destiny.

The $27 million appropriated by the Congress for humanitarian assistance to the democratic resistance recognizes the serious nature of the conflict in Nicaragua and the desperate conditions which have forced people to choose armed opposition and the hard life of warfare and refugee camps over the controlled life offered by the Sandinistas. As Americans who believe in freedom, we cannot turn our backs on people who desire nothing more than the freedom we take for granted. By providing this humanitarian assistance, we are telling the people of Nicaragua that we will not abandon them in their struggle for freedom.

In El Salvador, the opening of the political system has led to impressive reconciliation and the beginning of a dialog between President Duarte and the Salvadoran guerrillas. In Nicaragua we support the united Nicaraguan opposition's call for a church-mediated dialog, accompanied by a cease-fire, to achieve national reconciliation and representative government.

We oppose the sharing of power through military force, as the guerrillas in El Salvador have demanded; the Nicaraguan democratic opposition shares our view. They have not demanded the overthrow of the Sandinista government; they want only the right of free people to compete for power in free elections. By providing this humanitarian assistance, we help keep that hope for freedom alive.

Office will be carried out under the policy guidance of the Secretary of State. Program funds will be provided through the State Department, which will also be responsible for providing administrative services and facilities. Other agencies of the United States Government will be able to provide advice, information, and personnel; however, by the terms of this Executive order, no personnel from the Central Intelligence Agency or the Department of Defense will be assigned or detailed to this Office. I have ordered that the Director of the Nicaraguan Humanitarian Assistance Office shall be an officer of the United States designated by the President, and the staff of the Office shall be limited to 12 officials, plus support staff. The Director will be responsible for assisting the President with reporting requirements, including the detailed accounting required by the law. Authority for this Office will terminate on April 1, 1986, or when all the funds to be distributed are disbursed, whichever is later.

I am proud to establish the Nicaraguan Humanitarian Assistance Office by this Executive order and to begin providing the humanitarian assistance needed to help those people who are fighting for democracy in Nicaragua. I value the support that Congress has shown for this important measure and will ensure that the implementation of the program is fully in accord with the legislation the Congress has enacted.

Section 1. Establishment of Board. There is hereby established, effective August 30, 1985, a board of three members to be appointed by the President to investigate this dispute. No member shall be pecuniarily or otherwise interested in any organization of railroad employees or any carrier. The board shall perform its functions subject to the availability of funds.

Sec. 3. Maintaining Conditions. As provided by Section 10 of the Act, as amended, from the date of the creation of the board and for 30 days after the board has made its report to the President, no change, except by agreement of the parties, shall be made by the carriers or the employees in the conditions out of which the dispute arose.

Emergency Board No. 208 to investigate and make recommendations for settlement of a current dispute between the United Transportation Union and most of the Nation's major railroads represented by the National Railway Labor Conference. The President, by Executive order, established the Emergency Board on the recommendation of the National Mediation Board. The situation appears to the President to be extremely critical.

Nation's railroads move more than one-third of all intercity freight traffic, or more than 100 million tons each month. A strike against the railroads could result in the layoff of hundreds of thousands of employees, who would be idled. Cessation of operations on the freight railroads would halt the flow of $750 million worth of goods each day.

A nationwide railroad strike would have a materially adverse effect on basic industries served by the railroads. The coal industry, for example, relies heavily on rail transport. In 1984 the railroad industry hauled close to 60 percent of total U.S. coal production. Cessation of rail service would force shutdowns of some mines almost immediately. The automobile industry relies on rail service for transportation of some essential materials for parts production and for distribution of a large share of the finished products. The disruption of supply channels during a rail strike would result in the layoff of thousands of employees. Railroads are one of the primary transporters of Department of Defense freight traffic. A strike would severely limit the Department of Defense's ability to move this freight. Finally, although the National Railroad Passenger Corporation (Amtrak) is not a party to this dispute, its passenger service may be curtailed because it contracts with other railroads for train and engine crews. The railroads also operate trains carrying 150,000 commuters each day, more than three-quarters of them in and around Chicago, IL.

Act, which in part provide that the Board will report its findings and recommendations for settlement to the President within 30 days from the date of its creation. The parties must then consider the recommendations of the Emergency Board and endeavor to resolve their differences without engaging in self-help during a subsequent 30-day period.

Through technical error, the staged reductions in rates of duty for certain tariff items redesignated by the Proclamation were omitted. Accordingly, I have determined that due to the implementation of Proclamation 5291 that further modifications to Annex III to Proclamation 4707 of December 11, 1979, set forth in Annex XII to this Proclamation, are appropriate in order to ensure the application of such reductions in customs duties for articles classified in those tariff items.

Lucia, and St. Vincent and the Grenadines) within the required ninety-day period. As provided by section 213(c)(3) of the CBERA, I have entered into consultations with these five beneficiary countries. These countries do not export sugar or beef products to the United States and, therefore, have determined not to submit stable food production plans at this time. Should they wish to export either sugar or beef products in the future, they may submit a stable food production plan for review by the United States Government at that time. In accordance with section 213(c)(2)(A) of the CBERA, I am suspending duty-free treatment extended under the CBERA to sugar and beef products that are the product of these five beneficiary countries. I will terminate the suspension of duty-free treatment under the CBERA imposed by this Proclamation with regard to any affected beneficiary countries which take appropriate action to remedy the factors on which the suspension was based.

Proclamation and which are imported into the customs territory of the United States in accordance with general headnote 3 of the TSUS (as modified by Annex I to this Proclamation) on or after the effective date of this Proclamation are eligible for duty-free treatment, and a rate of duty of ``Free'' applicable to such products is inserted in the column in the TSUS entitled ``Special'' followed by the symbol ``I'' in parentheses.

Last Wednesday I notified Congress of my decision not to impose either quotas or tariffs on foreign shoe imports into this country. I'd like to talk with you about that decision because the case of shoe imports illustrates why so-called protectionism is almost always self-destructive, doing more harm than good even to those it's supposed to be helping.

Advocates of protectionism often ignore its huge hidden costs that far outweigh any temporary benefits. The Council of Economic Advisers estimates that the quotas on shoe imports that I turned down would have cost the American consumer nearly $3 billion, and there are other costs.

Quotas would have entitled our trading partners to another $2 billion in compensation, or they would have retaliated, slapping quotas or tariffs on the products we sell to them. That would mean an immediate loss of American jobs and a dangerous step down the road to a trade war.

Protectionism almost always ends up making the protected industry weaker and less able to compete against foreign imports. Between 1977 and 1981, U.S. footwear manufacturers received protection from foreign imports, but at the end of that time they were more vulnerable to foreign competition than before. Instead of protectionism, we should call it destructionism. It destroys jobs, weakens our industries, harms exports, costs billions of dollars to consumers, and damages our overall economy.

Of course, free trade also means fair trade. We will move vigorously against unfair trading practices, using every legal recourse available to give American manufacturers a fair shake at home and open markets abroad. The balance of trade has become a very emotional issue; some claim our trade deficit has cost us millions of jobs. Congress is awash in bills calling for trade sanctions and retaliation. But look at the facts: In 1980 we had a trade surplus, and about 99 million Americans had jobs. Today we have a trade deficit, and almost 107 million Americans are working. Despite a growing trade deficit, we've gained over 7\1/2\ million new jobs since 1980.

And one of the first victims of a protectionist trade war will be America's farmers, who have it tough enough already. A news story the other day said protectionist fervor on the Hill is stronger than it has been since the 1930's. Well now, some of us remember the 1930's, when the most destructive trade bill in history, the Smoot-Hawley tariff act, helped plunge this nation and the world into a decade of depression and despair. From now on, if the ghost of Smoot-Hawley rears its ugly head in Congress, if Congress crafts a depression-making bill, I'll fight it. And whether it's tax, trade, or farm legislation that comes across my desk, my primary consideration will be whether it is in the long-run economic interest of the United States. And any tax hike or spending bill or protectionist legislation that doesn't meet the test of whether it advances America's prosperity must and will be opposed.

America is getting stronger, not weaker. Our 23-percent tax rate cuts have given us 2\1/2\ years of economic expansion, a dramatic increase in after-tax personal income, and the most dramatic drop in poverty in 10 years. We must not retreat into the failed policies of the past, whether they be protectionism or higher taxes. Let's go forward by cutting income tax rates again and building opportunity. On Monday we'll be recognizing America's working men and women. We've created over 7 million jobs in the last 4\1/2\ years. On this Labor Day, let's challenge ourselves to create 10 million more in the next four. To do that, we're going to have to be courageous, hopeful, hard working, and proud, which pretty well sums up what it means to be an American. There is one quality I left out: faith in the loving God who will continue to guide us on the optimistic course we've set.

In the history of Eastern Europe since World War II, there have been few events whose anniversaries can be celebrated with any sense of pride or satisfaction. The lot of these countries has been one of repression, of sacrifice, of waiting for a better day that never comes. Five years ago, however, in a unique, spontaneous, and overwhelming expression of the public will, the working people of Poland exacted from their government the right to form their own free trade unions. The myth of the ``worker state,'' as Communist governments so misleadingly characterize themselves, was thereby shattered for all time.

During the ensuing 15 months, some 10 million Polish citizens banded together under the banner of the Solidarity movement, to be joined by 4 million farmers who created their own union along similar lines. Their goals were no different from those of the working class throughout the world -- decent working conditions, a fair wage, an economic system that works, and a genuine voice in shaping the society of which they form the foundation. They pursued those goals then, as they do today, not with force, for they had no weapons other than indomitable courage, steadfast will, and a readiness to accept high risks in pursuit of their cause. Not one drop of blood was shed when Polish workers gained their victory, and Solidarity has consistently eschewed violence in any form ever since.

These brave aspirations were brought to a temporary standstill in December 1981, when, pressured by Moscow, Gen. Wojciech Jaruzelski used the Polish Armed Forces to impose martial law on his own people, to arrest most of Solidarity's leaders and many of the rank and file, to force others into hiding, and to withdraw from the union its legal right to exist. Since that day, the alienation of the Polish Government from the people it professes to represent has become all too evident.

But Solidarity has not died, nor have the principles for which it came into existence become any less urgent in the minds of the Polish people. Despite all oppressive measures, provocations, imprisonment, police brutality, and even killings, this, the only free trade union in the entire Communist world, has continued its struggle by peaceful means to persuade its government to provide all elements of the society a role in shaping Poland's destiny. Although Solidarity's voice has been muted by being forced underground, its message -- whether via underground radio, clandestine publications, public demonstrations, or by simple word of mouth -- continues to be heard clearly throughout Poland and throughout the world, wherever there are people who value freedom.

It asks only that basic human rights be observed and that Poland be governed by responsible and responsive leaders. It asks those leaders to seek participation of workers, managers, and technocrats, academicians and intelligentsia, and the cohesive strength of the church in grappling with the massive economic and societal problems which must be solved if Poland is to assume its rightful place within the brotherhood of nations. Should such a reconciliation take place, the traditional hand of American friendship will be ready and unreservedly extended to Poland, just as it has been throughout the last 200 years. Meanwhile, we shall continue to support the legitimate hopes of our Polish brothers and sisters who are defending our common values.

Eleven years ago today the United States, Canada, and 33 European countries signed in Helsinki the Final Act of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe (CSCE). The signatories undertook to observe important standards of international conduct and to pursue practical steps to reduce the barriers dividing Europe between East and West.

Final Act is an eloquent statement of hopes and goals to which the United States fully subscribed, because its principles were rooted in our own philosophy and traditions. The United States remains firmly committed to the full implementation of the Final Act in all its provisions and to the indivisibility of its human, security, and economic dimensions.

Unfortunately, the Soviet Union and its East European allies have repeatedly failed to carry out many of their Helsinki pledges. There has been limited progress since the signing of the Final Act. But the reality of Europe's division remains, and the most important promises of a decade ago have not been kept. That was our assessment on the 10th anniversary last year. It remains our assessment today.

Eastern Governments continue to impede the free flow of people, information, and ideas. They continue to repress those who seek to exercise freedoms of religion, thought, conscience, and belief. They continue to disregard Final Act provisions as they choose.

The Final Act recognized the interrelationship between these goals, that the interests of individual human beings are a fundamental part of progress toward peace in Europe, that a more stable peace among nations depends on greater freedom for the people of Europe. The ambitious goals of the Helsinki process can be achieved only through balanced progress on all fronts. The next followup meeting of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe will open in Vienna this November. An important task of that meeting will be to take stock of the promises made and the promises kept, and to weigh the balance among the various dimensions of the Helsinki process. Governments must be made to account at Vienna for their commitments.

United States takes its commitments under the Final Act seriously and will continue to strive for the full realization of its goals for all the peoples of Europe. We call upon others to do likewise. We will work to ensure that the upcoming meeting in Vienna will mark a step toward making the promises of Helsinki's first decade a reality in its second.

President today announced that U.S. trade officials have successfully renegotiated a stronger and more comprehensive multifiber arrangement (MFA) that will help the textile and apparel industries compete more fairly in the international marketplace.

The new 5-year MFA concluded this morning in Geneva significantly improves on the MFA that expired on July 31. It expands coverage to previously uncontrolled fibers such as ramie, linen, and silk blends, so that textile products made of fabrics engineered to circumvent our bilateral agreements can be restrained. It also provides a mechanism to prevent destructive import surges and improves provisions to prevent fraud. We also made clear in these negotiations that we would continue to pursue measures in our bilateral agreements that will open markets to our textile exports. The new MFA, coupled with tougher bilateral agreements with major trading partners such as Taiwan and Hong Kong, will allow us to moderate growth in textile and apparel imports without incurring reprisals against U.S. exports abroad.

This is an orderly and positive program that stands in sharp contrast with the sledgehammer approach of the Textile and Apparel Trade Enforcement Act. That legislation would cost consumers an extra $44 billion for clothing over the next 5 years -- $70,000 for each job supposedly protected by the bill. And by requiring the unilateral and illegal abrogation of our international agreements, the bill would guarantee retaliation against U.S. exporters -- including the agricultural, aerospace, and high-technology, electronics sectors -- threatening the jobs of the 5 million Americans who produce goods for export.

It would pit industry against industry, worker against worker, and region against region. If this legislation becomes law, our trading partners would likely refuse to adhere to the multifiber arrangement and other international agreements. By renegotiating the MFA, we have provided the maximum possible protection for American textile workers without sacrificing jobs in our healthy export industries or overburdening American consumers.

The President. Well, ladies and gentlemen, I think you all know who we have here with us today. And certainly his being here is an answer to a great many prayers by all of us, and we're delighted to have Father Jenco with us. And now, Father Jenco.

Jenco. I'd like to make a public statement: I have already expressed my joy and gratitude over being home -- home with my family, both physical and spiritual. I'm about to meet with the President later, to whom I shall convey the confidential message from my captors. This completes my mission. I've met with His Holiness the Pope, the Archbishop of Canterbury, and now I'm meeting with President Reagan. I'm not a politician; I'm a pilgrim. I believe, nevertheless, that there is a resolution to the tragedy of Lebanon that is based on our common belief in an Almighty God.

I appeal to those who held me captive, to those still holding Tom, Terry, and David, and this situation. The best way they can do this would be to accept the invitation of Mr. Terry Waite to continue the dialog aimed at resolving the situation. He is a churchman, a man who knows the thinking of those in authority in both the Catholic and Anglican Churches. It must be resolved soon. Our common beliefs dictate this. Our humanity demands it. I pray for those being held captive, and I also pray for my captors. I thank you.

The President noted that his happiness on this occasion is tempered by the knowledge that other Americans remain captive in Lebanon. The warm welcome that Father Jenco has received this week from the Pope, the Archbishop of Canterbury, and his friends, family, and nation serves as a tribute to a brave man and his faith. The President said he is grateful for the work of those of many different nationalities and organizations who continue to work for the safe return of all hostages -- of whatever nationality.

President has made a decision today to allow grain to be sold to the Soviet Union at current world market prices in sufficient quantities to fulfill the terms of the U.S.-Soviet long-term grain agreement. The unfulfilled portion of the contract calls for the Soviets to purchase 4 million metric tons of U.S. wheat by September 30, 1986.

Section 301 of the Trade Act of 1974, as amended (19 U.S.C. 2411), I have determined that use of a duty paying system to calculate customs duties by the authorities on Taiwan violates a trade agreement and is unjustifiable and unreasonable and a burden or restriction on U.S. commerce. Under Section 301 of the Trade Act, I have determined to retaliate commensurately against Taiwan so long as it fails to meet its obligations in this regard and am directing the United States Trade Representative to propose an appropriate method for such retaliation.

Through a bilateral exchange of letters, Taiwan agreed in 1979 to observe obligations ``substantially the same'' under this agreement as those applicable to developing countries. This means it should have implemented those obligations effective January 1, 1986.

Instead, it enacted a law effective July 1 under which its customs authorities calculate duties upon the basis of a duty paying system (under which values of import items are determined administratively), rather than upon ``transaction value'' (ordinarily the invoice price). This practice is inconsistent with Taiwan's agreement to apply ``substantially the same'' obligations as set forth for developing countries in the Customs Valuation Code.

I have made these determinations and directed the United States Trade Representative to propose appropriate retaliation to enforce U.S. trade rights and to respond to the Taiwan practices in question.

Canal treaties of 1977 and the Panama Canal Act of 1979 provide the framework in which the United States can continue to exercise its rights to operate and defend the canal in a manner consistent with our responsibilities and obligations under the treaties. In signing this act, which will in part amend the Panama Canal Act, I want to assure Members of Congress and the Government of Panama that this legislation will also be interpreted and applied by the executive branch in strict conformity with the terms and intent of the treaties.

August 1, 1986, marks the eleventh anniversary of the signing of the Final Act of the Conference on Security and Cooperation in Europe, known as the Helsinki Accords. Later this year, representatives from the signatory states will be meeting in Vienna to review implementation of these Accords, including the human rights and humanitarian provisions.

Human rights and fundamental freedoms lie at the heart of the commitments made in the Helsinki Accords of 1975 and in the follow-on Madrid Concluding Document of 1983. These documents set forth clearly a code of conduct, not only for relations among sovereign states, but also for relations between governments and their citizens. This code holds out a beacon of hope for those people in Eastern Europe and the Soviet Union who seek a freer, more just, and more secure life. We and the other Atlantic democracies will not let up in our efforts to see to it that these solemn commitments are fully honored throughout Europe.

Americans will never waver in our commitment to implement fully the human rights and humanitarian provisions of the Helsinki Accords, not only because these freedoms are fundamental to our way of life but because of our conviction they are the God-given entitlement of every member of the human family. Let us pledge ourselves once again to do all in our power so that all people may enjoy them in peace. We also call on all 35 CSCE signatory governments to uphold these just and fundamental principles.

Witness Whereof, I have hereunto set my hand this first day of August, in the year of our Lord nineteen hundred and eighty-six, and of the Independence of the United States of America the two hundred and eleventh.

We've followed, of course, the First Lady's interest in the drug problems for years, but now it seems as if you and the White House staff and the fellows on Capitol Hill are all beginning to move at the same time on this. What prompts the activity now?

The President. Well, let me say, it isn't just a recent thing. Nancy would have never sat back doing what she was doing and let us get away with doing nothing. But we felt from the very first, in 1981 when we came here, that the obvious, legitimate job of government was the interception of -- or the interdiction of the drugs and preventing them from getting to the users. Nancy, of course, had approached it from what I've always believed is the real way if we're ever to get control of this; and that is, to take the users away from the drugs instead of the other way around. And she had been interested in this before we even got here. Finding out how many parents weren't aware of there being a threat to their children -- whether they were unwilling or just didn't know that this was happening in the schools and so forth -- and she had started along that tack.

When we first came here, Florida had been targeted, I suppose, because of its position down there and the inflow by sea and air for drugs. And so, we put together a task force under the Vice President that for the first time, I believe, in our history really put together every agency that could be interested at every level of government -- complete cooperation between Federal, State, county, local. And it was tremendously successful; the inflow through Florida decreased greatly. And as a result of that, we then followed with further units for border interdiction under the Vice President because of the border across the Southwest and our two seacoasts. What had actually happened is: You began to stop the flow in Florida, and they just started diverting and finding other places to land. But as this has gone on, and this increasing problem, we have all begun to come to the conclusion -- and looking at what has happened; for example, look at Nancy's Just Say No idea. That came out of a simple answer to a question before a bunch of young people in Oakland, California, when she was asked about what could they do. And she said, ``Just say no.'' And now there are 10,000 Just Say No clubs among young people throughout the country.

I think it's just the increasing problem that made us finally aware that what is really needed is a nationwide campaign, not just government. But as we've done so many times in the past, when you take a problem to the American people, they now are concerned about it. The polls show that this is on most people's mind -- the number-one problem in the country. And we're going to very shortly be going public with soliciting the help of everyone on both sides. Because it's not only necessary to step up our efforts to make it difficult to get the drugs, but the main thrust has got to be to get the people, themselves, to turn off on it.

The President. Well, there has to be, when you stop to think of some people in some very -- well, the type of work that they are doing. For example, you can't have people in law enforcement who carry weapons, you can't have air traffic controllers and so forth -- have this be a possibility. So, we've always been in agreement on keeping tabs on people in those positions -- using testing. But we're still discussing the ways of getting at this, not only in government but out in business and industry, where it's estimated that the cost now to business and industry in America of drugs and alcohol abuse is about $100 billion per year.

Oh, I'm sorry. Will you be asking your department heads, though, to select those jobs that they consider safety- or national security-related enough to ask the people who hold those jobs to take these tests?

The President. Well, and in some instances, I think it's all right to have it mandatory. That, as I say, people who have other people's safety in their own hands -- I don't think that they should complain about mandatory testing. But in the other, I believe through -- down all the way -- and this is why a nationwide movement, and one at the civilian sector -- to again have that same approach, in business and industry. Let the executives volunteer themselves and say to others, you know, do this, but with that assurance: We're not out to find you and destroy you -- punish you in any way. We're out to help you.

The President. No. If it would help, I would be very much in favor of volunteering to start at the top, and not only in government but in business, industry, the professions, everyplace else as an example to others and be willing to do it.

The President. Well, Mort, there's going to be some of your questions that I can't answer, because we're still in the process. And I'm afraid that any announcements that we have will come after this interview has been printed. But, yes, this is under discussion right now, and I have already suggested such a thing to our top people.

The President. Well, as I say, if the mandatory is only in those areas where you can show the kind of responsibility for national security, for people's lives, and so forth -- there I don't think there can be a quarrel. On the other, I feel that it might be far more productive to go the voluntary way.

Could I ask a question about the money connected with all this? If these people turn up or even volunteer themselves and come forward, is there going to be the money available for rehabilitation required. And also, is there going to be added money for prevention, you know, education programs and that sort of thing? How much more money is going to be spent?

The President. Well, this, of course, is, again, one of the things that we have under discussion, and we know the problem that we have to meet. I think one simple thing could add to the money right now without an additional penny being spent. Having come from being a Governor, one thing that was very much in my mind was getting a lot of Federal grants to local and State governments converted into what we could call block grants. For example, I have to tell you that as Governor of a State I found out that Federal grants that came to us, totally wrapped in redtape and restrictions and absolute directions as to how the money must be used, every dollar of it, that the amount that went into administrative overhead was far in excess of the amount that was then left to do the job.

So, we sought to combine some of these into block grants and then let the people at the local and the State level use this money where it met their problems the most. For example, to say nationwide to a State: You must use x amount of money in an alcoholic treatment. You must use x amount of money in drug treatment -- well, you can't believe that every place in the country had the same ratio of problems.

But when the Congress approved it, what they did would add amendments that put all the redtape and all the directions, specific directions, back in. So, out there too much of that money is being spent on administrative overhead. Now, what we would like to do as a part of this program is ask that those restrictions be taken off and see how far the money goes if it isn't all being spent on bureaucracy.

But does that mean that there won't be any additional money? And the question you get from a lot of people involved in this is: If this is a real war, are we going to devote the resources to it, the money, to really fight it, or are we going to try to nickel and dime it or handle it by rhetoric?

The President. No, not going to be rhetoric. And it's possible that there will be more need for money. On the other hand, you can't underestimate what can be done at the private sector without government intervention. When you look at the amount of money, right now, that is being spent and being raised privately by people in the private sector and is being administered by the private sector because of the help of volunteers -- no one can estimate the amount of money it would take to replace these volunteers with bureaucrats. And I don't mean to denigrate the people that work in government, but they would be legitimately doing the job. But they can't afford to be volunteers. So, we will have to look at this other, and then it has to be a matter of priorities.

Now, in the budget that I submitted and which the Congress -- if it wasn't dead on arrival, they stabbed it right after arrival -- had to do with spending cuts we had proposed in the domestic sector. And those cuts weren't just off the top of our heads. Those came from hours and hours of meetings, day after day in the Cabinet Room, with the people who would be in charge of these programs. And they were the ones who were willing to say that they could do this program for less money than it had been done before and so forth. Then you sent it up to Congress, and they who have nothing to do with the administration of the program say: Oh, no, sir, you've got to spend twice as much money. There, as I say, we've listed at least 40 programs that we don't think are needed at all, that are not serving any useful purpose. So, once again, if this is the primary problem and we're talking about human beings and lives and a whole generation of young people, then I think we're entitled to go back and say: Isn't this more important than some of these other things that you insist we keep on doing?

Mr. President, if you talk to the people who run treatment programs, rehabilitation programs, they say they're swamped -- they are turning people away. And yet they also say that it's been under your administration that there's been less money for rehabilitation and treatment.

The President. The less money was because when we switched to block grants we figured that that had eliminated -- and we know this from the return on block grants in other areas -- that added so much money to the actual work that could be done rather than to administrative overhead that we didn't feel we needed quite as much. But then, when the Congress put back in all the redtape and the restrictions that we had tried to eliminate, why, of course, that left less money for the actual program. But, once again, this is part of what we believe when we start appealing for this national drive. And I've talked to leaders in the private sector of many areas on this very subject; they're raring to go.

The President. No, I think we should offer help for them. I can tell you, however, what the military did, and this is very encouraging. Early on, when we first came here, then the military started taking up this problem within the ranks and found, yes, there was widespread use of drugs, just as there is on some of our prestigious educational campuses and so forth. And the military put into effect a program, and it wasn't one of, hey, you're out if you were found using them. It was a case of offering treatment and help. And then there've been very few that have been ousted. They had a system of the junior recruits. New people were given a couple of chances if they, you know, if they came forth and said: Okay, yes, I will take the treatment. Then if they backslid and didn't -- we gave them two chances. Then the next grade up and junior officers and so forth -- they only got one more chance. And that's what it is at the very top. And so, there've been a very small number who have been removed from the service. But the usage of drugs has been cut by 67 percent in the uniformed services.

But, no, I would think that we might be taking on, then, something that would divide our ranks, because there are so many people who don't believe in the death penalty for anything. So, no, I think the stricter penalties and all of this and law enforcement -- but my own view is that the death penalty would be counterproductive.

The President. Well, I think we've got a problem of whether we have enough. We have one locally in Washington, a problem with whether we have enough confinement facilities now. So, we have to do whatever is necessary there.

The President. Yes, we're talking about human lives at stake. I actually believe that the prime effort, however, if we're to succeed, has to be in turning off. The thing that Nancy's been doing so much of is getting the young people, themselves -- and not only the young people but the others -- to come forward and want to turn off. In other words, want to just say no.

The President. Well, how do you relate that? For one thing, we've had some of our modern day things of interest to young people in the music world that has stimulated this, that it made it sound as if it's right there and the thing to do, and rock and roll concerts and so forth, musicians that the young people like and that make no secret of the fact that they are users, and many times, when they're performing, the lyrics of songs, show business, itself. I must say this, that the theater, well, motion picture industry, was started down a road that they'd been on before once with alcohol abuse. I can remember when it was rather commonplace in films, particularly if you wanted some laughs in a comedy, to portray drunk scenes and so forth as being very humorous. And the motion picture industry decided sometime ago that that wasn't right for them to do, that that was encouraging and painting the wrong picture; and they stopped.

The President. Well, that is in that one agency. But I don't think that counts all the other people that we've organized into these task forces and the dozen such forces under the Attorney General that have other personnel from other agencies plus the local and the military and all the others that have been banded together in this. In other words, the job is just not in the hands of the DEA agents alone. So, I think that's been exaggerated in the way it's been portrayed. As I say, when you've got a team that comes from local law enforcement, and you have access to them -- to State legal or law enforcement people, to military, to Federal, and that kind of cooperation, such as is in these groups under the Attorney General, why, we have added to the personnel that are fighting this.

Mr. President, some members of your own party, in addition to talking about the need to spend more, are saying that your policies toward drug-producing countries contain only carrots and not enough sticks.

The President. Well, there's a limit to what you can do with regard to another sovereign nation. You can't stand in there and whip their law enforcement authorities now. But I don't think that's a fair charge. We have been working -- and here again, the start came from Nancy, when she had the idea of inviting a large group of First Ladies from all the other countries and speaking to them as mothers and wives and so forth and together. And they went back to their own countries, and it started.

I saw the effect of it subsequently at one of the economic summit conferences where, suddenly, the heads of state sitting around the table -- their wives had been a part of this group that Nancy had put together -- and suddenly they said: Hey, wait a minute, what are we doing? Let's us do something. And we are working, and working hand in hand, with foreign ministers. As a matter of fact, Secretary Shultz just said the other day that he, as a result of this First Ladies' thing and what Nancy has done, is getting actual inquiries from other foreign ministers. So, we're trying to work with them and help them. And, yes, there will be problems of noncooperation.

The President. Well, yes, but this if you feel that they are not dealing up to their capacity, that they're shutting their eyes to it and letting it happen. But you have to recognize that, as I say, some of these countries are limited in their means and their ability -- their personnel in handling a problem as big as this. And it wouldn't do any good to punish them for not being able to do more. It would be up to us to find ways where there could be better cooperation and where we can all be helpful to each other.

The President. Oh, well, we can't overrule States and their laws. But I do think that as a part of a campaign of the kind that we're talking, where you're going to want to identify the users in order to be of help to them, in this program now of turning them off on drugs, why, then, I think that we're going to be -- my own view is -- far better off if we do as the military did and offer them -- you can come in and you can ask for help and you won't be punished if you will agree to take the help to try and cure you.

The President. It's such a complex problem. Let me just, along that tack, just tell you something. One community in California that I know of -- know very well -- and they're getting the street hustlers peddling drugs as fast as they can. And they conducted an experiment. One weekend, they just went out -- and because they're pretty sure of who the users are now; they see them on the streets buying -- and they rounded up all the users they could identify, and they just threw them in the jug. And they left them there for a few days, and it was an experiment. They didn't hold them beyond that.

The President. Well, let me tell you what happened. In that period they wanted to find out something about -- this was local law enforcement. In that period robbery and burglary was virtually zero while they were off the streets, which was what they wanted to find out; and that is that, yes, a lot of the crime, particularly the robbery-type crime, is coming from the people that need it to feed the habit -- the pay for the habit. And when they shut them up for a few days, the police didn't have any crimes.

The President. Now, here again, this is the one above all. I think first of all we want to sit down with the teachers, the principals, the school boards, and so forth to make sure that they recognize that in this war it is no reflection on them. You know, sometimes school officials can be a little reluctant to report something, because they're afraid the school board will think, well, they're derelict in their duty. But we want to deal with them and then, yes, we want to get at the students. And it's just like the Just Say No thing. We're going to do everything we can to let them know, again: Come tell us; we'll help. There won't be punishment. Now, if you get the recalcitrant who is just -- he's going to continue regardless, then we've got some wonderful examples where school principals here and there in our country have taken over schools that were really out of bounds, that were running wild, and the kind of principal that just starts -- well, I know of one that had over 350 expulsions, just expelled that many students, and now has a school that is a model for everyone to follow.

Wouldn't you be punishing a lot of non-users, because a lot of those Federal funds are going to individual students in the form of grants and loans so they can go to college. Well, you shut off the grant, and you shut off the ability to go to college for a lot of kids who aren't users. And I don't think that's the way to go.

Okay, the question is: To what extent is the problem with Hollywood that a lot of people out there are using it themselves? And what do you do about that, I mean, as a person who used to be a resident?

The President. And that is at a level of society, also, where we know that -- you know, they have a dinner party and they feel they have to put the drug out on the coffee table, like a cocktail party. And, yes, that has to be dealt with -- that particular problem.

The President. No, the drug thing hadn't hit Hollywood. There had been a time in the past, and I guess in that golden era, when -- as I call it -- of pictures, we were in the afterwave of the reaction to all of that. And as a matter of fact, if you will recall, or maybe you didn't know, in those days when you had a contract with a studio, were under contract as a performer, there was a morals clause in that contract. And if you violated what was commonly accepted as public morals, you were out. Your contract was canceled.

It's sometimes said that if you put three economists together in a room and ask them a question, you're liable to get more than three answers. It's true, economists don't often agree. But there is one issue on which almost all responsible economists, whatever their political persuasion, are unanimous. They agree that free and fair trade brings growth and opportunity and creates jobs. And they all warn that high trade barriers, what is often called protectionism, undermines economic growth and destroys jobs. I don't call it protectionism; I call it destructionism.

That's why our motto is: free and fair trade with free and fair traders. Now, we've seen that governments sometimes don't play by the rules. They keep exports out of subsidy -- or subsidize, I should say, industries, giving them an unfair advantage. Well, our patience with unfair trade isn't endless, and we're taking action to bring other nations back in line to ensure that free trade remains fair trade. We're aggressively using existing trade laws to pry open foreign markets and force others to play by the rules. This week, for instance, we signed a breakthrough trade agreement that'll open up Japanese markets to U.S. semiconductors and prevent the Japanese from dumping semiconductors in our markets. And last month, after intensive negotiations in response to a deadline I set, the European Community agreed to keep its market open to U.S. farm exports.

These agreements are examples of positive, result-oriented trade action. Instead of closing markets at home, we've opened markets to U.S. products abroad, thus helping to create more American jobs. Instead of erecting destructionist import barriers, we're tearing down foreign barriers to make trade freer and fairer for all. Because, believe me, when Americans are competing on a level playing field, they can outproduce and outsell anyone, anywhere in the world. We've been tough with those nations who've been unfair in their trading practices, and that toughness has produced results. And with hard-pressed industries like textiles and apparel that have gone through difficult times, we've taken strong action to help. We renegotiated agreements with Taiwan and Hong Kong over a year early to expand product coverage and tighten controls of imports from those countries.

We are pursuing negotiations with Korea to tighten restraints on their exports to us and improve opportunities for our producers in their market. And just this week we completed a tough, new multifiber arrangement with our trading partners that will include products not previously covered and which gives us tools to prevent damaging import surges. This is result-oriented action.

What doesn't bring results is the sort of destructionist legislation now before the House of Representatives. Next week the House will vote on whether to override my veto of a textile trade bill, and I'm hopeful this won't happen. My Council of Economic Advisers estimates this bill would cost you, the consumer, $44 billion over the next 5 years: $70,000 for every job saved, jobs that pay about $13,000 on average. Even worse, these temporarily protected jobs would be more than offset by the loss of thousands of other jobs -- jobs in retail, marketing, and finance and jobs directly related to importing, such as dockworkers and transportation workers. And then there are all those who would be thrown out of work as we began to feel the effects of foreign retaliation, and you can bet there would be retaliation. I'm thinking, especially, of our struggling agricultural sector and its many connected industries. At a time when we're trying to increase agricultural exports, let's remember that some of the first victims of retaliation would be our farmers -- kicking them when they're already down.

So, our trade policy remains a positive one that will not play off one region against another or one American worker against another, doing grievous damage to the industries involved. In trying to help workers in ailing industries, we must be careful that the cure is not worse than the disease, like the infamous Smoot-Hawley tariffs that deepened and prolonged the Great Depression. The best way to help is with the progrowth policies of free and fair trade that have created more than 10 million new jobs in the last 3\1/2\ years. In the last 7 months 1,650,000 people have found jobs in the United States. There's more than Europe and Japan combined in the last 10 years. And by the way, recently released figures show the leading economic indicators are up and unemployment has dropped to 6.8 percent. You know, the Europeans talk about the American miracle of economic growth and job creation.

President today announced his intention to nominate Kenneth Y. Tomlinson to be a member of the National Commission on Libraries and Information Science for a term expiring July 19, 1991. He would succeed Elinor M. Hashim, and upon confirmation he will be designated Chairman.

The President. Good afternoon. During one of my first press conferences as President, I pledged that fighting drug abuse would be a major goal of our administration. Nancy had already made it her major role. I am proud of the enormous effort that's been made in these last 5\1/2\ years to follow through on that pledge. We've waged a good fight. The military forces have dramatically reduced drug use by 67 percent. We've been on the offensive attacking the peddlers, the transporters, the smugglers, the growers -- everyone who's a part of the international network that channels drugs into America's neighorhoods and communities. Arrests are up, confiscations are up, cooperation with other nations has increased.

So much has been accomplished, and I am encouraged that so many others from every walk of life are now joining the struggle. And yet drug use continues. And its consequences escalate, claiming so many victims, including promising young athletes, and bringing sorrow and heartbreak into homes across our country.

Drug use threatens the health and safety of millions of Americans, it extracts a high cost -- the cost of crime stemming from drugs, the cost of drug-related health problems, the cost in productivity, the cost in the quality of American manufactured goods as we compete on the world market -- but most of all the cost in lives. Drugs, in one way or the other, are victimizing all of us. And that's why I am here today: to announce six major goals of what we hope will be the final stage in our national strategy to eradicate drug abuse. I should point out that each of these goals includes a number of Federal policy options that I will mention as we go along. But as you know, I've always insisted that such steps be the subject of a full discussion and debate within the administration before any final decisions as made.

I will talk today of goals and a number of specific steps, and we'll have further announcements in the very near future. But I want you to know that our announcements will deal not just with what government will do, but what all of us will do -- and must do. For the key to our antidrug strategy -- my very reason for being here this afternoon -- is not to announce another short-term government offensive, but to call instead for a national crusade against drugs, a sustained, relentless effort to rid America of this scourge -- by mobilizing every segment of our society against drug abuse. But as I say, the solution does not lie simply within the realm of government, Federal or State.

It's time to go beyond government. All the confiscation and law enforcement in the world will not cure this plague as long as it is kept alive by public acquiescence. So, we must now go beyond efforts aimed only at affecting the supply of drugs; we must affect not only supply but demand.

I believe we've come to a time when the American people are willing to make it clear that illegal drug and alcohol use will no longer be tolerated, a time when we will take those steps necessary to rid America of this deeply disruptive and corrosive evil. So, starting today Nancy's crusade to deprive the drug peddlers and suppliers of their customers becomes America's crusade. We mean to reach out to the drug user, and we mean to prevent others from becoming users.

Our goal is not to throw users in jail but to free them from drugs. We will offer a helping hand, but we will also pressure the user at school and in the workplace to straighten up, to get clean. We will refuse to let drug users blame their behavior on others; we will insist they take responsibility for their own actions. And finally, yet first and foremost, we will get the message to the potential user that drug use will no longer be tolerated; that they must learn to ``just say no.'' Nancy spoke those words in Oakland, California, just a few years ago, and today there are now more than 10,000 Just Say No clubs among our young people all across America.

If this battle is to be won -- and it must -- each and every one of us has to take a stand and get involved. Leadership and commitment must be evident, not only in the White House and the statehouse but also in the pulpit, at the workplace, in the union hall, in our schools, and in the media. If we're to defeat this enemy, we've got to do it as one people, together united in purpose and committed to victory. And victory in this case is a drug-free generation. Those who know this country understand that once the American people set their minds to something, there's nothing we can't accomplish. Precisely because the realization is finally taking hold that drugs threaten our nation, neighborhoods, and families, the time has come for a national mobilization, one that strikes now at the heart of the problem.

Our first goal is to seek a drug-free workplace for all Americans. Progress in this area is needed to protect working people and the public and to increase the productivity of our country. It's particularly important that workers in sensitive occupations are clearminded and free from the effects of illegal drugs. To accomplish this we propose to create a drug-free workplace for all Federal employees; to encourage State and local government to follow the Federal Government's example; to solicit commitments from government contractors to establish drug-free work environs; to mobilize management and labor leaders in the private sector to fight this problem.

Our second goal is drug-free schools, from grade schools through universities. Four major steps are being considered: enlisting the help of local educators and school officials; making certain that Federal laws against distributing drugs in or near schools are known and enforced in cooperation with local authorities; encouraging local school districts to expand their drug abuse education as part of an overall health curriculum; seeking a commitment from local and State government to require schools within their jurisdiction to be drug free.

The health dangers posed by drugs are increasingly evident. Our third goal is ensuring the public is protected and those involved in drugs are treated. Three steps are under consideration: encouraging States and communities to develop programs to treat specific drug-related health problems; improving research in health-related areas, including drug testing; bolstering medical and health programs aimed at prevention.

Fourth is international cooperation. We must build on what we've already accomplished and move forward. Earlier this year I raised the priority of drug abuse by declaring it a threat to our national security. Now, our goal is nothing less than the full and active support and cooperation of every country with which the United States must work to defeat international drug trafficking.

To accomplish this, we can take additional steps to expand our joint efforts in affecting or attacking drug and narcotic traffickers at the source; continue Vice President Bush's initiatives to increase the support given by the United States military to drug law enforcement operations whenever it's appropriate; intensify efforts with other nations to hit the traffickers where it hurts, in the pocketbook, by further clamping down on money laundering and other transactions conducted with drug money.

Our fifth goal is strengthening law enforcement. Here again much has been accomplished, but we can build upon existing programs to hit drug traffickers with the force and power of a renewed sense of purpose. The following actions could be part of this: insisting that the criminal justice system give prompt and severe punishment to drug peddlers, the big guys and the little guys; directing law enforcement coordinating committees and U.S. attorneys to prosecute those who sell drugs in or near school property to the fullest extent of the law; instructing the Vice President and Attorney General to expedite a comprehensive new effort on our southern border, complementing current programs, to stop illegal drug entry into the United States.

The sixth goal is primary. We must expand public awareness and prevention. Now, we've come a long way on this front. Attitudes are changing; so, now is the time to enlist those who have yet to join the fight. We can do this by reaching out to all Americans and asking them to join Nancy's drug abuse awareness and prevention campaign; taking a stand in every city, town, and village in this country and making certain drug users fully understand their fellow citizens will no longer tolerate drug use; disseminating credible and accurate information about the danger posed by drugs. Users should know we are concerned and understand there is a legitimate reason to be concerned.

In these next few weeks, the administration will be preparing for an action campaign, based on many of the points I've made here today, to be launched when the kids start returning to school in the fall. So, this is chapter one, more to come. Thank you.

Mr. President, you didn't say anything today about spending more Federal money on drug enforcement; and, in fact, the level of spending has remained current or gone down a little bit. Is rhetoric alone enough to take care of this?

The President. It isn't just rhetoric alone. We're talking about a lot of people who are, right now -- organizations that are actively engaged and so forth. But let me say this -- no, we did step up as far as law enforcement was concerned -- that area.

There seems to be a little misunderstanding about a reduction out here with regard to grants and so forth about drug use and rehabilitation and so forth. Actually, what we set out to do, based on the experience of some of us in State government and local government, was that too many Federal programs are sent out to local and State levels -- just wrapped in redtape and with specific designations as to exactly how every penny must be spent. And we found that that has led to a situation in which many times the greatest part of the money was used for administrative overhead and not actually getting at the problem. So, what we did -- yes, we reduced, but we changed to block grants. And we know from that experience out of the State level that if you give a block grant and trust to the local authorities, their freedom to do this in the most expeditious manner in their area -- treat with the problems that they see as the greatest problem -- that you have more money actually going to the task and not wasted in Federal-mandated overhead.

We know that there's going to be a cost, and we're going to have to look at where we are going to find that money. Because, for example, we believe that schools and workplaces -- we believe that we should -- to those people that are found to be using drugs -- that if we don't threaten them with losing their jobs or kicking them out of school -- what we say to them is, we want to help you get well. Now, if there's going to be increased testing, that is costly. If there's going to be extra burden imposed on the treatment centers and so forth, we're going to have to find funds for that, and we recognize that.

Mr. President, the supply of illegal drugs has never been more varied, more abundant, more potent, or less expensive than it is today. Isn't this new crusade just an acknowledgment that you can't do anything about the supply?

The President. I don't think you should give up on that. You have to do that. What it does recognize is what I think many of us recognized even while we were stepping that program up, and that is, you're not going to succeed until you take the customer away from the drugs. At the same time, however, you can increase the price by cutting down on the supply, by confiscation of the means of delivery and so forth. The Government, right now, already owns quite a fleet of yachts and airplanes and trucks and so forth that have been involved in that trade and that we have already intercepted. And you can make it more difficult for the buyer. But at the same time, the real cure is going to be turning, particularly, our young people off.

Mr. President, what will you say to your critics who say you're 5 years too late -- that if you'd been serious about this, you would have started it earlier, and you're doing it now only because public opinion polls show that it would be popular politically?

The President. Well, maybe it took awhile to see that the things that were going forward -- programs that went from just a few organizations to, as I said earlier, 10,000 organizations across the country -- that that growing thing needs -- that needs the added help that can be given by doing this.

The President. You're saying as if everything that I am announcing is in the past. As I said here, we are still at work on this. This is a kind of a preliminary announcement of what it is the problems and what -- the general format. These specifics are yet to come, and as I say, I'll be making further announcements.

The President. As I've said, we're going to encourage the use of voluntarism where it is not a case of endangering someone's safety. But at the same time, I think we're pretty much agreed that we should make it plain that we're not out to get people and fire them, and we're not out to get kids and kick them out of school for using it. What we're out to do is to see if they will not recognize that we want to help them, and they don't lose from that, so I don't see how that could become coercive.

The President. Well, the only pressure that I could see is, if they see other examples and if they see groups stepping forward and saying, ``Yes, we'll do this in the interest of the cause.'' Well, then there's a kind of a peer pressure put on people.

The President. I will take that question, because in the interview some things were edited out. I spoke of little gratuitous scenes put in for comedy relief that made it look kind of funny, and all fun together -- drugs -- as once upon a time Hollywood did with drinking scenes. But if you've noticed over the years, recently, you rarely see a scene for straight comedy of someone being drunk. Well, the same thing is generally happening. Now, the part that was left out of what I said is that the motion picture industry itself is talking about making sure that they don't do this. You can't police every individual who wants to go wild -- and producing a picture and put in some scene of that kind as the one that I mentioned recently. But also, Nancy has met with the head of the Motion Picture Producers Association -- and that there is a movement going on now in Hollywood as to what they can do about this.

The President. Just recently. And with regard to the music thing -- and we do know about the lyrics of some of those songs, plus the usage and the behavior at rock concerts and so forth -- well, you might be interested and pleased to know that a large number of the musicians in that field are organizing to see if they cannot start promoting rock concerts without drugs.

Under the bill, the university is governed by a Board of Trustees composed as follows: 1 member of the Board is a United States Senator, appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate; 2 are Members of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the House; and 18 are elected by the present Board of Trustees for Gallaudet College.

I, sec. 6, cl. 2. However, inasmuch as the history and role of the university are unique, I am signing this measure, notwithstanding the constitutional issues that would be raised outside this unique context.

Secretary Baldrige based his determination on the following: (1) the Norwegian harvest of minke whales in the North Atlantic was from two stocks for which the IWC had established zero quotas and (2) there had been no indication that Norway intended to comply with IWC standards.

Norway had objected to the IWC decision which resulted in the setting of zero quotas and, additionally, to the IWC classification of the primary stock whaled as a ``protection stock'' which by definition prohibits commercial whaling. By objecting, Norway is not bound by these IWC decisions under international law. Even though the objections release Norway from any treaty obligation to observe the zero quotas, the taking of more minke whales than permitted under quotas is inconsistent with the international conservation standard and, in the absence of remedial or mitigative actions, diminishes the effectiveness of the Commission and its conservation program.

Because the foundation of the effectiveness of the IWC conservation program remains the voluntary compliance of member governments, and the Norwegian decision contemplates compliance, even though delayed, with IWC zero quotas, I am not imposing sanctions upon Norway at this time.

I am making this decision on the premise that Norway will not allow the resumption of any commercial whaling after the 1987 season unless the IWC takes affirmative action to authorize such a resumption.

I have therefore directed Secretary Baldrige, in cooperation with Secretary of State George Shultz, to monitor developments relating to Norwegian whaling carefully during the period of this certification. I will expect to receive any additional recommendations as may be warranted under the certification, and I will at that time reassess my position and take necessary action. I will send to the Congress a supplemental report at such time.

Enclosed is an unclassified version of a classified report which I provided on June 19 in response to related Congressional requests, including a request for projections and comparisons of U.S. and Soviet strategic force dismantlements, inventories, etc., in terms of adherence to existing arms control agreements.

The report further found that the SALT I and II agreements, even if fully complied with, would not prevent a very substantial further expansion of Soviet capabilities. We believe that, absent SALT II, the Soviets would not necessarily expand their forces significantly beyond the increases already projected with SALT II since the Soviet forces are very large and would appear, in our judgment, more than enough to meet reasonable military requirements.

In my letter of June 19, I noted that in view of the adverse implications of Soviet noncompliance for our security and for the arms control process, I had determined on May 27 that, in the future, the United States must base decisions regarding its strategic force structure on the nature and magnitude of the threat posed by Soviet strategic forces, and not on standards contained in the SALT structure which has been undermined by Soviet noncompliance, and especially in a flawed SALT II treaty which was never ratified, would have expired if it had been ratified, and has been violated by the Soviet Union.

I have also noted that the full implementation of the Strategic Modernization Program is critical both to meeting our future national security needs and to appropriately responding to Soviet noncompliance. However, we will exercise utmost restraint. As we modernize, we will continue to retire older forces as national security requirements permit. We do not anticipate any appreciable growth in the size of U.S. strategic forces.

I want again to emphasize that no policy of interim restraint is a substitute for an agreement on deep and equitable reductions in offensive nuclear arms, provided that we can be confident of Soviet compliance with it. Achieving such reductions continues to receive my highest priority. This is the most direct path to achieving greater stability and a safer world.

United States and Soviet Union officials today concluded a week of discussions on expanding cultural, educational, and people-to-people exchanges between our two countries. These discussions were arranged to implement the agreement reached between the President and Soviet leader Gorbachev last year at the Geneva summit to increase cooperation and contacts and to expand opportunities for people in our respective countries to communicate directly with one another. Thirteen cooperative programs in the areas of education, higher education, health, sports, and culture were agreed upon, and about 19 more are under active discussion.

Thank you all, and good afternoon. There are far too many distinguished members and friends of the Knights of Columbus with you today for me to recognize them all, but permit me to extend my greetings to Your Excellencies and, of course, to the leader of the Knights of Columbus, my friend, Supreme Knight Virgil Dechant. I believe you know we're trying out a new technology today -- one with a hookup that will enable me to hear you, as you've been told, if you laugh or applaud. And I thought the best way to test it would be to tell an old story. So, if you'll permit me.

Hey, you know, this system does work. [Laughter] But I want to tell you that I've had a place in my heart for the Knights of Columbus since I was a boy. You see, my father was a Knight, and he never missed an opportunity to express his pride in the K of C or join in its efforts on behalf of charity and tolerance. I can still remember when the silent picture ``Birth of a Nation'' opened in our hometown. Dad told us that the movie portrayed the Ku Klux Klan in a favorable light and that the Reagans were one family that wouldn't be seeing it. Well, even as a boy, I sensed that in taking that stand my father had done something strong and good, something noble. And you know, to this day I've never seen that famous movie.

Americans who give as much to our nation as you do. Last year alone the Knights donated over $66 million to good causes, provided more than 20 million hours of volunteer community service, responded generously to OPERATION: Care and Share, and contributed $1 million to the restoration of the Statue of Liberty. And then there are the scores of neighborhoods throughout the country where the Knights have provided a playground, a basketball court, a football field. Just the other day our Secretary of Education, Bill Bennett, remarked that when he was growing up in Brooklyn, none of the kids used the words ``swimming pool,'' they just told their parents they'd be down at the K of C.

Knights of Columbus, for all you've given America, for all the countless acts of charity you've performed to make our land kinder, friendlier, happier, and more humane, I convey to you the thanks of your country. All that you do as Knights of Columbus arises from the fundamental values you hold so dear -- your belief in a just and loving God, in the validity of hard work, in the central importance of the family. When I talked about these fundamental values myself during the campaign of 1980, there was a certain amount of questioning, even criticism. And then came the campaign of 1984, and I know you must have been as gratified as I was to hear both sides talking about values like neighborhood and family. But it was the Knights who led the way, stressing the importance of fundamental values long before you were joined by me or any other politician.

Today your concern for the basic and life-giving values remains ardent, and I know you feel deeply that nothing offends fundamental morality more gravely than assaults upon the sanctity of life itself. Your church and the Knights of Columbus have been leaders in the fight against abortion from the first.

Recently, Cardinals O'Connor and Law demonstrated the church's commitment to this cause anew. They announced that any woman in their dioceses who could go to the church for help so that none -- not one -- would feel forced to have an abortion because she lacked the resources or guidance to deliver her child.

Knights of Columbus, I know you join me in applauding that action as innovative and altogether courageous. The K of C has long funded prolife efforts, and now Supreme Knight Dechant has announced a new initiative of your own. In his words, you've decided to ``harness your clout'' to restore legal protection to the unborn.

As you put this new project into effect, you can be certain you'll be accused of mixing religion and politics. I receive the same criticism myself for supporting prolife legislation. Yet virtually every law in America is predicated upon the value and dignity of human life. Respect for human life belongs in the public realm; indeed, it represents the very basis of civilization. I know you agree.

As the institution in which men and women receive their most basic instruction and nurturing, the family is likewise sacred; something the Knights of Columbus have understood from the first. My friends, don't you believe the Federal Government should respect the family just as much as you do? [Applause] Since taking office, we've worked to bring government interference in family life to an end, rolling back intrusive rules and regulations. Indeed, later this year, our Domestic Policy Council will report to me on ways Federal programs could be restructured to strengthen families and promote family values. We've proposed an historic tax reform that will raise the exemption for dependents from just over $1,000 all the way to $2,000. Thanks to your help, this tax reform is nearing final passage by Congress.

And just yesterday I announced our most recent family initiative, a dramatic undertaking intended to bring to an end one of the worst social evils besetting our country -- drug abuse. Too many American families have been destroyed, too many parents' hearts broken, too many young lives lost. After discussing this problem with Supreme Knight Dechant just last week, I know you agree -- it's time the United States took drug abuse head on.

In many areas -- abortion, crime, pornography, and others -- progress will take place when the Federal judiciary is made up of judges who believe in law and order and a strict interpretation of the Constitution. I'm pleased to be able to tell you that I've already appointed 284 Federal judges, men and women who share the fundamental values that you and I so cherish, and that by the time we leave office, our administration will have appointed some 45 percent of all Federal judges. And I know you share my satisfaction in the Supreme Court nominations of Justice William Rehnquist and Judge Antonin Scalia. I was especially delighted because, as some of you may know, Judge Scalia is the first Italian-American to be nominated to the Supreme Court in history.

Bishop Vega's case makes clear, the Communist regime in Nicaragua has moved beyond the trampling of general civil liberties to a brutal persecution of the church. The Communists have silenced the church's radio station, stopped its presses, and subjected priests to organized harassment. Churches have been attacked by Communist gangs; in at least one case, a gang carrying machetes and chains.

Today these democratic resistance forces number more than 20,000, over four times the number of troops the Sandinistas had in the field when they themselves came to power. The members of this resistance have chosen to separate themselves from their families and homes; to live in conditions of immense hardship, often with scant water and food; and to expose themselves to the dangers of battle. They fight for freedom. And I know you agree, they deserve our help. To support the freedom fighters and democracy throughout Central America, I've urged Congress to enact a plan to provide Costa Rica, El Salvador, Honduras, and Guatemala with essential economic assistance and to extend $100 million in urgently needed aid to the Nicaraguan resistance. Six weeks ago, the House approved that plan. Now, the Senate must take action.

